Cost-effectiveness analysis based on the atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance/low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion Triage Study (ALTS).The ALTS (atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance [ASCUS] and low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion [LSIL] Triage Study) suggests that, for women diagnosed with ASCUS, human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA testing followed by referral to colposcopy of only those women with oncogenic HPV (i.e., HPV DNA testing) is as effective at detecting cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) 3 or cancer (CIN3+) as referring all women with ASCUS for immediate colposcopy. We conducted a cost-effectiveness analysis of the ALTS trial to determine whether HPV DNA testing is a cost-effective alternative to immediate colposcopy or conservative management with up to three cytology examinations.Data from the ALTS trial were used in conjunction with medical care costs in a short-term decision model. The model compared the incremental costs per case of CIN3+ detected as measured by the incremental cost-effectiveness ratio (ICER) for the following management strategies for women with ASCUS: immediate colposcopy, HPV DNA testing, and conservative management with up to three cytology examinations.The least costly and least sensitive strategy was conservative management with one repeat cytology examination using a threshold of high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HSIL) for referral to colposcopy. Compared with this strategy, triage to colposcopy based on a positive HPV DNA test result had an ICER of 3517 dollars per case of CIN3+ detected. Immediate colposcopy and conservative management with up to three repeat cytology visits detected fewer cases of CIN3+ and were more costly than HPV DNA testing. Immediate colposcopy became cost-effective at 20,370 dollars compared with HPV DNA testing only if colposcopy and biopsy were assumed to be 100% sensitive.HPV DNA testing is an economically viable strategy for triage of ASCUS cytology. The less than perfect sensitivity of colposcopy and biopsy needs to be accounted for in future clinical guidelines and policy analyses.A 7.5-year prospective study of longer than 18 months type-specific human papillomavirus persistence in a routine cytology-based cervical screening population of about 31,000 women in West Germany.The objective of this study was to analyse the prevalence, infection pattern, duration and outcome of long-term, type-specific, persistent human papillomavirus (HPV) infections in a routine cytology-based cervical screening population of West German women followed up for 7.5 years. From a screening population of 31,000 women, a strictly selected cohort of 100 patients with > or =18-month persistent, type-specific HPV infection were prospectively followed up for a mean of 35.52 months (+/-13.0). HPV type prevalence and odds ratios for regression, progression and steady state were analysed, as well as the influence of age and HPV coinfection on outcome. Altogether, 21 different genotypes were detected. Seventy-two percent of women were infected with high-risk HPVs, 24% with low-risk and 4% with unknown risk HPV types; 44% of cases had coinfections with multiple HPV types. The risk of progression in low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions and high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions was the highest for infections with high-risk HPVs [odds ratio: 2.2 (0.79-6.11, 95% confidence interval)], whereas cases with low-risk and unknown risk HPVs tended to regress or remained unchanged during follow-up. The mean duration of infections showed considerable variation among the different HPV types and risk groups detected and ranged between 19.7 and 54.3 months. Age was not significantly associated with disease progression and infection duration, and histology had a poor sensitivity for detecting high-grade dysplasia. In conclusion, detecting long-term persistent HPV infections by genotyping may help to identify women with cervical intraepithelial lesions who are at lower and higher risk of developing high-grade precancer and cancer. This may influence future screening strategies and therapy decisions.Immunocytochemical expression of p16INK4A and Ki-67 in cytologically negative and equivocal pap smears positive for oncogenic human papillomavirus.This study was designed to analyze the cross-sectional comparison of the p16 and Ki-67 immunocytochemical expression in negative and equivocal (atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US)) liquid-based cytology (LBC) samples testing positive for high-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) types with HC2 assay or polymerase-chain reaction (PCR). A series of 199 consecutive LBC specimens derived from the same number of women participating in the ongoing Latin American Screening Study at Leonor Mendes de Barros Hospital, Sao Paulo, were analyzed using immunocytochemistry for expression of p16 and Ki-67 in negative and equivocal LBC samples testing positive for high-risk HPV types with hybrid capture II test (HC2) or PCR. All patients with at least one test positive (cytology, PCR, and/or HC2) were followed each 6 months for 3 years. The follow-up procedure consisted of visual examination, colposcopic inspection, cytology, and HC2 assay. Among the negative cytologic samples, 101 were HPV-positive and 55 HPV-negative. Of the HPV-positive group, 59 of 101 cases (58.4%) were positive for both p16 and Ki67 immunostaining, and 17 of 101 (16.8%) were negative for both. The proportion of Ki-67-positivity increased almost in parallel with the increasing grade of p16-positivity (p = 0.0001 for linear trend). In the HPV-negative group, both markers were negative in 41 of 55 cases (74.5%), and no statistical relationship was observed between the two markers (Pearson, p = 0.595). HPV-positive ASC-US samples demonstrated a simultaneous positive immunoreaction for p16 and Ki67 in 11 of 16 cases (68.7%), whereas 3 (18.7%) were concurrently negative. The relationship between the two markers was of borderline significance (Pearson, p = 0.053), but no linear relationship was found between the graded p16 and Ki-67 expression (p = 0.065 for linear trend). In the HPV-negative ASC-US group, there was no statistical association between the graded p16 and Ki-67 positivity (Pearson, p = 0.281). After 36 months of follow-up of the ASC-US patients, 6 women still displayed ASC-US smear, of which 4 of 6 were HPV-positive and expressed both p16 and Ki-67 markers. Two of 43 ASC-US smears had high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions diagnosed (4.6%), and 1 had low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (2.3%). All of those were positive for HPV, p16 and Ki-67. Patients with ASC-US diagnosis and positive high-risk HPV status and positive for p16 Ki67 should be carefully observed to exclude occurrence of a squamous intraepithelial lesion. The combination of these two markers can be a useful implement for management of women with equivocal cytology.When to test women for human papillomavirus.Human papillomavirus status in the prediction of high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia in patients with persistent low-grade cervical cytological abnormalities.The role of human papillomavirus (HPV) detection in the management of patients with persistent low-grade (mild dyskaryosis or less) cervical cytological abnormalities is unclear. We have analysed cytological material from 167 such patients both cytologically and by non-isotopic in situ hybridisation (NISH) for HPV 16, 18, 31 and 33 and consensus primer polymerase chain reaction (PCR) amplification followed by both generic and specific typing for these HPV types. Cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) 2 or 3 was present in 40 of 167 patients (23.9%), and the positive predictive values (PPVs) for the presence of CIN 2 or 3, of moderate or severe dyskaryosis at repeat cytology and an HPV-positive NISH and generic PCR signal were 100%, 66% and 42% respectively. The corresponding sensitivities were 48%, 68% and 87%. Addition of cytology to molecular analysis improved both PPV and sensitivity, the best combination being NISH and cytopathology (PPV 71%, sensitivity 87%). These data demonstrate that the presence of CIN 2 or 3 in patients with mild cytological abnormalities can be predicted by molecular detection of HPV in some cases, particularly when combined with cytological analysis. However, the magnitude of this prediction is dependent on the population of patients studied, and the clinical role of this approach therefore remains to be defined.Follow-up findings for women with human papillomavirus-positive and atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance screening test results in a large women's hospital practice.Reflex human papillomavirus (HPV) testing has been designated in consensus guidelines as "preferred" for women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US) liquid-based cytology (LBC) results, and colposcopy is currently recommended for patients with HPV-positive ASC-US results. Data from large clinical practices using newer screening methods and current cytology terminology are limited.We analyzed data from patients with ASC-US LBC and positive HPV test results. We also assessed the impact of the presence or absence of an endocervical cell/ transformation zone sample (EC/TZS) on biopsy diagnoses.The information system of a large women's hospital serving an older-than-average population was searched over a 21-month period between July 1, 2005, and March 31, 2007, for HPV-positive cases interpreted as ASC-US (Bethesda System 2001) using computer-imaged LBC. Histologic diagnoses, patient ages, and presence or absence of an EC/TZS were analyzed. The average follow-up period was 7.5 months.Among 4273 women with HPV-positive ASC-US results, the cumulative cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 2 or 3 (CIN 2/3) and CIN 1 rates for 2192 women with available biopsies were 5.1% and 43.6%, respectively. Cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 2/3 and CIN 1 rates for women with HPV-positive ASC-US results were not significantly different for women with and without an EC/TZS.The risk of CIN 2/3 in the study population was significantly lower than reported in widely cited trial data. Neither presence nor absence of an EC/TZS, nor the age of the patient, had a statistically significant impact on the likelihood of biopsy diagnoses of CIN 2/3 and CIN 1 for patients with HPV-positive ASC-US test results.Comparison of HPV genotyping by type-specific PCR and sequencing.Human papillomavirus (HPV) infection is the most common sexually transmitted disease worldwide and there is a strong link between certain high-risk viral types and cervical carcinogenesis. Although there are several typing methods, it is still unclear which test is the best. This study compared the effectiveness of type-specific PCR (TS-PCR) and sequencing, with a focus on their clinical application. A total of 260 cervical samples from HPV-positive patients were tested for types 6, 11, 16, 18, 31, 33 and 35 using TS-PCR and sequencing. The genotype was identified in 36% of cases by TS-PCR and in 75% by sequencing. Sequencing was four times more likely to identify the viral type in positive samples than TS-PCR (p = 0.00). Despite being more effective for virus genotyping, sequencing was unable to identify viral types in multiple infections. Combining both techniques resulted in highly sensitive detection (87% of cases), showing that they are complementary methods. HPV genotyping is an important step in HPV management, helping to identify patients with a higher risk of developing cervical cancer and contributing to the development of type-specific vaccines.Image-guided ThinPrep Papanicolaou tests and cotesting with high-risk human papillomavirus in women aged 30 years and older in a low-risk private practice population.Screening for cervical cancer precursors has evolved considerably with the introduction of new technologies to improve the early detection of disease. The objective of this study was to analyze the accuracy and effectiveness of combined screening with cytology and high-risk human papillomavirus (HR-HPV) testing in a low-risk population of women aged >or=30 years.Consecutive unselected samples from a group of 1871 women aged >or=30 years were screened with image-guided ThinPrep tests and HR-HPV tests during a 6-month period. Histologic follow-up was reviewed among women with positive HR-HPV tests.A total of 85 (4.5%) women had positive HR-HPV tests. In 48 HR-HPV-positive women with follow-up biopsies, 41 (85%) were found to have histologic abnormalities. Thirty-three (1.9%) women with cytologically normal Papanicolaou (Pap) tests harbored HR-HPV, and a cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) 2+ lesion was detected in 1 (16%) of 6 women with histologic follow-up. Conversely, 2 (28%) of 7 women with high-grade intraepithelial lesion on cytology tested negative for HR-HPV during the same period. A case of serous carcinoma with atypical glandular cells on cytology was also negative for HR-HPV, as expected.In this low-risk population of women aged >or=30 years, histology-confirmed CIN2+ lesions were identified in women with negative cytology and positive HR-HPV tests, as well as in those with positive cytology and negative HR-HPV tests. Because both cytology and HPV testing alone missed significant lesions, cotesting with Pap and HR-HPV in women aged >or=30 years appears to be a reasonable option in a low-risk population.Prevalence and typing of HPV DNA by hybrid capture II in women with ASCUS, ASC-H, LSIL, and AGC on ThinPrep Pap tests.Testing for human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA is now a viable option for the management of women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS). The utility of reflexive HPV DNA testing for women with a cytologic diagnosis of atypical glandular cells-not otherwise specified (AGC-NOS), ASCUS subtypes, and low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL) has not been well established. In the present investigation, reflex Hybrid Capture II HPV DNA testing results were evaluated for HPV prevalence and type in 371 women with abnormal cytologic diagnoses of ASCUS-not otherwise specified (ASCUS-NOS), ASCUS-suspicious for low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (ASCUS-L), atypical squamous cells-cannot exclude high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (ASC-H), AGC-NOS, and LSIL on ThinPrep Pap tests. Positive high-risk HPV DNA was identified in 53.6% of the study samples, including ASCUS-NOS 40.2% ASCUS-L 71.4%, ASC-H 37.5%, LSIL 88.6%, and AGC-NOS 0%. We conclude that reflex HPV DNA testing appears to not be useful for colposcopy triage for cytologic diagnoses of LSIL or AGC-NOS.Five-year experience of human papillomavirus DNA and Papanicolaou test cotesting.To estimate the 5-year age group-specific test positives for Pap tests and human papillomavirus (HPV) testing in a large, general screening population of women 30 and older.Using data from Kaiser Permanente Northern California, a large health maintenance organization that introduced cotesting in 2003, we evaluated the cotesting results overall and by 5-year age groups. Women (n=580,289) who opted for and underwent cotesting (n cotests=812,598) between January 2003 and April 2008 were included in the analysis. Pap tests interpreted as atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US) or more severe were considered to be positive. Women were tested for carcinogenic HPV using an assay approved by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration. Binomial exact 95% confidence intervals (CIs) were calculated.Overall, 6.27% (95% CI 6.21-6.32%) of cotests were carcinogenic HPV positive, and only 3.99% (95% CI 3.94-4.03%) cotests had normal cytology and were carcinogenic HPV positive. By comparison, 5.18% (95% CI 5.13-5.23%) of cotests had ASC-US or more severe cytology, and 2.87% (95% CI 2.84-2.91%) of cotests had ASC-US or more severe cytology and were carcinogenic HPV negative.In a general screening population, concerns about excessive HPV test positives among women aged 30 years and older are not borne out.The relationship between HPV16 and HPV18 viral load and cervical lesions progression.Cervical cancer remains one of the most important mortality causes worldwide. It is already known that high risk HPV (HR-HPV) has the main role in the development of pre- or cancerous lesions. Despite the fact that many studies focused on the HR-HPV viral loads as possible biomarkers, the viral load quantification utility for all HR-HPV genotypes is still a controversy. The purpose of our study was to determine if HPV16 and 18 viral load values might be a potential marker for HPV infection clearance versus of pre- and cancerous lesions development.80 women who tested positive for HPV16 and 18 were selected from a cohort of 250 patients. The samples, consisting in cervical smears, were collected in transport media ESwab (Copan). The patient's average age was 36.26 years. HPV DNA detection, genotyping and viral load determination were performed twice for each patient (within one year follow-up).HPV 16 viral load was significantly higher in normal cytology samples and in HGSIL patients than in ASCUS/LGSIL (p value < 0.0312). HPV 18 viral load was also significantly higher in HGSIL cases than in ASCUS/LGSIL (p = 0,038). Independently of cervical cytology, HPV 18 viral load was lower (7.93 x 10(4) copies/microL) than HPV 16 viral load (5 x 10(13)) copies/microL).For HPV types 16 or 18 positive patients with LGSIL cytology the viral load might have predictive value. Our study suggested that patients with elevated viral loads are at disease risk progression and should be carefully evaluated.Does typing of human papillomavirus assist in the triage of women with repeated low-grade, cervical cytologic abnormalities?To evaluate the ability of testing for high-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) using the hybrid capture technique to detect cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) in patients with repeated low-grade cervical cytologic abnormalities and an adequate and normal colposcopy.Hybrid capture testing and LEETZ were performed on 166 women with repeated low-grade cervical cytologic abnormalities who were referred for colposcopy which was to be adequate and normal.A highly significant correlation (P < 0.0001) was found between a positive test for high-risk HPV types and the finding of CIN II,III. In 67 women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance on repeated cytologic studies, a positive test for high-risk HPV types had a sensitivity and specificity of 90 and 96.5%, respectively, for detecting CIN II,III. In 99 patients with low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions found on repeated cytologic study, a positive test for high-risk HPV types identified all patients as having CIN II,III on cone biopsy (sensitivity, 100%), with a specificity of 86.4%. Restriction of tissue sampling to women who were positive for high-risk HPV types would have reduced the number of tissue samplings performed to 20.4%, while identifying 20 of 21 patients with biopsy-confirmed CIN II, III.A positive hybrid capture test for high-risk HPV types is highly sensitive and specific for detecting CIN II,III in patients with repeated low-grade cervical cytologic abnormalities and an adequate and normal colposcopy and may be used in the triage of these women before performing tissue sampling.Cost-effectiveness of using human papillomavirus 16/18 genotype triage in cervical cancer screening.Testing for human papillomavirus (HPV) 16 and 18 genotypes, which are known to cause approximately 65-70% of invasive cervical cancer cases, may allow clinicians to identify women at highest risk for underlying cervical intraepithelial neoplasia missed by Pap cytology. Our objective was to determine the cost-effectiveness of adding HPV-16 and 18 genotype triage to current cervical cancer screening strategies in the United States.We developed a lifetime Markov model to assess the cost-effectiveness of the following cervical cancer screening algorithms: (1) liquid-based cytology (LBC), (2) LBC+HPV triage, (3) HPV+LBC triage, (4) co-screening, (5) co-screening+HPV genotyping, and (6) HPV only+HPV genotyping. Costs were estimated from a payer perspective in 2007 U.S. dollars. Outcome measures included lifetime risk of cervical cancer, quality-adjusted life years saved (QALYs), and incremental cost-effectiveness ratios (ICERs).In our model, the use of HPV genotyping strategies prevented 51-73 deaths per 100,000 women screened compared to screening using LBC followed by HPV triage and 4-26 deaths compared to co-screening with LBC and high-risk HPV. Use of HPV genotyping to triage all high-risk HPV-positive women every three years had an ICER of $34,074 per QALY compared to HPV and LBC co-screening. HPV genotyping with co-screening was the most effective strategy and had an ICER of $33,807 per QALY compared to HPV genotyping for all high-risk HPV-positive women.The addition of HPV-16 and -18 genotype triage to HPV and LBC co-screening was a cost-effective screening strategy in the United States.Role for HPV testing in ASCUS: a cytologic-histologic correlation.Human papilloma virus (HPV) Hybrid Capture II testing was introduced at our institution in mid-April, 2001. Relatively little data exists on the histologic follow-up of "high-risk HPV-positive ASCUS" patients without a previous abnormal Pap result. The results of the cytologic-histologic correlation of 50 patients over an 11-mo period are presented. Our results indicate that significant lesions may be discovered in patients of the "high-risk HPV-positive ASCUS" category who have no previous abnormal Pap history. Of the 50 patients presented in this study, histologic follow-up demonstrated evidence of squamous carcinoma in one patient (2%), high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HSIL) in eight patients (16%), and low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL) in 19 patients (38%). The other 22 (44%) showed chronic cervicitis, reactive changes, or no pathologic changes. These findings suggest a more aggressive clinical approach may be warranted in the management of new onset ASCUS positive for high risk HPV.Prospective evaluation of the Hybrid Capture 2 and AMPLICOR human papillomavirus (HPV) tests for detection of 13 high-risk HPV genotypes in atypical squamous cells of uncertain significance.The use of high-risk human papillomavirus (hrHPV) testing as an adjunct to cervical cytology in population-based screening programs is currently based on DNA hybridization and PCR assays. The aim of this study was to prospectively assess the diagnostic performance of the Hybrid Capture 2 test (HC2; Digene Corporation) in comparison with that of the recently developed PCR-based AMPLICOR HPV test (Roche Molecular Systems) for the detection of 13 hrHPV types. A reverse line blot hybridization assay (Innogenetics) was used as an internal reference standard in discordant cases. Two hundred seventy-one patients with atypical squamous cells of uncertain significance (ASCUS) in cervical samples underwent hrHPV testing. The chi-square test was performed to compare respective proportions. Totals of 160/271 (59%) and 156/271 (58%) were found to be positive for hrHPV with HC2 and AMPLICOR, respectively. Concordant results were obtained for 235 (86.7%) of the 271 samples (kappa statistic, 0.73 +/- 0.04). Considering types 26, 53, and 66 as oncogenic types, negative predictive values (NPVs) of HC2 and AMPLICOR were 92.8% and 87.8%, respectively (difference was not significant), and their respective accuracies were 94.8% and 91.9% (difference was not significant). Considering types 26, 53, and 66 as not oncogenic, the respective HC2 and AMPLICOR NPVs were 92.8% and 97.4% (difference was not significant), and accuracy was significantly higher for the AMPLICOR assay (95.9% versus 90.8% for HC2) (P<0.05). For ASCUS samples, the NPV was 92.8% for HC2 testing and might be compromised if the copy number of HPV DNA was low. The NPV was 97.4% for the AMPLICOR assay and might be compromised if HPV types 26, 53, and 66 were considered oncogenic. The accuracy of these two assays is good and is compatible with routine clinical use in the triage of ASCUS cases.High-risk human papillomavirus DNA testing: a marker for atypical glandular cells.Cervical/endocervical cytology screening has decreased morbidity and mortality, and implementing adjunctive human papilloma virus (HPV) DNA testing for atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance has improved the specificity for detecting premalignant squamous lesions. Currently, there are no guidelines to perform HPV DNA testing on cervical/endocervical ThinPreps with atypical glandular cells (AGC). To assess the potential role of HPV DNA testing on AGC cases, Hybrid Capture 2 (Digene Corp.) testing was performed on 144 cervical/endocervical AGC specimens. One hundred three of 144 cases had follow-up; 60/103 (58.3%) were high-risk HPV negative and 43/103 (42.3%) were high-risk HPV positive. Of 43 HPV-positive patients, 37 had adenocarcinoma in situ (AIS), atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS), or cervical squamous intraepithelial neoplasia, while only one patient without high-risk HPV had a squamous intraepithelial neoplasia. Furthermore, most high-risk HPV positive AGC cases harbored high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HSIL) rather than AIS. Our data support HPV DNA testing of all AGC specimens to detect cervical, especially squamous, neoplasia.Human papillomavirus testing for cervical cancer screening: results from a 6-year prospective study in rural China.Long-term follow-up evaluations of cervical screening approaches are limited in low-resource areas. This prospective study assessed the risk of future cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 2 or worse (CIN2+) associated with baseline human papillomavirus (HPV) and cytologic status. In rural China, 1,997 women were screened with 6 screening tests, including colposcopic evaluations, and underwent biopsies in 1999. In December 2005, 1,612 women with cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 1 or less at baseline were rescreened by visual inspection, liquid-based cytology, and HPV-DNA testing. All women underwent colposcopy at follow-up, with biopsies taken from women with visually apparent lesions or cytologic abnormalities. Twenty women developed incident CIN2+. The crude relative risk of CIN2+ for baseline HPV-positive women was 52 (95% confidence interval: 12.1, 222.5). The crude relative risk of CIN2+ was 167 (95% confidence interval: 21.9, 1,265) for baseline and follow-up repeatedly HPV-positive women compared with repeatedly HPV-negative women. Among 1,374 baseline HPV-negative women, 2 and no incident CIN2+ cases were detected in baseline cytologically normal and abnormal subgroups, respectively. Among 238 baseline HPV-positive women, 6 of 18 incident cases of CIN2+ developed in the cytologically normal group. This study demonstrates that a single oncogenic HPV-DNA test is more effective than cytology in predicting future CIN2+ status.Human papillomavirus infection and its association with cervical dysplasia in Ecuadorian women attending a private cancer screening clinic.Women living in Latin American countries bear a disproportionate burden of cervical cancer, a condition caused by infection with the human papillomavirus (HPV). We performed a study in Santa Elena, Guayas (currently Santa Elena Province), Ecuador, to determine how often HPV could be detected in women attending a private cancer screening clinic. Participants underwent a Pap test, and vaginal and cervical swabs were performed for HPV testing by the polymerase chain reaction (PCR). Each participant completed a verbally administered survey. The mean age of 302 participants was 37.7 years (range 18 to 78 years). The majority of cervical and vaginal specimens contained sufficient DNA to perform PCR. Overall, 24.2% of the participants had either a cervical or vaginal swab that tested positive for HPV. In general, there was a good correlation between the HPV types detected in the cervical and vaginal swabs from the participants, but vaginal swabs were more likely to contain HPV DNA than were cervical swabs. The high-risk HPV types 16, 52, 58, and 59 and the low-risk HPV types 62, 71, 72, and 83 were the most frequently detected HPV types. The number of lifetime sexual partners was positively associated with detection of any HPV type, detection of oncogenic HPV, and abnormal Pap smears. Further studies are needed to determine if these results are representative of all Ecuadorian women and to determine if cervical cancers in Ecuadorian women are caused by the same HPV types found in the swab specimens obtained in this study.Visual appearance of the uterine cervix: correlation with human papillomavirus detection and type.Infection with carcinogenic human papillomaviruses (HPVs) is necessary for cervical precancer and cancer, but the effects of type-specific HPV infection on cervical appearance are poorly understood.Twenty expert colposcopists evaluated a total of 939 digitized cervigrams that were obtained during the ASCUS (atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance)-LSIL (low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion) Triage study after the application of 5% acetic acid. Each reviewer rated the number and severity of lesions in 112 pictures that were matched on histologic diagnoses and HPV typing results so that > or = 2 reviewers rated each image. We used standard tests of association and correlation to relate HPV type and visual appearance.Pairs of reviewers were significantly (P < .05) more likely to agree that a definite lesion was present when HPV DNA was found, particularly HPV16, regardless of histologic diagnosis. However, the link between infection status and visual appearance was weak for each individual reviewer. Interestingly, many women with multiple HPV infections had no visible lesions and vice versa.HPV16 causes more definite visual abnormalities than other HPV types, regardless of eventual histologic diagnosis. Otherwise, the associations between HPV infection and lesion recognition are weak.Resolution of equivocal results with the Hybrid Capture II high-risk HPV DNA test: a cytologic/histologic review of 191 cases.The Hybrid Capture II (HC II, Digene) high-risk human papilloma virus (HPV) (hrHPV) DNA test is an in vitro nucleic acid hybridization assay that uses enhanced chemiluminescence for the qualitative and semiquantitative detection of hrHPV in cervical samples. Patient samples are concomitantly tested with positive and negative DNA controls and results reported as positive or negative on the basis of a ratio of relative light units to a cutoff value derived from the positive control (RLU/CO). Samples with a ratio <1.0 RLU/CO are expressed as negative for hrHPV, samples with a ratio >2.5 RLU/CO are expressed as positive for hrHPV, and samples with a ratio between these numbers are submitted for retesting. These "equivocal" values are resulted as positive for hrHPV if either of 2 subsequent test values equals or exceeds 1.0 RLU/CO. Samples that show <1.0 RLU/CO after 2 repeat tests are resulted as negative for hrHPV.In this study, we evaluated all hrHPV test results over a 17-month period in our institution. Initial tests showing an equivocal result were analyzed for final retesting result, and for all corresponding and subsequent cytology and histology results. All hrHPV tests were conducted on SurePath (TriPath) or ThinPrep (Cytyc) cervical cytology specimens using the HC II hrHPV DNA test. Subsequent hrHPV tests also were correlated with incident and follow-up findings.A total of 4792 hrHPV test results were evaluated. Of these, 191 (4%) showed equivocal initial results. When retested, 178 of the 191 samples (93%) resulted positive for hrHPV on first retest and an additional 8 resulted positive for hrHPV on the second retest, bringing the total positive tests to 186 out of 191 (97.4%). Five samples (2.6%) out of 191 were finally expressed as negative for hrHPV. Corresponding cytologic interpretations for the 191 specimens were as follows: NILM-30, atypical squamous cell of undetermined significance (ASC-US)-138, atypical squamous cells--cannot exclude HSIL-13 (ASC-H-13), LSIL-9, and high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HSIL)-1. Follow-up histology was available for 60 of the 191 equivocal cases and showed cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) II or CIN III in 7 cases, CIN I in 13 cases, and negative or reactive changes in 40 cases.On the basis of the results, repeat testing of equivocal specimens might not be necessary as these specimens are overwhelmingly found to be positive for hrHPV. Additionally, hrHPV tests falling in the equivocal range should be considered as definite positive tests, as follow-up results in this cohort demonstrate that significant histologic abnormalities are associated with 10.5% of these cases (20/191), and with 33% of those biopsied (20/60) cases.[Expression of epidermal growth factor receptor and the correlation with HPV16/18 infection in cervical intraepithelial neoplasia and cervical carcinoma].The aim of this study was to elucidate the role of EGFR expression and HPV infection and their relationship in the genesis and progression of cervical carcinoma.This analysis included 60 cases of cervical carcinoma, 40 cases of CIN and 30 cases of control group. Patients of cervical carcinoma group were all subjected to radical hysterectomy with bilateral pelvic lymphadenectomy in Tumour Hospital, Zhongshan University from 1997 to 2001. The FIGO stage was I a - II b. EGFR protein was stained by S-P immunohistochemistry, and HPV16/18 DNA was detected by PCR.The moderate/ strong expression of EGFR was observed in 0, 42.5%, 76.7% of normal cervical epithelium, CIN and cervical tumor tissue, respectively, with a significant difference among them (P < 0.05). The infection of HPV16/18 was observed in 6.7%, 67.5%, 58.3% of normal cervical tissue, CIN and cervical tumors, respectively. The infection rate of CIN or cervical carcinoma was significantly higher than that in normal cervicaltissue (P = 0.000), but no statistically significant difference was observed between cervical carcinoma and CIN. The moderate/strong expression of EGFR demonstrated an association with the cervical invasion depth. The EGFR expression increased significantly as the invasion depth progressed from less than or equal to a half cervical stroma to deeper than that (89.2% vs. 56.5%, P = 0.004). The infection of HPV16/18 demonstrated a correlation with the cervical canal invasion. The infection increased significantly in the cases with cervical invasion than that in the cases without invasion (88.2% vs. 46.5%, P = 0.003). But no significant correlation was observed between EGFR and HPV. Neither EGFR nor HPV had a significant association with carcinoma prognosis.EGFR and HPV demonstrate a significant correlation with genesis and progression of cervical carcinoma. In our study, neither EGFR nor HPV demonstrates a significant association with tumor prognosis, and no significant correlation is observed between EGFR and HPV.Comparison of p16INK4A and Hybrid Capture 2 human papillomavirus testing as adjunctive tests in liquid-based gynecologic SurePath preparations.p16(INK4a), cyclin-dependent kinase inhibitor, is functionally inactivated in many tumors, including cervical cancer. We compared p16(INK4A) immunocytochemical staining and Hybrid Capture 2 (HCII) on SurePath specimens using tissue biopsies (as the gold standard). Their utility in a spectrum of atypical and preneoplastic lesions, and their ability to accurately identify underlying lesions of CIN II or greater was assessed using biopsy follow-up data. One-hundred and seventeen residual SurePath samples were collected: 43 atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS), 47 low-grade (LGSIL), and 27 high-grade (HGSIL) squamous intraepithelial lesions. Two slides were prepared from each sample; one stained with the SurePath autocyte stain and one immunostained using the CINtec p16(INK4a) Cytology Kit (Dakocytomation). High-risk HPV testing was performed using the HCII DNA test (Digene, Gaithersburg, MD). Available tissue biopsy follow-up data was retrieved. p16(INK4a) was positive in 32.6% (14/43) ASCUS, 46.8% (22/47) LGSIL, and 48.1% (13/27) HGSIL specimens. HCII DNA test was positive in 41.9% (18/43) ASCUS, 78.7% (37/47) LGSIL, and 96.3% (26/27) HGSIL samples. The sensitivity, specificity, positive (PPV) and negative (NPV) predictive values of p16(INK4a) and HCII were: 58.7% and 89.8%, 58.6% and 34.6%, 69.2% and 72.1%, 47.2% and 64.3%, respectively. In patients with cervical biopsies, the PPV of HCII (92.3%) results for a biopsy with CINII/III was significantly higher than the PPV of p16(INK4a) (52%) (P=0.001). Using liquid-based cytology specimens, HCII is a more sensitive test than p16(INK4a) for detection of abnormal cytology. HCII has a higher PPV than p16(INK4a) for identifying CIN II/III.Outcomes of women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance and high-risk human papillomavirus DNA.To study the risk of high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HSIL) and cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) 2 or 3 in women with human papillomavirus (HPV)-positive atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) cytology over a 2-year period using the 2001 Bethesda System and ThinPrep Paps.In 2002, 846 patients with ThinPrep cervical cytology having an ASCUS interpretation and positive for high-risk HPV DNA were identified. A cohort of 514 (60.8%) patients with follow-up by repeat cytology, cervical biopsy or both was included in the study. Patient age was 12-81 years, with a median of 25 years.There were 291 women (56.6%) with negative status by cytology, HPV testing or biopsy with a median interval of 8.5 months, and an additional 174 patients (33.9%) had persistent ASCUS, positive HPV DNA or low-grade SIL/CIN 1. Finally, 49 patients (9.5%) had CIN 2 or 3, with a median interval of 8.5 months.Our study suggests that HSIL or CIN 2 or 3 will be detected in 1 in 10 women with HPV-positive index ASCUS cervical cytology at initial colposcopy or within a 2-year follow-up period.A human papillomavirus testing system in women with abnormal Pap results: a comparison study with follow-up biopsies.To evaluate the efficacy of INFORM HPV using the SurePath collection method in women whose Pap tests indicated abnormal results.Ninety-two women from the gynecology clinics at The University of Texas M.D. Anderson Cancer Center who had Pap tests and underwent follow-up biopsies were selected for the study. This included 51 women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS), 23 women with low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL), 15 women with high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HSIL) and 3 women with negative Pap results. The INFORM HPV, an in situ hybridization assay, testing for oncogenic types of HPV was performed, and the results were compared with follow-up biopsies.The positive rate of the INFORM HPV increased with higher grades of cytology diagnoses. The sensitivity of the INFORM HPV testing for predicting high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN 2/3) also increased with higher grades of cytology diagnoses. A negative predictive value (NPV) of 94.9% and a specificity of 80.4% for predicting CIN 2/3 were observed in the ASCUS group.Using SurePath Pap specimens, the INFORM HPV lacks sufficient sensitivity and NPV for predicting CIN 2/3 in women with ASCUS. Therefore, use of the test as a triage tool is limited.Longitudinal cytological follow-up of patients with a papanicolaou test interpretation of "atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance" that was followed by a negative reflex test for high-risk human papillomavirus types.The 2001 consensus guidelines essentially equated the follow-up management of patients with a Papanicolaou (Pap) test interpretation of negative for intraepithelial lesion or malignancy and those with an interpretation of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US) that was followed by a negative reflex test for high-risk human papillomavirus (HR HPV) types: follow-up cytology in 12 months. As several years have elapsed since these guidelines attained some measure of widespread implementation, we sought to determine whether, in routinely diagnosed cases, the full spectrum of follow-up cytological findings are indeed identical in these 2 groups. Clinical and pathological data of consecutive patients with a Pap test interpretation of ASC-US during a 6-week period (n = 587), in which reflex human papillomavirus testing was performed (n = 497) and in which HR HPV types were not detected (n = 300), were reviewed (study group). A randomly selected control group of 300 patients whose Pap tests were reported as negative (negative for intraepithelial lesion or malignancy) during the same period were similarly reviewed. The follow-up Pap tests were classified into the various Bethesda 2001 diagnostic categories, and both groups were compared. The average follow-up duration in the study and control groups was 26.03 and 25.9 months, respectively. When all of the follow-up Pap tests in each group (study, n = 555; control, n = 356) were used for the comparisons, patients in the study group were significantly more likely to have an abnormal follow-up Pap test result than the control group patients (24.9% vs 7.6%, P < 0.0001); this was primarily attributable to the more frequent repeat interpretations of ASC-US in the former group (20.5% vs 5.1%, P < 0.0001). The HR HPV detection rates in the follow-up ASC-US cases were not significantly different between the study and control groups. There were no significant differences between both groups regarding the diagnostic frequencies of low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion and atypical squamous cells-cannot exclude high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HGSIL). No examples of HGSIL or invasive cancer were identified in the follow-up of either group. All comparisons of statistical significance retained their significance when only 1 follow-up Pap test per patient, the most severe interpretation, was used. Our findings suggest that some significant differences exist between these 2 groups, most notably the comparatively increased frequency of repeat ASC-US interpretations in the study group. However, the extraordinary rarity of the most clinically significant interpretations of HGSIL and carcinoma in this setting can be confirmed because no such cases were identified during the follow-up of either group.Human papillomavirus type-specific 18-month risk of high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia in women with a normal or borderline/mildly dyskaryotic smear.High-risk human papillomavirus (hrHPV) DNA testing is an increasingly used instrument in cervical cancer prevention along cervical cytology. The inclusion of hrHPV testing in cervical screening requires efficient management as many hrHPV infections are transient. We investigated the potential value of hrHPV genotyping in normal and borderline/mildly dyskaryotic (BMD) smears.From a screening population of 44,102 women in the Netherlands, we included hrHPV-positive women with a normal or BMD smear. We assessed the type-specific 18-month risk of high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN).In hrHPV-positive women, 18-month risk of CIN grade 3 or invasive cancer (> or =CIN3) was 6% [95% confidence interval (95% CI), 4-9] after normal cytology and 20% (95% CI, 16-25) after BMD. If positive for HPV16, > or =CIN3 risks were 14% (95% CI, 9-21) and 37% (95% CI, 28-48), respectively. In the subset of hrHPV-positive women without HPV16, HPV18 was associated with an increased risk of high-grade CIN after normal cytology and HPV31 and HPV33 were associated with an increased risk, particularly after BMD. HPV16 and HPV18 were also associated with an increased risk of high-grade CIN in women with an hrHPV-positive normal baseline smear and a repeat normal smear at 6 months.HrHPV-positive women without type 16, 18, 31, or 33 had a relatively low risk of high-grade CIN. Among women with baseline normal cytology and among women with a baseline and repeat normal smear, HPV16/18-positive women showed an increased risk of high-grade CIN. This warrants more aggressive management of HPV16/18-positive women compared with other hrHPV-positive women.Use of p16-INK4A overexpression to increase the specificity of human papillomavirus testing: a nested substudy of the NTCC randomised controlled trial.Human-papillomavirus (HPV) testing is more sensitive, but less specific, than conventional cytology for detecting high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN). We assessed whether HPV testing with triage by p16-INK4A overexpression can increase specificity while maintaining sensitivity.HPV-positive women were enrolled between June 10, 2003, and Dec 31, 2004 in a multicentre randomised controlled trial, which compared stand-alone HPV testing by Hybrid Capture 2 (experimental group) with conventional cytology, were referred for colposcopy. In seven of nine centres, cytospin preparations from these women were tested for p16-INK4A overexpression by immunostaining. The sensitivity and specificity for CIN grade 2 or more, determined at blind review of histology, were calculated for these women. We also estimated the relative sensitivity and relative referral to colposcopy that would have been obtained by HPV testing with p16-INK4A triage compared with conventional cytology. This trial is registered as a Standard Randomised Controlled Trial, number ISRCTN81678807.24 661 women were randomly assigned to the experimental group. 1137 women (74% of those undergoing colposcopy in relevant centres), including 50 with CIN2 and 42 with CIN3 or cancer, had valid p16-INK4A immunostaining. For the endpoint of CIN2+, sensitivity and specificity of p16-INK4A (deemed positive with any number of stained cells-except endocervical, metaplastic, and atrophic cells if morphologically normal) in HPV-positive women of any age were 88% (81 of 92; 95% CI 80-94) and 61% (633 of 1045; 57-64), respectively. In the 35-60-year age group, the relative sensitivity of HPV testing and p16-INK4A triage versus conventional cytology for CIN2+ was 1.53 (95% CI 1.15-2.02) and relative referral was 1.08 (0.96-1.21). In the 25-34-year age group, relative sensitivity was 3.01 (1.82-5.17) and relative referral was 1.15 (0.96-1.37). In the latter age group, when 5% or more stained cells were deemed positive, the corresponding values were 2.06 (1.20-3.68) and 0.58 (0.46-0.73), respectively.HPV testing with p16-INK4A triage produces a significant increase in sensitivity compared with conventional cytology, with no substantial increase in referral to colposcopy.Should all women with cervical atypia be referred for colposcopy: a HARNET study. Harrisburgh Area Research Network.Clinicians who manage women with Papanicolaou (Pap) smears showing atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) may miss clinically significant cervical disease by repeating the cytology alone. We evaluated the ability of the human papillomavirus (HPV) screen and the naked-eye examination after a cervical acetic acid wash to enhance the follow-up Pap smear in predicting an abnormal colposcopic biopsy.Pap smears were performed on all women (N = 7458) attending six family practice offices for a health maintenance examination from August 1989 through February 1991. Consenting subjects with ASCUS underwent repeat cytological testing, an HPV screen, and a cervical acetic acid wash examination immediately before colposcopy after a 4- to 6-month waiting period.Of the 122 consenting women identified with ASCUS, 67 (55%) demonstrated abnormalities on biopsy, including 26 with condyloma, 26 with cervical intraepithelial neoplasia I (CIN I), and 15 with CIN II to III. The false-negative rate, 58%, of the follow-up Pap smear alone for detecting these cases of condyloma and CIN was significantly decreased (false-negative rate, 27%) with the use of the cervical acetic acid wash as an adjunctive test. There was no additional reduction in the false-negative rate with the use of the HPV screen. Of the 15 subjects with high-grade cervical lesions (CIN II to III), 14 had either an abnormal follow-up Pap smear or an abnormal cervical acetic acid wash examination.Among women with cervical atypia, a single follow-up Pap smear alone failed to detect one third of the cases of high-grade disease. Ninety-three percent of these cases were detected, however, with a follow-up Pap smear and an acetic acid wash. Our one subject with a high-grade lesion missed with this combination of tests had an unsatisfactory Pap smear. Use of both tests together may reliably guide clinical decisions regarding the management of cervical atypia.The Mexican Cervical Cancer Screening Trial: self-sampling for human papillomavirus with unaided visual inspection as a secondary screen.The Mexican Cervical Cancer Screening (MECCS) study took place in the State of Michoacán. Primary screening was by self-sampling for high-risk human papillomavirus (HR-HPV). The objectives were to increase the specificity of primary HPV screening by requiring 2 positive HPV tests 1 year apart in women whose secondary screen was negative according to an acetic acid-aided visual inspection (VIA). In addition, we postulated that the sensitivity of VIA would be sufficient to identify large preinvasive lesions and cancers unsuitable for cryotherapy if applied in a see-and-treat algorithm.A total of 8621 women (aged 30-50 years) were screened, and 14.3% were positive for HR-HPV. In phase 1, 11.9% of the HPV-positive women were VIA-positive and were referred for colposcopy with directed and random biopsies. If VIA-negative, women repeated the self-sample 1 year later to detect persistent HR-HPV (25.2% were positive). If persistently HR-HPV-positive in phase 2, patients again had VIA, then all women (both VIA-positive and -negative) received directed and random biopsies. If cryotherapy had been used to treat HPV- and VIA-positive women in phase 1 or persistent HR-HPV-positive (phase 2), the potential risk of undertreatment would have been 4.1%, and 66.4% of the treated patients would have had normal or cervical intraepithelial neoplasia I on biopsy. The VIA triage would refer 0.73% of the patients to colposcopy owing to the lesion size, location, or the presence of a cancer. On the basis of this pilot study, we are encouraged to explore and evaluate a rapid, more sensitive, and more specific self-test.Human papillomavirus typing and viral gene expression analysis for the triage of women with abnormal results from papanicolaou test smears to colposcopy.A cascade of molecular tests for human papillomavirus (HPV), as a follow-up to Papanicolaou test screening, could eliminate unnecessary colposcopy. Tests based on detection of HPV E6 messenger RNA (mRNA) are already being used as screening tools, but there is a good biological rationale for expecting that an increase in the relative amounts of HPV E6 mRNA in cervical samples may better predict cancerous transformation.To compare some of the available diagnostic methods and our novel method of relative quantification (RQ) of HPV gene expression for the effective triage of women with abnormal results from Papanicolaou tests to colposcopy.Sensitivities, specificities, and likelihood ratios were calculated for repeat Papanicolaou test smears, HPV DNA polymerase chain reactions, HPV genotyping, HPV-16 E6 mRNA detection, and the RQ of HPV-16 E6 mRNA calibrated to cellular RNA and DNA levels and standardized to viral load.Human papillomavirus genotype in combination with a repeat Papanicolaou test can be used to categorize most women (96%) with cervical intraepithelial neoplasia of grade 2 or higher for colposcopy while eliminating 44% of women with cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 1 or less. The presence of HPV-16 E6 mRNA (P < .001) and RQ of HPV-16 E6 mRNA (P < .001) displayed significant median differences among the various grades of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia. Further testing of women who are positive for HPV-16 demonstrated that the RQ of E6 mRNA has diagnostic potential when combined with Papanicolaou testing in populations with higher disease prevalence.The RQ of HPV E6 mRNA and HPV genotype could be useful in a cascade of diagnostic testing designed to refer women with findings of cervical abnormalities for colposcopy or treatment while reducing triage numbers.A weakly positive human papillomavirus Hybrid Capture II result correlates with a significantly lower risk of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 2,3 after atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance cytology.The Hybrid Capture II assay (hc2; QIAGEN, Inc) for high-risk human papillomavirus (hrHPV) is an in vitro nucleic acid hybridization assay using chemiluminescence for the qualitative detection of hrHPV DNA in cervical samples. Results are reported as a ratio of relative light units (RLUs) to a cutoff value based on a positive control. Specimens with RLU ratios of 1.0 or higher are scored positive for hrHPV. We tested the hypothesis that hrHPV positives with low-positive RLU ratios (1-10) had a lower prevalence of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 2,3 (CIN 2,3) on histologic follow-up.Relative light unit ratios for 388 consecutive hrHPV-positive cervical cytologic specimens interpreted as atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) were reviewed. Individual RLU ratios were compared with outcome histologic diagnosis in cases with colposcopic follow-up and tissue sampling (biopsy and/or endocervical curettage; n = 236).Of 236 cases with histologic follow-up, 63 had RLU ratios in the range of 1 to 10; of these, 53 (84.1%) were negative for CIN, 7 (11.1%) had CIN 1, 1 (1.6%) had CIN of uncertain grade, and 2 (3.2%) had CIN 2,3. The difference in CIN 2,3 outcome between RLU ratios of 1 to 10 (3.2%) versus over 10 (17.3%) was significant (p =.0047). The difference in prevalence of CIN 1 was not significant (p =.67).An RLU ratio of 10 or less was associated with a significantly lower prevalence of CIN 2,3 on biopsy outcome after a Pap test result of ASCUS. The much lower prevalence of underlying CIN 2,3 in patients who are weakly HPV-positive may justify modification of the management algorithm for this subset of women with ASCUS.Comparison of management algorithms for the evaluation of women with low-grade cytologic abnormalities.To present our clinical experience using a repeat Papanicolaou smear and human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA testing to evaluate patients with low-grade cytologic abnormalities.We performed a retrospective chart review of women who were referred for the evaluation of a Papanicolaou smear and were diagnosed as having either atypical cells of undetermined clinical significance or a low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (SIL). All women included in this review had a repeat Papanicolaou smear, HPV DNA testing with the Hybrid Capture method, and a colposcopic examination.The sensitivity and specificity of the repeat Papanicolaou smear for detecting biopsy-confirmed cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) were 0.74 and 0.67, respectively, in the 398 women referred for a previous low-grade SIL or atypical Papanicolaou smear. The sensitivity and specificity of a HPV DNA test positive for "high oncogenic risk" HPV types were 0.73 and 0.66, respectively. Triage using a repeat Papanicolaou smear and an HPV DNA test in combination correctly identified 92% of the women with biopsy-proven CIN, but 71% of the women would have been referred for colposcopy with this form of triage.A repeat Papanicolaou smear combined with a HPV DNA test is a sensitive alternative to colposcopic evaluation for the detection of CIN in women referred for a previous low-grade abnormal Papanicolaou smear. However, because of the low specificity of this approach, it results in only modest cost reductions compared to the more standard triage of performing colposcopy at the first visit.Human papillomavirus type 18 DNA load and 2-year cumulative diagnoses of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grades 2-3.The clinical relevance of the amount of human papillomavirus type 18 (HPV18) DNA in cervical tissue (ie, HPV18 DNA load) is unknown.Study subjects were 303 women who were HPV18 positive at enrollment into the Atypical Squamous Cells of Undetermined Significance (ASC-US) and Low-Grade Squamous Intraepithelial Lesion (LSIL) Triage Study. HPV18 DNA load, expressed as copies of HPV18 per nanogram of cellular DNA, at enrollment was quantitatively measured. Subjects were followed up semiannually for a period of 2 years for detection of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 2-3 (CIN2-3). A linear regression model was used to examine associations of CIN2-3 with HPV18 DNA load. All statistical tests were two-sided.CIN2-3 was confirmed in 92 of 303 (30.4%) HPV18-positive women. Among women without CIN2-3, HPV18 DNA load was positively associated with increasing severity of cervical cytology at enrollment (Ptrend < .001). However, among those with CIN2-3, HPV18 DNA load was not associated with severity of cervical cytology at enrollment (Ptrend = .33). The ratios of geometric means of HPV18 DNA load at enrollment among women with CIN2-3, relative to those without, were 6.06 (95% confidence interval [CI] = 0.31 to 117.92) for those with normal cytology at enrollment, 0.50 (95% CI = 0.10 to 2.44) for those with ASC-US, 0.11 (95% CI = 0.03 to 0.46) for those with LSIL, and 0.07 (95% CI = 0.01 to 0.80) for those with high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HSIL). After adjusting for age and coinfection with other high-risk HPVs, a statistically significant association of lower HPV18 DNA load with CIN2-3 was observed among women with LSIL or HSIL at enrollment (P = .02). Within the 2-year period, HPV18 DNA load was unrelated to the timing of CIN2-3 diagnosis. Overall results were similar when the outcome was CIN3.HPV18 DNA load was higher for women with LSIL or HSIL at enrollment with no evidence of CIN2-3 during the 2-year follow-up period than it was for women with CIN2-3. Thus, testing for high levels of HPV18 DNA does not appear to be clinically useful.Human papillomavirus DNA detection in the management of women with twice mildly abnormal cytological smears.This study was undertaken to investigate the value of HPV testing in women referred with two abnormal smears that were graded as mild dyskaryosis or less who attended for at least three follow-up visits. One hundred forty-nine women were included in the study and a total of 39 high-grade lesions including one cancer were detected. All of these were found to be associated with the persistent presence of one or more of 13 high-risk human papillomavirus types (HPV) as detected by a multiplex type specific PCR technique. Two high-grade lesions were initially missed by cytology. In contrast, no cytological or histological evidence of high-grade lesions was found during a follow-up period of up to 8 years in 62 women with no high-risk HPV infection or in 38 women with only transient high-risk HPV infection. The utility of high-risk HPV detection in the management of women presenting with mild cytological abnormalities is discussed.ASC-US diagnosis and triage.Human papillomavirus 'reflex' testing as a screening method in cases of minor cytological abnormalities.The aim was to evaluate human papillomavirus (HPV) 'reflex genotyping' in cases of minor cytological abnormalities detected in the gynaecological screening programme in Stockholm, Sweden. Liquid-based cytology samples showing minor cytological abnormalities were analysed using HPV genotyping (Linear Array, Roche diagnostics). Colposcopically directed cervical biopsies were obtained and the HPV test results were correlated with the histological results. In all, 63% (70/112) of the samples were high-risk (HR) HPV (HR-HPV) positive. A statistically significant correlation was found between high-grade cervical lesions and HR-HPV (P=0.019), among which HPV 16, 18, and 31 were the most important. The negative predictive value of HR-HPV detection for histologically confirmed high-grade lesions was 100%. An age limit for HPV reflex testing may be motivated in cases of low-grade squamous intraepithelial neoplasia (LSIL), because of high HR-HPV prevalence among younger women. By using HPV reflex genotyping, additional extensive workup can safely be avoided in about 50% of all cases of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) and LSIL among women 30 years. This screening strategy could potentially reduce the total abnormal cytology-reporting rate in the Swedish screening programme by about 1% and provide more accurately directed follow-up, guided by cytological appearance and HPV test results.[Progression and regression low grade intraepitelial squamous lesions in context of positivity of high risk human papillomavirus].Evaluation of regression and progression of histologically confirmed low grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (LG SIL) in women under the age of 35 in context of positivity of high risk human papillomavirus (HPV HR). Evaluation of sensitivity of PAP smear and HPV HR test in women with LG SIL.Prospective study.Department of Obstetrics and Gynecology, Charles University Prague, 2nd Medical Faculty, University Hospital Motol.166 women with SIL low or repeated ASC-US PAP smear were included to the study. 1 to 3 punch biopsy under the expert colposcopy and HPV HR test were performed in all women. Follow up were done every 6 month in all women with histologically confirmed LG SIL.LG SIL was detected in 120 women. Sensitivity of PAP smear was 72.3% and sensitivity of HPV HR test 60.2 % in women with LG SIL. 84 women (70 %) were HPV HR positive. Regression of LG SIL was detected in 20 (23 %) HPV HR positive women and in 18 (50%) HPV HR negative women. This difference is statistically significant (p = 0.0094). Progression of LG SIL was detected in 24 (29 %) HPV HR positive women and in 4 (11%) women HPV HR negative women. This difference is borderline statistically significant (p = 0.058). Progression of LG SIL to the carcinoma in situ or invasive cancer had not been detected during follow up period.PAP smear is a standard for LG SIL detection in women under the age of 35 and HPV HR test is not so important for LG SIL detection in this group of women. HPV HR test could be useful for prediction of the risk of progression, but positivity of HPV HR in LG SIL cannot indicate surgical treatment (conisation) in this cohort of women under the age of 35.Quantitative detection of oncogenic HPV DNA using hybrid capture to triage borderline and mildly dyskaryotic Papanicolaou smears.To investigate the use of hybrid capture to triage borderline and mildly abnormal PAP smears to either colposcopy or continued cytological surveillance.A prospective cross-sectional study of 207 women with either mild or borderline dyskaryosis referred to the colposcopy clinic at the Whittington Hospital, London was done. Quantitative detection of oncogenic human papillomavirus deoxyribose nucleic acid was performed using the solution hybridization technique Hybrid Capture I (Digene Diagnostics). Positive or negative hybrid capture results were compared to colposcopically directed punch biopsy or loop excision of the transformation zone.Hybrid capture correctly predicted 1/1 micro-invasive cancers, 23/24 CIN 3 and 20/24 CIN 2, giving a sensitivity to detect significant disease of CIN 2 or above of 90%. For CIN 1, 37/66 were HPV positive making the sensitivity to detect all grades of CIN 70%. Of women with a normal cervix, 39/92 were HPV positive and in total 58% of the women were HPV positive and would have been referred to colposcopy.Hybrid capture was a simple solution hybridization method which provided a sensitive method of detecting CIN 2 and above lesions in women with minor PAP smear abnormalities. However, the sensitivity for CIN 1 and the specificity were low, meaning that further improvements in the technique are needed before it can be used as a triage strategy.[Contribution of HPV sequences detection in cervical carcinoma screening].At the present time, Human Papillomaviruses (HPV) is a leading cause of squamous intraepithelial lesions (SIL) and invasive carcinoma of the cervix. The aim of this article was to review the main taxonomic and epidemiologic data on HPV infection and to assess the potential clinical implications of the different HPV tests in staging women with borderline cytologies (ASC-US; ASC-H; LSIL); for follow-up after treatment of high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN), for primary screening as the sole screening modality, or in association with cytology.Comparison between the Hybrid Capture 2 and the hpVIR real-time PCR for detection of human papillomavirus in women with ASCUS or low grade dysplasia.Human papillomavirus (HPV) testing is an important part of cervical carcinoma screening, and the most widely used assay for detection of HPV is Hybrid Capture 2 (HC2).We compare the HC2 with the real-time PCR hpVIR assay for detection of HPV in follow-up smears of 398 women diagnosed with atypical squamous cells of unknown significance (ASCUS) or low grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN 1) in their initial smear.The two assays target the same set of high-risk (HR) HPVs with exception of HPV68. hpVIR identify individual or groups of HPV types as well as their viral load, while HC2 identify HR HPVs without specification of type.34% (131/391) of the women were positive with HC2 and 45% (175/391) with hpVIR. 16% (63/391) were positive only with hpVIR and among those with cytology available 6% (3/52) had a CIN 2. The 3% (13/391) of women positive only with HC2 either contained low-risk HPVs or copy numbers below the cut-off for the hpVIR assay.The hpVIR assay has a similar sensitivity and specificity as HC2, but hpVIR detect a higher frequency of high-risk HPV infections.The clinical value of digene hybrid capture HPV DNA testing in a referral-based population with abnormal pap smears.The hybrid capture human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA assay is offered by the manufacturer to assist clinicians with patients with ASCUS pap smear results to assess the risk factor and to potentially direct follow-up of these patients. In our practice, a gynecologic oncology practice that has a referral based population with abnormal pap smears, our purpose was to evaluate the patients referred with all grades of abnormal cervical cytology.One hundred consecutive patients who were referred for evaluation of abnormal cervical cytology: atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS); low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LGSIL); high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HGSIL); or squamous cell carcinoma (SCC) were evaluated by repeat pap smear, hybrid capture HPV DNA analysis and colposcopy. Colposcopic findings were recorded, and if appropriate, cervical biopsies were performed. Hybrid capture results were correlated with histologic and cytologic findings. Using histopathologic diagnosis as the reference standard, the sensitivity and positive predictive value of pap smear and high risk HPV were calculated. The Kappa test was used to correlate colposcopic and histopathologic findings.Repeat pap smears at the time of initial consultation demonstrated 25 patients with normal results, 39 with LGSIL, 30 with HGSIL, 1 SCC and 5 ASCUS. Seventy-eight patients underwent cervical biopsy. Colposcopic findings correlated significantly with histopathologic findings (p<0.0001). Forty-four percent of patients tested positive for HPV DNA: 40 patients with high risk HPV, three patients with low risk HPV, and one patient with both high risk and low risk HPV. Sixteen of 39 patients (41%) with LGSIL on pap smear tested positive for high risk HPV; 37% of patients in this group required cervical conization because cervical biopsies demonstrated moderate/severe dysplasia. The diagnosis of moderate/severe dysplasia significantly correlated with the presence of high risk HPV [OR 78.9 (8.31-389.30)]. There was no significant correlation between the HPV DNA signal strengths and the histologic grade of dysplasia. The sensitivity and the positive predictive value of pap smear alone in identifying moderate/severe dysplasia was 62% and 96%, respectively. The combination of HGSIL pap smears and high risk HPV increased the sensitivity but not the positive predictive value for the detection of moderate/severe dysplasia to 77.7% and 95%, respectively (P=NS).Although in this setting, the use of hybrid capture DNA testing did not significantly improve the sensitivity or positive predictive value of the diagnosis of HGSIL cytology when compared to cytologically indicated plus colposcopically directed cervical biopsies in this population of women at high risk for the presence of disease, the combination of HGSIL pap smears and high-risk HPV did result in a clinically important increase in the diagnosis of moderate/severe dysplasia.Refining the management of low-grade cervical abnormalities in the UK National Health Service and defining the potential for human papillomavirus testing: a commentary on emerging evidence.Reflex human papilloma virus infection testing detects the same proportion of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 2-3 in young versus elderly women.The American Society for Colposcopy and Cervical Pathology recently recommended triage of women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) through reflex human papilloma virus (HPV) infection testing. Because age is an important determinant of the incidence of both ASCUS and HPV infection, the current study was conducted to determine the impact of age on reflex HPV infection test performance.The authors reviewed all liquid-based Papanicolaou tests submitted for reflex HPV infection testing to the University of Alabama Medical Center during the period from January 2002 to January 2004. To assess the impact of age on reflex HPV infection testing, women were divided into 6 age groups (<25, 25-34, 35-44, 45-54, 55-64, >64 years). Trend of different diagnostic categories with age was assessed using the chi-square test for linear trend. As a measure of test performance, the proportions of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) lesions confirmed by biopsy through reflex testing (of the total CIN lesions detected in the study population) were then compared among different age groups.During the study period, 25,164 ThinPrep tests were performed during the study period, with 2672 (11%) cases of ASCUS and 1371 (5%) cases of squamous intraepithelial lesions (SILs). A total of 2309 (86%) ASCUS cases were tested for HPV infection, of which 789 (34%) were positive. Biopsy specimens were obtained from 831 patients with SILs and from 316 patients with HPV+ASCUS. Of 246 patients with CIN Grade 2-3 (CIN2-3) detected on biopsy, 36 (15%) were triaged through reflex HPV infection testing and the rest were triaged through cytologic diagnosis of SILs. Despite the trend in the prevalence of HPV+ASCUS and SILs with increasing age (P < 0.05), there was no significant difference in the proportion (range, 9-23%) of CIN2-3 detected through reflex HPV infection testing in different age groups.Reflex HPV infection testing performed similarly for women in different age groups, including perimenopausal and postmenopausal women.Triage with human papillomavirus testing of women with cytologic abnormalities prompting referral for colposcopy assessment.The current study was conducted to evaluate the cost-effectiveness of triaging for colposcopy using human papillomavirus (HPV) testing.HPV tests were performed in a consecutive series of women who were referred for colposcopy for persistent atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS)-favor reactive (n = 35 women), ASCUS-favor squamous epithelial lesion (n = 164 women), atypical glandular cells of undetermined significance (n = 74 women), low-grade squamous epithelial lesion (n = 161 women), or high-grade squamous epithelial lesion (n = 78 women). The cost effectiveness of triaging women with ASCUS results using HPV testing was determined compared with the current protocol.The sensitivity of HPV testing for cervical intraepithelial neoplasia > Grade 2 was very high. Cost analysis showed a moderate increase in cost with the addition of HPV triage.Because HPV testing is highly sensitive, it may be useful as an alternative to the current policy of 6-month repeat cytology for women with ASCUS.Impact of reflex HPV testing on interpretation and management of ThinPrep Pap tests.HPV testing for high-risk types is the preferred method to triage women with atypical squamous cells (ASC) on ThinPrep Pap tests for management. The impact of this practice on the cytopathologists' interpretation is unknown. A significant percentage of providers at the Beth Israel Deaconess Medical Center (BIDMC) are not requesting reflex HPV testing. This offers a unique opportunity to examine its impact. Consecutive ThinPreps submitted to the cytology laboratory at the BIDMC for a 3-mo period were identified retrospectively. The ThinPreps were divided into those with a request for reflex HPV testing (reflex testing request group), those without such a request, and those with a request for HPV testing regardless of the diagnosis. Cytologic diagnoses, results of HPV testing and subsequent cervical biopsies within 6 mo after the ThinPrep were recorded and correlated in these cases. A total of 4,590 ThinPreps were processed during this period. 2,659 had a request for reflex HPV testing, 1,849 did not have such a request, and 82 had a request for HPV testing regardless of diagnosis. The numbers (%) of abnormal results in these three groups were 155 (5.8%), 141 (7.6%), and 22 (27%), respectively. The ASC:SIL ratios for these three groups were 1.2, 0.86, and 0.62, respectively. 38/71 (54%) women with ASC in the reflex testing request group were positive for high-risk HPV types. Of those with ASC in the reflex testing request and no request groups, 15/73 (21%) and 12/56 (21%) underwent biopsies with 2 (of 15) and 2 (of 12) showing HSIL on histology, respectively. Our study demonstrates that at our institution a request for reflex HPV testing did not significantly affect cytopathologists' interpretation of ThinPreps. Furthermore, HPV testing did not seem to have influenced the subsequent management of women with ASC diagnosis.Does the ThinPrep Imaging System increase the detection of high-risk HPV-positive ASC-US and AGUS? The Women and Infants Hospital experience with over 200,000 cervical cytology cases.Published reports have demonstrated that introduction of the ThinPrep Imaging System (Imager) to the cytology screening services has increased the detection rate of high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (HSILs). In accordance with recent clinical treatment guidelines, patients with atypical squamous or glandular cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US or AGUS) are often tested for high-risk HPV infection using the Hybrid Capture HPV DNA test. We took the opportunity to investigate whether the Imager had resulted in any significant differences in our diagnostic categories, as well as whether the Imager increased the detection of high-risk HPV-DNA-positive (HRHPV+) ASC-US or AGUS.Cytology cases with the diagnosis of ASC-US and AGUS were retrieved from the archival files of our institution during periods of 11 months prior to and 11 months after the introduction of the Imager. The total number of cases in each category was correlated with results of reflex high-risk HPV DNA testing when the latter were available. All AGUS diagnoses were correlated with subsequent biopsy follow-up. Statistical analyses were performed using the chi-Square test with Yate's Correction and Fisher's Exact test.A total of 108,371 and 104,555 of ThinPrep Pap Test (TPPT) cases were reviewed during 11 months pre- and post-imager introduction. The ASC-US rate was 5.4% in the pre-Imager and 5.3% in the post-Imager period. The HPV reflex test was 38% and 34% positive respectively in the pre- and post-Imager period (P>0.124). Similarly, 0.14% and 0.12% AGUS were found in the pre- and post-Imager period. The positive HPV reflex test was 14% versus 23% (P = 0.1690). The abnormal biopsy follow-up rate in the AGUS category was increased from 20.9% in the pre-Imager period to 31% in the post-Imager period (P = 0.1471). The ASCUS/SIL ratios were 1.9 and 1.6 respectively.The ASC-US and AGUS rates did not change statistically before and after the introduction of the Imager in our cytology laboratory. Although use of the Imager did not increase detection of HPV+ ASC-US, it did appear to increase the detection rate of HPV+ AGUS and subsequent abnormal biopsy follow-up rates in all categories. However, the increase in the detection rate did not reach the point of statistical significance.Predicting CIN2+ when detecting HPV mRNA and DNA by PreTect HPV-proofer and consensus PCR: A 2-year follow-up of women with ASCUS or LSIL Pap smear.It has been suggested that human papillomavirus (HPV) testing improves follow-up of atypical cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) and low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL) in cervical cancer screening programs. To evaluate the prognostic value of including HPV testing as an adjunct to cytology, we carried out a 2-year follow-up study of 77 women with ASCUS or LSIL Papanicolaou (Pap) smear in the Norwegian Cervical Cancer Screening Program (NCCSP) for detection of histological cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) 2+. The study includes a comparison between viral mRNA and DNA detection. PreTect HPV-Proofer was used for HPV E6/E7 mRNA detection from the 5 high-risk types 16, 18, 31, 33 and 45, and Gp5+/6+ consensus PCR was used for HPV DNA detection. Twice as many women were positive for HPV DNA (54.6%) than for HPV mRNA (23.4%). PreTect HPV-Proofer and consensus PCR had a sensitivity of 85.7% (95% confidence interval [CI] = 42.1-99.6) for detecting CIN2+ during follow-up. The specificity was significantly higher for PreTect HPV-Proofer, 84.9% (95% CI = 73.9-92.5), than for consensus PCR, 50.0% (95% CI = 37.4-62.6). PreTect HPV-Proofer positive women were 69.8 times (95% CI = 4.3-1137.3) more likely to be diagnosed with CIN2+ within 2 years than PreTect HPV-Proofer negative women. Consensus PCR-positive women were 5.7 times (95% CI = 0.6-52.0) more likely to be diagnosed with CIN2+ within 2 years than PCR-negative women. With equal sensitivity and higher specificity than consensus PCR, the PreTect HPV-Proofer might offer an improvement for the triage of women with ASCUS or LSIL Pap smear.Gene expression profiling in cervical cancer: identification of novel markers for disease diagnosis and therapy.Cervical cancer, a potentially preventable disease, remains the second most common malignancy in women worldwide. Human papillomavirus is the single most important etiological agent in cervical cancer. HPV contributes to neoplastic progression through the action of two viral oncoproteins E6 and E7, which interfere with critical cell cycle pathways, p53, and retinoblastoma. However, evidence suggests that HPV infection alone is insufficient to induce malignant changes and other host genetic variations are important in the development of cervical cancer. Advances in molecular biology and high throughput gene expression profiling technologies have heralded a new era in biomarker discovery and identification of molecular targets related to carcinogenesis. These advancements have improved our understanding of carcinogenesis and will facilitate screening, early detection, management, and personalised targeted therapy. In this chapter, we have described the use of high density microarrays to assess gene expression profiles in cervical cancer. Using this approach we have identified a number of novel genes which are differentially expressed in cervical cancer, including several genes involved in cell cycle regulation. These include p16ink4a, MCM 3 and 5, CDC6, Geminin, Cyclins A-D, TOPO2A, CDCA1, and BIRC5. We have validated expression of mRNA using real-time PCR and protein by immunohistochemistry.Is smoking an independent risk factor for invasive cervical cancer? A nested case-control study within Nordic biobanks.The strong correlation between smoking and exposure to oncogenic human papillomaviruses (HPVs) has made it difficult to verify the independent role of smoking in cervical carcinogenesis. Thus, the authors evaluated this role. Five large Nordic serum banks containing samples from more than 1,000,000 subjects were linked with nationwide cancer registries (1973-2003). Serum samples were retrieved from 588 women who developed invasive cervical cancer and 2,861 matched controls. The samples were analyzed for cotinine (a biomarker of tobacco exposure) and antibodies to HPV types 16 and 18, herpes simplex virus type 2, and Chlamydia trachomatis. Smoking was associated with the risk of squamous cell carcinoma (SCC) among HPV16- and/or HPV18-seropositive heavy smokers (odds ratio=2.7, 95% confidence interval: 1.7, 4.3). A similar risk of SCC (odds ratio=3.2, 95% confidence interval: 2.6, 4.0) was found in heavy smokers after adjustment for HPV16/18 antibodies. The point estimates increased with increasing age at diagnosis and increasing cotinine level. This study confirms that smoking is an independent risk factor for cervical cancer/SCC in women infected with oncogenic HPVs. These findings emphasize the importance of cervical cancer prevention among women exposed to tobacco smoke.HPV vaccine protein L1 predicts disease outcome of high-risk HPV+ early squamous dysplastic lesions.Prediction of the clinical outcome of nonadvanced, early dysplastic lesions is one of the unresolved problems of cervical cancer screening programs. We examined the influence of human papillomavirus (HPV) L1 capsid protein detection in a randomized, prospective study of 187 high-risk HPV+ early dysplastic lesions during 36 to 46 months. The difference in the clinical outcome of the HPV L1- cases and the HPV L1+ cases was highly statistically significant (P < .0001) and independent of the classification of low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (mild dysplasia) and high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion of the moderate dysplastic type. L1+ mild and moderate dysplasias, reflecting productive HPV infection, showed low malignant potential, justifying a wait-and-watch strategy to prevent overtreatment, especially in young women. L1- early dysplastic lesions, as nonproductive infections or precancerous lesions, have a high malignancy potential and close follow-up with colposcopy and histologic evaluation should be advised.Usefulness of combining testing for p16 protein and human papillomavirus (HPV) in cervical carcinoma screening.To evaluate the value of the combination of p16 and HPV detection in the screening for cervical cancer.186 patients with previous abnormal cervical lesion were studied. After colposcopic examination, two conventional Pap slides were prepared: the first was Papanicolaou-stained and examined by cytologist; the second was immunocytochemically stained for p16. Cervical cells were collected by brush using for HPV detection by Hybrid Capture II. Biopsy of any colposcopically abnormal lesions was performed.The 186 cervical samples were classified cytologically as normal (148), ASCUS (13), low-grade (11), high-grade (12) dysplasia and squamous cell carcinoma (2). P16 and HPV were found in all high-grade dysplasia and SCC, and in 64% and 27% of low-grade dysplasia, 62% and 0% of ASCUS and 7.4% and 3.4% of normal, respectively. 18 of p16-positive cases (11%) were HPV-negative, 14 of them in the ASCUS and normal group. Compared to histological results, all of the p16-positive cases of squamous metaplasia, CIN II/III and SCC were HR-HPV-positive. Therefore, the cases that were positive for both with normal cytology (5 cases) or low-grade dysplasia (3 cases) may comprise a high-risk group for neoplastic change.The combination of p16 and HPV detection may be useful in cervical cancer screening to identify high-risk patients requiring early and proper management.Human papillomavirus (HPV) in atypical squamous cervical cytology: the Invader HPV test as a new screening assay.In surveillance for cervical neoplasia, a diagnosis of cytologically atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) presents a significant clinical issue, often dependent on testing for high-risk (HR) human papillomavirus (HPV) for the triage of patients. HPV type 16 now appears to be a critical concern in the follow-up of patients with ASCUS. The Invader HPV (Inv2) test, by Third Wave Technologies, Inc., is a recently developed analyte-specific reagent assay that uses probe sets for the detection of 14 HR HPV subtypes. These probe sets are A5/A6 (HPV types 51, 56, and 66), A7 (HPV types 18, 39, 45, 59, and 68), and A9 (HPV types 16, 31, 33, 35, 52, and 58). This report describes the performance characteristics of the Inv2 test in the screening of ASCUS cervical cytology specimens and correlates the results of the Inv2 test with those of the Hybrid Capture II HPV (HC2) test by Digene. The linear array HPV genotyping test (Roche Molecular Systems) was used as a reference method for the testing of samples with discordant results. Ninety-four Pap smear samples with a cytological diagnosis of ASCUS and 39 samples with a negative diagnosis were tested. The results of the Inv2 test demonstrated a good (86.6%) concordance with those of the HC2 test, with an overall sensitivity and specificity of 96% for the Inv2 test. Additionally, the Inv2 assay, which offers high-throughput, semiautomated DNA extraction, allows the subgrouping of HPV types by differential probe sets, could provide a useful test for screening for HPV, and has the potential to provide an improved means of risk stratification and the selection of patients for further HPV subtyping.Triage by HPV-DNA testing: is it useful in women with persistent minor smear abnormalities?This study was carried out to evaluate the efficacy of HPV-DNA (Human Papilloma Virus) testing as a triage strategy for persistent borderline and mild cytological abnormalities.A prospective cross-sectional study involving 321 women registered between January and December 2001 with two smears showing borderline or mild dyskaryosis, taken 6 months apart. This study was undertaken in a colposcopy unit in a large district general hospital in central London.Three hundred and twenty-one women referred with persistent borderline and mild dyskaryosis were recruited in this study. HPV-DNA testing was positive in 194 women (60.4%). Histology of colposcopically directed biopsy showed CIN2/3 in 57 women (18%). Fifty-one of these 57 women were detected by HPV-DNA testing (sensitivity for high-grade disease 89.5%). Specificity for high-grade disease was 45.8%. Negative predictive value was 95.3%. Women with a positive HPV-DNA result had a 7.2 times higher risk of having a high-grade cervical cancer precursor lesion.Negative predictive value of HPV-DNA testing for high-grade cervical lesion is very high. Hence, it can be used as a triage strategy for persistent borderline changes and mild dyskaryosis.High-throughput two-step LNA real time PCR assay for the quantitative detection and genotyping of HPV prognostic-risk groups.Human papillomavirus (HPV) infection is a necessary event in the development of cervical carcinoma. High risk (HR) HPV genotypes, however, may progress differentially from low grade lesions to malignancy.The necessity to genotype and quantify HPV-DNA in cervical screening programs, in the follow up post-surgical treatments and in monitoring the effectiveness of HPV vaccination programs, requires access to economical, high-throughput and flexible molecular technologies.A high-throughput two-step LNA real time PCR assay was developed consisting of real time PCR reactions with fluorescent Locked Nucleic Acid (LNA) probes. The first step permits classification into three prognostic-risk groups of nine HR HPV genotypes (16, 18, 31, 33, 35, 45, 52, 56 and 58) most frequently found associated with cervical lesions in Europe. The second step allows us to genotype/quantify the HPV-DNA only when clinical, epidemiological or prophylactic aims exist.The specificity, repeatability, detection and quantitation limit, and linearity of the assay were evaluated and appear to be in agreement with guidelines for the validation of analytical procedures. The overall genotype concordance on cervical samples between our assay and INNOLiPA test was 94% (k 0.83) indicating good agreement.The two-step PCR assay can give much information relative to the predictive value of different HR HPV types and can quantify the genotype-specific viral load. In particular, its ability to detect and quantify nine HR HPV genotypes can help provide more efficient and successful patient care and may be useful for the monitoring of the efficacy of HPV vaccines.Molecular analysis of HPV 16 E6I/E6II spliced mRNAs and correlation with the viral physical state and the grade of the cervical lesion.The presence of HPV 16 E6*I/E6*II spliced transcripts, in cervical lesions of different grade, was analyzed to characterize the transcription pattern. The presence and amount of spliced transcripts were correlated with DNA viral markers such as E2/E6 ratio and physical state. The detection of HPV 16 E6*I/E6*II mRNAs was set up by an SYBR Green real-time reverse transcriptase PCR assay with an optimal dynamic range and sensitivity. The assay was applied to the analysis of 71 specimens, positive to HPV 16 as a sole infection, from women with abnormal cervical smears, precisely 31 low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions and 40 high-grade lesions. Samples negative to both transcripts were found only in low-grade cervical lesions. Three different transcription profiles were found in the low- and high-grade lesions analyzed: in low-grade lesions samples positive only to E6*II and in high-grade lesions samples positive only to E6*I were detected. In low- and high-grade lesions, samples positive to both E6*I and E6*II were found. In the samples positive for both transcripts, the E6*I/E6*II ratio was higher than that in the majority of high-grade lesions and lower than that in all the low-grade lesions. Analyzing the transcription pattern in relation to E2/E6 ratio and to the DNA physical state, the presence of high values of E6*I was associated mainly with low values of E2/E6 ratio and of mixed DNA forms. The detection of HPV 16 E6*I/E6*II mRNAs may serve to identify transcription patterns indicative of cervical disease progression and help physicians to decide clinical management.[Application of high-risk human papillomavirus testing in women with abnormal cytology].To detect the high-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) infectious condition in women with abnormal cytology and evaluate its values in the screening of high grade squamous intraepithelial lesion.We used hybrid capture 2 (hc2) method to examine 949 patients with abnormal cervical cytology results [ > or =atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US) according to the 2001 The Bethesda System diagnosis criteria]. All subjects also received colposcopy for tissue studies.Among 949 patients with abnormal cytology, the diagnoses of atypical squamous cells (ASC), low grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL), and high grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HSIL) were made in 432, 310, and 207 patients, respectively. The high-risk HPV positive rate in ASC, LSIL, and HSIL were 40.3%, 44.8%, and 89.4%, respectively. The numbers of patients with pathologically confirmed results of negative intraepithelial lesion or malignancy (NILM), cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 1, 2, 3 (CIN 1, 2, 3), and squamous cell carcinoma (SCC) were 335, 388, 118, 101, and 7, and the high-risk HPV positive rate was 17.3%, 66.2%, 92.4%, 97.0%, and 100%, respectively. Among patients with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US), rate of HSIL in high-risk HPV positive group and negative group were 10.2% and 0.8%, respectively (P < 0.01). In screening HSIL, the sensitivities of cytology [ > or = ASC cannot exclude HSIL (ASC-H)] and cytology ( > or = ASC-H) plus high-risk HPV testing were 0.925 and 0.991, and the specificities were 0.510 and 0.748, respectively (P < 0.01). Sensitivitives of cytology ( > or = LSIL) and cytology (> or = LSIL) plus high risk HPV in detecting HSIL were 0.898 and 0.982, respectively, while the specificitives were 0. 567 and 0.779, respectively (P < 0.01).The positive rate of high-risk HPV increases with the gravity of cervical lesions. In patients with abnormal cervical cytology, high-risk HPV testing can improve the sensitivity and specificity in the screening of HSIL.Reflex high-risk human papilloma virus DNA test is useful in the triage of women with atypical squamous cells cannot exclude high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion.This study is aimed to investigate the role of reflex high-risk human papilloma virus (HPV) DNA testing as an alternative triage method to colposcopy for women with atypical squamous cells cannot exclude high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (ASC-H) on Papanicolaou (Pap) tests. Reflex HPV DNA testing using Hybrid Capture II method was carried out on 88 women with ASC-H diagnosed by Thin Prep Pap test. Correlation with follow-up biopsies was available on 42 of these patients. The reflex HPV DNA test showed an overall positive rate of 67% and negative rate of 33% in 88 patients with ASC-H. Using age 30 as the cut off point, the positive rate had increased to 83.3% (35/42) in patients 30 yr or younger, while the positive rate for patients older than 30 yr had decreased to 52.2% (24/46). Follow-up colposcopic biopsy results were available in 35 of 59 HPV-positive women, which revealed 15 (43%) high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (HSIL), 12 low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (LSIL), and 8 negative for dysplasia. In 7 HPV-negative patients, the follow-up biopsies showed no evidence of HSIL or LSIL. Correlation between clinical risk factors and the HPV results demonstrated no significant differences in HPV positivity between the high-risk and low-risk patients. The high sensitivity (100%) and negative predictive rate (100%) in detecting HSIL in our study provide strong evidence that, instead of automatic referral to colposcopy, reflex HPV DNA testing may be used as an alternative triage method for women diagnosed with ASC-H on Thin Prep Pap test, especially for women older than 30 yr of age.Women >or=30 years of age with low grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL) have low positivity rates when cotested for high-risk human papillomavirus: should we reconsider HPV triage for LSIL in older women?High-risk human papillomavirus (HR-HPV) testing for colposcopy triage of low grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL) is not recommended because of high positive rates in young women. It remains unclear whether HR-HPV testing may be useful for triage of older women. We compiled HR-HPV data for women aged >or=30 years with LSIL for the period March 1, 2006 to February 28, 2008. Follow-up cervical biopsy information was collected for the period March 1, 2006 to August 15, 2008. We used the Hybrid Capture II test performed on residual material from liquid-based Pap tests. Of 735 women, 254 had HR-HPV testing, and of these 144 had positive HR-HPV results. Among women with positive HR-HPV results 79 underwent biopsy (54.9%) and 11 had cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) 2 or 3 (13.9% of women with biopsy follow-up). A total of 481 women did not undergo HR-HPV testing, of whom 192 underwent biopsy (39.9%) and 11 had CIN 2 or 3 (5.7% of biopsied women [P = 0.04]). Among women who tested negative for HR-HPV and had follow-up biopsies, only one had a high grade lesion found (CIN 2). The overall HR-HPV positive rate in tested women >or=30 years old with LSIL was 56.7% if women who had reflex HR-HPV testing for ASC-US are included. The HR-HPV positive rate in residual material from Pap tests interpreted as LSIL was 63.8%. Among women >or=30 years of age with LSIL, CIN 2-3 is significantly more likely in HR-HPV positive women. Relatively few older women with LSIL test positive for HR-HPV. Colposcopy triage using HR-HPV may be justified in this population.Performance of Pap smear and human papilloma virus testing in the follow-up of women with cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 1 managed conservatively.Conservative management (follow-up) of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 1 (CIN1) is acceptable, but evidence on performance of follow-up tools, such as Pap smear and human papilloma virus (HPV) test, is still needed.A cohort of 78 women with histologically confirmed CIN1, referred because of atypical squamous cell or low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion in their Pap smear, was enrolled between August 2000 and September 2002 and was prospectively followed-up at 6 and 12 months, until September 2003. Follow-up examinations included Pap test and Hybrid Capture II (HCII) with high-risk HPV, colposcopy, and cervical biopsies in patients with persistent abnormalities. Odds ratios and performance indicators (with 95% confidence interval) were calculated for HPV and Pap test results in detecting biopsy-confirmed CIN during the follow-up.Thirty-seven (47%) of the women were HPV-positive at baseline. At first follow-up visit, 30 women had persistent CIN1 and one woman progressed to CIN2; 15 patients had CIN1 and one patient CIN2 at the second follow-up visit. Women with persistent CIN1 (or progression) during follow-up had a significantly higher HPV detection rate and abnormal Pap tests, compared to women with regressive disease. Cytology had a far better sensitivity in detecting CIN than HCII at the first follow-up visit (81 versus 52%, respectively), whereas both examinations had equivalent sensitivities at the second follow-up visit (69 and 56%, respectively). Cytology had a superior negative predictive value at the first follow-up visit and better positive predictive value, in addition, at the second visit.Because cytological abnormalities correlated generally better with the persistence of biopsy-confirmed CIN1 in this follow-up protocol, HCII test is the second-hand option to Pap test, but the use of both Pap and HCII together seems an unnecessary waste of resources.Triage using HPV-testing in persistent borderline and mildly dyskaryotic smears: proposal for new guidelines.In the Netherlands 2% of cervical smears in the cervical cancer screening program are read as borderline or mildly dyskaryotic cytology (BMD smear). Only in about 10% of these women a high-grade CIN lesion (CIN II-III) is present; therefore referral is for the majority unnecessary. In our study triage with high-risk HPV (hrHPV) testing was used to identify women at risk for development of high-grade CIN lesions after a repeat BMD smear. A "wait-and-see" period was incorporated allowing clearance of HPV and regression of the lesion. Women with a low-grade lesion, irrespective of their HPV status, were monitored at 12 months; women with a high-grade lesion were monitored at 6 and 12 months. Fifty-one of the 105 women (49%) were hrHPV negative at baseline; none of them showed progression of the lesion within the first year of follow-up (NPV 100%). High-grade CIN was present in 1 patient who was HPV negative at baseline (2%); she demonstrated regression after 12 months. Nineteen of the hrHPV positive women (35%) demonstrated a high-grade CIN lesion at baseline and 3 cleared hrHPV after 6 months, with a subsequent regression of CIN. Ten women remained hrHPV positive with persistence of high-grade CIN and were eventually treated. At baseline, 35 hrHPV positive women demonstrated a low-grade lesion, 19 remained hrHPV positive after 12 months and 5 developed high-grade CIN. Sixteen out of the 35 cleared the hrHPV infection without progression of the lesion. In conclusion, triage, using hrHPV testing for women with persistent BMD cytology, can select women who are not at risk for development of high-grade CIN. We recommend return to the screening program without referral for colposcopic examination if hrHPV is absent. For hrHPV positive women, a repeat hrHPV test after another 6 months is suggested. Referral is only required if persistence of hrHPV is established.Value of combining HPV-DNA testing with follow-up Papanicolaou smear in patients with prior atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance.To address human papillomavirus (HPV) testing on negative Pap tests preceded by atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US) without reflex HPV testing.Positive HPV test results with concurrent negative Pap tests over 1 year were identified. Pathology records for all patients diagnosed with ASCUS without reflex HPV testing in the previous year were reviewed; all cytologic and surgical specimens over the subsequent 2 years were evaluated for squamous abnormalities.Fifty patients had positive HPV DNA (HPV-DNA) test result combined with a negative Pap test. Twenty-three had a previous Pap test interpretation of ASC-US (without HPV testing) within the preceding year. On follow-up, 8 of 23 developed a squamous intraepithelial lesion (SIL) within 1 year. Four additional cases developed SIL in the second year after positive HPV testing. All dysplasias in the first year of follow-up were low grade; 1 of 4 developing in the second year was high grade.Negative Pap smear following an ASC-US interpretation without a concurrent HPV test is associated with significant false negative rate. We suggest consideration of combining HPV-DNA testing to all initial follow-up negative Pap tests of patients with previous ASC-US, if reflex HPV testing has not been performed.Risk of precancer and follow-up management strategies for women with human papillomavirus-negative atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance.To investigate the relative performances of follow-up cytology and carcinogenic human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA testing among carcinogenic HPV-negative women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS), for detection of cervical precancer.Twelve-month follow-up management strategies to detect cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 3 (CIN3) or worse using cytology or HPV testing or both were compared among women with HPV-negative ASCUS in the Atypical Squamous Cells of Undetermined Significance-Low-Grade Squamous Intraepithelial Lesion (ASCUS-LSIL) Triage Study.Overall only 22 of 1,559 (1.4%) HPV-negative ASCUS women developed CIN grade 3 or worse during follow-up compared with 269 of 1,767 (15.2%) HPV-positive ASCUS women (P<.001). Because of the low risk of disease among HPV-negative ASCUS women, only 7 cases of CIN3 were diagnosed between 12 and 24 months of follow-up, limiting power to distinguish meaningful differences in sensitivity among 12-month testing strategies. The specificity of HPV testing (84%) was significantly higher than cytology using an ASCUS threshold (71%) (P<.001). Cotesting with cytology and HPV testing at 12 months resulted in even lower specificity (61%). Because cases were uncommon, the positive predictive value for subsequent CIN3 or worse was low for cytology (2.6%), Hybrid Capture 2 (3.8%), and cotesting with cytology and HPV testing (2.2%). The negative predictive value for all three management strategies was very high (99.70%, 99.82%, and 100.0% for HPV testing, cytology, or cotesting, respectively.)Women with HPV-negative ASCUS have very low absolute risk of subsequently detected CIN3 or worse in the subsequent 2 years, similar to women with a negative cytology in the absence of HPV testing. The results suggest that women with HPV-negative ASCUS should return to routine screening intervals which may be longer than 1 year depending on age and screening history. However, if increased surveillance is chosen, a single HPV test for carcinogenic types at 12 months has significantly higher specificity and lower referrals than cytology.HPV DNA testing in the triage of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS): cost comparison of two methods.Human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA testing for triage of cervical cytologies showing atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) has become the standard of practice. Currently, Hybrid Capture II (HCII) is the preferred method for ASCUS triage. In situ hybridization for HPV represents an alternative to HCII and appears to have a superior specificity but is more expensive. We compare the reimbursement rates of ASCUS triage (HPV high risk) using the methods of HCII and INFORM (in situ hybridization for HPV) in a series of 431 ASCUS patients. The patients were followed for 1 yr, during which each patient had either colposcopic biopsy or follow-up cervical cytology after ASCUS HPV DNA triage. Eighty-nine patients were excluded from the analysis because of incomplete follow-up. The HPV triage percentages, colposcopic biopsy positivity rates and cervical cytology positivity percentages were calculated for each method. The reimbursement rates of the tests/procedures used in the analysis were those in effect at the University of Utah in 2003. The total triage and follow-up reimbursement costs were calculated for HCII and INFORM and compared.HCII referred 19.9% of patients to colposcopy, with a biopsy positivity rate of 25.6% for dysplasia. INFORM referred 11.8% of patients to colposcopy, of whom 34% had a biopsy diagnosis of dysplasia. HCII negative cases revealed 19% to have ASCUS or higher on the follow-up cervical cytology, while 19.9% of INFORM negative cases had a reading of ASCUS or higher at follow-up cytologic examination. The 1-yr HPV DNA triage and follow-up reimbursements for HCII were 316,942.00 US dollars per 1,000 women, and for the INFORM methodology, the reimbursements were 369,484.00 US dollars per 1,000 women. The INFORM method was associated with higher specificity and sent fewer (41%) patients to colposcopy than did HCII. Although this smaller referral rate reduced reimbursement costs associated with colposcopy, the increased reimbursement paid for follow-up cytologies and office visits of HPV DNA negative patient and the greater cost of the INFORM test results in higher overall reimbursement for INFORM. Based on these costs and diagnostic accuracies, it appears that the INFORM HPV technology represents a viable option to HCII ASCUS triage. INFORM HPV appears to be 16% more expensive than HCII but has the advantage of sending 41% fewer women to colposcopy.Cervical cancer screening with liquid cytology in women with developmental disabilities.To evaluate the use of liquid cytology in Pap smears in women with developmental disabilities (DD) for endocervical cell yield and abnormalities, via speculum examination or blind technique.We used retrospective chart review of gynecological visits by women with DD from October 2002 to November 2005. Cervical cytology screening included speculum examination or blind technique. Endocervical cell yield was analyzed via Pearson's chi-square test.Of 240 attempted liquid cytology Pap smears, 199 (82.9%) were completed. Of these, 193 met inclusion criteria for the study, and 120 (62.2%) contained endocervical cells. The endocervical cell yield with liquid cytology/speculum was 80.0% and was 43.6% with liquid cytology/blind (p < 0.001). Two blind smears (1.0%) were abnormal; both revealed atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) with subsequent negative human papillomavirus (HPV) typing.Cervical screening with liquid cytology in women with DD provides an overall rate of endocervical cells of approximately 44%-80% depending on the technique used. Although this is much lower than in the general population, this compares favorably with slide Pap smear in women with DD. The 44% yield of endocervical cells and the finding of abnormal Pap smears with the blind technique suggest this is a reasonable alternative for obtaining Pap smears in women with difficult pelvic examinations who otherwise would not receive cervical screening.Histologic follow-up results in 662 patients with Pap test findings of atypical glandular cells: results from a large academic womens hospital laboratory employing sensitive screening methods.Atypical glandular cell (AGC) Pap interpretations and screening for glandular neoplasias remain major challenges. We document the largest reported AGC histopathologic follow-up experience and include verification bias-adjusted data on laboratory screening sensitivity.AGC Pap tests of endocervical origin (AGC-EC), endometrial origin (AGC-EM), and not otherwise specified (AGC-NOS) were documented at a center serving an older low risk population. 98% of Pap tests were liquid-based cytology (LBC) specimens screened using computer-assisted screening. Follow-up diagnoses were correlated with cytology and stratified into age groups. Screening sensitivity was assessed by examining Pap results during 1 year preceding neoplastic diagnoses. Verification bias was adjusted with findings in over 2000 patients with hysterectomies.Of 247,131 Pap tests, 1021 (0.41%) reported AGC results and 662 cases had tissue follow-up. Precancerous or malignant neoplastic histologic outcomes were documented in 101 patients (15.3%), including 8.3% cervical, 6.3% endometrial, and 0.6% ovarian. AGC results were most often associated with neoplastic cervical outcomes in women younger than 40 and with neoplastic endometrial outcomes in women 50 or older. AGC-NOS with a squamous cell abnormality and AGC-EC results suggested cervical neoplasia, while AGC-EM results suggested endometrial neoplasia.AGC Pap results detected significant numbers of cervical and non-cervical neoplasias. Since 38 of 44 (86%) of AGC-detected carcinomas were endometrial or ovarian, HPV co-testing would not have aided screening in detecting the majority of malignancies diagnosed after AGC Pap results. Verification bias-adjusted Pap screening sensitivity in the laboratory for detection of significant neoplastic cervical disease was 93%.Diagnostic value of p16INK4A, Ki-67, and human papillomavirus L1 capsid protein immunochemical staining on cell blocks from residual liquid-based gynecologic cytology specimens.This study was conducted to evaluate the reliability and role of cell block preparations in the diagnosis of neoplastic and preneoplastic lesions of the cervix and to improve the value of cell block preparations in diagnosing and predicting the prognosis of cervical lesions through immunostaining of p16INK4A (p16), Ki-67, and human papillomavirus (HPV) L1 capsid protein (HPV L1).In total, 138 specimens were diagnosed on liquid-based cytology (LBC) and cell block preparations, and 63 specimens were subjected subsequently to tissue follow-up and immunostaining for p16, Ki-67, and HPV L1 on cell block sections.In 42 specimens that were diagnosed as low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion, high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HSIL), and squamous cell carcinoma (SCC) on cell blocks, 38 specimens (90.5%) were confirmed by histopathologic reports, and there was slightly better than 81.6% agreement between LBC and tissue follow-up. Immunointensity and cells that were positive for p16 were enhanced according to increased pathologic grade and differed statistically between cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 1 (CIN-1) and CIN-2/CIN-3 as well as SCC. The positive rates of HPV L1 decreased gradually according to the severity of cervical neoplasia, and HPV L1/p16 expression patterns were related to the severity of cervical lesions.The cell block preparation technique was complementary to LBC, and the authors concluded that the application of LBC combined with cell block preparations may improve the diagnostic accuracy of cytology. Immunostaining for p16 and Ki-67 on cell block preparations can help to improve the diagnostic accuracy of HSIL and SCC. A combined expression pattern of p16 and HPV L1 may serve as a valuable index for predicting prognosis and follow-up of cervical dysplastic lesions.Human papillomavirus genotypes and the cumulative 2-year risk of cervical precancer.Prospective data on the risks of cervical precancer associated with specific human papillomavirus (HPV) genotypes are limited.In 5060 women participating in the Atypical Squamous Cells of Undetermined Significance/Low-Grade Squamous Intraepithelial Lesions Triage Study (ALTS), we determined the cumulative 2-year risks of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) grade 2 or more severe (> or =CIN2) and of grade 3 or more severe (> or =CIN3) for 38 individual HPV genotypes, as detected by polymerase chain reaction.The most common HPV genotypes detected at baseline, in descending order of prevalence, were 16, 52, 51, 31, 18, 53, 39, 56, 62, 59, and 58. When detected as a single-type HPV infection, HPV-16 had a 2-year cumulative risk of 50.6% (95% confidence interval [CI], 44.1%-57.2%) for > or =CIN2 and 39.1% (95% CI, 32.9%-45.7%) for > or =CIN3. For other singly detected carcinogenic HPV types, the risk of > or =CIN2 ranged from 4.7% (for HPV-59) to 29.5% (for HPV-31), and the risk of > or =CIN3 ranged from 0.0% (for HPV-59) to 14.8% (for HPV-31). Multiple infections with HPV genotypes of different risk classes resulted in a risk that was similar to, and not significantly different from, the risk observed for the HPV genotype of the highest risk class.Genotype-specific HPV testing may be useful for identifying women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance and low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions who are at higher and lower risk of prevalent and incipient cervical precancer.ASC-US and HPV testing in women aged 40 years and over.High-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA triage is commonly performed for cervical cytology specimens interpreted as atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US), but little is known about testing results in women > or =40 yr of age. The extent to which clinical follow-up after HPV testing reflects the most recent management guidelines is unknown also. Data from 108 patients > or =40 yr of age with concurrent (93 patients) or recent (15 patients) ASC-US interpretations and HPV testing were reviewed. Twenty-five (23.1%) of these patients were positive for high-risk HPV. The HPV(+) rate was higher in women with a current interpretation of ASC-US (26.9%) compared with those with a previous ASC-US result (0%). Many patients were not managed exactly according to the "2001 Consensus Guidelines for the Management of Women with Cervical Cytologic Abnormalities." The majority (52.6%) of women with HPV(+) ASC-US did not receive colposcopy in our institution, and 41.3% of women with HPV(-) ASC-US received follow-up testing within 8 mo. These results show the potential for inadequate evaluation of women with HPV(+) ASC-US, as well as unnecessary early repeat cytology in HPV(-) ASC-US patients. Therefore, additional clinician education and reminders to correlate cytology and HPV test results may be warranted to optimize patient care.An evaluation of human papillomavirus testing as part of referral to colposcopy clinics.To determine the usefulness of human papillomavirus (HPV) testing as a triage method for predicting which women referred to a colposcopy clinic were most likely to have histologically confirmed cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN).Papanicolaou tests, ViraPap tests for HPV infection, and colposcopically directed biopsies were performed concurrently on 482 women referred to a student health colposcopy clinic.The results demonstrated that HPV positivity was associated with a greatly increased likelihood of histologic confirmation of CIN, especially among women with concurrent cytologic findings that were negative or showed only atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance.Testing for HPV appears to have a role in the triage of students now being referred to our colposcopy clinic. A combination of HPV testing and repeated cytologic screening would provide reasonably sensitive screening for cervical neoplasia while limiting the use of colposcopic services, which are currently overburdened. The eventual usefulness of HPV testing will depend on the cost and availability of colposcopy services, the cost of Papanicolaou tests, the cost and accuracy of HPV tests, and the predictive value of HPV detection in the population being screened.Evaluation of atypical and low-grade cervical cytology in private practice.To evaluate the adequacy of cytology alone for diagnosis of grade of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) and to study performance of cytology, human papillomavirus (HPV) testing, and colposcopy in the evaluation of cytologic findings suggesting low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (SIL), or atypical squamous (ASCUS) or atypical glandular (AGCUS) cells of undetermined significance.Standard gynecologic and cytologic evaluation and colposcopic inspection as an additional screening approach were performed on women with no prior hysterectomies screened in a private practice between January 1, 1993, and August 1, 1995. Among these 7651 women, 367 had ASCUS, AGCUS, or SIL cytology or clinically or colposcopically visible cervical lesions. Sensitivity, specificity, and relative risk of CIN in the 367 women were compared by colposcopic, cytologic, histologic and virologic diagnoses.The sensitivity of all non-negative Papanicolaou smears for CIN 2-3 and cancer was 92%, combined cytologic categories of high- and low-grade SIL were 59%, and high-grade SIL alone was 22%. Colposcopy was performed in all 367 patients, and positive findings led to biopsies in 48%. Colposcopy of patients with ASCUS increased detection of CIN 2-3 by 32% and CIN 1 by 48%. Cervical cytology was false negative in 8% of patients with CIN 2-3 and in 14% of those with CIN 1. These cases of CIN were detected by screening colposcopic inspection. High-risk HPV DNA was positive in 41% of women with CIN 2-3, and in 25% of those with CIN 1. The positive predictive value of ASCUS cytology increased from 5% to 42% for CIN 2-3 and from 30% to 85% for all grades of CIN in patients carrying high-risk HPV DNA. Virologic studies did not add to an increase in the sensitivity for CIN 2-3 among women in the low- and high-grade SIL cytology groups.Because of the limited sensitivity of the high-grade SIL cytologic category for CIN 2-3, we recommend that all women with ASCUS, AGCUS, low- or high-grade SIL cytology be recalled for colposcopy, with biopsy only when indicated by colposcopic findings.Triage of women with minor cervical lesions: data suggesting a "test and treat" approach for HPV E6/E7 mRNA testing.Human papillomavirus (HPV) testing is included in the cervical cancer screening program in the triage of women with equivocal (ASC-US) or low-grade (LSIL) cytological lesions. These women have an increased risk for developing high grade dysplasia and cancer (CIN2+) compared to women with normal cytology. However, in order to avoid unnecessary follow-up, as well as overtreatment, a high positive predictive value (PPV) of the triage test is important.The HPV test PreTect HPV-Proofer, detecting E6/E7 mRNA from the HPV types 16, 18, 31, 33 and 45, is used as triage test together with repeat cytology. PPV data for HPV E6/E7 mRNA testing during the period from January 2006 up to June 2009 are reported. In total, 406 of 2099 women (19.3%) had a positive HPV test result. Of the women with a positive test result and with a histological diagnosis (n = 347), 243 women had histological high-grade dysplasia or cancer (CIN2+), giving a PPV of 70.0% (95% confidence interval [CI], 65.2%-74.8%). For HPV 16 or HPV 33 positive women above 40 years of age, the PPV was 83.7% (95% CI, 73.3%-94.0%) and 84.6% (95% CI, 65.0%-100.0%) respectively. The PPV of test positive women with HSIL cytology was 94.2% (95% CI, 88.7%-99.7%).When the result in triage is HPV mRNA positive, our data suggest direct treatment for women above 40 years of age or for women with a concurrent cytological HSIL diagnosis, contributing to better clinical safety for these women. In addition, by decreasing the time to treatment, thereby reducing the number of recalls, the patient management algorithm will be considerably improved, in turn reducing follow-up costs as well as unnecessary psychological stress among patients.Clinical implications of the diagnosis "atypical squamous cells, cannot exclude high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion" in pregnant women.Atypical squamous cells, cannot exclude high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (ASC-H) has a high predictive value for high-grade intraepithelial lesion (HSIL) in the general population. However, the significance of ASC-H in pregnant women remains to be elucidated. The objective of this study was to investigate the clinical implications and pathologic significance of ASC-H in pregnant women, so that these patients will be managed appropriately.All Papanicolaou tests that were diagnosed as ASC-H in pregnant women over 1.5 years (total, 60 women) were reviewed and correlated with histologic and/or cytologic follow-up. High-risk type of human papillomavirus (HPV) status was also correlated with follow-up findings. The following cytomorphologic parameters were evaluated for each woman and were compared between the squamous intraepithelial lesion (SIL) follow-up group and the benign follow-up group: inflammatory background, the number of atypical cells, cell arrangement pattern, nuclear irregularity/grooves, hyperchromasia, and cell shape.Among 30 women who had histologic follow-up, 3 women (10%) had HSIL, and 13 women (43%) had low-grade intraepithelial lesion (LSIL). Among 32 women who had cytologic follow-up, 2 women (6%) had HSIL, 3 women (9%) had LSIL, 1 woman (3%) had ASC-H, and 3 women (9%) had atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS). HPV was detected in 24 of 43 women (56%). The cytomorphologic features were similar in the SIL follow-up group and the benign follow-up group. No specific cytomorphologic features that predicted underlying SIL were identified.ASC-H in pregnant women had a lower predictive value for an underlying HSIL compared with the general population. A positive HPV test result was not a good indicator for an underlying SIL, but a negative result appeared to be useful for ruling out an underlying HSIL. Because of low positive predictive value for HSIL and the difficult colposcopic examination, a more conservative follow-up may be reasonable for pregnant women who have a diagnosis of ASC-H. HPV testing may be used as an adjunctive test.Longitudinal clinical evaluation of a novel antibody cocktail for detection of high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions on cervical cytology specimens.Although cervical cancer screening by cytology is successful, the test continues to show relatively poor operating characteristics. Cell cycle markers may enhance detection of high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions.To determine the clinical usefulness of ProExC, an immunocytochemical assay for cell cycle components, performed on routine cervical cytology samples.Cervical cytology samples were collected using the SurePath method. Residual cells remaining after preparation of the Papanicolaou-stained slide were used to make a second slide for ProExC staining using an indirect polymer-based immunoperoxidase method. Only adequately cellular slides were evaluated for the presence of nuclear staining within cytologically abnormal epithelial cells. Results were correlated with clinical follow-up.Six hundred twenty-four samples were satisfactorily cellular and stained. Correlation with clinical follow-up for subsequent cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 2+ on biopsy/high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion on cytology (CIN 2+/HSIL) showed that 434 results were true negative, 78 true positive, 18 false-negative, and 94 false-positive, resulting in a sensitivity/specificity of 81%/82%. When ProExC results were combined with any level of cytologic atypia, sensitivity for CIN 2+/HSIL was 92% and specificity was 84%.ProExC shows promise as an aid in enhancing the sensitivity and specificity of cervical cytology for subsequent CIN 2+/HSIL and may be useful in identifying those cervical lesions most apt to progress.Quantitative multiplex PCR assay for the detection of the seven clinically most relevant high-risk HPV types.High-risk HPV DNA detection has become a valuable tool for the triage of borderline, questionable and abnormal cytologic findings in cervical carcinoma screening programs. This knowledge is largely based on studies which could only discriminate between low-risk (LR-) and high-risk (HR-) HPV groups. However, it is becoming increasingly clear that HPV genotyping may allow further risk stratification and may offer different treatment options in the future.To establish a fast and cost-effective system not only for genotyping but also for quantification of viral DNA.Development and validation of a 5' exonuclease fluorescent probe multiplex real-time PCR assay (TaqMan format) for the detection and quantification of the 7 most frequent HR-HPV types (16, 18, 31, 33, 45, 52 and 58) which account for over 87% of cervical carcinomas world-wide. Two PCR reactions are required to detect the designated HPV types.Experiments with plasmid constructs of all 18 HR-HPV DNA showed that the multiplex real-time PCR assay was highly sensitive and specific. Evaluation of DNA extracted from archived cell pellets of cervical scrapes by the multiplex assay and the GP5+/6+-EIA showed identical genotyping for 234 of 261 (89.6%) samples and an almost perfect agreement when considering all typing results (kappa 0.901). Viral load did not correlate with disease progression within the CIN spectrum but significant differences were evident when comparing all CIN with the group lacking CIN (p=0.0028) or with the cancer group (p=0.0001).Our multiplex assay will be useful to address questions related to viral persistence at the genotype level, the kinetics of viral load and disease recurrence.The clinical performance of Invader technology and SurePath when detecting the presence of high-risk HPV cervical infection.Testing for high-risk genotypes of the human papillomavirus (HR HPV) has been fully integrated into the management algorithms for the prevention of cervical cancer. The literature is limited with regard to the evaluation of the clinical performance of laboratory-developed tests (LDT) utilizing Invader V2.0 assay (ThirdWave/Hologic, Madison, WI, USA) for the detection of HR HPV.To evaluate the clinical performance of Invader V2.0 LDT by determining its sensitivity, negative predictive value (NPV), specificity and positive predictive value (PPV).This study evaluated Invader V2.0 assay results from 12,490 SurePath Pap specimens and 1,931 cervical biopsies in order to assess the clinical performance of the Invader V2.0 assay. The cervical biopsy results were correlated with Invader V2.0 results to determine clinical sensitivity, NPV, clinical specificity, and PPV.The clinical sensitivity and NPV of Invader V2.0 LDT for cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 3 (CIN 3) or higher were 97.4% and 99.1% respectively. The clinical specificity and PPV for CIN 3 were 10.3% and 3.7% respectively.The results support the use of the Invader V2.0 in identifying patients who are at low risk for CIN 3 or higher. The power of the assay implies that it could be used as a primary screening tool for prevention of cervical cancer if a paradigm shift in cervical screening ever occurs.Human papillomavirus triage for young women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance.Human papillomavirus testing is a cost-effective strategy for the management of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance. Young women have a high prevalence of transient human papillomavirus infections and low incidence high-grade cervical lesions, which may limit the usefulness of human papillomavirus testing in this cohort. We sought to estimate the usefulness of human papillomavirus testing for young women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance.A retrospective study of women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance was undertaken. Reflex human papillomavirus results and pathologic follow-up were evaluated. Age-stratified rates of human papillomavirus positivity, rates of high-grade dysplasia, and sensitivity and specificity were estimated.A total of 1,290 women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance cytology were identified. The rate of human papillomavirus positivity decreased with age from 55% for those aged 25 years or younger to 12% for women aged older than 50 years (P < .001). The cumulative rate of high-grade lesions increased with age; 12% for patients aged 25 years or younger compared with 24% for women aged older than 50 years (P = .05). A negative human papillomavirus test more effectively excluded high-grade disease in the young women. No high-grade lesions were detected in the human papillomavirus negative women aged 25 years or younger compared with 3.8% of those aged older than 50 years (P = .04). The sensitivity for detection of high-grade disease was higher in women aged younger than 25 years compared with those aged older than 50 years (100% compared with 50%), whereas specificity was lower (14% compared with 44%).Given the high prevalence of human papillomavirus and low occurrence of high-grade lesions in young women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance, a human papillomavirus-based triage strategy will result in the referral of a large number of women for colposcopy and may limit its cost-effectiveness.III.Living with uncertainty: equivocal Pap test results and the evolution of ASC terminology.Communication of equivocal findings and their significance has been a significant challenge related to Pap testing throughout its history. Terminology to report these findings has changed considerably to accommodate the changes in understanding of cervical neoplasia, and to accommodate new management strategies, tests, and technologies. This article reviews the evolution of terminology for equivocal Pap test findings from the original Papanicolaou classification to the current the Bethesda System 2001 atypical squamous cells terminology, the implication and use of these terms, and the changing landscape of cervical neoplasia screening, which prompted these terminology changes. Emerging issues related to improving risk stratification through the introduction of additional terms and the impact of human papillomavirus testing may alter terminology of equivocal findings in the future.Outcome of "Atypical squamous cells" in a cervical cytology screening program: implications for follow up in resource limited settings.(1) To study the incidence and outcome of "Atypical squamous cells (ASC)" diagnosis in a hospital based cytology screening programme. (2) To work out a feasible strategy for follow up of Atypical squamous cells-undetermined significance (ASC-US) and Atypical squamous cells-cannot exclude high grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (ASC-H) in resource limited settings. A total of 29,475 women were screened cytologically through Pap tests. The epithelial cell abnormalities (ECA) detected on screening were reviewed by the cytopathologists and classified according to Bethesda 2001 system. The women with ASC-US reports were followed up by two repeat cytology tests at 3 and 6 months of the initial visit. The persistent ASC-US cases or the cases which revealed squamous intraepithelial lesion (SIL) on follow up smears; as well as all ASC-H and above cases were referred for coloposcopic evaluation. ASC diagnosis comprised 3.6% of all reports. These were qualified as ASC-US (3.36%) and ASC-H (0.22%). On follow up, only 7 CIN 2 or worse (3.2%) lesions were detected on 218 biopsies in ASC-US category while in ASC-H qualifier 16 CIN 2 and above lesions (30.8%) were picked up on 52 colposcopic biopsies. The difference between ASC-US and ASC-H categories for a CIN 2 or worse outcome was highly significant (P < 0.001). ASC-H qualifier has a high likelihood for an ominous histological outcome and warrants an immediate colposcopic evaluation. On the other hand, ASC-US cases can be managed conservatively by repeat cytology tests at regular intervals without a significant risk of missing a high grade lesion. Diligent screening of cervical smears can judiciously downgrade some cases overcalled as ASC because of inflammatory atypia and thereby reduce referrals in geographic settings with high prevalence of reproductive tract infections. High risk HPV (HR HPV) testing may be a useful adjunct to further reduce referrals by selecting the women who require colposcopic evaluation.[Comparison of efficacy of combined use of liquid cytology and immunohistochemical assay of p16ink4 and standard procedure and high risk evaluation by polymerase chain reaction of human papillomavirus infection in diagnosing cervical dysplasia and carcinoma].Efficacy of liquid cytology, on the one hand, and those of standard one, appraisal of high risk of cancer by polymerase chain reaction (PCR) of human papillomavirus infection and immunohistochemical assay of p16ink4 high risk in cervical carcinoma diagnosis, on the other, was evaluated PCR of high risk of cancer (dysplasia-free) was detected in 73% (n = 73), CIN I-II--78%, CIN II-III--89%, CIN III and carcinoma--100%. p16ink4 was not detected in dysplasia-free cases and it was--(16%) in CIN I-II, (89%) CIN II-III, (90%) CIN III and (100%)--in carcinoma. Hence, unlike p16ink4 expression (p < or = 0.001), a correlation between the increase in the number of those infected with papillomavirus was not significantly higher than that of dysplasia grade (p < or = 0.05). It is suggested that combined use of liquid cytology and immunohistochemical assay of p16ink4 is more effective.Human papillomavirus triage of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance: cost-effective, but at what cost?Significance of high-risk human papillomavirus DNA-positive atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance pap smears in perimenopausal and postmenopausal women.To determine the risk of high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HSIL)/cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) 2 or 3 in perimenopausal and postmenopausal women with high-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA-positive atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) on Pap tests.A total of 752 perimenopausal and postmenopausal women (patients 45 years) with an ASCUS interpretation on ThinPrep Pap tests were identified in 2002 and 2003. High risk HPVDNA was detected in 191 (25.4%) women. The follow-up results in these 136 women were compared with those of women <45 years.Of the 136 perimenopausal and postmenopausal women, 64.7% became negative on cytology or biopsy and 30.9% revealed persistent low-grade SIL (LSIL)/CIN 1. Furthermore, 5 women (3.68%) were diagnosed with HSIL/CIN 2 or 3, and 1 patient had squamous cell carcinoma (0.74%). The rate of HSIL/CIN 2 or 3 or worse detected in perimenopausal and postmenopausal women was significant lower than 10.6% in women <45 years (p = 0.028).Our study showed that perimenopausal and postmenopausal women with high-risk HPV positivity and an ASCUS interpretation have a significantly lower risk of HSIL/CIN 2 or 3 detected. Nonetheless, the risk of a significant finding on workup, including invasive carcinoma, indicates the need for colposcopic evaluation of these women.The predictive value of p16(INK4a) and hybrid capture 2 human papillomavirus testing for high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia.We performed p16(INK4a) immunocytochemical analysis and Hybrid Capture 2 (HC2; Digene, Gaithersburg, MD) high-risk HPV testing on 210 abnormal SurePath (TriPath Imaging, Burlington, NC) Papanicolaou specimens diagnosed as low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL) or high grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HSIL). The results were compared with 121 follow-up biopsy specimens. p16(INK4a) was positive in 57.9% of women with LSIL compared with 97.1% of women with HSIL. In contrast, HC2 testing was positive in 85.0% of women with LSIL and 86.4% of women with HSIL. The differences in the positive rates for16(INK4a) between LSIL and HSIL was significant (P < .001), whereas, for HC2, it was not (P = .264). In patients who had cervical biopsies following a cytologic diagnosis of LSIL, the positive predictive value (PPV) of p16(INK4a) for a biopsy of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 2 or 3 (CIN2/3; 33.3%) was significantly higher than the PPV of HC2 results (21.2%) (P < .001). Using liquid-based cytology specimens, p16(INK4a) immunocytochemical analysis has a higher PPV than reflex HC2 HPV testing for identifying CIN2/3 among patients with LSIL and might be useful for selecting patients with LSIL for colposcopy.Comparison of the clinical significance of the Papanicolaou test interpretations LSIL cannot rule out HSIL and ASC-H.Despite the two-tiered classification of dysplasia in The Bethesda System (TBS), rare cases fall into the category squamous intraepithelial lesion (SIL) of indeterminate grade. These Pap tests are often interpreted as "LSIL/ASC-H" or "LSIL" with a comment indicating the presence of cells with features approaching HSIL. Patients with LSIL/ASC-H have a significant risk of CIN 2 or worse (29-61.5%) on follow-up cervical biopsies, similar to the risk of CIN 2 or worse in patients with ASC-H Pap tests (24-68%). The purpose of this study was to compare patients with ASC-H and LSIL/ASC-H Pap tests. Women with LSIL/ASC-H had a slightly lower incidence of CIN 2 or worse (PPV = 35.6%, 95% CI: 29.8-41.4%) on follow-up cervical biopsy than the control ASC-H group (PPV = 40.2%, 95% CI: 31.9-56.3%); this difference was not statistically significant. The difference in the distribution of the biopsy results between the two groups was statistically significant (P < 0.001). The current guidelines for the management of cervical cytologic abnormalities from the American Society for Colposcopy and Cervical Pathology (ASCCP) advocate similar treatment algorithms for both LSIL and ASC-H. The main difference is the option of cytologic follow-up or HPV testing for certain "special populations," as an alternative to colposcopy, for LSIL Pap test results. Based on our results, we recommend (1)LSIL/ASC-H to be added to TBS classification and (2) Pap test cases of LSIL/ASC-H may need to be clinically followed in a manner similar to ASC-H, i.e., colposcopy for all patients.Hybrid capture 2 human papillomavirus DNA testing for women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance Papanicolaou results in SurePath and ThinPrep specimens.Human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA testing using Hybrid Capture 2 assay with ThinPrep Papanicolaou (Pap) collection is the only US Food and Drug Administration-approved method for the triage of women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS). Although SurePath Pap collection has been used for Hybrid Capture 2 HPV DNA testing, clinical validation of this method has been scarce.From a cervical cancer-screening program in Mississippi, we analyzed data from screenings of 8380 women with ASCUS Pap results who underwent reflex Hybrid Capture 2 HPV DNA tests during a course of 4 years. Of these, 4145 were screened with the ThinPrep collection system, and 4235 were screened with SurePath. Results of follow-up biopsies within 3 months of Pap tests were available for the ThinPrep group (229 cases) and the SurePath group (455 cases). Hybrid Capture 2 positive rates and the follow-up biopsy results from both groups were compared.Hybrid Capture 2 detected high-risk HPV DNA in 68.8% of ThinPrep and 66.7% of SurePath-collected specimens (P = .37). Detection rates for CIN2+ and CIN3+ were also comparable between ThinPrep (21.4%, 3.1%) and SurePath (15.4%, 4.2%) using Hybrid Capture 2 (P = .06, P = .45). In ThinPrep-collected specimens, 4.4% were quantitatively insufficient for Hybrid Capture 2 testing. Significantly more equivocal Hybrid Capture 2 results were observed in SurePath (11.4%) than in ThinPrep specimens (3.2%). However, 67.4% of women with equivocal Hybrid Capture 2 results had negative 1-year Pap cytology follow-up in the SurePath group.Hybrid Capture 2 positive rates and CIN2-3 detection rates were comparable for the SurePath and ThinPrep Pap collection systems, thus supporting the use of SurePath for Hybrid Capture 2 testing.The role of human papillomavirus testing in the management of women with low-grade abnormalities: multicentre randomised controlled trial.To assess the value of a single human papillomavirus (HPV) test in making decisions on management of women with cervical cytology showing borderline nuclear abnormality (BNA) or mild dyskaryosis. In particular, to determine whether information on high-risk (hr) HPV status would be valuable in the choice between (1) cytological surveillance versus immediate referral to colposcopy, and (2) at colposcopy, between biopsy and recall versus immediate large loop excision of the transformation zone (LLETZ).Multicentre individually randomised controlled trial, nested within the NHS Cervical Screening Programmes, investigating the value of HPV testing by testing for interactions between HPV status and (1) cytological surveillance versus colposcopy, and (2) biopsy and recall versus immediate LLETZ. Setting Grampian, Tayside and Nottingham. Population Women (n = 4439), aged 20-59 years, with a cytology test showing borderline nuclear abnormalities or mild dyskaryosis during October 1999 to October 2002.High-risk HPV status was determined at recruitment using the polymerase chain reaction assay with the GP5+/6+ general primer system. The results of this HPV testing were not disclosed to either the participating women or to those involved in their management. Women were randomised to either (1) 6-monthly cytological screening in primary care or (2) referral for colposcopy. Human papillomavirus status was used to stratify both randomisations. All women were followed for 3 years, concluding with an invitation to an exit appointment at which colposcopic examination was undertaken. In addition, in women who were randomised to initial colposcopy and underwent colposcopy, the association between hrHPV status and presence of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) grade 2 or more severe disease (henceforth CIN2 or worse) was examined.Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values of the HPV test for predicting CIN2 or worse and the implications for the choice of management between cytological surveillance and immediate referral for colposcopy.There were no significant interactions between management and HPV status. Hence, in women with mild dyskaryosis or BNA who are HPV positive, there is no advantage of (1) immediate colposcopy over cytological surveillance (P = 0.76) or (2) immediate LLETZ over biopsy and recall (P = 0.27). The sensitivity of HPV testing for detection of CIN2 or worse was 75.2% (95% CI 68.8-81.0%) among women with mild dyskaryosis and 69.9% (95% CI 61.7-77.3%) among those with BNA. Specificity was higher in those with BNA (71.3%; 95% CI 68.5-74.1%) than in those with mild dyskaryosis (46.9%; 95% CI 42.2-51.6%). Sensitivity decreased with increasing age whereas specificity increased. The negative predictive value was high, particularly among women with BNA (94.5%; 95% CI 92.9-96.0%). Across all ages, 22% of women who had CIN2 or worse were HPV negative. Conversely, 40% of those who were HPV positive did not have CIN. HPV was a much more reliable predictor in women aged over 40 years.We conclude that in younger women with low-grade cytological abnormalities, a single HPV test would not be useful in determining who should be referred for colposcopy or the most effective management at colposcopy. In women over 40, a negative HPV test could be used to rule out further investigation.Age-specific prevalence of HPV genotypes in cervical cytology samples with equivocal or low-grade lesions.To define the spectrum of human papillomavirus (HPV) types and establish an age limit for triage HPV testing in atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) and low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL).343 liquid-based cytological samples from the population-based screening programme with minor abnormalities were subjected to HPV genotyping (Linear Array, Roche, Basel, Switzerland).High-risk human papillomavirus (HR-HPV) was found in 71% of LSIL and 49% of ASCUS cases (P<0.001). High-risk human papillomavirus prevalence was age-dependent in LSIL (P=0.01), with decreasing prevalence until the age of 50 years, followed by a slight increase. Human papillomavirus type 16 was the most common HR-HPV, found in 23% of HPV-positive women. Human papillomavirus type 18 was the sixth most common, found in 9.9% (P<0.001). An age-dependent quadratic trend was observed for multiple infections (P=0.01) with a trough at about 42 years. The most common HR-HPV types to show a coinfection with HPV16 (clade 9) were HPV39 (28%), 45 (38%), and 59 (46%), belonging to HPV18 clade 7. The frequency of low-risk (LR) vs probable HR and HR-HPV also followed an age-dependent quadratic trend.After the age of 25 years, HR-HPV prevalence is similar in LSIL and ASCUS cases, motivating a low age limit for triage HPV testing. Multiple infections and LR/HR-HPV dominance are age-dependent. Genotyping in longitudinal design is needed to elucidate the importance of multiple infections in cancer progression and in cross-protection from vaccination.HPV testing for triage of HIV-infected women with papanicolaou smears read as atypical squamous cells of uncertain significance.To assess the utility of testing for high-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA as a triage strategy for detecting cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) grade 2/3 in women with human immunodeficiency virus-1 (HIV-1) infection and cytology read as atypical cells of uncertain significance (ASCUS).Conventional cervical cytology and cervicovaginal lavage were obtained at 6-month intervals between October 1, 1994, and September 30, 2002, from women enrolled in the Women's Interagency HIV Study, a multicenter cohort studying the natural history of HIV in women. HPV typing was performed by PCR. HPV types 16, 18, 31, 33, 35, 39, 45, 51, 52, 56, 58, 59, and 68 were classified as carrying high oncogenic risk. Women with ASCUS smears were referred for colposcopy. Analyses of the sensitivity of HPV testing were cross-sectional, using colposcopy results within 90 days of first ASCUS result.Of the 270 women evaluated, 7 (3%) had CIN 2, and 3 (1%) had CIN3 or adenocarcinoma in situ. High-risk HPV DNA was found in 81 (30%) of the 270 participants. The sensitivity of high-risk HPV DNA detection for CIN 2/3 was 50% (95% CI 0.19, 0.81), the specificity was 71% (95% CI 0.65, 0.76), the positive predictive value was 6% (95% CI 0.01, 0.11), and the negative predictive value was 97% (95% CI 0.95, 1.00). HPV of any risk type was found in 176 (65%) of the 270 women, including 9 of 10 women with CIN 2/3, for a sensitivity of 90% (95% CI 0.56, 1.00), a specificity of 36% (95% CI 0.30, 0.42), a positive predictive value of 5% (95% CI 0.02, 0.08), and a negative predictive value of 99% (95% CI 0.94, 1.00).For women with HIV and Papanicolaou smears read as ASCUS, DNA testing for high risk HPV may not be sensitive enough for clinical use.Multiplex chemiluminescence microscope imaging of P16(INK4A) and HPV DNA as biomarker of cervical neoplasia.Classification of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) lesions in low-grade (CIN1) or high-grade (CIN2-3) ones is crucial for optimal patient management, but current histological diagnosis on bioptic samples is often hampered by inter-observer variability. To allow objective classification, we have exploited the peculiar characteristics of chemiluminescence detection, such as high sensitivity and easy quantification of the luminescence signal, to perform sequentially in the same tissue section both an immunohistochemical quantitative detection of p16(INK4A) (a protein marker of high-grade CIN lesions) and an in situ hybridization for human papillomavirus (generally accepted as a necessary but insufficient cause of cervical carcinoma). Different label enzymes (alkaline phosphatase and horseradish peroxidase) were employed in order to avoid any interference between the two assays, and quantitative chemiluminescence image analysis was used to obtain objective evaluation of sample positivity. The multiplexed method allowed detection of two complementary biomarkers and provided discrimination between different lesions (non-neoplastic, low-grade and high-grade CIN). This assay might thus represent an accurate and objective diagnostic test providing important information for counseling, selection of therapy and follow up after surgical treatment.Clinical significance of cytologic diagnosis of atypical squamous cells, cannot exclude high grade, in perimenopausal and postmenopausal women.We used cytohistologic correlation to determine the clinical significance of atypical squamous cells, cannot exclude high grade (ASC-H) in perimenopausal and postmenopausal women. A computer search identified 250 Papanicolaou smears from women older than 45 years with a diagnosis of ASC- H. Cases were considered perimenopausal (45 to < 55 years; 150 cases) and postmenopausal ((3)55 years; 100 cases). No follow-up data were available for 33 cases, which were excluded. The remaining 217 cases (perimenopausal, 127; postmenopausal, 90) had surgical or cytologic follow-up. Results of follow-up colposcopic biopsy were available for 176 (81.1%) and cytology for 41 (18.9%) women. Follow-up results were as follows: perimenopausal women, negative, 50 (39.4%); mild dysplasia (low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion [LSIL]), 46 (36.2%); high-grade dysplasia (high-grade SIL [HSIL]); 28 (22.0%); and ASC of undetermined significance (ASC-US), 3 (2.4%); postmenopausal women, negative, 52 (58%); LSIL, 31 (34%); HSIL, 5 (6%); and ASC-US, 2 (2%). The diagnosis of ASC-H in postmenopausal women usually is associated with LSIL or a negative diagnosis on follow-up, suggesting a less aggressive surveillance and treatment regimen is needed for postmenopausal women with ASC-H.The triage of squamous cell abnormalities of cervical cytology by human papilloma virus screening.The aim of the study was to determine the presence of human papilloma virus (HPV) infection in cervical swabs by the use of the Digene Hybrid Capture assay in a cohort of patients with squamous cell abnormalities found in cervical cytologic screening.Thirty-four (0.3%) of 1,100 patients who came for their routine cervical cytologic screening and diagnosed as having squamous cell abnormalities were enrolled in the study. Colposcopy-directed biopsy was obtained from all study patients. HPV DNA was sought in cervical swab specimens placed in Digene transport medium by the use of the Digene Hybrid Capture assay. The findings of cervical cytology, colposcopy-directed biopsy and HPV screening were compared.In a total of 34 women who were diagnosed as having squamous cell abnormalities in their routine cervical cytologic screening, 15 women had atypical squamous cell lesions of undetermined significancy (ASCUS), 16 women had low-grade cervical intraepithelial lesions (LGSIL), and three women had high-grade cervical intraepithelial lesions (HGSIL). Five (15%) of these women tested positive for HPV screening in cervical swabs where four women had infection with high-risk and one woman had infection with low-risk subtypes. None of the patients with koilocytotic changes of the squamous cells in the class of LGSIL histopathologically tested positive for HPV screening. In addition, one patient diagnosed as having invasive cervical carcinoma histopathologically tested negative for HPV screening. Atypical vascularization was seen colposcopically in this 37-year-old woman who had ASCUS cytologically.HPV screening seems to have value in the triage of patients with ASCUS with no clear advantage to colposcopy-directed biopsy. The routine performance of HPV screening for the triage of patients with squamous cell abnormalities has no advantage over colposcopy-directed biopsy.Increased risk of oncogenic human papillomavirus infections and incident high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia among smokers: experience from the Latin American screening study.The purpose of this study was to assess the effect of smoking on the prevalence and incidence of high-risk human papillomavirus (hr-HPV) infection and cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) in a large sample of Latin American women.The study examines baseline data on over 12,000 women included in the Latin American Screening Study (Brazil and Argentina), and over 1000 women followed-up for a period of 36 months. Three groups were formed: never smokers, current, and past smokers. The prevalence of hr-HPV infection and CIN were compared between the study groups. In the prospective analysis, women were controlled at 6-month intervals to assess the cumulative risk of incident hr-HPV infection, smear abnormalities, and CIN.A higher prevalence (21.7%) of hr-HPV infection was found among current smokers as compared to never smokers (16.5%) or past smokers (13.5%). Being current smoker was significantly (P <0.01) associated with hr-HPV detection (OR = 1.6; 95% CI = 1.2-2.1). Being a current smoker was a significant predictor of incident hr-HPV during the follow-up [Hazards ratio (HR) = 1.4; 95% CI 1.0-1.9]. For incident CIN2+, being a past smoker (HR = 3.6; 95% CI 1.6-9.8) or current smoker (HR = 3.6; 95% CI 1.5-8.6) were the significant independent predictors. Current and past smokers had a significantly increased risk of incident CIN2+ (P <0.01).Smoking increases the risk of contracting hr-HPV infection and modifies the effect of a persistent hr-HPV infection by further increasing the risk of developing CIN2+. It seems that this effect modification persists over several years after smoking cessation.HPV testing as an adjunct to cytology in the follow up of women treated for cervical intraepithelial neoplasia.To evaluate human papillomavirus (HPV) testing in combination with cytology in the follow up of treated women.A prospective study.Three UK centres: Manchester, Aberdeen and London.Women treated for cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN).Women were recruited at 6 months of follow up, and cytology and HPV testing was carried out at 6 and 12 months. If either or both results were positive, colposcopy and if appropriate, a biopsy and retreatment was performed. At 24 months, cytology alone was performed.Cytology and histology at 6, 12 and 24 months.Nine hundred and seventeen women were recruited at 6 months of follow up, with 778 (85%) and 707 (77.1%) being recruited at 12 and 24 months, respectively. At recruitment, 700 women had had high-grade CIN (grades 2 or 3) and 217 had CIN1. At 6 months, 14.6% were HPV positive and 10.7% had non-negative cytology. Of those with negative cytology, 9% were HPV positive. Of the 744 women who were cytology negative/HPV negative at baseline, 3 women with CIN2, 1 with CIN3, 1 with cancer and 1 with vaginal intraepithelial neoplasia (VAIN)1 were identified at 24 months. Nine of 10 cases of CIN3/cervical glandular intraepithelial neoplasia (CGIN) occurred in HPV-positive women. At 23 months, cancer was identified in a woman treated for CGIN with clear resection margins, who had been cytology negative/HPV negative at both 6 and 12 months.Women who are cytology negative and HPV negative at 6 months after treatment for CIN can safely be returned to 3-year recall.Contribution of human papillomavirus testing by hybrid capture in the triage of women with repeated abnormal pap smears before colposcopy referral.The purpose of this work was to evaluate the ability of testing for high-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) types using the hybrid capture technique to predict the presence of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) II,III in patients with repeated atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) and low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LGSIL) on Pap smears.Hybrid capture testing and tissue biopsy were performed on 503 consecutive women with ASCUS or LGSIL on repeated Pap smears who were referred for colposcopy.A highly significant association (P < 0.0001) was found between a positive test for high-risk HPV types and CIN II,III, with an 87.0% positive predictive value and a 95.7% negative predictive value. In 226 women with ASCUS on repeated Pap smears, a positive test for high-risk HPV types had a 85.7% sensitivity and a 97% specificity for CIN II,III. In 277 patients with LGSIL on repeated Pap smears, a positive test for high-risk HPV types had an 88.2% sensitivity and a 94.7% specificity for CIN I,II. Reserving colposcopy examination for women who were positive for high-risk HPV types would have reduced the number of referrals for colposcopy to 24.6% and maintained a sensitivity of 87.0% for CIN II,III.A positive hybrid capture test for high-risk HPV types was highly sensitive and specific for the presence of CIN II,III in patients with ASCUS and LGSIL on repeated Pap smears. We believe that improved methodology will eventually enable more selective colposcopy referrals without affecting patient safety among these women.Prevalence of human papillomavirus types 6, 11, 16 and 18 in young Austrian women - baseline data of a phase III vaccine trial.Cervical cancer is the second most common cancer among women worldwide. In the absence of changing risk or intervention, it is projected that in comparison with 2002 there will be a 40% increase in the number of new cases of cervical cancer by 2020. HPV types 16 and 18 cause 70% of cervical cancers worldwide, 50% of high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasias and 25% of low-grade neoplasias. HPV types 6 and 11 are the causative agent of > 90% of genital warts. The aim of this study was to assess the baseline prevalence of infection with HPV 6, 11, 16 and 18 in young Austrian women.Austrian females aged 16-24 (n = 123) were enrolled in a double-blind, placebo-controlled, randomized phase III trial of a quadrivalent HPV (types 6, 11, 16, 18) vaccine (FUTURE I, ClinicalTrials.gov number NCT00092521). Healthy women who were not pregnant and had no prior history of genital warts or abnormal results on cervical cytologic testing and had fewer than five lifetime sex partners were eligible for enrollment. The study sub-population was recruited primarily from university settings.Analysis of the sexual history of the Austrian subjects showed that 92.7% (114/123) were non-virgins and 46.3% were current smokers. At enrollment, 15 (13.5%) had positive serological or PCR tests for HPV 6, 11, 16 or 18. Serologically, 14 (12.3%) of women were positive to HPV 6, 11, 16 or 18: of these, 13 (11.4%) were positive for HPV 16, four (3.5%) were positive for HPV 18, and one (0.9%) for HPV 6. By PCR all were negative for HPV 6 and 11, whereas seven (6.1%) were positive for HPV 16 and one (0.9%) for HPV 18. Abnormal cytology was observed in 12 (10.3%) women.Although the prevalence of vaccine HPV types among young Austrian women with fewer than five lifetime sexual partners was lower than in international data, we observed a high prevalence of abnormal cytology and smoking. These data suggest that a substantial number of Austrian women are at risk for HPV-related disease.Value of p16(INK4a) as a marker of progression/regression in cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 1.The objective of this study was to evaluate the usefulness of p16(INK4a) staining to classify cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 1 according to its progression/regression risk.Patients with a histologic diagnosis of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 1 were prospectively recruited (n = 138). Simultaneous detection of high-risk human papillomaviruses and p16(INK4a) evaluation were performed. Follow-up was conducted every 6 months by cytology and colposcopy and annually by high-risk human papillomavirus testing, for at least 12 months (mean, 29.0). Progression was defined as a histologic diagnosis of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grades 2-3, regression as a negative cytology and high-risk human papillomaviruses, and persistence as a cytologic result of low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions and/or a positive test for high-risk human papillomaviruses.Progression was observed in 14 women (10.1%), 66 (47.6%) regressed, and 58 (42.0%) had a persistent disease. p16(INK4a) was positive in 77 (55.8%) initial biopsy specimens. Progression to cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grades 2-3 was identified in 14 of 77 (18.2%) women with positive and none of 61 (0.00%) women with negative p16(INK4a) immunostaining (P < .001).p16(INK4a) negative cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 1 lesions rarely progress and may benefit from a less intensive follow-up.A randomized trial of basing treatment on human papillomavirus and/or cytology results in low-grade cervical lesion triage.This study was undertaken to compare management algorithms that base treatment with loop electrosurgical excision procedure on human papillomavirus and/or repeat Papanicolaou test smear results.A randomized trial that referred 674 women with either atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance or low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions cytology results, detected in organized screening to treatment either (1) if they were positive in a repeat Papanicolaou test smear and/or a human papillomavirus test or (2) if they were positive in the repeat Papanicolaou test smear test only. Women who tested positive were treated, regardless of colposcopic findings.There were 208 of 337 (62%) women who were treated in the human papillomavirus /Papanicolaou test smear group (187/337 because of HPV positivity) and 138 of 337 (41%) in the Papanicolaou test smear only group. Histopathologically diagnosed cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 2 or worse was found among 112 of 337 (33.2%) women in the human papillomavirus/Papanicolaou test smear group compared with 85 of 337 (25.2%) women in the Papanicolaou test smear only group (P < .05). Twenty-one women with cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 2+ had normal colposcopy.For adequate cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 2+ sensitivity, the decision to use loop electrosurgical excision procedure needs to be based on human papillomavirus testing results and should not exclude women with normal colposcopy.Detection of telomerase, its components, and human papillomavirus in cervical scrapings as a tool for triage in women with cervical dysplasia.To examine whether the detection of either telomerase and its components or high risk human papillomavirus (HPV) are of value in predicting the presence of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) grade II/III in women referred because of cervical cytology reports showing at most moderate dyskaryosis.Cervical scrapings of 50 women referred with cytological borderline, mild, or moderate dyskaryosis were analysed. Telomerase activity was assessed by a commercially available telomere repeat amplification protocol assay and its components human telomerase RNA (hTR) and human telomerase reverse transcriptase (hTERT) were assessed by reverse transcriptase polymerase chain reaction (PCR). HPV was detected by GP5+/6+ PCR enzyme immunosassay. Histological findings on colposcopy guided biopsies or excised cervical tissue were regarded as the final pathological diagnosis. The sensitivity and specificity for detecting CIN II/III were calculated.Twenty eight women were diagnosed with CIN II/III. Telomerase activity was detected in none, hTR in 88%, hTERT in 23%, and high risk HPV was detected in 79% of these women. As a diagnostic test none of the described analyses combined a sensitivity of at least 90% with a specificity >or= 90%. Despite the small numbers, calculation of the 95% confidence intervals excluded a combined sensitivity and specificity of at least 90% for all of the evaluated parameters.Neither detection of telomerase or its components, nor detection of high risk HPV seem suitable for the triage of women with borderline, mild, and moderate cytological dyskaryosis.Papillary squamous intraepithelial lesions of the uterine cervix: human papillomavirus-dependent changes in cell cycle expression and cytologic features.Most human papillomavirus-associated squamous intraepithelial lesions of the uterine cervix are flat; some have papillary architecture that shows a spectrum of differentiation from low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions to high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions. For this subset of lesions, there are few data relating human papillomavirus type to cytology and cell cycle activity. Here, we collected 24 cases of papillary squamous intraepithelial lesions with either low-risk (15 cases) or high-risk (9 cases) human papillomavirus infection. We described their morphology and performed immunohistochemical staining with cell cycle-related markers Ki-67, p53, pRb, and P16INK4a. The Ki-67 labeling index was significantly lower in the low-risk group than in the high-risk group (P < .001). A cut point of less than 50% labeling index detected all but one low-risk group case. Degradation of p53 and pRb was less evident in the low-risk group than in the high-risk group (p53, P < .001; pRb, P = .006). P16INK4a produced an unexpectedly high positive rate of staining in the low-risk group (60%). However, a specific top-heavy distribution pattern was noted, with evident nuclear but faint cytoplasmic staining, whereas the high-risk group showed strong full-thickness nuclear and cytoplasmic staining. The detection of these lesions by smear examination was not reliable, given the wide expression pattern. Papillary structure was evident in none. We conclude that cell cycle-related markers are helpful in distinguishing low- and high-risk lesions. The strong p16INK4a staining in the low-risk group may imply that more cell cycle-controlling pressure is elicited in papillary lesions than in flat lesions. The distribution pattern of p16INK4a staining is important when making a diagnosis; cytology is not effective. Human papillomavirus type, histology, and cell cycle markers could clearly separate these lesions into either a low-risk or a high-risk group, properly designated low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions or high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions in current management algorithms. Thus, the previously used terms papillary immature metaplasia and immature condyloma, although descriptive for low-risk group lesions, are confusing and should be discarded.Atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance, human papillomavirus, and cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 2 or 3 in adolescents: ASC-US, age, and high-grade cervical neoplasia.To determine rates of and factors associated with cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) 2 or 3 among women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US) and oncogenic human papillomavirus (HPV) infection.This is a retrospective review of 357 women with ASC-US and known high-risk HPV infection. To be eligible for inclusion, patients had to have subsequently undergone colposcopic-directed cervical biopsy and/or endocervical sampling. Univariate and multivariable regression analyses were used to estimate crude and adjusted odds ratios of CIN 2 or 3 by risk factors associated with HPV and CIN.Thirty-three of 215 (15%) women with ASC-US and oncogenic HPV who underwent histological sampling demonstrated CIN 2 or 3. In the adjusted model, only nulliparity (adjusted odds ratio = 2.2, 95% CI = 1.0-4.8) retained a marginal association with the outcome. No significant age-related differences in the prevalence of high-grade disease emerged. The high-grade lesions seen in adolescents consisted of single, small lesions.In the light of these findings, and in conjunction with the high rate of oncogenic HPV infection among adolescents with ASC-US, both reflex HPV testing and immediate colposcopy do not appear to be of benefit in the initial management of teenagers with this cytological diagnosis.The evaluation of human papillomavirus genotyping in cervical liquid-based cytology specimens; using the Roche Linear Array HPV genotyping assay.To ascertain the usefulness of the Roche Linear Array human papillomavirus (HPV) genotyping assay for assessing HPV genotypes in liquid-based cytology (LBC) samples and to evaluate this methodology within a cytopathology laboratory. These tests are of importance as persistent infection with high-risk HPV genotypes is considered a causal factor in the development of cervical cancer.A total of 175 cervical LBC samples were tested using the Roche Linear Array HPV genotyping test. The suitability of the assay use in routine cytopathology laboratory was considered. HPV genotypes were matched to the cervical cytology results, which included negative, borderline nuclear abnormalities, mild, moderate and severe dyskaryosis.The assay could be applied to screening samples with the combined result available at the reporting stage. There were no test failures. All samples used after cytological analysis had sufficient DNA for testing. The results were reproducible and easily read and there was concordance of results between biomedical scientists. The results of the assay showed co-infection with multiple HPV genotypes was common in both high-grade and low-grade cytology samples. The percentage of HPV+ samples in the normal cytology samples (although in this grouping the number of samples was low) was 37%. In the cytology samples reported as severe dyskaryosis the HPV genotypes most commonly found were HPV16 and HPV51.The assay was able to detect multiple HPV infection with a wide range of genotypes in LBC samples sent for routine cytological analysis. It would be suitable for use in a cytopathology laboratory. The results of the assay show that the genotype profile has some variation from other geographical regions, and more work is needed to determine population prevalence, to ascertain the impact of the HPV vaccine, to evaluate test for cure and HPV triage management.[Importance of human papillomavirus (HPV) screening in the follow-up after CIN2-3 treatment].Cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) 2 and CIN3 lesions clearly represent precancerous states even if some of them would heal spontaneously. Management is based on surgical excision of part of the uterine cervix because such lesions can potentially progress into carcinomas. In most cases, this treatment leads to the cure of intraepithelial lesions. However, even after such an efficient treatment, theses patients are still at a higher risk of developing an invasive cervical cancer. That is why guidelines recommend a specific follow-up in order to screen for residual disease (incomplete excision) or for recurrences (after a complete excision). The actual problem in the follow-up strategy lies in the screening tools in use - cervical smears and colposcopy - whose sensitivities are low and hence, not quite sufficient when applied to a high risk population. These intraepithelial lesions are due to high risk human papillomaviruses (HPV) and there cannot be any lesion progression without HPV. Consequently, a viral testing would help in identifying a high risk subpopulation of women after cone loop cervical excision.We studied, retrospectively, the contribution of HPV testing (Hybrid Capture 2((R))) in the follow-up after CIN2-3 treatment in 386 cone loop cervical excisions performed at a single centre during 80 months.Between three to six months follow-up after surgery, HPV remained present in 22.5% cases. The sensitivity of HPV testing in the screening for residual lesions or for recurrences was 100%, that of cervical smears cytology was 72%, whereas that of the pathological analysis of margins reached only 67%. The negative predictive value of a negative HPV detection associated with a normal cytology was 100%.Owing to its clinical relevance, HPV testing optimises postoperative follow-up and leads to the rapid and efficient selection of a subgroup, representing less than one upon three patients who are really at risk of an invasive lesion and to wholly reassure the others. Indeed, a negative HPV testing, associated with a normal cervical cytology, obtained after surgery correspond to a negative predictive value of almost 100% and this allows us to increase the time-interval between two screenings and to rapidly place the patient in a routine follow-up.Human papillomavirus testing by hybrid capture appears to be useful in triaging women with a cytologic diagnosis of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance.Our purpose was to determine the clinical value of human papillomavirus deoxyribonucleic acid testing with the hybrid capture test, specifically to examine whether human papillomavirus testing could identify which women with Papanicolaou smears read as atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance were most likely to have histologically confirmed cervical intraepithelial neoplasia.Hybrid capture testing for 14 human papillomavirus types, repeat Papanicolaou smears, and colposcopically directed biopsies were performed concurrently on 217 women referred to a student health colposcopy clinic with a previous Papanicolaou smear read as atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance.Human papillomavirus deoxyribonucleic acid positivity was associated with an eightfold increased likelihood of histologic confirmation of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia. The sensitivity of hybrid capture for any cervical intraepithelial neoplasia was 86% (43/50) and for grade 2 or 3 was 93% (14/15), whereas the corresponding values for the repeat Papanicolaou smear were 60% (30/50) and 73% (11/15), respectively. Moreover, high viral levels of human papillomavirus types known to be associated with cervical cancer were strongly predictive of high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia.Testing for human papillomavirus deoxyribonucleic acid with hybrid capture appears to offer an effective means by which patients whose cervical Papanicolaou smears have been read as atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance could be triaged for colposcopy. In particular, sensitivity for high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia could be maintained and specificity markedly improved by referring only those patients who had elevated levels of human papillomavirus deoxyribonucleic acid of cancer-associated viral types.[The clinical significance and management of cervico-cytologically diagnosed ASCUS/LSIL].To investigate the clinical significance and management of ASCUS/LSIL.254 patients who were examined with cervical cytology in the Cancer Institute and Hospital Chinese Academy of Medical Sciences were ASCUS/LSIL, of whom 136 cases underwent colposcopy, Data were analyzed retrospectively according to the golden criterion of pathology outcome.140 cases were ASCUS, and 114 cases were LSIL. Cervical intra-epithelial neoplasia (CIN) were diagnosed in 51.5% of patients with ASCUS, compared with 59.6% of patients with LSIL (P>0.05). High-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia were diagnosed in 22.9% of patients with ASCUS, compared with 30.7% of patients with LSIL (P >0.05). In the 136 patients examined with colposcopy, inflammation was found in 47 cases, low-grade intraepithelial lesion in 53 cases, High-grade intraepithelial lesion in 36 cases. The pathological results show inflammation in 55 cases, low-grade intraepithelial lesion in 41 cases, High-grade intraepithelial lesion in 40 cases (Kappa=0.314, U=0.064, P less than 0.05). CIN were diagnosed in 79% (67/84) of HPV-positive patients identified by pathology, compared with 43.5% (74/170) of HPV-negative patients (chi2=29.88 P less than 0.05). 83.5% of 254 patients were between 35 to 55 years old, and that was consistent with HPV-positive women age peak.Patients with ASCUS should be paid the same attention with LSIL patients and colposcopy examination should be done immediately to avoid missed diagnosis and missed follow-up examination, especially for HPV positive patients between 35 to 55 years old.An economic analysis of human papillomavirus triage for the management of women with atypical and abnormal Pap smear results in Germany.We developed decision-analytic models to determine the cost effectiveness of incorporating human papillomavirus (HPV) testing into the management of atypical and abnormal Pap smear results in Germany. The models compare three management strategies: (1) repeat Pap smear, (2) triage with HPV DNA testing, or (3) immediate treatment. The primary outcome measure is incremental cost per case of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) 2+ detected and treated. The models take the perspective of the German health system. For patients with initial PapIIw, III, and IIId results, incremental cost effectiveness ratios for HPV triage versus repeat Pap smears are 2,232 euro, 815 euro, and 487 euro per additional case of CIN2+ detected and treated. In addition, the number of cases of CIN2+ detected and treated in a hypothetical population of 1,000 women increases from 17 to 35, 61 to 130, and 157 to 332 for each population, respectively. For patients with initial PapIII and IIId results, immediate treatment of 1,000 patients detects only four and 11 additional cases of CIN2+ versus HPV triage at incremental cost effectiveness ratios of 39,684 euro and 10,716 euro per case, respectively. For each of the populations evaluated, HPV triage is the most cost-effective management strategy versus either repeat Pap smear or immediate treatment.Comparative evaluation of smear cytology & hybrid capture II for the diagnosis of cervical cancer.There is no ideal screening method for cervical cancer in India with the role of human papilloma virus (HPV) detection yet to be established. This study was undertaken to compare the diagnostic accuracy of HPV testing by hybrid capture II (HC-II) with conventional cervical smear cytology for squamous intraepithelial lesions (SIL).This prospective study was conducted at New Delhi during 2003-2004 with patients selected from the gynaecology out patients of the All India Institute of Medical Sciences. Initial screening by a questionnaire and per-speculum examination were used to select high-risk patients. Patients, in whom conventional cytology, HC-II test and colposcopy-directed biopsy were done, formed the basis of this study.Of the 133 patients included in the study, incidence on biopsy of low grade SIL (L-SIL) was 6.77 per cent, high grade SIL (H-SIL) was 8.27 per cent and carcinoma was 3.00 per cent. Sensitivity and specificity of cytology for detection of H-SIL and above lesions was 93.33 and 83.49 per cent while for HC-II it was 93.33 and 90.83 per cent, respectively. HC-II had higher diagnostic accuracy of 91.13 per cent versus 84.68 per cent for cytology. Kappa for HC-II was higher (0.67) than cytology (0.52). Among patients diagnosed to have atypical squamous cells (ASC-US & ASC-H) and L-SIL, HC-II helped to select patients who had significant lesions on biopsy.The main utility of HC-II is in the triage of patients with cytology smear diagnosis of ASC-US, ASC-H or L-SIL, for referral to colposcopic examination. HC-II alone has the best diagnostic accuracy but owing to high cost it is unsuitable for general screening in developing countries. Combining HC-II with cytology will refer smaller numbers for colposcopy,improving efficient utilization of available resources.Comparison of linear array and line blot assay for detection of human papillomavirus and diagnosis of cervical precancer and cancer in the atypical squamous cell of undetermined significance and low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion triage study.We evaluated Linear Array (LA), a newly commercialized PGMY09/11 L1 consensus primer PCR test that detects 37 human papillomavirus (HPV) genotypes by reverse line blot hybridization, for the detection of individual HPV genotypes and carcinogenic HPV and its clinical performance for detecting 2-year cumulative cervical precancer and cancer using archived specimens from the Atypical Squamous Cell of Undetermined Significance (ASCUS) and Low-Grade Squamous Intraepithelial Lesion Triage Study. LA testing was conducted on enrollment specimens from women referred because of an ASCUS Pap test. To gauge the performance of the new test, the results were compared to those of its prototype predecessor assay, Line Blot Assay (LBA), restricted to paired results (n = 3,335). LA testing was done masked to LBA results and clinical outcomes. The results of LA and LBA testing were compared for detection of carcinogenic HPV and clinical outcomes of cervical precancer and cancer. Overall, 50% and 55% of the women tested positive for carcinogenic HPV by LBA and LA, respectively (P < 0.0001). The percent agreement for carcinogenic HPV detection was 88%, percent positive agreement was 80%, and kappa was 0.76 for detection of carcinogenic HPV by the two assays. There was a significant increase in detection by LA for most of the 37 HPV genotypes targeted by both assays, including for 13 of 14 carcinogenic HPV genotypes. LA detected more multiple-genotype infections for all HPV genotypes among HPV-positive women (P < 0.0001) and for carcinogenic HPV genotypes among carcinogenic-HPV-positive women (P < 0.0001). LA was more sensitive (92.3% versus 87.1%; P = 0.003) and less specific (48.2% versus 54.0%; P < 0.0001) than LBA for 2-year cumulative cervical precancer and cancer as diagnosed by the Pathology Quality Control Group. In conclusion, we found LA to be a promising assay for the detection of HPV genotypes and carcinogenic HPV, and it may be clinically useful for the detection of cervical precancer and cancer in women with equivocal cytology.Cytological distinction between high-risk and low-risk human papillomavirus infections in SurePath liquid-based cell preparations.To investigate the correlation of various diagnostic cytological features in SurePath liquid-based cell preparations with high-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) infection.Case-control study. SurePath specimens from 510 cases that had been tested for HPV DNA by Hybrid Capture 2 assay were retrieved and re-examined for 10 cytological features. Distribution of these features in high- and low-risk HPV types was compared and risk statistics were estimated. Effects of cervicitis on the manifestation of HPV cytological changes were adjusted by means of logistic regression.Cytological features of nuclear hyperchromasia, multinucleation and atypical metaplastic cells were predominantly noted in high-risk HPV infection in the category of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance/low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion. The odds ratios of these three features were 6-12 times higher in high-risk than low-risk HPV infection.Some diagnostic cytological features can be used as markers in Pap smear screening for assessing the types of HPV infection.Human papillomavirus-specific genotypes in cervical lesions of women referred for smears with atypical glandular cells or adenocarcinoma in situ.This study was designed to analyze whether specific human papillomavirus (HPV) genotypes may predict histologic outcomes in women with glandular abnormalities in their cervical smears. Of the 160 women included, 111 were diagnosed with atypical glandular cells, 35 had both atypical glandular cells and high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions, whereas 14 women had AIS, in 1 case associated with high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions. All women underwent colposcopic examinations and biopsy was performed in 129/160 (80.6%). Thirty-one women (19.3%) were considered negative for neoplasia and scheduled for follow-up. All specimens were tested for 27 HPV genotypes by Roche's polymerase chain reaction-reverse line blot assay. Histologic diagnoses were either cervical intraepithelial neoplasia or invasive carcinoma in 75 (58%) women, and negative for neoplasia in 54 (42%). The overall prevalence of HPV was 43%. HPV 16 was the most prevalent type followed by HPV 18. HPV 16 was significantly associated with squamous and glandular neoplasia and HPV 18 with glandular neoplasia. In women with cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 2 or 3, 11 different HPV genotypes were found, whereas in those who had invasive glandular or invasive carcinoma HPV 16 and HPV 18 were found predominantly. The detection of HPV 16 in women with glandular abnormalities in cervical smears did not help differentiating squamous from glandular lesions. However, the detection of HPV 53 in abnormal smears can predict squamous neoplasia, whereas HPV 18 can predict glandular neoplasia as histologic diagnoses.Are adjunctive markers useful in routine cervical cancer screening? Application of p16(INK4a) and HPV-PCR on ThinPrep samples with histological follow-up.The objectives of the study were to evaluate 1) the diagnostic sensitivity and specificity of p16(INK4a) as a marker for high-grade cervical lesions, 2) the results of a real-time polymerase chain reaction detecting high-risk human papillomavirus, and 3) the interobserver variability of the p16(INK4a) interpretation.A total of 232 ThinPrep samples were stained for p16(INK4a), and HPV-DNA PCR was performed on 107 specimens with inclusion of both benign and abnormal cytology. Histological follow-up information was collected. The diagnostic sensitivity of ASC+ with CIN2+ in histology as endpoint was 96% for p16(INK4a) and 100% for HR-HPV DNA PCR, and the diagnostic specificity was 41% and 27%, respectively. If p16(INK4a) had been used for triage of the ASC samples, then 18 patients (42%) could have been spared unnecessary follow-up procedures compared to six patients (21%) with the HR-HPV DNA test.Linear array genotyping and hybrid capture II assay in detecting human papillomavirus genotypes in women referred for colposcopy due to abnormal Papanicolaou smear.The main objective of this study was to assess the feasibility of human papillomavirus (HPV) genotyping in women referred for colposcopy due to abnormal Papanicolaou (Pap) smear. A series of 248 women referred for colposcopy due to an abnormal Pap smear were analysed with the Roche Linear Array HPV genotyping test detecting 37 most frequent HPV types, and compared with hybrid capture II (HCII) assay for oncogenic (high-risk [HR] HPV) types as well as for p16INK4a expression using immunocytochemistry. All tests were performed in cervical samples collected in PreservCyt liquid media for liquid-based cytology (ThinPrep), and colposcopic biopsy and/or loop electro excision procedure cone biopsy was used as the gold standard. HPV16 was the single most frequent genotype (29/258; 11.7%), followed by HPV51 (4.4%), HPV66 (3.6%), HPV42, 52 and 56 (3.2% for all). Linear array genotyping test significantly predicts both abnormal colposcopy (odds ratio [OR] = 9.0; 3.12-25.93), high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (OR = 9.6; 1.26-74.17) and cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) 3+ (OR = 29.3; 3.95-218.06). In detecting CIN3, linear array was equivalent (97.6%) to colposcopy in sensitivity (SE), both being superior to HCII (92.7%). Concordance between linear array and HCII was moderate (Cohen's kappa kappa = 0.547; 95% confidence interval [CI]: 0.435-659). Specificity (SP) and positive predictive value (PPV) of linear array were significantly improved, if only HPV16 genotype was considered. Performance in the best balance is obtained, when linear array and colposcopy are combined, giving 82.9% SE, 93.9% SP, 73.9% PPV and 96.3% negative predictive value (NPV) as predictor of CIN3+ (OR 74.5; 95% CI: 27.36-202.72). In conclusion, linear array for HR-HPV is a highly sensitive test (97.6%) with high NPV (98.9%) in detecting CIN3+ lesions. HPV16 genotyping alone significantly improves SP and PPV of this test in management of women with abnormal cytology.Atypical glandular cells of undetermined significance. Outcome predictions based on human papillomavirus testing.Cases of atypical glandular cells (AGC) diagnosed on liquid-based preparations were culled from a 3-year period. When available, residual cellular material was analyzed for human papillomavirus (HPV) by polymerase chain reaction and correlated with cytologic and histologic (biopsy) outcome. Of 178,994 cytologic cases, 187 (0.1045%) contained AGC compared with 8,740 (4.8828%) atypical squamous cells (ASC) for an AGC/ASC ratio of 0.021. HPV results and follow-up were available for 108 specimens from 106 patients. Depending on the end-point (histologic/cyto-logic), the sensitivity range of HPV testing for significant cervical disease (high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion [SIL], adenocarcinoma in situ [ACIS], invasive carcinoma) was 83% with a specificity range of 78% to 82%, a positive predictive value of 57% to 61%, and a negative predictive value of 91% to 95%. Fifteen false-positive results included concurrent ASC or low-grade SIL, ASC on follow-up cytology, and previous ACIS with a negative follow-up cone biopsy result. Noncervical glandular neoplasia (including atypical endometrial hyperplasia) was confirmed in 13 cases (1 recurrent), only 2 of which scored positive for HPV. HPV-positive AGC has a substantially higher positive predictive value for significant disease than ASC (61% vs historic 20%) and merits consideration in the triage of patients with atypical endocervical cells not otherwise specified. However, noncervical or other HPV-negative glandular neoplasia must be considered in all patients with AGC, particularly older patients.Comparison of HPV detection technologies: Hybrid capture 2, PreTect HPV-Proofer and analysis of HPV DNA viral load in HPV16, HPV18 and HPV33 E6/E7 mRNA positive specimens.Human papillomavirus (HPV) testing using molecular methods in liquid based cytology (LBC) specimens may be useful as an adjunct to cervical screening by cytology. We compared the positivity rate of the commercially available HPV DNA method hybrid capture 2 (hc2) and the commercially available E6/E7 mRNA method PreTect HPV-Proofer in cytological specimens (n=299). LBC specimens collected (n=299) represented the following cervical cytological disease categories: Normal (n=60), borderline nuclear abnormalities (BNA) (n=34), CIN1 (n=121), CIN2 (n=60), CIN3 (n=24). Overall, 69% (205/299) of the cases were positive by hc2 and 38% (112/299) of the cases were positive by PreTect HPV-Proofer. Concordance rates between the two tests were highest in the high-grade cytology cases (CIN2: 67% and CIN3: 83%) and the normal cytology cases (88%) and lowest in the BNA and CIN1 categories (56% and 52%). HPV DNA viral load analyses were carried out on HPV16 (n=55), HPV18 (n=9) and HPV33 (n=13) samples that were positive by PreTect HPV-Proofer. The sensitivity and specificity of PreTect HPV-Proofer and the hc2 DNA test for the detection of high-grade cytology (i.e. CIN2+) were 71.4% and 75.8% vs 100% and 43.7%, respectively. The relatively low detection rate observed by PreTect HPV-Proofer in the whole range of cytological positive cases, combined with a relatively higher specificity and PPV, suggests that PreTect HPV-Proofer may be more useful than hc2 for triage and in predicting high-grade disease.Predicting absolute risk of CIN3 during post-colposcopic follow-up: results from the ASCUS-LSIL Triage Study (ALTS).At present, clinical management of women referred to colposcopy but found to have <CIN2 remains unclear. Using data from the ASCUS-LSIL Triage Study (ALTS) to inform clinical management, we calculated the absolute risk for developing CIN3 within 2 years of referral to an enrollment colposcopy.Women included in the analyses: (1) were initially referred to ALTS with a community cytologic interpretation of atypical squamous cell of undetermined significance (ASCUS) or low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (LSIL); (2) had a colposcopic evaluation and biopsy, if indicated, resulting in a diagnosis <CIN2; and, therefore (3) were followed without treatment. Results from subsequent human papillomavirus (HPV) testing, liquid-based cytology interpretations, and a second colposcopic evaluation at least 6 months after and within 2 years of the first colposcopic evaluation were used to calculate absolute risks for CIN3.Women with HPV-negative test results were at low risk for CIN3 regardless of other test results. Among HPV-positive women, increasing absolute risks of CIN3 were observed with increasing cytology severity: 7% (normal), 11% (ASCUS and LSIL), and 45% (HSIL). The highest absolute risk for CIN3 (67%) was observed for HPV-positive women with HSIL and a colposcopic impression of high-grade/cancer on the second colposcopy.In the ALTS population, after the first colposcopic diagnosis of <CIN2, clear risk stratification for CIN3 outcomes was obtained among women with a subsequent HPV-positive test. Because absolute risk for histologic CIN3 outcomes was high for women with HPV positive tests, HSIL cytology, and a high-grade impression at second colposcopy, it is worth considering whether this combination of findings might warrant immediate excisional therapy in some circumstances.Reflex high-risk human papillomavirus testing for women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance in cytologic smears: effects since implementation in a large clinical practice.Reflex high-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) testing often is used in the management of women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance identified in cervicovaginal screening. Following implementation of reflex testing, our laboratory processed 8,022 specimens during a 20-month period; sufficient material was available for testing in 7,334 specimens. High-risk HPV was detected in 34.10% of these specimens. Detection rates varied with age, with positive rates as high as 58.46% in women 20 years old or younger, decreasing to 14.58% in women older than 35 years. The detection rate, categorized in 5-year age increments, showed a significant decrease until after 35 years, when the rate remained fairly constant (P < .0001). The detection rate decreased over the time of the study. These results demonstrate that high-risk HPV detection might vary according to the age mix of the population tested and the interval after implementation of testing.Lifetime effects, costs, and cost effectiveness of testing for human papillomavirus to manage low grade cytological abnormalities: results of the NHS pilot studies.To predict the incremental lifetime effects, costs, and cost effectiveness of using human papillomavirus testing to triage women with borderline or mildly dyskaryotic cervical smear results for immediate colposcopy.Modelling study.Three centres participating in NHS pilot studies, United Kingdom. Population Women aged 25-64 with borderline or mildly dyskaryotic cervical smear results.Screening using conventional cytology, liquid based cytology, and four strategies with different age cut-off points and follow up times that used combined liquid based cytology and human papillomavirus testing (adjunctive human papillomavirus testing).The model predicts that compared with using conventional cytology without testing for human papillomavirus, testing for the virus in conjunction with liquid based cytology for women with borderline or mildly dyskaryotic cervical smear results (aged 35 or more) would cost 3735 pounds sterling (5528 euros; 6474 dollars) per life year saved. Extending adjunctive human papillomavirus testing in combination with liquid based cytology to include women aged between 25 and 34 costs an additional 4233 pounds sterling per life year saved. Human papillomavirus testing is likely to reduce lifetime repeat smears by 52%-86% but increase lifetime colposcopies by 64%-138%.Testing for human papillomavirus to manage all women with borderline or mildly dyskaryotic cervical smear results is likely to be cost effective. The predicted increase in lifetime colposcopies, however, deserves careful consideration.A randomized controlled trial of Human Papillomavirus (HPV) testing for cervical cancer screening: trial design and preliminary results (HPV FOCAL Trial).In the HPV FOCAL trial, we will establish the efficacy of hr-HPV DNA testing as a stand-alone screening test followed by liquid based cytology (LBC) triage of hr-HPV-positive women compared to LBC followed by hr-HPV triage with > or = CIN3 as the outcome.HPV-FOCAL is a randomized, controlled, three-armed study over a four year period conducted in British Columbia. It will recruit 33,000 women aged 25-65 through the province's population based cervical cancer screening program. Control arm: LBC at entry and two years, and combined LBC and hr-HPV at four years among those with initial negative results and hr-HPV triage of ASCUS cases; Two Year Safety Check arm: hr-HPV at entry and LBC at two years in those with initial negative results with LBC triage of hr-HPV positives; Four Year Intervention Arm: hr-HPV at entry and combined hr-HPV and LBC at four years among those with initial negative results with LBC triage of hr-HPV positive casesTo date, 6150 participants have a completed sample and epidemiologic questionnaire. Of the 2019 women enrolled in the control arm, 1908 (94.5%) were cytology negative. Women aged 25-29 had the highest rates of HSIL (1.4%). In the safety arm 92.2% of women were hr-HPV negative, with the highest rate of hr-HPV positivity found in 25-29 year old women (23.5%). Similar results were obtained in the intervention arm HPV FOCAL is the first randomized trial in North America to examine hr-HPV testing as the primary screen for cervical cancer within a population-based cervical cancer screening program.International Standard Randomised Controlled Trial Number Register, ISRCTN79347302.The use of p16(INK4A) immunocytochemistry in "Atypical squamous cells which cannot exclude HSIL" compared with "Atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance" in liquid-based cervical smears.Even though p16(INK4a) (p16) immunocytochemistry has proven a useful accessory tool verifying the identification of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US) categorized smears, the procedure still has limitations. To date few studies examining the usefulness of p16 immunocytochemistry in atypical squamous cells which cannot exclude HSIL (ASC-H), compared with ASC-US in liquid-based cervical smears. Therefore, we examined the correlation of p16 immunocytochemical staining with follow-up biopsy results on ASC-H categorized smears and compared the data with those classified as ASC-US on 105 liquid-based cytology samples. We found no statistical significance in the p16 expression of ASC-US smears and the presence of squamous intraepithelial lesions (SIL) in follow-up biopsies (p = 0.546). However, p16 expression did significantly correlate with the presence of SIL (p = 0.002) in ASC-H smears. There was a statistically significant relationship between p16 expression and presence of high grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (HSIL) or more on the follow-up biopsies in both ASC-US (p = 0.012) and ASC-H (p < 0.001) categorized smears. In ASC-US categorized smears, there was no statistical significance between p16 expression and the HR-HPV viral load (p = 0.091). But there was a statistical significance between p16 expression and the HR-HPV viral load (p < 0.001) in ASC-H categorized smears. Our results indicate that p16 immunostaining is a much better useful marker for HR-HPV infection and detection of SIL in ASC-H categorized smears compared to those defined as ASC-US.Trial of management of borderline and other low-grade abnormal smears (TOMBOLA): Trial design.Cervical screening reduces the risk of cervical cancer by detecting and treating cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN). The management of women with low-grade cervical abnormalities is controversial. Two management policies exist: repeat smears in primary care and colposcopy examination. It is not clear which of these is the more effective and efficient. There is also uncertainty as to the most effective and efficient management of women at colposcopy when an area of abnormality is seen on the cervix - immediate treatment or biopsy and selective recall for treatment if the biopsy result suggests this is necessary. The result of a human papillomavirus (HPV) test might assist in deciding the appropriate management of women with low-grade abnormalities. TOMBOLA, a pragmatic randomised-controlled trial set within the cervical screening programmes in Scotland and England, addresses these three areas of uncertainty. Almost four and a half thousand women aged 20-59 with a low-grade cervical abnormality have been recruited and randomised to either repeat smears or colposcopy examination. Women in the colposcopy arm of the trial are further randomised to a policy of either immediate treatment or biopsy and selective recall for treatment if they have an abnormal transformation zone. Women are followed up to an exit examination at 3 years. HPV testing is undertaken at recruitment and at the exit examination. The primary endpoint is cumulative incidence of CIN2/3. A range of other clinical, psychosocial and economic outcomes is being considered. This paper describes the design of the trial, and discusses the rationale underlying aspects of the design and the challenges faced in designing and implementing the trial.Prognostic significance of the detection of human papilloma virus L1 protein in smears of mild to moderate cervical intraepithelial lesions.To investigate whether it is possible to use detection of the human papillomavirus (HPV) L1 capsid protein to predict the course of mild or moderate cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN).Pap smears from 279 women in whom CIN 1 and CIN 2 had been diagnosed by cytology and histology, who were known to have a high-risk HPV status and had a median follow-up of 25 months, were immunohistochemically stained for the HPV L1 protein. The staining results were correlated with the clinical course of the disease.HPV L1-positive patients showed regression in 49.1% of cases, stable disease in 41.5%, and progressive disease in 9.4%, whereas HPV L1-negative women had progression in 25.9% of cases (regression 33.3%, stable disease 40.7%; p=0.001). The effect was clearest in the group under 30 years of age. HPV L1-negative patients experienced progression significantly more often than women with a positive HPV L1 test (odds ratio 3.391).HPV L1-positivity was found to have prognostic significance in relation to disease progression in women with CIN 1 and CIN 2 and particularly in those less than 30 years of age.Human papillomavirus-based triage of women showing a cervical cytology result of borderline or mild dyskaryosis.Comparison of three management strategies for patients with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance, after six months delay: a three-year experience in an Iranian university hospital.A Pap test result of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) presents a clinical challenge. Only 5-10% of women with ASCUS harbour serious cervical disease.We screened 3619 women, who attended to Mirza Koochak Khan Hospital at Tehran University of Medical Sciences with Pap smears, of whom 100 returned with ASCUS. After six months, each subject underwent a standard cytology (conventional Pap smear), human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA testing (identifying high-risk HPV types with polymerase chain reaction) and colposcopy with multiple cervical biopsies.Mean age was 44.09 +/- 8.6 years. The estimated prevalence of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) II or higher was 4%. When histologically verified high-grade lesions (> or = CIN II) were observed, the relative sensitivity of HPV DNA testing was 100% compared with conventional Pap smear, which performed 75% versus 100% relative sensitivity, respectively, using cytological diagnosis high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion, or low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL) as the cut-off. Negative and positive predictive values (NPV and PPV) of Pap test were 98.9% and 100%. The NPV and PPV of HPV DNA testing were 100%.Although less complicated than colposcopy, the repeat Pap smear triage algorithm for ASCUS may underdiagnose some women with high-grade CIN, when compared with colposcopy. Considering the high sensitivity of HPV testing, it may be useful as an alternative to the current policy of six-month repeat cytology for women with ASCUS results.The accuracy of colposcopic grading for detection of high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia.To relate aspects of online colposcopic image assessment to the diagnosis of grades 2 and 3 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN 2+).To simulate colposcopic assessment, we obtained digitized cervical images at enrollment after acetic acid application from 919 women referred for equivocal or minor cytologic abnormalities into the ASCUS-LSIL Triage Study. For each, 2 randomly assigned evaluators from a pool of 20 colposcopists assessed images using a standardized tool online. We calculated the accuracy of these assessments for predicting histologic CIN 2+ over the 2 years of study. For validation, a subset of online results was compared with same-day enrollment colposcopic assessments.Identifying any acetowhite lesion in images yielded high sensitivity: 93% of women with CIN 2+ had at least 1 acetowhite lesion. However, 74% of women without CIN 2+ also had acetowhitening, regardless of human papillomavirus status. The sensitivity for CIN 2+ of an online colpophotographic assessment of high-grade disease was 39%. The sensitivity for CIN 2+ of a high-grade diagnosis by Reid Index scoring was 30%, and individual Reid Index component scores had similar levels of sensitivity and specificity. The performance of online assessment was not meaningfully different from that of same-day enrollment colposcopy, suggesting that these approaches have similar utility.Finding acetowhite lesions identifies women with CIN 2+, but using subtler colposcopic characteristics to grade lesions is insensitive. All acetowhite lesions should be assessed with biopsy to maximize sensitivity of colposcopic diagnosis with good specificity.P634A4 and TAp73 immunocytochemistry in liquid-based cervical cytology--potential biomarkers for diagnosis and progress prediction of cervical neoplasia.P63 and p73 are two homologues of the important tumor suppressor gene p53. In this study, we investigated p63 and p73 expression by immunocytochemistry using antibodies for TAp73 and p634A4 isoforms in 91 high-grade and 107 low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions, 212 atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance, 9 squamous cell carcinomas and 63 normal samples from an Asian screening population together with 47 hospital samples of carcinomas. There was significant correlation between the TAp73 and p634A4 indices (P<0.0001). Significantly, higher TAp73 and p634A4 indices were found in high-grade lesions or carcinoma when compared with atypical squamous cells and low-grade lesions (P<0.0001). Among atypical squamous cells, p634A4 indices of cases that subsequently progressed to low-grade (P=0.031) or high-grade lesions (P=0.006) were significantly higher than those that did not. For atypical squamous cells positive for high-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) as detected by Digene (61%), cases with high p634A4 index were still more likely to have subsequent high-grade lesions detected (P=0.016). Among low-grade lesions, significantly higher TAp73 (P=0.038) was found in cases that subsequently progressed to high-grade lesions. There was significant correlation between presence of high-risk HPV and p634A4 index (P=0.01). In summary, p63 and p73 immunocytochemistry are potential good markers for detection of carcinoma and high-grade lesions in cervical cytology samples and for triage management of women with atypical squamous cells and low-grade lesions.HPV DNA testing as an adjunct in the management of patients with low grade cytological lesions in Finland.Patients with recurrent low grade cytological abnormalities are at increased risk for high grade lesions. We wanted to see whether these patients could be identified by HPV DNA and pap tests.A prospective study of 663 patients referred for a colposcopy on the basis of ASC-US or LSIL cytology. High-risk HPV DNA positivity and cytology were compared with histology.In total 65.6% samples were positive for HC2, and the overall proportion of CIN2+ lesions was 14.6%. No CIN2+lesions were found in patients testing HC2-, pap-. There were 5/97 (5.2%) high grade lesions, which were HC2-negative but pap-positive, including 1 cervical adenocarcinoma in situ. The corresponding histological sections were all positive for p16INK in immunostaining. In further analysis by PCR, 3 samples were positive for HPV DNA. High-risk HPV type 67, which is not included in the HC2 probe cocktail, was found in 1 case, and 2 cases were HPV positive but could not be typed. One CIN3 and one AIS remained HPV negative. In these 5 cases, the concomitant pap smear showed ASC-USx1, LSILx1, HSILx2 and AGCx1. During 6-month follow-up, a relatively high number of CIN2+(28/557, 5.0%) emerged from the non-CIN-CIN1 group.The HC2 test or pap test alone were not sensitive enough to detect all CIN2+lesions. A relatively high number of CIN2+cases emerged from the non-CIN-CIN1 group after 6 months. Adequate follow-up of patients with mild cytological abnormalities, including a repeat pap smear taken during colposcopy and control at 6 months is underscored. Combination of hrHPV DNA and pap test should be considered, since it had high negative predictive value.Performance of the Roche AMPLICOR human papillomavirus (HPV) test in prediction of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) in women with abnormal PAP smear.To assess the performance of a novel PCR-based assay (Roche AMPLICOR HPV test) in detection of cervical pathology as a part of management for abnormal PAP smear (MAPS) and in women participating in cervical cancer screening.Altogether, 504 women comprising 270 patients referred for colposcopy due to an abnormal Pap smear and another 234 women participating in cervical cancer screening (tested for comparison) were analyzed for oncogenic (HR) Human papillomavirus (HPV) types 16, 18, 31, 33, 35, 39, 45, 51, 52, 56, 58, 59, and 68 using the Roche AMPLICOR HPV test in cervical samples collected in PreservCyt liquid media. Colposcopic biopsy and/or LEEP cone biopsy was used as the gold standard in the triage group, while liquid-based cytology (LBC) was the reference test in the screening group.The prevalence of HPV was significantly higher in the MAPS group (65.9%) than in the screening group (31.2%) (P = 0.0001). There was a poor concordance between the referral PAP and the current LBC, being only moderate in the screening series, ICC (weighted kappa) = 0.291 (95%CI 0.070-0.459) (P = 0.007), and almost poor in the MAPS Series, with ICC = 0.217 (95%CI 0.04-0.384) (P = 0.023). AMPLICOR HPV positivity increased linearly with the increasing grade of cervical lesions. In detecting high-grade (CIN2-3), colposcopy was the most sensitive test (96.5%), very similar to AMPLICOR (95.2%) (P = 0.731), while LBC with HSIL cutoff was by far the most specific test (99.5%) and showed the highest PPV (96.1%). NPV of colposcopy (97.2%) and AMPLICOR (96.7%) were similar (P = 0.839). Together with abnormal colposcopy and HSIL cytology, the AMPLICOR HPV test is a powerful independent predictor of high-grade CIN2-3, and as such suitable to replace cervical cytology in management of women with abnormal PAP test (MAPS).The Roche AMPLICOR HPV test is comparable to other HPV tests (HCII, PCR) in detecting CIN in MAPS. However, more data are clearly needed on the performance of AMPLICOR test in management of abnormal PAP and particularly as a screening tool.Clinical validation of the Cervista HPV HR and 16/18 genotyping tests for use in women with ASC-US cytology.High-risk (HR) human papillomavirus (HPV) testing is important in cervical cancer screening for triage to colposcopy. This study evaluated the clinical performance of the Cervista HPV HR and 16/18 genotyping tests for detection of HPV in cervical cytology specimens.The tests were prospectively evaluated in a multicenter clinical study. DNA was extracted from approximately 4000 residual liquid-based cytology specimens collected during routine liquid-based Papanicolaou tests at standard of care visits and was assessed for the presence of HR HPV and/or HPV types 16 and 18. All women with cytology results of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US) or greater underwent colposcopic examination and biopsies were collected. Test results were compared with local colposcopy and histology results from a central pathology review panel.There were 1347 subjects with complete data sets of cytology, HR HPV, colposcopy, and histology included in the analysis of the HPV HR test. Sensitivity of the HPV HR test for detection of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) 2+ among women with ASC-US cytology was 92.8% (95% confidence interval [CI]: 84.1-96.9) and the negative predictive value (NPV) was 99.1% (95% CI: 98.1-99.6). Sensitivity for detection of > or =CIN 3 in women with ASC-US was 100% (95% CI: 85.1-100) and the NPV was 100% (95% CI: 99.4-100). The specificity of the test for detection of > or =CIN 2 and > or =CIN 3 was 44.2% (95% CI: 41.5-46.9) and 43% (95% CI: 40.3-45.7), respectively. The HPV 16/18 genotyping test also performed as expected in women with ASC-US cytology who were positive for HR HPV.The Cervista HPV HR test can be clinically used for detecting HR HPV types in conjunction with cervical cytology for use in triage of women with ASC-US cytology during routine cervical cancer screening.Human papillomavirus genotyping for the eight oncogenic types can improve specificity of HPV testing in women with mildly abnormal Pap results.To evaluate whether human papillomavirus (HPV) genotyping for the selected oncogenic HPV types can improve the efficacy of HPV DNA testing in predicting cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN 2/3) in women with mildly abnormal Pap results, we compared HPV DNA testing and HPV genotyping for eight oncogenic types (16, 18, 31, 33, 35, 45, 52 and 58) in Pap specimens with abnormal results (HSIL, 20 cases; LSIL, 42 cases; ASC-US, 94 cases) and follow-up biopsies. Using consensus primer-mediated PCR assays, HPV DNA was detected in 90% (18/20) of HSIL, 95% (40/42) of LSIL and 64% (60/94) of ASC-US cases. HPV DNA positivity was significantly associated with CIN 2/3/carcinoma (P<0.001) in women with ASC-US, but not in women with LSIL (P=0.52). Of HPV DNA-positive specimens, the eight oncogenic HPV types were detected in 83% of HSIL cases (15/18), 53% of LSIL cases (21/40), and 47% of ASC-US cases (28/60). The eight oncogenic HPV types were significantly associated with CIN 2/3/carcinoma (OR, 10.6; 95% CI, 3.98-28.10; P<0.001), whereas no significant association was observed between the non-eight oncogenic HPV types and CIN 2/3/carcinoma (OR, 2.20; 95%CI, 0.80-6.03; P=0.125). In women with ASC-US, HPV genotyping for the eight oncogenic types showed higher specificity (81 vs 46%) and positive predictive value (PPV, 44 vs 26%) in predicting CIN 2/3/carcinoma compared to HPV DNA testing. Similarly, in women with LSIL, higher specificity (69 vs 8%) and PPV (62 vs 39%) for predicting CIN 2/3/carcinoma were also observed using HPV genotyping test for the eight oncogenic types compared to HPV DNA testing. Our findings suggested that HPV genotyping for the eight oncogenic types might be useful to improve the efficacy of HPV DNA testing for predicting CIN 2/3/carcinoma in women with mildly abnormal Pap results, which may lead to personalized clinical management with improved patient compliance for follow-up.The significance of marked nuclear atypia in grade 1 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia.Approximately 10% to 15% of cases of grade 1 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia are found to have progressed to a high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion or higher at follow-up, and there are presently no reliable morphological predictors of this subset. It has recently been reported that cases of grade 1 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia that display marked nuclear atypia (defined as cases with at least 5 epithelial cells with nuclear enlargement of at least 5 times the size of an intermediate cell, and/or multinucleation of at least 5 nuclei.) have a substantially higher rate of high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion on short-term follow-up and may, therefore, require more aggressive initial management. We report herein our experience with a cohort of such cases. After a review of consecutive cervical biopsies, 352 cases with grade 1 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia were classified into group 1 (grade 1 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia with marked atypia, n = 31) and group 2 (grade 1 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia without marked atypia, n = 321). The average follow-up rates for groups 1 and 2 were 93.55% (29/31) and 90.65% (291/321), respectively. Average follow-up durations were 14.3 and 17.9 months, respectively. The follow-up high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion rate of the cases with marked atypia was 10.34%, as compared with 11.68% for cases without marked atypia. The follow-up interpretive frequency (in cytologic samples) of "low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion" was significantly higher in group 1(19/29 versus 114/291, P = .009). However, no significant differences were identified between groups 1 and 2 regarding the interpretive frequencies of either high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (3/29 versus 34/291, P = 1) or "negative for intraepithelial lesion or malignancy" (6/29 versus 56/291, P = .8) in follow-up cytologic samples. In subsets of both groups in which high-risk human papillomavirus testing was performed in the Papanicolaou test sample that immediately preceded the index cervical biopsies, no significant differences in viral load were found. In conclusion, grade 1 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia with marked atypia does not have a higher follow-up high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion rate than grade 1 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia without marked atypia in our patient population. Further studies are required to address the significance of marked atypia in grade 1 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia and whether patients with this finding should be managed differently.Smoking worsens the prognosis of mild abnormalities in cervical cytology.To examine the effect of smoking on the incidence of low- and high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) in women with a baseline Pap smear of atypical squamous cells (ASC) or a low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL).Prospective study in which a cohort of women with normal colposcopy and ASC/LSIL at baseline were followed at 6-month intervals of up to 36 months. Women were grouped in post-hoc analysis according to their smoking behavior: never (or past) smokers and current smokers.This report was based on data from the Latin American Screening Study, conducted in Sao Paulo, Campinas, Porto Alegre (Brazil) and Buenos Aires (Argentina).A subset of 150 women derived from a cohort of 1,011 women.Multivariate Cox analysis and Kaplan-Meier curves were used.Low- and high-grade CIN during follow-up.The only factor related to an increased risk of developing CIN was the positive high-risk (hr) HPV status (hazard ratio (HR) = 3.42; 95% CI: 1.11-9.43). A total of 21 cases of incident CIN were detected during follow-up. Of these, 11 appeared in the group of 67 smokers and 10 among the 83 non-smoker women (log-rank, p=0.33). Smoking status was not associated with the risk of developing CIN (HR = 0.73; 95% CI: 0.40-1.33). However, when restricting the analysis to high-grade CIN only (11 cases), the probability of developing the disease was significantly higher among smokers (p=0.04).Smoking contributes additional risk for developing high-grade CIN in women with ASC or LSIL cytology but normal colposcopy.Co-expression of p53 and Bcl-2 proteins in human papillomavirus-induced premalignant lesions of the uterine cervix: correlation with progression to malignancy.To analyze aberrant expression of the apoptotic protein p53 and the anti-apoptotic protein Bcl-2 in premalignant lesions of the uterine cervix induced by human papillomavirus (HPV) infection and its significance for early diagnosis of cervical cancer.Cytological adequate smears (n = 382) from various grades of squamous intraepithelial lesions (SILs; n = 142), 'atypical squamous cells of unknown significance' (ASCUS; n = 128) and normal tissue (n = 112) were investigated immunocytochemically for aberrant expression of p53 and Bcl-2 proteins using the streptavidin-biotin-peroxidase method; HPV status was analyzed in cervical smears using general and type-specific primers.HPV-DNA of any type was detected in 25.7% (98/382) of cases. HPV16 was seen in 58.2% (57/98), HPV18 in 20.4% (20/98) and other HPV types in 21.4% (21/98). Abnormal nuclear expression of p53 protein and cytoplasmic expression of Bcl-2 protein were noted in cervical dysplasia and an association with the presence of HPV16/HPV18 was noted. The intensity of immunoreactivity for p53 and Bcl-2 proteins varied between different cytological grades of cervical smears. Follow-up data revealed that cases with high-risk HPV and co-induced expression of apoptosis-regulatory proteins presented a trend to progressive disease.The detection of both p53 and Bcl-2 proteins in cervical smears can be used as independent diagnostic marker for early-stage HPV-associated cervical cancer.Human papillomavirus genotypes in asymptomatic young women from public schools in Rio de Janeiro, Brazil.The aim of this work was to survey HPV information from a random population of young women from Rio de Janeiro, Brazil.This cross-sectional study included cervical samples from 241 female students. To determine human papillomavirus status, polymerase chain reaction amplification was performed. HPV typing was determined by restriction fragment length polymorphism analysis. Demographic data, life style, sexual and gynecological history were obtained through use of a structured questionnaire.The average age of the women was 19.6 years-old (SD=3.4 years). HPV prevalence was 27.4%. Nineteen different HPV genotypes were detected, including 13 high risk types. HPV 16 was the most prevalent type (6.2%), followed by 31 (4.1 %) and 66 (3.7%). Most of the oncogenic types belonged to the A9 species (28/48). The frequency of women infected by at least one oncogenic type was significantly higher than those only infected by low risk types (18.7% versus 7.5%). Cervical changes were detected in 12.5% of the sample and were significantly linked to infection with HPV types of the A9 species. Demographic variables, sexual initiation, or number of sexual partners were not associated with HPV prevalence, variety of HPV genotypes or oncogenic types.The relative frequency of HPV genotypes other than vaccine types in young females should be taken into account when evaluating vaccination strategies. Due to the high prevalence of HPV infection among the population studied, implementation of sex education in schools, promotion of condom use and an organized screening program to prevent cervical cancer must be encouraged for this age group.Atypical squamous cells, cannot exclude a high-grade intraepithelial lesion and its clinical significance in postmenopausal, pregnant, postpartum, and contraceptive-use patients.Previous studies have confirmed the low predictive value of a diagnosis of atypical squamous cells, cannot exclude a high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (ASC-H) in a Papanicolaou (Pap) smear for subsequent high-grade dysplasia in the postmenopausal age group. It appears plausible that the decrease in estrogen inherent in the postmenopausal state likely produces reactive cytologic atypia, which is misinterpreted as ASC-H. The change in hormone levels observed in pregnant patients, postpartum patients, and contraceptive users, as a corollary, potentially could create a similar diagnostic dilemma. In the current study, the impact of age and altered hormone status on the frequency of ASC-H was assessed to answer the following questions: Is the low predictive value of ASC-H in postmenopausal women an age-related phenomenon, and do other states that result in decreased levels of estrogen relative to progesterone have a similar association?Pap smears that were diagnosed as ASC-H were divided into postmenopausal, pregnant, postpartum, and contraceptive-use categories. Each Pap smear slide was reviewed to assess the degree of atrophy and the character of atypical cells. The frequency of high-grade follow-up (histology and/or Digene Hybrid Capture II) in the postmenopausal group was compared with the frequency of high-grade follow-up in the pregnant, postpartum, and contraceptive-use categories using the chi-square test. The pregnant, postpartum, and contraceptive-use categories also were compared statistically among each other with the chi-square test.In total, 195 cases met the criteria for study inclusion. The percentage of patients who had subsequent high-grade follow-up was 22.5% in the postmenopausal group, 79.6% in the pregnant group, 66.7% in the postpartum group, and 60% in the contraceptive-use group. When these data were subjected to the chi-square test, there was a statistically significant difference (P<.0001) between the predictive value of subsequent high-grade follow-up in the postmenopausal group compared with the other patient groups. When the chi-square test was applied to the intercomparison of the pregnant, postpartum, and contraceptive-use categories, there were no significant differences (P > .05) in high-grade follow-up between any of these groups.The diagnosis of ASC-H in postmenopausal Pap smears has a low predictive value in the subsequent diagnosis of high-grade squamous lesions in stark contrast to the pregnant, postpartum, and contraceptive-use categories. This suggests that age rather than hormone alterations affects the capacity of ASC-H to predict subsequent high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions. In addition, there are no definite cytomorphologic criteria that can be used to distinguish reliably between benign cellular changes and possible high-grade squamous lesions in these Pap smears. Digene Hybrid Capture II testing, although helpful, does not have 100% correlation with subsequent tissue/Pap smear follow-up and cannot be used alone to triage this group of women for colposcopy.Evaluation of cervical screening strategies with adjunct high-risk human papillomavirus testing for women with borderline or mild dyskaryosis.The management of women with a smear read as borderline/mild dyskaryosis (BMD) found by cervical cancer screening is still under discussion as only few of these cases are associated with high-grade lesions. To determine the optimal screening strategy for these women, a simulation model of cervical cancer development was used that is based on high-risk human papillomavirus (hrHPV) infection. The current strategy of repeat cytological testing at 6 and 18 months after BMD was compared to strategies with adjunct hrHPV testing. Calculations were done for both conventional and liquid-based cytology as the primary screening tool. In comparison to current screening, adjunct hrHPV testing was more effective in preventing cancer and more woman-friendly (reduction in colposcopy referrals with outcome < cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN2) of up to 56% and in repeat smears of 30-100%). In combination with conventional cytology, cost-effective strategies were the ones in which a sample for high-risk human papillomavirus (hrHPV) testing is collected at a return visit within 1 month or in which hrHPV testing is restricted to repeat smears taken at 6 and 18 months. For these strategies, co-collection of samples for hrHPV testing at baseline is not necessary which has organizational and cost advantages. In combination with liquid-based cytology, it was cost-effective to perform a reflex hrHPV test at baseline from the liquid-based specimen. Liquid-based screening was more effective than conventional screening, but annual diagnosis costs were euro5 million higher (population size 16 million). In conclusion, our calculations indicate that implementation of hrHPV testing for the management of women with borderline or mild dyskaryosis (BMD) is feasible both in settings where conventional and liquid-based cytology is current practice.Cervical cytology screening and management of abnormal cytology in adolescents.The consensus guidelines recognize adolescents as a special group and allow for more conservative follow- up of abnormal cytology and histology. The guidelines recognize the role of high rates of HPV infection and reinfection in teens, along with high rates of clearance of HPV and low rates of invasive cervical cancer. Risks of treatment are balanced with risk for disease progression. The cervical cancer vaccine is now recommended for teens. The approved vaccine protects against HPV related disease caused by four subtypes of HPV 6, 11, 16, and 18. The Food and Drug Administration has approved the vaccine as routine for 11- and 12-year-old girls. The vaccine is most effective prior to HPV exposure or before the sexual debut. In South Carolina only 4.8% of high school girls indicate having sexual intercourse before age 13. Vaccination provides an opportunity to review risky behaviors with adolescent patients and to encourage healthy, safe lifestyles. Vaccination is not protective for sexually transmitted infections and this can be emphasized at vaccination visits as well. The importance of cancer screening can also be reviewed with patients at vaccination visits.Correlation between hybrid capture II high-risk human papillomavirus DNA test chemiluminescence intensity from cervical samples with follow-up histologic results: a cytologic/histologic review of 367 cases.The Hybrid Capture II high-risk human papillomavirus (hrHPV) DNA test is a US Food and Drug Administration-approved nucleic acid hybridization assay using chemiluminescence for the semiquantitative detection of hrHPV in cervical samples. Patient samples and controls are used to calculate results as negative for hrHPV if <1.0, positive for hrHPV if >2.5, and "equivocal" if between 1.0 and 2.5.The authors reported on the cervical histologic results of 209 patients demonstrating "equivocal" results for hrHPV from SurePath (204 patients) or ThinPrep (5 patients) vials, and compared patients in this cohort with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US) cytology on the index cervical Papanicolaou (Pap) test (Group 1; n = 148 patients) with a patient cohort demonstrating unequivocal positive hrHPV test results (Group 2; n = 148 patients). The chemiluminescence intensity of hrHPV tests from patients in Group 2 were correlated with the presence and severity of dysplasia on subsequent histologic results, and patients were thereby stratified for their subsequent risk of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) types II/III.Approximately 97% of hrHPV tests demonstrating "equivocal" results were found to be positive at the time of retesting, and 15% of biopsied cases demonstrated CIN II or III. Results of follow-up histology after an ASC-US diagnosis, expressed as a percentage of the biopsied cohort, were: CIN II/III: 16.5% in Group 1 and 22.4% in Group 2; CIN I: 27% in Group 1 and 23.5% in Group 2; and negative: 56.5% in Group 1 and 54.1% in Group 2. Chemiluminescence intensity did not appear to be correlated with the severity of dysplasia.The percentage of high-grade CIN in the "equivocal" hrHPV cohort is highly significant and therefore the management of these patients should be similar to the unequivocally positive population. After an unequivocal positive hrHPV test, the hrHPV chemiluminescence intensity does not appear to further predict the rate of high-grade CIN.Atypical squamous cells and low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion in cervical cytology: cytohistological correlation and implication for management in a low-resource setting.To perform an audit of all cervical smears reported as atypical squamous cells (ASC) and low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL) as in the Bethesda system (TBS) 2001, and determine their histological follow-up and outcome when available, in order to define the threshold for colposcopic referral.A total of 25,203 cervical smears were screened over a period of 3 years (January 2006 - December 2008) and all ASC and LSIL smears were reviewed with the corresponding histological follow-up. All cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) grade 2 lesions and above (CIN2+) were considered as clinically significant lesions for analysis.Out of 25,203 cervical smears, 424 (1.7%) were reported as ASC and 113 (0.4%) as LSIL. Additionally, three were reported as atypical cells, not otherwise specified. The ASC : SIL ratio was 2.18 : 1. Follow-up histology was available in 153 (36.8%) of the ASC cases and revealed CIN2+ lesions in 22 (14.4%). Follow-up histology was available in 50 (44.2%) of LSIL cases and revealed clinically significant abnormalities in five (10%), all of which were CIN2. CIN3 and invasive squamous carcinomas were seen in 5.9% and 1.4%, respectively, of cases of ASC, and not seen in LSIL. Reclassification of ASC smears into ASC-US (ASC-undetermined significance) and ASC-H (ASC- high grade SIL not excluded) revealed ASC-H in 2.6% of all ASC smears, with a clinically significant outcome in 45.4%.In a low-resource setting where human papillomavirus testing is unaffordable, the threshold for colposcopic referral and follow-up histology should be ASC rather than SIL.Prediction of recurrent disease by cytology and HPV testing after treatment of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia.To assess the role of human papillomavirus (HPV) testing and cytology as predictors of residual/recurrent disease after treatment of high-grade cervical intraepithelial lesions.One hundred and thirty-eight women with cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) grade 2/3 lesion on biopsy were included in a prospective follow-up study in Belgium and Nicaragua. All women were treated with loop electrosurgical excision procedure (LEEP) and follow-up visits took place at 6 weeks, 6 months, 1 year and 2 years. During these visits, a Papanicolaou (Pap) smear test was taken, colposcopy was performed and specimens were collected for HPV testing. Cytology, high-risk (HR) HPV presence, persistent HR HPV infection and combinations of these tests at different time points during follow-up were correlated with histologically confirmed residual/recurrent disease.Thirteen patients (9%) developed residual/recurrent disease during follow-up. Abnormal cytology at 6 weeks after treatment was significantly correlated with residual/recurrent disease. Nine of thirty-seven patients with abnormal cytology at 6 weeks had recurrent disease versus three of seventy with a normal cytology [odds ratio (OR): 7.2; 95% confidence interval (CI): 1.8-28.5; P = 0.003). Sensitivity of this test was 75.0%, specificity 70.5%. Combining abnormal cytology and the presence of HR HPV within the first 6 months after treatment gave the best correlation with residual/recurrent disease: of the 54 women with abnormal cytology and/or HR HPV presence within the first 6 months, 11 developed residual/recurrent disease (OR 10.2; 95% CI: 2.2-48.3). Sensitivity of this combination was 84.6% and specificity 65.0%.Cytology remains the cornerstone in the early follow-up after LEEP for CIN lesions of the cervix. HPV testing can add value as it increases the sensitivity of cytology in concomitant testing within the first 6 months.Human papillomavirus deoxyribonucleic acid detection in mildly or moderately dysplastic smears: a possible method for selecting patients for colposcopy.Current screening protocols for cervical cancer dictate that patients with smears read as mild or moderate dysplasia of the uterine cervix undergo colposcopy, although approximately half these women do not prove to have high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions. The aim of this study was to determine whether human papillomavirus testing is capable of discriminating between high- and low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions so as to be useful in reducing the number of colposcopic examinations.We tested 190 consecutive patients with smears read as mild or moderate dysplasia for the presence of human papillomavirus deoxyribonucleic acid by use of two different polymerase chain reactions with the consensus primer pairs CPI/IIG and MY09/11. Typing was carried out by direct sequence analysis of the CPI/IIG amplimers. The MY09/11 amplimers were detected in enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay format with the SHARP (Solution Hybridization Assay for PCR Products) Signal System with two probe mixtures (A and B) to detect nononcogenic and oncogenic human papillomavirus types. The human papillomavirus test results were compared with the histologic diagnosis, which was regarded as the reference standard.Fifty-six of the 190 patients had high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions. The sensitivity was 96% for the CPI/IIG test and 95% for the MY09/11 polymerase chain reaction plus SHARP Signal System when probe B only was used. The specificity was 33% for the CPI/IIG test and 40% for the MY09/11 polymerase chain reaction plus SHARP Signal System when probe B was used.A negative CPI/IIG or SHARP Signal System probe B test can select, respectively, 44 or 54 of the 134 patients without high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions. The use of these human papillomavirus tests as a secondary triage in patients with smears that were read as mild or moderate dysplasia could prevent those patients from undergoing unnecessary colposcopy. However, respectively, 2 or 3 of the 56 patients who have high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions would be missed by human papillomavirus testing.Should women with atypical squamous cells, cannot exclude high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion, receive reflex human papillomavirus-DNA testing?The 2001 American Society for Colposcopy and Cervical Pathology Consensus Guidelines recommend that women who have Papanicolaou (Pap) smears diagnosed as atypical squamous cells (ASC), cannot exclude high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HSIL) (ASC-H) should be referred for immediate colposcopic examination. The objective of this pilot study was to evaluate whether reflex human papillomavirus (HPV)-DNA testing performed on smears diagnosed as ASC-H may obviate the need for immediate colposcopic examination.All ThinPrep Pap smears that were diagnosed as ASC-H or atypical squamous metaplastic cells (ASMT) between 2001-2003 and that had HPV-DNA testing and subsequent histologic and/or cytologic follow-up were evaluated. Those smears that were diagnosed as ASMT were reviewed and reclassified under the 2001 Bethesda System as either ASC of undetermined significance (ASCUS) or ASC-H. Smears that were diagnosed as ASCUS were excluded from the study.The study included of 48 smears that were diagnosed as ASC-H. All patients with biopsy-proven HSIL had positive high-risk (HR)-HPV results (100% negative predictive value). Approximately 80% of patients with ASC-H who had biopsy-proven, low-grade intraepithelial lesion on follow-up had positive HR-HPV results. Among the patients who had ASC-H with negative follow-up, 50% had positive HR-HPV results, and 50% had negative HR-HPV results.Among patients with ASC-H, a negative HR-HPV result was found to be an excellent predictor of the absence of HSIL. The results of this pilot study suggested that HPV-DNA testing may serve as a means to better select which patients with ASC-H on Pap smear should undergo colposcopic examination. This approach potentially may reduce medical costs and eliminate the need for routine colposcopic examination among patients with ASC-H Pap smears.Effect of HIV infection on atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance.Detection of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) is a cervical cytologic finding that is suggestive but not definitive of squamous intraepithelial lesions (SILs).We examined the risk, characteristics, and progression of ASCUS in women with and without human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) infection. Cervical Papanicolou (Pap) test and colposcopy data were obtained at the first 10 semiannual visits for the HIV Epidemiology Research study of 774 HIV-infected and 480 demographically similar, HIV-uninfected women in the United States. Multiple logistic regression models and Cox proportional hazards models were utilized.ASCUS was more common among HIV-infected women (odds ratio [OR], 1.6 [95% confidence interval {CI}, 1.3-2.0] to 2.6 [95% CI, 1.9-3.6]) after adjustment for human papillomavirus (HPV) infection and other risk factors (e.g., race, condyloma, and prior Pap test result). Among women with normal Pap test results at enrollment, the cumulative incidence of ASCUS was 78% among HIV-infected women and 38% among HIV-uninfected women. HIV-infected and HIV-uninfected women with ASCUS did not differ by prevalence of indices of inflammation (inflammation on Pap test and leukocytes on cervical gram stain). HPV infection, including high risk types, was more common among HIV-infected women with ASCUS. Among women with ASCUS, 60% of HIV-infected and 25% of HIV-uninfected women developed SILs (P < .01). Compared with HIV-infected women with higher CD4+ lymphocyte counts, HIV-infected women with CD4+ lymphocyte counts < 200 cells/microL were more likely to present subsequently with a SIL detected by Pap test (OR, 1.7; 95% CI, 0.8-3.6).Higher risk of SIL following the appearance of ASCUS among HIV-infected women, especially women with low CD4+ lymphocyte counts, supports the need for follow up with colposcopy and histologic examination, as indicated, to allow early detection and treatment of SIL.Association of polymorphism in FcGR3A gene and progression of low-grade precursor lesions of cervical carcinoma.Polymorphisms in receptors of the constant part of antibodies (FcR) have been associated with susceptibility to disease and viral infections but have not been studied in cervical carcinogenesis. The distribution of the polymorphism V158F (rs396991) in FcGR3A in cervical smears was detected in a group of 84 women with stable or regressed low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (group I) and a group of 54 women with high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (HSIL) (group II). Human papillomavirus (HPV) genotyping was also performed. In 27.4% of women from group I, FF genotype was found, whereas this genotype was observed in 51.9% of patients in group II (p = 0.003; odds ratio = 2.856 (95% confidence interval = 1.4-5.8)). When only women infected with high-risk HPV were analyzed these differences were found to be even higher (p = 0.0013; odds ratio = 3.8 (95% confidence interval = 1.7-8.8)). FF genotype in FcGR3A gene seems to be associated with increased risk of low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions to HSIL progression suggesting that its presence may play a role in HPV tolerance, persistent infection, and HSIL development.Role of P16(INK4a) expression in identifying CIN2 or more severe lesions among HPV-positive patients referred for colposcopy after abnormal cytology.p16 is strongly overexpressed in dysplastic cervical cells because of the transforming activity of the E7 oncogene of all high-risk human papillomavirus (HR-HPV) types and may be easily revealed by immunochemistry: p16 may, therefore, be considered a surrogate marker for the activated oncogene expression of HR-HPV in dysplastic cervical cells.HPV and p16(INK4a) testing were performed in a consecutive series of 283 patients with abnormal cytology referred to colposcopy assessment or follow-up. Triage of patients to colposcopy by HPV or HPV and p16 testing was simulated, and the relative sensitivity, specificity, and positive predictive value (PPV) of HPV and p16 testing for > CIN2 lesions was determined as well as the cost balance of the two triage types.Compared to current protocol, triage by HPV testing reduced the number of colposcopies by 44.2%, but also reduced the > CIN2 detection rate by 10.7%, and was associated with a cost of euro 54.16 per assessed woman and of euro 613.20 per > CIN2 detected. Compared with current protocol, triage by HPV and p16 testing combined reduced the number of colposcopies by 73.1%, but reduced > CIN2 detection rate by 21.5%, and was associated with a cost of euro 54.73 per woman assessed and of euro 704.09 per > CIN2 detected.Triage by HPV and p16 improves considerably the PPV of diagnostic assessment, but decreases > CIN2 detection rate, and is associated with substantially higher costs. Further decrease of molecular immunochemistry testing due to technological progress may allow HPV and p16 testing to become a cost effective procedure in the future.Assessment of HPV DNA test value in management women with cytological findings of ASC-US, CIN1 and CIN2.The aim of this retrospective study was to answer the following questions: 1) is HPV DNA test for high-risk types able to predict lesion behaviour in women with cytological abnormalities lower than CIN3 (ASC-US, CIN1 and CIN2); 2) how to predict the histological diagnosis CIN3, and 3) is its use in diagnostic management in these patients justified or not? The study included 345 women (11 ASC-US, 312 CIN1 and 22 CIN2) that underwent conventional diagnostic management (repeat cytology and colposcopy with or without histology) and HPV testing for high-risk HPV types by PCR method. The value of HPVDNA test in predicting lesion regression/persistence was assessed in 275 subjects without histology. In 70 subjects, diagnostic accuracy (sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive value) of repeat cytology and HPV DNA test in predicting severe intraepithelial lesion (CIN3) was determined on the basis of colposcopy guided biopsy. The prevalence of persistent lesions was significantly higher in the group of HPV positive than in the group of HPV negative subjects (37.7% vs. 16.4%; p < 0.001). Positive HPV test was associated with a 3.1-fold risk of lesion persistence [OR (95% CI) = 3.095 (1.65-5.82)]. However, on screening to predict the outcome of cytologically diagnosed cervical lesion with sensitivity of 39.7% and positive predictive value of 37.7% showed that a positive test could not be considered a reliable indicator of lesion persistence. In contrast, the specificity of 82.5% and negative predictive value of 83.6% suggested that a negative test result could be taken as a good indicator of lesion regression. In comparison with repeat cytology, HPV test showed higher sensitivity (69.2% vs. 61.5%) but significantly lower specificity (63.2% vs. 93.0%) and positive predictive value (30.0% vs. 66.7%), and comparable negative predictive value (90.0% vs. 91.4%) in predicting histologically verified CIN3. In one patient with a histological diagnosis of squamous cell carcinoma with minimal invasion, repeat cytology indicated CIN3, whereas HPV test was negative. Due to authors experience in women with cytological abnormalities lower than CIN3, HPV testing is not a method to reliably predict lesion behaviour (regression, persistence) or presence of CIN3. HPV testing is of limited value in daily routine and should not be widely used until it is definitely demonstrated to be superior to conventional methods in improving the sensitivity, specificity and positive predictive value of CIN3 and invasive carcinoma detection.Management and triage of women with human papillomavirus infection in follow-up for low-grade cervical disease: association of HPV-DNA and RNA-based methods.Type-specific persistent infection with Human Papillomavirus (HPV) is a significant risk factor for the development of cervical diseases. Persistent infection could be further refined by a sequencing approach to detect early cervical lesions that are at high risk of developing an invasive squamous cervical cancer. The aim of the present study is to investigate the clinical utility of detecting mRNA transcripts of HPV oncogenes E6/E7 by using a Real-time NASBA technology (mRNA test) and to identify women with low-grade cytological disease but with an increased risk of developing high-grade cervical abnormalities or invasive squamous cervical cancer. Our preliminary results show that E6/E7 is detected in only a subset of HR-HPV-positive cases. Since viral persistence is considered to be the true precursor of neoplastic progression, only the detection of E6/E7 mRNA can identify the infection which is more likely to persist and induce neoplasia in future. For these reasons we believe that this test would be useful for the characterization of women with HR-HPV DNA positivity who should be effectively treated because at high-risk of developing a high grade cervical lesion or an invasive squamous cervical cancer.HPV triage testing or repeat Pap smear for the management of atypical squamous cells (ASCUS) on Pap smear: is there evidence of process utility?A two-stage standard gamble was used to evaluate women's preferences for alternative managements of atypical squamous cells of undermined significance (ASCUS) on Pap smear (repeat Pap smear compared with immediate HPV test), and to test for the evidence of process utility. Women's utilities for the health state scenarios were clustered towards the upper end of the 0-1 scale with considerable variability in women's preferences. There was evidence of process utility, with immediate human papillomavirus (HPV) testing strategies having lower valuations than repeat Pap smear, where the clinical outcome was the same. Mean (95% CI) utilities for HPV testing (negative test) followed by resolution were 0.9967 (0.9957-0.9978) compared with repeat Pap smear followed by resolution: 0.9972 (0.9964-0.9980). Mean (95% CI) utilities for immediate HPV testing (positive test), followed by colposcopy, biopsy and treatment were 0.9354 (0.8544-1.0) compared with repeat Pap smear followed by colposcopy, biopsy and treatment: 0.9656 (0.9081-1.0). Our results add to the existing evidence that the impact of healthcare interventions on well-being is not limited to the effect of the intervention on the health outcomes expected from the intervention; process of care can have quality of life implications for the individual. A modelled application of trial-based data will allow characterisation of the true population costs, benefits, risks and harms of alternative triage strategies and subsequent policy implications thereof.Cervical infections by multiple human papillomavirus (HPV) genotypes: Prevalence and impact on the risk of precancerous epithelial lesions.A large proportion of human papillomavirus (HPV) infections is sustained by multiple genotypes. The effect of multiple infections on the risk of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) and the potential efficacy of vaccine on these infections are controversial. We performed viral typing by SFP(10)-LIPA on a consecutive series of 1,323 women undergoing colposcopy, 69% of whom had cervical biopsy, and correlated CIN severity with the type and number of HPVs. Overall prevalence of HPV-DNA was 68.9%, 97.3% in CIN1, and 98.1% in CIN>/=2. HPV positivity correlated with younger age (35.9 vs. 37.3 years, P = 0.026) and history of CIN (P < 0.001). Multiple types were detected in 44.2% of cases, including 63.1% CIN1 and 80.8% CIN>/=2. Twenty-three different types were detected, HPV-16, 31 and 52 being the most frequent. Infections by HPV-6, 11, 16, or 18 occurred in 59.4% of CIN1 and 71.3% of CIN>/=2. Number of viral types and class of oncogenic risk were linearly correlated with CIN severity (P < 0.0001) by univariate and multivariate analyses controlling for age and history of CIN. The effect of the number of HPV types was maintained after exclusion from the model of infections by HPV-6, 11, 16, and 18. Frequency, distribution, and clinical correlates of multiple HPV infections highlight the importance of assessing individual types in the management and the prediction of outcome of women with abnormal baseline cytology and point to potential limitations in current vaccine strategies.[The significance of HPV-DNA genotyping assays in the ASC].To disscuss different outcomes of ASC-UC and ASC-H, two subtypes of ASC, and the significance of HPV-DNA genotyping assays in these two subtypes.We reviewed and analyzed colposcopic and biopsy results of 1256 cases of ASC between Jan. 2005 to Dec. 2007, of which 580 cases have results of HPV-DNA genotyping assays.In 1256 ASC cases, ASC-US and ASC-H cases account for 90.1% and 9.9% respectively, CIN2 and higher levels diagnosed via colposcopy and cervical biopsy are 8.5% and 24.2% respectively (P = 0.000). In ASC-US cases, the infection rate of HPV-DNA high risk types is 67.2%, there is statistic significance among different HPV-DNA results and biopsy pathology (P = 0.000). In ASC-H cases, the infection rate of HPV-DNA high risk types is 47.3%, there is no statistic significance among them (P = 0.054).The clinical outcomes of ASC-US and ASC-H are different, we should distinguish and treat. HPV-DNA genotyping assay is available in ASC-US triage, but Colposcopy is proposed for all ASC-H patients.Utility of HPV DNA detection in thin-layer, liquid-based tests with atypical squamous metaplasia.To determine if testing for HPV is useful in the management of patients with atypical squamous metaplasia (ASM) and to evaluate a small group of patients with atypical squamous cells in the setting of an atrophic cellular profile (estrogen test [ESTT]).Presence of HPV DNA was determined on 104 ASM and ESTT cases on residual ThinPrep specimens using Hybrid Capture II. Results of the HPV DNA test were correlated with subsequent biopsy or repeat Pap test results.Of 63 patients with ASM on ThinPrep Pap tests, 52% were associated with histologically proven SIL when HPV DNA was detected by Hybrid Capture II. None of the 17 patients who were negative for HPV DNA had subsequent evidence of HPV infection by biopsy or repeat Pap test. Among 14 patients with ESTT, none of the 12 who were negative for HPV DNA had subsequent evidence of HPV infection.ASM and ESTT with a negative HPV DNA test can be followed routinely, and a colposcopic examination is not warranted.Genital human papillomavirus testing by in situ hybridization in liquid atypical cytologic materials and follow-up biopsies.To describe cases of HPV testing by DNA in situ hybridization performed on atypical cervicovaginal samples collected by a liquidsed method that were negative for HPV DNA on cytology but revealed cervical intraepithelial neoplasia on follow-up biopsies.Three hundred ninety-five consecutive SurePath atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US) cytologic samples from asymptomatic, reproductive-age women were tested for human papillomaviruses (HPVs) by the in situ hybridization (ISH) method (Ventana Inform HPV Test, Tucson, Arizona, U.S.A). One hundred (25%) cases underwent follow-up colposcopic biopsy within 3 months of cytology. All the tests (cytology, ISH, histology) were independently evaluated without knowledge of the other tests.One hundred twenty-two (33%) cytologic samples were positive for HPVs. Of a total of 100 (HPV positive and negative) follow-up biopsies, 55 were positive for cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN). Fourteen cases of biopsy-proven CIN tested negative for all HPV types in the prior cytologic samples. Retesting of the 14 CIN tissues by ISH was negative in 10, positive for HPV in 2 and inconclusive in 2.There is a small but significant (14%) false negative rate with HPV testing by the Ventana ISH method. Clinically suspicious cases should be followed even if an HPV test is negative.Cervical dysplasia: assessing methylation status (Methylight) of CCNA1, DAPK1, HS3ST2, PAX1 and TFPI2 to improve diagnostic accuracy.Diagnosis of cervical neoplasia hinges upon microscopic inspection of cervical samples. This has inherent operator-dependent variability. Testing for high-risk human papilloma virus (HPV) may help to triage patients with pre-invasive disease in determining clinical intervention and follow-up. However, HPV presence/absence does not reflect the cervical epithelial cell's molecular status. Epigenetic modifications, e.g. DNA methylation, have been observed in the early stages of neoplastic change, preceding gene mutations. Here, we assess the correlation between cytologic/histologic results and combined DNA methylation data of 5 genes in different grades of cervical dysplasia.Cervical specimens collected via the liquid-based cytology system were each microscopically examined. Residual cells were subjected to DNA methylation analysis (Methylight) of gene loci CCNA1, PAX1, HS3ST2, DAPK1 and TFPI2. Methylation data were compared with cytologic/histologic reports. Statistical methods were applied to assess the ability of DNA methylation status to subtype the cervical neoplastic lesions according to their corresponding cytologic/histologic reports.A total of 165 subjects provided cytologically proven 63 HSIL, 49 LSIL and 53 normal samples. All patients with HSIL and LSIL underwent colposcopic examination. Patients with LSIL were all found to be CIN1; patients with HSIL were subsequently subdivided into 10 squamous cell carcinoma (SCC), 31 CIN3, 10 CIN2 and 12 CIN1. For each gene, there was increasing frequency of methylation from normal and LSIL (CIN1), through HSIL (CIN2 and CIN3), to SCC. Methylation of ≥1 of genes investigated was observed in 88% of combined HSIL (CIN2 and CIN3) and SCC cases. All genes showed significant increase in methylation level (PMR value) with increasing disease grade (p<0.005). CCNA1 was the only gene that was able to distinguish CIN2 from CIN3 specimens (p=0.016). Based on receiver operating characteristic (ROC) analysis, HS3ST2 was the most significant candidate in segregating HSIL/SCC from normal/LSIL cases (p<0.0001); at an optimal cutoff value, sensitivity and specificity between 70% and 80% were obtained.Development of DNA methylation status of a gene panel to improve diagnostic accuracy in cervical neoplasia is warranted.The utility of HPV DNA triage in the management of cytological AGC.Given the demonstrated utility of human papilloma virus DNA triage in the management of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance, this study sought to evaluate the potential role of human papilloma virus DNA testing in the evaluation and management of cytological atypical glandular cells.Following institutional review board approval, 28 women presenting with cytological atypical glandular cells underwent repeat thin-prep cytology, Hybrid Capture 2 human papilloma virus DNA testing, colposcopic evaluation, Fisher electrosurgical conization, and endometrial sampling. Human papilloma virus test results in each patient were then correlated with histologic lesions, if present.Sixteen of the 28 study patients had pathologic lesions (11/28 high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion, 3/28 low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion, 1/28 adenocarcinoma in situ, 1/28 simple endometrial hyperplasia). Human papilloma virus DNA testing was available in 24 of 28 subjects (86%). The sensitivity of human papilloma virus positivity to predict the presence of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia was 100% (confidence interval 77% to 100%), specificity 64% (confidence interval 35% to 85%), positive predictive value 76%, and negative predictive value 100%. Women who tested human papilloma virus positive were 12 times more likely to have cervical intraepithelial neoplasia than women who were human papilloma virus negative (Fisher P<.001). Human papilloma virus positivity was not predictive of endometrial pathology; women who were human papilloma virus positive were less likely to have endometrial pathology than were women who were human papilloma virus negative (risk ratio 1.6, 95% confidence interval 0.01-1.7).Atypical glandular cells can represent a variety of lesions. The majority of the lesions will be squamous intraepithelial lesions of the cervix (50%), with high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion present in 40% of subjects. Human papilloma virus DNA testing is a sensitive test for the presence of squamous intraepithelial lesion, with excellent negative predictive value for the absence of squamous intraepithelial lesion. The results of this study suggest human papilloma virus DNA testing might be an effective screening test in the initial evaluation and management of cytological atypical glandular cells.Optimal threshold for a positive hybrid capture 2 test for detection of human papillomavirus: data from the ARTISTIC trial.We present data on the use of the Hybrid Capture 2 (HC2) test for the detection of high-risk human papillomavirus (HR HPV) with different thresholds for positivity within a primary screening setting and as a method of triage for low-grade cytology. In the ARTISTIC population-based trial, 18,386 women were screened by cytology and for HPV. Cervical intraepithelial neoplasia lesions of grade two and higher (CIN2+ lesions) were identified for 453 women within 30 months of an abnormal baseline sample. When a relative light unit/cutoff (RLU/Co) ratio of > or = 1 was used as the threshold for considering an HC2 result positive, 15.6% of results were positive, and the proportion of CIN2+ lesions in this group was 14.7%. The relative sensitivity for CIN2+ lesion detection was 93.4%. When an RLU/Co ratio of > or = 2 was used as the threshold, there was a 2.5% reduction in positivity, with an increase in the proportion of CIN2+ lesions detected. The relative sensitivity decreased slightly, to 90.3%. Among women with low-grade cytology, HPV prevalences were 43.7% and 40.3% at RLU/Co ratios of > or = 1 and > or = 2, respectively. The proportions of CIN2+ lesions detected were 17.3% and 18.0%, with relative sensitivities of 87.7% at an RLU/Co ratio of > or = 1 and 84.2% at an RLU/Co ratio of > or = 2. At an RLU/Co ratio of > or = 1, 68.3% of HC2-positive results were confirmed by the Roche line blot assay, compared to 77.2% of those at an RLU/Co ratio of > or = 2. Fewer HC2-positive results were confirmed for 35- to 64-year-olds (50.3% at an RLU/Co ratio of > or = 1 and 63.2% at an RLU/Co ratio of > 2) than for 20- to 34-year-olds (78.7% at an RLU/Co ratio of > or = 1 and 83.7% at an RLU/Co ratio of > 2). If the HC2 test is used for routine screening as an initial test or as a method of triage for low-grade cytology, we would suggest increasing the threshold for positivity from the RLU/Co ratio of > or = 1, recommended by the manufacturer, to an RLU/Co ratio of > or = 2, since this study has shown that a beneficial balance between relative sensitivity and the proportion of CIN2+ lesions detected is achieved at this threshold.Impact of improved classification on the association of human papillomavirus with cervical precancer.Misclassification of exposure and surrogate endpoints of disease can obscure causal relations. Using data from the Atypical Squamous Cells of Undetermined Significance/Low-Grade Squamous Intraepithelial Lesion Triage Study (ALTS, 1997-2001), the authors explored the impact of exposure (human papillomavirus (HPV) detection) and endpoint (histologic cervical precancer) classification on their mutual association. Women referred into this study with an atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance Papanicolaou test with satisfactory results for all 4 HPV tests were included in this analysis (n = 3,215; 92.2%). HPV testing results were related to different definitions of cervical precancer, based on paired, worst 2-year histologic diagnoses, by calculating clinical sensitivity, specificity, and odds ratios. The authors found that HPV test sensitivity increased and specificity decreased with increasing certainty of cervical precancer, with HPV testing having the highest sensitivity (92%-98%) and lowest specificity (46%-54%) for consensus cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 3 (CIN 3). The overall accuracy of each HPV test, as measured by odds ratios, was greatest for consensus CIN-3 diagnoses, from 2- to 4-fold greater than for a less stringent precancer definition of any diagnosis of CIN 2 or more severe. In summary, there was convergence of greater certainty of carcinogenic HPV with greater certainty of a precancerous diagnosis, such that all 4 HPV tests almost always tested positive in women most likely to have cervical precancer. Finding increasingly strong associations when both test and diagnostic misclassification are reduced is a useful sign of "true association" in molecular epidemiology.Use of the ThinPrep Imaging System does not alter the frequency of interpreting Papanicolaou tests as atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance.Automated screening of Papanicolaou tests (Pap tests) improves the productivity of cytopathology laboratories. The ThinPrep Imaging System (TIS) has been widely adopted primarily for this reason for use on ThinPrep Pap tests (TPPT). However, TIS may also influence the interpretation of Pap tests, leading to changes in the frequency of various interpretive categories. The effect of the TIS on rates of TPPT interpretation as atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US) is of concern because any shift in the frequency of ASC-US will alter the sensitivity and specificity of the Pap test. We have sought to determine whether automated screening of TPPT has altered ASC-US rates in our institution when compared with manual screening (MS) of TPPT.A computerized search for all ASC-US with reflex Human Papillomavirus (HPV) testing over a one-year-period (7/1/06 to 6/30/07) was conducted. Cases included both TPPT screened utilizing TIS and screened manually. HPV test results for both groups were recorded. Pertinent follow-up cervical cytology and histology results were retrieved for the period extending to 11/30/07. Automated screening was in clinical use for 10 months prior to the start of the study.Automated screening was performed on 23,103 TPPT, of which 977 (4.23%) were interpreted as ASC-US. Over the same period, MS was performed on 45,789 TPPT, of which 1924 (4.20%) were interpreted as ASC-US. Reflex HPV testing was positive for high risk (HR) types in 47.4% of the TIS cases and 50.2% of MS cases. Follow-up cervical dysplasia found by colposcopy was also distributed proportionally between the two groups. Cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) was found on follow-up biopsy of 20.1% of the TIS cases (5.2% CIN 2/3) and 21.2% of MS cases (5.1% CIN 2/3). None of these differences were statistically significant.Use of the ThinPrep Imaging System did not appreciably change ASC-US rates or follow-up reflex HPV test results in our laboratory. This demonstrates that the benefits of automated screening may be obtained without increasing the rate of referral to colposcopy for ASC-US follow-up.Human papillomavirus DNA detection and histological findings in women referred for atypical glandular cells or adenocarcinoma in situ in their Pap smears.To evaluate the association between high-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA detection and histological diagnosis in women referred for atypical glandular cells (AGC) or adenocarcinoma in situ (AIS) at Pap smear.In this cross-sectional study, 146 women referred for AGC (124), AGC with high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HSIL) (15), or AIS (7) were tested for HPV DNA using Hybrid Capture II (HC II). All women underwent colposcopic examination, and cervical biopsy was performed for 95 patients. Fifty-one women referred due to AGC with normal colposcopy and normal second Pap smear were scheduled for control visits every 4 months.The overall prevalence of HPV DNA was 38%. HPV DNA was detected in 93% of the women with HSIL associated with AGC and in 71% of women with AIS Pap smear, being significantly higher when compared with the prevalence (29%) in women with AGC alone. Forty-five women (30.8%) had clinically significant histological lesions (CIN 2 or worse). High-risk HPV DNA was detected in only 16% of the women without significant abnormalities in biopsy, in contrast to 96% of those who had CIN 2 or CIN 3 and 75% of women with AIS. Eighty-five percent of women with invasive cervical carcinoma (squamous or adenocarcinoma) tested positive for HPV DNA. HPV DNA detection was significantly associated with histological diagnosis of CIN 2 or worse, with an odds ratio (OR) = 51.8 (95% CI 14.3-199.9).HPV DNA detection was strongly associated with the severity of cervical lesion (CIN 2 or worse) in women referred for AGC or AIS in their Pap smear. These data implicate the use of HPV testing in triage of women with AGC Pap smears.Comparison of two tests for detecting carcinogenic HPV in women with Papanicolaou smear reports of ASCUS and LSIL.The detection of cancer-associated types of human papillomavirus (HPV) in cervical specimens predicts the presence and future development of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN). The purposes of this study were (1) to determine the efficacy of a second-generation assay by hybrid capture (HC II) to detect carcinogenic HPV from residual cervical cells of a liquid-based cervical cytologic specimen, and (2) to compare the performance of this second-generation test with the first-generation hybrid capture (HCT) HPV test of material from direct cervical sampling to detect CIN in women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) and low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL) Papanicolaou (Pap) smear reports.Women with a recent Pap smear report of ASCUS or LSIL had a sampling of the cervix using either an Ayre's spatula and cytobrush or an Accellon device sampling for liquid-based cytologic system HC II HPV testing, followed by a Dacron swab sampling of the cervix for standard HCT HPV testing of the paired specimens. All women received colposcopy examinations including cervical biopsy and endocervical curettage, when indicated, to determine criterion standards for comparison.Paired swabs and liquid-based cervical specimens from 242 women were available for testing by standard HCT and the newer HC II HPV DNA assays. The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values for detecting CIN grade 2 or 3 (CIN 2/3) were 61.9%, 57.0%, 12.0%, and 94.0%, respectively, for the HCT test, and 90.5%, 29.4%, 10.9%, and 97.0%, respectively, for the liquid-based cytology HC II assay. When only women with an initial ASCUS Pap smear report were considered, the HC II test results were 88.9%, 40.3%, 9.1%, and 98.2%, respectively.Testing for lower genital tract carcinogenic HPV DNA using a cervical cytology liquid transport media residual sample is clinically feasible. The new HC II microplate HPV test achieved a greater test sensitivity for detecting carcinogenic HPV and correspondingly of CIN 2/3 compared with the currently available first-generation HC HPV test. Use of a liquid-based cervical cytology system combined with intermediate triage by HC II testing of residual cells for carcinogenic HPV alone may help to efficiently identify CIN 2/3 in women who have a prior screening Pap smear report of ASCUS.Comparison of the Digene Hybrid Capture 2 assay and Roche AMPLICOR and LINEAR ARRAY human papillomavirus (HPV) tests in detecting high-risk HPV genotypes in specimens from women with previous abnormal Pap smear results.The development of cervical cancer is strongly associated with the presence of persistent high-risk (HR) human papillomavirus (HPV) infection. Recently, the commercially manufactured PCR-based Roche AMPLICOR (AMP) and LINEAR ARRAY (LA) HPV tests have become available for HPV detection. However, knowledge of their clinical performance compared to the U.S. Food and Drug Administration-approved Hybrid Capture 2 (HC2) assay is limited. This study evaluated the concordance between the HC2, AMP, and LA tests in detecting HR-HPV among a cohort of 1,679 women with previous abnormal Pap smear results. Overall, 1,393 specimens (81.3%) generated concordant results for HR-HPV presence or absence by the three assays. The concordance levels were substantial between the HC2 and AMP tests (84.4%, kappa = 0.6419) and between the HC2 and LA tests (84.0%, kappa = 0.6341) and nearly perfect between the AMP and LA tests (97.8%, kappa = 0.9441). HR-HPV prevalence, as detected by the AMP or LA tests, was significantly higher among women with cytological or histological high-grade disease (CIN2 or greater) than that detected by HC2 (P < 0.0001). The AMP and LA tests exhibited greater sensitivity, but lower specificity, than HC2 for detecting HR-HPV among this cohort of women with underlying cervical abnormalities, particularly among subjects with histologically proven high-grade disease. Both PCR-based HPV tests may be valuable in the management of care for women with underlying cervical abnormalities, in predicting treatment success, and in studying the clearance or acquisition of new infections.Clinical performance of the APTIMA HPV Assay for the detection of high-risk HPV and high-grade cervical lesions.Human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA testing is widely used in conjunction with Papanicolaou (Pap) testing in cervical cancer screening programs to improve the detection of high-grade lesions. While HPV DNA test sensitivity is good, an improvement in specificity is desired. Detection of HPV mRNA may improve specificity. The APTIMA HPV Assay detects the mRNA of 14 high-risk HPV types in liquid-based cytology specimens.To evaluate APTIMA HPV Assay performance for detection of high-risk HPV and high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) compared to Qiagen's Hybrid Capture 2 HPV DNA (HC2) test.Liquid Pap specimens were collected from 800 women referred to colposcopy and tested with the APTIMA HPV Assay and the HC2 test. Complete results were available for 753 subjects. A subset of samples (n = 393) were typed using Roche's Linear Array HPV Genotyping Test.Sensitivity and specificity for detection of high-risk HPV were >92% and 99% for the APTIMA HPV Assay and 93% and 82% for the HC2 test. Clinical sensitivity and specificity were 91% and >55% for detection of CIN 2+, and 98% and 53% for detection of CIN 3+ for the APTIMA HPV Assay; values for the HC2 test were 95% and 47% for CIN 2+, and 99% and 44% for CIN 3+.The APTIMA HPV Assay is sensitive and very specific for detection of high-risk HPV. The APTIMA HPV Assay had similar clinical sensitivity for disease detection but higher clinical specificity than the HC2 test, which may improve patient management and reduce the cost of care.Triage of women with ASCUS and LSIL on Pap smear reports: management by repeat Pap smear, HPV DNA testing, or colposcopy?The purpose of this study was to determine the efficacy of a repeat Papanicolaou (Pap) smear and the Hybrid Capture tube-based (HCT) HPV DNA test for detecting cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) grade 2 or 3 in women with recent atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) or low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL) Pap smear reports.Women with a recent Pap smear report of ASCUS (n = 169) or LSIL (n = 110) had a repeat Pap smear, sampling of the cervix for HCT HPV DNA assay and a colposcopy examination. Data were evaluated using three different triage thresholds for colposcopy examination: a repeat Pap smear of persistent ASCUS or more severe dysplasia, a finding of persistent LSIL or more severe dysplasia, and a carcinogenic HPV test result.The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values for detecting CIN 2/3 were 70%, 45%, 7%, and 96% for a repeat Pap smear using an ASCUS-positive threshold and 20%, 86%, 8%, and 94% for a repeat Pap smear using an LSIL-positive threshold, respectively, when women with an initial ASCUS Pap smear were considered. HPV testing for carcinogenic viruses alone or in combination with a repeat Pap smear (using ASCUS as a positive threshold) yielded results of 50%, 67%, 9%, and 96%, respectively, and 70%, 37%, 7%, and 95%, respectively, for detecting CIN 2/3. In women with an initial LSIL Pap smear, respective values for detecting CIN 2/3 by a repeat Pap smear with an ASCUS threshold were 92%, 26%, 14%, and 96%, and for an LSIL threshold 23%, 64%, 8%, and 86%, respectively. Hybrid Capture HPV testing alone or in combination with a repeat Pap smear yielded 69%, 43%, 14%, and 91%, respectively, and 100%, 21%, 14%, and 100%, respectively.A Pap smear triage threshold restricted to LSIL or more severe dysplasia for women with prior ASCUS or LSIL Pap smear results was clearly ineffective for detecting high-grade cervical precancerous lesions. In contrast, when the repeat Pap smear triage threshold was expanded to include persistent ASCUS as abnormal, 83% of the women with CIN 2/3 were detected. Detection of carcinogenic HPV DNA using the HCT test was almost as sensitive for detecting CIN 2/3 as a solitary repeat Pap smear using an ASCUS or more severe positive threshold. Combining the HPV test with a repeat Pap smear did not significantly improve the sensitivity of cytology for detecting high-grade CIN. This study suggests that women with ASCUS and particularly LSIL Pap smears should be referred for a colposcopy examination until better triage methods become available.Correlation of Pap smear, cervical biopsy, and clinical follow-up with an HPV typing microarray system.A human papillomavirus (HPV) microarray system allows the determination of HPV type in clinical samples. The purpose of this study was to determine the presence of HPV in liquid-based Pap smears with the MyGene MyHPV Chip Kit HPV genotyping microarray test (MyGene Assay), and to correlate this with the cytology and biopsy diagnoses, clinical follow-up, HPV Hybrid Capture data, and HPV sequence analyses. Four hundred and two Pap smears (93 ThinPrep, 309 SurePath) were available for study. Correlation of HPV DNA detection by the MyGene Assay with the Pap smear diagnosis showed a detection rate of 19/97 (19%) for normal Pap smears, 181/242 (74%) for atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS), and 61/63 (97%) for squamous intraepithelial lesions (SILs). Biopsy data on 248 women were available. HPV was noted by the MyGene Assay in the Pap smear in 98/100 (98%) of the cases, for which the corresponding biopsy had been diagnosed as SIL, compared with 103/148 (69%) of the cases for which the biopsy had been negative for SIL. Clinical follow-ups were available for 200 women with ASCUS Pap smears. A significant increase was observed in the rate of biopsy-proven SILs in women with ASCUS Pap smears that were HPV-positive (63/66=95%) as compared with those that were HPV-negative (96/134=71%, P<0.05). The MyGene Assay and Hybrid Capture system gave equivalent results for all the categories studied, except for the presence of multiple infections, as determined by viral sequence analysis. Specifically, the Hybrid Capture system overestimated the presence of dual infection (low-risk and high-risk positive) by 48% and missed many cases of multiple infections, especially when 2 or more high-risk types were present. It is concluded that the MyGene Assay allows for the routine typing of HPV in liquid-based Pap smears, and that the presence of HPV DNA in ASCUS Pap smears is strongly correlated with a biopsy-proven SIL.Distribution of human papillomavirus types in ThinPrep Papanicolaou tests classified according to the Bethesda 2001 terminology and correlations with patient age and biopsy outcomes.A survey of the distribution of human papillomavirus (HPV) types across the spectrum of cervical cytologic categories defined by the Bethesda 2001 guidelines was conducted with the objective of examining how HPV detection by polymerase chain reaction (PCR) analysis may benefit the management of patients who have abnormal Papanicolaou (Pap) test results.DNA samples from women with no intraepithelial lesion or malignancy (NLM) (n = 300 samples); atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US) (n = 200 samples); low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL) (n = 200 samples); atypical squamous cells, cannot rule out high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (ASC-H) (n = 200 samples); and high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HSIL) (n = 200 samples) were tested for HPV using a modified general primer (GP)5+/GP6+ PCR assay and dot-blot hybridization with type-specific oligonucleotide probes (PCR assay analytical sensitivity: 1-100 copies of HPV, depending on the HPV type, in a background of 100 ng human DNA).HPV was detected in 27% of NLM samples, in 89.5% of ASC-US samples, in 97.5% of LSIL samples, in 93% of ASC-H samples, and in 96.5% of HSIL samples. Thirty-seven different HPV types were identified in total. One or more of 13 high-risk (HR) HPV types (16, 18, 31, 33, 35, 39, 45, 51, 52, 56, 58, 59, and 68) were detected in 53% of samples that were diagnosed as ASC-US (59.0% of patients younger than age 30 yrs; 45.5% of patients age 30 yrs and older), in 55.5% of samples that were diagnosed as LSIL (60.0% of patients younger than age 30 yrs; 44.0% of patients age 30 yrs and older), in 80% of samples that were diagnosed as ASC-H, and in 87.5% of samples that were diagnosed as HSIL (P < 0.001). HPV-16 was detected in 17.5% of ASC-US samples, in 15.5% of LSIL samples, in 48.5% of ASC-H samples, and in 49.0% of HSIL samples (P < 0.001). Among abnormal smears, HR HPV was significantly more common in women younger than age 30 years compared with women age 30 years and older (P < 0.002). Follow-up biopsy data were obtained for 359 patients. A "benign" biopsy result was recorded for 47 of 64 women (73.5%) with ASC-US, 30 of 66 women (45.5%) with LSIL, 39 of 87 women (45.0%) with ASC-H, and 26 of 142 women (18.0%) with HSIL and was most common in women age 30 years and older (P < 0.0001). Cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) Grade I (CIN-I) was found in 14.0% of women with ASC-US, in 39.5% of women with LSIL, in 8.0% of women with ASC-H, and in 7.0% of women with HSIL. CIN-II was diagnosed in 9.5% of women with ASC-US, in 13.5% of women with LSIL, in 19.5% of women with ASC-H, and in 24.0% of women with HSIL. CIN-III was identified in 2 women (3.0%) with ASC-US, in 1 woman (1.5%) with LSIL, in 24 women (27.5%) with ASC-H, and in 71 women (50.0%) with HSIL.HR HPV testing by PCR of samples diagnosed according to the Bethesda 2001 guidelines may benefit the management of patients with ASC-US or patients with LSIL, especially among women age 30 years and older, by allowing exclusion from referral for biopsy of women who are negative for HR HPV types. However, the small numbers of women who had CIN-III detected after a diagnosis of ASC-US or LSIL limited the assessment of test sensitivity.High-risk human papillomavirus DNA test results are useful for disease risk stratification in women with unsatisfactory liquid-based cytology pap test results.This study assesses whether high-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA test results from residual vial fluid of unsatisfactory liquid-based cytology(LBC) samples might provide useful information on disease risk.Patients with unsatisfactory imaged ThinPrep Pap test results and available Hybrid Capture 2 high-risk HPV results were identified at an academic women's hospital laboratory between July 1, 2005, and July 31, 2007. Follow-up repeat cytology results, HPV results, and available biopsy results were analyzed.Three hundred four patients with unsatisfactory cytology results and HPV test results were studied. Eleven (3.6%) of 304 tested positive for HPV DNA, and 293 tested HPV negative. Five (45%) of 11 HPV-positive patients had detectible low-grade squamous intraepithelial/cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 1 during a mean follow-up period of almost 6 months. Among 293 women with negative HPV results, only 1 case of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 1 was identified during roughly the same follow-up period.A positive high-risk HPV result associated with an unsatisfactory ThinPrep Pap test result identified patients at risk for diagnosis of an undetected squamous intraepithelial/cervical intraepithelial neoplasia. Negative high-risk HPV results associated with an unsatisfactory LBC had high negative predictive value in this limited study. The overall low detection rate for significant disease on follow-up of all patients with unsatisfactory imaged LBC is similar to findings reported in another LBC study but differs from studies reporting increased risk for undetected disease in women screened with unsatisfactory conventional Pap smears.The utility of human papillomavirus testing in the management of atypical glandular cells on cytology.To determine the value of human papillomavirus (HPV) testing for HPV-associated cervical disease (HPV-AD) and overall disease (atypical glandular cell [AGC]-associated cervical disease) in women with AGCs.A literature search was conducted from January 1993 through September 2007 using various AGC-related terms with the exploded Medical Subject Heading (MeSH) term "HPV." Findings from 7 studies were used to calculate disease rates according to HPV status.The rate of AGC-associated cervical disease for 661 cases of AGC with concurrent HPV testing was 23.3%. The rate of HPV-AD was higher in HPV-positive, versus negative, cases (53% vs 3%, respectively). Human papillomavirus-positive, versus negative, status predicted a higher likelihood of a cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 2/3 lesion (odds ratio = 39.6, 95% CI = 17.9-87.4, p <.001). The rate of HPV-nonassociated cancers was significantly higher in patients who were negative, versus positive, for HPV (4% vs 0.4%; p =.016). Human papillomavirus testing had an overall 90% sensitivity, 79% specificity, 53% positive predictive value, and 97% negative predictive value for cases of HPV-AD. Atypical glandular cell with concurrent atypical squamous cell (ASC) or squamous intraepithelial lesion (SIL) (ASC/SIL) had higher rates of disease than AGC alone. The positive predictive value of HPV testing for AGC with concurrent ASC/SIL was higher than that for AGC alone.All women with AGC should undergo a comprehensive initial examination regardless of HPV status. The presence of HPV identifies a group of women at higher risk for cervical disease who should be followed closely. Women positive for human papillomavirus with AGC and concurrent ASC/SIL are at even higher risk. If, after a comprehensive initial examination, women with AGC not-otherwise-specified and positive HPV have no identifiable disease, a cervical conization may be considered.Long-term follow-up of cervical disease in women screened by cytology and HPV testing: results from the HART study.Several studies have shown that testing for high-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) types results in an improved sensitivity for CIN2+, compared with cytology, although with a somewhat lower specificity.We obtained follow-up results, with at least one smear after participation in the HART study, which compared HPV testing (HC-II) with cytology as a primary screening modality.With a median follow-up of 6 years, 42 additional cases of CIN2+ were identified; women who were HPV positive at baseline were more likely to develop CIN2+ than those who were HPV negative (hazard ratio (HR) 17.2; 95% confidence interval (CI) (9.3-31.6)) and the risk increased with increasing viral load. Compared with HPV-negative women (relative light unit (RLU) <1), the HR (95% CI) was 5.4 (1.6, 18.2) for 1-10 RLU and 25.5 (13.6, 47.9) for RLU > or = 10. Positive cytology (borderline or worse compared with negative) was also predictive of developing CIN2, although to a lesser extent (HR 8.7; 95% CI (4.5-17.1)). Only one case of CIN3 and three cases of CIN2 were found in women who showed a positive cytology result but were HPV negative at baseline.After 5 years of follow-up, CIN2+ occurred in 0.23% of women who were HPV negative at baseline compared with 0.48% of women who showed a negative cytology result, indicating a much longer low-risk interval for CIN2+ after HPV testing.Risk factors for high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia in patients with mild cytological dyskaryosis: human papillomavirus testing versus multivariate tree analysis of demographic data.The objective of this study was to compare the use of molecular hybridization by hybrid capture methodology for human papillomavirus (HPV) with the use of demographic and lifestyle variables as intermediate triage in patients with cytological mild dyskaryosis. The study was designed as a prospective study using regression tree analysis of demographic data in consecutive patients who were subjected to colposcopic evaluation at the colposcopy clinic at the First Department of Obstetrics and Gynaecology, University of Milan (Milan, Italy). A total of 177 women were subjected to colposcopy because of a single routine Pap smear showing mild dyskaryosis. A structured interview, sampling for HPV testing for the detection of viral DNA by hybrid capture methodology, and colposcopic evaluation with cervical biopsies were performed for each subject. The accuracies of molecular hybridization for HPV and of the classification model based on the demographic and lifestyle variables in predicting patients with histologically high-grade cervical intraepithelial lesions were measured. The classification model based on the demographic and lifestyle variables showed comparable results with molecular hybridization for HPV (specificity, 0.75 versus 0.73; sensitivity, 0.61 versus 0.67, respectively). The use of demographic and lifestyle variables appears to be a simple and economic possibility for triaging patients with mild dyskaryotic smears in a screening program.Role of HPV DNA testing in predicting cervical intraepithelial lesions: comparison of HC HPV and ISH HPV.Human papillomavirus (HPV) is widely accepted as the primary agent involved in the development of squamous intraepithelial neoplasia and cervical carcinoma. Several commercial tests are available for detecting HPV DNA. This study compares the efficacy of INFORM HPV (in situ hybridization [ISH] HPV) and HCII (HC HPV) in predicting cervical lesions. A total of 762 sequential Papanicolaou (Pap) smears determined by cytologic examination to be either atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US) or low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (LSIL) were tested by both Hybrid Capture (HC) HPV and ISH HPV; 250 follow-up biopsies were reviewed as the reference standard for presence or absence of a lesion. ISH HPV and HC HPV differed significantly in accurately predicting biopsy findings from ASC-US and LSIL cases. The overall sensitivity and specificity of ISH HPV were 97% (28/29) and 86% (191/221); and HC HPV was 79% (23/29) and 56% (123/221). The positive predictive value (PPV) of ISH HPV was 48% (28/58) vs HC HPV value of 19% (23/121). Negative predictive value (NPV) was also better with ISH HPV at 99% (191/192) and HC HPV at 95% (123/129). Of equal importance, ISH HPV demonstrated a lower false-positive rate compared to HC HPV, 12% (30/250) vs 39% (98/250), as well as having a slightly lower false-negative rate 0.4% (1/250) vs 2.4% (6/250). ISH HPV is more predictive of biopsy histopathology in patients with detectable cervical lesions than is HC HPV. Effective triage of patients by HPV analysis using ISH HPV as compared to HC HPV has the potential of significant public health impact by reducing unnecessary colposcopies, as well as adverse medical, social, and psychological patient consequences.Analyses of atypical squamous cells refined by the 2001 Bethesda System: the distribution and clinical significance of follow-up management.This study was conducted to analyze the clinical significance of follow-up diagnostic methods of atypical squamous cells (ASC) (the 2001 Bethesda System) cases according to age. A computerized search of the cytology database was performed to retrieve all cases diagnosed as ASC from 2001 to 2003. The pathologic reports for all follow-up diagnoses were reviewed. We divided the patients into two groups according to their age, younger than 50 years of age and 50 years and older, and follow-up diagnoses were compared between the two groups. ASC was identified in 1035 (2.0%) of 49,882 women screened, and a total of 914 patients were eligible. In atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US) cases, colposcopically directed biopsy showed CIN I (CIN is cervical intraepithelial neoplasia) or higher grade lesions in 34.9% of cases younger than 50 years of age and in 17.4% of cases 50 years and older (P= 0.000). However, repeat Pap smears and human papillomavirus DNA testing showed no differences between the two groups. In contrast, the three methods did not exhibit significant difference between the two groups in patients with atypical squamous cells, cannot exclude high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (ASC-H) (P= 0.743). Colposcopically directed biopsy for the ASC-US was more useful in patients younger than 50 years of age than in those who were 50 years and older. It is suggested that age should be considered in deciding follow-up diagnostic methods in patients with ASC-US.Which test is a better strategy to determine the outcome of atypical glandular cell-categorized Pap smears? Immunocytochemical p16INK4A expression or human papillomavirus test--a retrospective cohort study.This study was to correlate high-risk human papillomavirus (HR-HPV) viral load to p16(INK4A) (p16) expression in atypical glandular cell (AGC)-categorized Pap smears with follow-up biopsies for elucidating their relationships.We enrolled 36 AGC-categorized Pap smears with subsequent follow-up biopsies. HR-HPV viral load was determined by Hybrid Capture II assay in each AGC-diagnosed Pap smear. Both smears and biopsies were immunostained with a primary anti-p16 antibody, clone E6H4. Correlations between HR-HPV viral load in each AGC-diagnosed Pap smear and p16 expression of smears with follow-up biopsies were performed.Comparative analysis of two tests disclosed both consistencies and discrepancies. There were significant differences (P=0.02) between negative or weak p16 expression of Pap smears with the presence of reactive lesion or LSILs/CIN1s in follow-up biopsies and negative HR-HPV viral load. However, no significant difference (P=0.317) was found between p16 expression of Pap smears with the presence of HSIL/CIN2, 3 and AIS or adenocarcinoma in follow-up biopsies and high HR-HPV viral load. In addition, there were significant differences (P=0.012) in specificity, but no significant differences were found in sensitivity (P=0.604), positive and negative predictive value (P=0.066 and 0.264) between p16 immunoexpression and HR-HPV viral load.Pathogenic activity of HR-HPV was indicated by p16 expression on smears and tissue sections, which appears to be a better strategy than HR-HPV viral load test for the detection of clinically insignificant lesions from AGC-categorized Pap smears.Evaluation of the HPV L1 capsid protein in prognosis of mild and moderate dysplasia of the cervix uteri.Cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) can be detected in the cytologic smears years before invasive squamous cancer arises, but no reproducible morphologic criteria exist to predict behavior of cervical lesions. The possibility of predicting the clinical course of cervical lesions could be of high value in clinical practice and some women will spare of unnecessary treatment. HPV L1 capsid protein represents about 90% of the total protein on the surface of the virus and can be detected in mild to moderate dysplasia and rarely in severe dysplasia. The purpose of the study was to evaluate the use of immunodetection of HPV L1 protein on archival Pap smears with findings of mild and moderate dysplasia in predicting its clinical course. Immunochemical analyses with L1 antibody revealed positively stained nuclei of squamous epithelial cells in 56 of 114 smears (49.1%). The staining results were correlated with follow-up smears or with histologic verification. Regression (negativisation of the Pap smear for 24 months or longer) was noticed in 31 of 56 (55.4%) L1-positive cases and in 20 of 58 (34.5%) L1-negative cases. Persistent disease occured in 13 (23.2%) L1-positive cases and in 14 (24.1%) L1-negative cases. Progressive disease occured in 12 (21.4%) L1-positive cases and in 24 (41.4%) L1-negative cases. The difference in the clinical course between the L1-positive and L1-negative patients was statistically significant (p = 0.025). Also, the difference in the clinical course of the L1-negative staining in the under-30 and over-30 years age group was statistically significant (p = 0.04). For conclusion, our data confirm that immunostaining for HPV L1 capsid protein could offer prognostic information about mild and moderate intraepithelial cervical squamous lesions.Clinical utility of atypical glandular cells (AGC) classification: cytohistologic comparison and relationship to HPV results.To determine the utility of the category of atypical glandular cells (AGC) in the management of patients with putative cervical neoplasia and to correlate HPV-DNA test results when available.The Johns Hopkins Hospital cytopathology records of 50,668 women patients were searched for all liquid-based gynecologic cytology (LBP) results of Atypical Glandular cells of Undetermined Significance (AGUS) and AGC from January 1, 2001 through December 31, 2003, yielding 98 patients (0.19%). Oncogenic HPV-DNA tests were performed on the residual fluids of 43 of these patients, 37 of whom had follow-up biopsy. During the period of January 1, 2000 and December 31, 2002, we identified 237 patients (0.58%) with conventional Pap smears in the AGUS or AGC category, among 41,024 conventional smears collected contemporaneously. To avoid confusion in this paper, AGC will be used to replace those results that originally were AGUS.Following the 98 LBP AGC interpretations, 24 lesions (33.8%) were discovered out of 71 biopsies. HPV-DNA tests were performed on the residual of 43 LBPs, 18 (41.9%) were positive for oncogenic HPV. Only 37 patients had follow-up biopsy and 15 (40.5%) were positive for oncogenic HPV, of which 40% (6/15) had a significant lesion. Of the 237 conventional AGC Paps, 18 lesions (15.3%) were discovered out of 118 biopsies.Comparison of liquid-based and conventional Pap tests revealed a significant difference (33.8% vs. 15.3% respectively) (OR: 2.84, 95% CI: 1.4-5.73, p=0.004) in the detection of glandular and squamous lesions. HPV testing may prove beneficial to triage AGC patients with negative colposcopic findings and positive HPV results.High-risk HPV detection and concurrent HPV 16 and 18 typing with Abbott RealTime High Risk HPV test.High-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) is the causative agent of cervical cancer. Among the high-risk types, infection with HPV 16 and 18 is associated with significantly higher risk of disease progression, and consequently these two types together cause approximately 70% of invasive cervical cancer worldwide. Identification of HPV 16 and HPV 18 can provide valuable information for risk stratification and clinical management of patients infected with these two types in both ASC-US triage and primary screening in women over age 30. It may also be valuable in the assessment of HPV vaccine efficacy. Abbott RealTime High Risk (HR) HPV is a recently developed test for the detection of 14 high-risk HPV types with the ability to concurrently identify HPV 16 and 18.To evaluate the clinical performance of Abbott RealTime HR HPV test.Abbott RealTime HR HPV was evaluated with 253 cervical specimens obtained from patients with CIN 3 and 340 specimens from patients with cervical cancer to determine clinical sensitivity of the test and the prevalence of types 16 and 18. Additionally, 757 cervical specimens obtained from women 30 years of age or older with normal cytology in a general screening population were tested to determine high-risk HPV positivity rate.The Abbott RealTime HR HPV test detected 97.2% (246/253) of CIN 3 specimens and 98.5% (335/340) of cancer specimens. HPV 16 was the most prevalent type in both CIN 3 (72.8%) and cancer specimens (64.5%). HPV 16 and 18 combined were detected in 78.9% of high-risk HPV positive CIN 3 and 84.8% of high-risk HPV positive cancer specimens. In specimens from women 30 years of age or older with normal cytology in a screening population, the HPV positivity rate was 6.5% (49/757).Abbott RealTime HR HPV is a highly sensitive test for detection of high-grade cervical disease and cancer. The HPV 16 and HPV 18 typing capability of the test offers the advantage of stratifying patients at greater risk of progression and may thus aid in better patient care and management.Conservative management of adolescents with abnormal cytology and histology.Adolescents remain vulnerable to human papilloma virus (HPV) infection because of certain physiologic characteristics inherent in this age group and common sexual behaviors, including lack of condom use. The commonness of HPV in this age group also results in frequent abnormal cytology. Fortunately, most of the infections are transient, with frequent clearance of HPV and the lesion. Current strategies for adolescents with abnormal cytology include conservative management, avoiding invasive procedures. For cytologic atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance or squamous intraepithelial lesions (SIL), management can be obtaining cytology only at 1-year intervals for up to 2 years before referral for colposcopy is necessary. For biopsy-proven cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) I, management is similar with yearly cytology indefinitely or until high-grade-SIL or CIN II/III develops. CIN II in adherent adolescents can be managed with 6-month cytology and colposcopy.Human papillomavirus testing as triage for atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance and low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions: sensitivity, specificity, and cost-effectiveness.Our purpose was to evaluate the cost-effectiveness of the use of a Food and Drug Administration-approved human papillomavirus test in triaging patients with Papanicolaou smears showing atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance or a low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion for colposcopy compared with an algorithm that used cytologic follow-up.Four hundred sixty-two women referred to our Colposcopy Clinic with a Papanicolaou smear report of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance or a low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion underwent repeat Papanicolaou smear, cervical colposcopy, directed cervical biopsy, and endocervical curettage. In addition, human papillomavirus testing by the Food and Drug Administration-approved HPV Profile (Digene Diagnostics, Silver Spring, Md.) test was done. A comparison of sensitivity, specificity, and cost-effectiveness of an algorithm determining the need for colposcopy on the basis of repeat cytologic testing versus an algorithm that incorporated repeat cytologic testing and human papillomavirus screening was done. The cost-effectiveness of both of these triage algorithms was also compared.As expected, high-risk human papillomavirus deoxyribonucleic acid was detected with greater frequency in relation to increasing severity of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia. In 268 women, the follow-up smear obtained in our clinic was reported as negative. High-risk human papillomavirus types were found in 23.5% of these women. In the human papillomavirus-negative women, 5.9% had grade 2 or 3 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia confirmed on cervical biopsy. In comparison, 20.6% of those with a positive result of the human papillomavirus test had grade 2 or 3 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia on biopsy (p < 0.001). Despite this difference, the sensitivity of a positive result of a high-risk human papillomavirus test in predicting the presence of grade 2 or 3 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia was only 52%. Among the women for whom a follow-up clinic Papanicolaou smear was reported as showing atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance or a low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion, there was no difference in the frequency of biopsy-proved grade 2 or 3 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia between those women with a positive human papillomavirus test result and those with a negative test result. Colposcopy would have been recommended for 194 women because of a repeat clinic smear revealing atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance, a low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion, or a high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion, and in 21.6% of these grade 2 or 3 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia was shown on biopsy (sensitivity 63%, specificity 62%). Colposcopy would have been recommended for 180 women because high-risk human papillomavirus or a high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion was detected at the clinic visit, and in 25% of this group grade 2 or 3 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia was shown on biopsy (sensitivity 67%, specificity 66%). Sensitivity and specificity were virtually identical for the two algorithms, but the cost of human papillomavirus testing was nearly double that of triage based on repeat cytologic testing alone ($692 vs $1246 per case).The Food and Drug Administration-approved HPV Profile test is not a cost-effective triage for patients referred with Papanicolaou smears reported as showing atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance or low-grade squamous lesions.Atypical glandular cells of undetermined significance (AGUS): cytopathologic features, histopathologic results, and human papillomavirus DNA detection.We intensively reviewed 137 smears initially classified as atypical glandular cells of undetermined significance (AGUS) to refine cytological criteria for evaluating these cases, evaluate histological outcomes, and assess the value of human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA testing in management. Consenting, nonpregnant study participants were identified from a cohort of 46,009 women receiving routine Pap smear screening in a managed care setting. Colposcopy was performed on all women, and at least one histological sample was obtained from each. Review diagnoses were assigned to smears and biopsy specimens by two separate panels of pathologists. DNA testing for cancer-associated HPV types was performed on rinses of cytological samplers after a smear and thin-layer slide had been made. On review, 47 (34%) smears were reclassified as negative, 44 (32%) as AGUS, 30 (22%) as atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS), and 16 (12%) as squamous intraepithelial lesions (SIL). The 19 smears interpreted as high-grade intraepithelial lesions on review included 13 high-grade SIL (HSIL), two HSIL with AGUS, favor neoplastic (endocervical adenocarcinoma in situ [AIS]), and four AGUS, favor neoplastic (AIS). Review histological diagnoses were negative in 105 (77%), squamous or glandular atypia in four (3%), low-grade SIL (LSIL) in nine (7%), HSIL in 12 (9%), AIS in five (4%, including two with concurrent HSIL), and endometrial carcinoma in one (1%). HPV testing identified 11 (92%) of 12 women with histologically confirmed HSIL and all five with AIS (100%). A high-grade intraepithelial lesion or carcinoma is detected in approximately 14% of women with community-based diagnoses of AGUS who are referred for immediate evaluation. Use of refined cytological criteria and HPV DNA testing may permit improved management of women with AGUS.Detection of high-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA by Hybrid Capture II in women referred due to atypical glandular cells in the primary screening.We assessed the detection of high-risk human papillomavirus DNA (HPV-DNA) in women examined by a second Pap smear due to atypical glandular cells (AGC) detected in their screening Pap smear. In 91 women included in the study, a second Pap smear was taken and HPV-DNA test was performed using Hybrid Capture II (HC II). The second Pap smear showed no abnormalities in 28 (31%) cases, ACG in 17 (19%) cases, and high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (HSIL) or worse in 24 (26%). HC II test was positive in 36% of the cases. Considering the second Pap smear diagnosis, HPV-DNA was detected in 87% of the women with HSIL, 100% of women with in situ adenocarcinoma, and only in 11% of the women with no abnormalities. The use of the second Pap smear combined with HPV-DNA may improve the management of women with AGC in the primary screening.Introducing HPV triage into the English cervical cancer screening program: consequences for participation.To predict the likely impact of adding human papillomavirus (HPV) triage for minor abnormalities on participation in the English cervical cancer screening program.Contingent valuations of the existing Pap program and a possible HPV-augmented screening program, obtained from questionnaires completed by 1141 women in east-central England.The value of participating in Pap screening was negatively associated with age, positively associated with educational level, and positively associated with the level of household income. Higher levels of worry about cervical cancer were associated with higher valuations of screening. Adding HPV-based triage to the Pap program lowered the value of screening participation for only two women, whereas for the sample as a whole, it increased the average valuation by about 47 percent. Supposedly-negative characteristics of HPV testing, when described, were expected to trigger psychosocial concerns in respondents and thereby give rise to significant decreases in valuations of participating in a Pap-plus-HPV program. For most women, however, such information changed their valuations of participation in screening little, if at all.Accepting the proposition that higher contingent valuations indicate stronger behavioural preferences, our results offer insubstantial grounds for believing that the inclusion of HPV triage would detrimentally affect participation in Pap screening for cervical cancer.Triage of women with minor cervical lesions: data suggesting a "test and treat" approach for HPV E6/E7 mRNA testing.Human papillomavirus (HPV) testing is included in the cervical cancer screening program in the triage of women with equivocal (ASC-US) or low-grade (LSIL) cytological lesions. These women have an increased risk for developing high grade dysplasia and cancer (CIN2+) compared to women with normal cytology. However, in order to avoid unnecessary follow-up, as well as overtreatment, a high positive predictive value (PPV) of the triage test is important.The HPV test PreTect HPV-Proofer, detecting E6/E7 mRNA from the HPV types 16, 18, 31, 33 and 45, is used as triage test together with repeat cytology. PPV data for HPV E6/E7 mRNA testing during the period from January 2006 up to June 2009 are reported. In total, 406 of 2099 women (19.3%) had a positive HPV test result. Of the women with a positive test result and with a histological diagnosis (n = 347), 243 women had histological high-grade dysplasia or cancer (CIN2+), giving a PPV of 70.0% (95% confidence interval [CI], 65.2%-74.8%). For HPV 16 or HPV 33 positive women above 40 years of age, the PPV was 83.7% (95% CI, 73.3%-94.0%) and 84.6% (95% CI, 65.0%-100.0%) respectively. The PPV of test positive women with HSIL cytology was 94.2% (95% CI, 88.7%-99.7%).When the result in triage is HPV mRNA positive, our data suggest direct treatment for women above 40 years of age or for women with a concurrent cytological HSIL diagnosis, contributing to better clinical safety for these women. In addition, by decreasing the time to treatment, thereby reducing the number of recalls, the patient management algorithm will be considerably improved, in turn reducing follow-up costs as well as unnecessary psychological stress among patients.Cost-effectiveness of using human papillomavirus 16/18 genotype triage in cervical cancer screening.Testing for human papillomavirus (HPV) 16 and 18 genotypes, which are known to cause approximately 65-70% of invasive cervical cancer cases, may allow clinicians to identify women at highest risk for underlying cervical intraepithelial neoplasia missed by Pap cytology. Our objective was to determine the cost-effectiveness of adding HPV-16 and 18 genotype triage to current cervical cancer screening strategies in the United States.We developed a lifetime Markov model to assess the cost-effectiveness of the following cervical cancer screening algorithms: (1) liquid-based cytology (LBC), (2) LBC+HPV triage, (3) HPV+LBC triage, (4) co-screening, (5) co-screening+HPV genotyping, and (6) HPV only+HPV genotyping. Costs were estimated from a payer perspective in 2007 U.S. dollars. Outcome measures included lifetime risk of cervical cancer, quality-adjusted life years saved (QALYs), and incremental cost-effectiveness ratios (ICERs).In our model, the use of HPV genotyping strategies prevented 51-73 deaths per 100,000 women screened compared to screening using LBC followed by HPV triage and 4-26 deaths compared to co-screening with LBC and high-risk HPV. Use of HPV genotyping to triage all high-risk HPV-positive women every three years had an ICER of $34,074 per QALY compared to HPV and LBC co-screening. HPV genotyping with co-screening was the most effective strategy and had an ICER of $33,807 per QALY compared to HPV genotyping for all high-risk HPV-positive women.The addition of HPV-16 and -18 genotype triage to HPV and LBC co-screening was a cost-effective screening strategy in the United States.Cervical dysplasia: assessing methylation status (Methylight) of CCNA1, DAPK1, HS3ST2, PAX1 and TFPI2 to improve diagnostic accuracy.Diagnosis of cervical neoplasia hinges upon microscopic inspection of cervical samples. This has inherent operator-dependent variability. Testing for high-risk human papilloma virus (HPV) may help to triage patients with pre-invasive disease in determining clinical intervention and follow-up. However, HPV presence/absence does not reflect the cervical epithelial cell's molecular status. Epigenetic modifications, e.g. DNA methylation, have been observed in the early stages of neoplastic change, preceding gene mutations. Here, we assess the correlation between cytologic/histologic results and combined DNA methylation data of 5 genes in different grades of cervical dysplasia.Cervical specimens collected via the liquid-based cytology system were each microscopically examined. Residual cells were subjected to DNA methylation analysis (Methylight) of gene loci CCNA1, PAX1, HS3ST2, DAPK1 and TFPI2. Methylation data were compared with cytologic/histologic reports. Statistical methods were applied to assess the ability of DNA methylation status to subtype the cervical neoplastic lesions according to their corresponding cytologic/histologic reports.A total of 165 subjects provided cytologically proven 63 HSIL, 49 LSIL and 53 normal samples. All patients with HSIL and LSIL underwent colposcopic examination. Patients with LSIL were all found to be CIN1; patients with HSIL were subsequently subdivided into 10 squamous cell carcinoma (SCC), 31 CIN3, 10 CIN2 and 12 CIN1. For each gene, there was increasing frequency of methylation from normal and LSIL (CIN1), through HSIL (CIN2 and CIN3), to SCC. Methylation of ≥1 of genes investigated was observed in 88% of combined HSIL (CIN2 and CIN3) and SCC cases. All genes showed significant increase in methylation level (PMR value) with increasing disease grade (p<0.005). CCNA1 was the only gene that was able to distinguish CIN2 from CIN3 specimens (p=0.016). Based on receiver operating characteristic (ROC) analysis, HS3ST2 was the most significant candidate in segregating HSIL/SCC from normal/LSIL cases (p<0.0001); at an optimal cutoff value, sensitivity and specificity between 70% and 80% were obtained.Development of DNA methylation status of a gene panel to improve diagnostic accuracy in cervical neoplasia is warranted.Assessment of fluorescence in situ hybridization and hybrid capture 2 analyses of cervical cytology specimens diagnosed as low grade squamous intraepithelial lesion for the detection of high grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia.To assess Hybrid Capture 2 (HC2) and fluorescence in situ hybridization (FISH) for the detection of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 2 or worse (CIN 2+) in patients with a cytologic diagnosis of low grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL).Residual samples from 115 LSIL-diagnosed cervical cytology specimens were evaluated by high-risk human papillomavirus (HR-HPV) HC2 testing and FISH using biotin-labeled probes to HR-HPV and chromosomal probes to 3q26 (TERC) and 8q24 (CMYC). A cervical biopsy diagnosis of CIN 2+ was considered as evidence of high grade disease.The positive and negative predictive values of HC2 and FISH for detecting patients with CIN 2+ were 32% vs. 37% and 100% vs. 93%, respectively. The sensitivities of HC2 and FISH for CIN 2+ were not significantly different (100% vs. 90%, p = 0.25), while the specificity of HC2 was significantly lower than that of FISH (28% vs. 48%, p=0.003). FISH diagnosed fewer specimens as positive as compared to HC2 (62% vs. 79%).These preliminary data suggest that FISH testing may be useful for determining which patients with LSIL are most likely to have CIN 2+ on clinical follow-up.Evaluation of the HPV L1 capsid protein in prognosis of mild and moderate dysplasia of the cervix uteri.Cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) can be detected in the cytologic smears years before invasive squamous cancer arises, but no reproducible morphologic criteria exist to predict behavior of cervical lesions. The possibility of predicting the clinical course of cervical lesions could be of high value in clinical practice and some women will spare of unnecessary treatment. HPV L1 capsid protein represents about 90% of the total protein on the surface of the virus and can be detected in mild to moderate dysplasia and rarely in severe dysplasia. The purpose of the study was to evaluate the use of immunodetection of HPV L1 protein on archival Pap smears with findings of mild and moderate dysplasia in predicting its clinical course. Immunochemical analyses with L1 antibody revealed positively stained nuclei of squamous epithelial cells in 56 of 114 smears (49.1%). The staining results were correlated with follow-up smears or with histologic verification. Regression (negativisation of the Pap smear for 24 months or longer) was noticed in 31 of 56 (55.4%) L1-positive cases and in 20 of 58 (34.5%) L1-negative cases. Persistent disease occured in 13 (23.2%) L1-positive cases and in 14 (24.1%) L1-negative cases. Progressive disease occured in 12 (21.4%) L1-positive cases and in 24 (41.4%) L1-negative cases. The difference in the clinical course between the L1-positive and L1-negative patients was statistically significant (p = 0.025). Also, the difference in the clinical course of the L1-negative staining in the under-30 and over-30 years age group was statistically significant (p = 0.04). For conclusion, our data confirm that immunostaining for HPV L1 capsid protein could offer prognostic information about mild and moderate intraepithelial cervical squamous lesions.Atypical squamous cells and low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion in cervical cytology: cytohistological correlation and implication for management in a low-resource setting.To perform an audit of all cervical smears reported as atypical squamous cells (ASC) and low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL) as in the Bethesda system (TBS) 2001, and determine their histological follow-up and outcome when available, in order to define the threshold for colposcopic referral.A total of 25,203 cervical smears were screened over a period of 3 years (January 2006 - December 2008) and all ASC and LSIL smears were reviewed with the corresponding histological follow-up. All cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) grade 2 lesions and above (CIN2+) were considered as clinically significant lesions for analysis.Out of 25,203 cervical smears, 424 (1.7%) were reported as ASC and 113 (0.4%) as LSIL. Additionally, three were reported as atypical cells, not otherwise specified. The ASC : SIL ratio was 2.18 : 1. Follow-up histology was available in 153 (36.8%) of the ASC cases and revealed CIN2+ lesions in 22 (14.4%). Follow-up histology was available in 50 (44.2%) of LSIL cases and revealed clinically significant abnormalities in five (10%), all of which were CIN2. CIN3 and invasive squamous carcinomas were seen in 5.9% and 1.4%, respectively, of cases of ASC, and not seen in LSIL. Reclassification of ASC smears into ASC-US (ASC-undetermined significance) and ASC-H (ASC- high grade SIL not excluded) revealed ASC-H in 2.6% of all ASC smears, with a clinically significant outcome in 45.4%.In a low-resource setting where human papillomavirus testing is unaffordable, the threshold for colposcopic referral and follow-up histology should be ASC rather than SIL.A weakly positive human papillomavirus Hybrid Capture II result correlates with a significantly lower risk of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 2,3 after atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance cytology.The Hybrid Capture II assay (hc2; QIAGEN, Inc) for high-risk human papillomavirus (hrHPV) is an in vitro nucleic acid hybridization assay using chemiluminescence for the qualitative detection of hrHPV DNA in cervical samples. Results are reported as a ratio of relative light units (RLUs) to a cutoff value based on a positive control. Specimens with RLU ratios of 1.0 or higher are scored positive for hrHPV. We tested the hypothesis that hrHPV positives with low-positive RLU ratios (1-10) had a lower prevalence of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 2,3 (CIN 2,3) on histologic follow-up.Relative light unit ratios for 388 consecutive hrHPV-positive cervical cytologic specimens interpreted as atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) were reviewed. Individual RLU ratios were compared with outcome histologic diagnosis in cases with colposcopic follow-up and tissue sampling (biopsy and/or endocervical curettage; n = 236).Of 236 cases with histologic follow-up, 63 had RLU ratios in the range of 1 to 10; of these, 53 (84.1%) were negative for CIN, 7 (11.1%) had CIN 1, 1 (1.6%) had CIN of uncertain grade, and 2 (3.2%) had CIN 2,3. The difference in CIN 2,3 outcome between RLU ratios of 1 to 10 (3.2%) versus over 10 (17.3%) was significant (p =.0047). The difference in prevalence of CIN 1 was not significant (p =.67).An RLU ratio of 10 or less was associated with a significantly lower prevalence of CIN 2,3 on biopsy outcome after a Pap test result of ASCUS. The much lower prevalence of underlying CIN 2,3 in patients who are weakly HPV-positive may justify modification of the management algorithm for this subset of women with ASCUS.Correlation between hybrid capture II high-risk human papillomavirus DNA test chemiluminescence intensity from cervical samples with follow-up histologic results: a cytologic/histologic review of 367 cases.The Hybrid Capture II high-risk human papillomavirus (hrHPV) DNA test is a US Food and Drug Administration-approved nucleic acid hybridization assay using chemiluminescence for the semiquantitative detection of hrHPV in cervical samples. Patient samples and controls are used to calculate results as negative for hrHPV if <1.0, positive for hrHPV if >2.5, and "equivocal" if between 1.0 and 2.5.The authors reported on the cervical histologic results of 209 patients demonstrating "equivocal" results for hrHPV from SurePath (204 patients) or ThinPrep (5 patients) vials, and compared patients in this cohort with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US) cytology on the index cervical Papanicolaou (Pap) test (Group 1; n = 148 patients) with a patient cohort demonstrating unequivocal positive hrHPV test results (Group 2; n = 148 patients). The chemiluminescence intensity of hrHPV tests from patients in Group 2 were correlated with the presence and severity of dysplasia on subsequent histologic results, and patients were thereby stratified for their subsequent risk of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) types II/III.Approximately 97% of hrHPV tests demonstrating "equivocal" results were found to be positive at the time of retesting, and 15% of biopsied cases demonstrated CIN II or III. Results of follow-up histology after an ASC-US diagnosis, expressed as a percentage of the biopsied cohort, were: CIN II/III: 16.5% in Group 1 and 22.4% in Group 2; CIN I: 27% in Group 1 and 23.5% in Group 2; and negative: 56.5% in Group 1 and 54.1% in Group 2. Chemiluminescence intensity did not appear to be correlated with the severity of dysplasia.The percentage of high-grade CIN in the "equivocal" hrHPV cohort is highly significant and therefore the management of these patients should be similar to the unequivocally positive population. After an unequivocal positive hrHPV test, the hrHPV chemiluminescence intensity does not appear to further predict the rate of high-grade CIN.The age-specific relationships of abnormal cytology and human papillomavirus DNA results to the risk of cervical precancer and cancer.To estimate the relationship of human papillomavirus (HPV) detection and abnormal cytology with histologic diagnoses of cervical precancer and cancer.From 2003 to 2008 we examined the HPV, cytology, and diagnostic results from almost one million cervical cancer screenings done on women aged 30 and older who were members in Kaiser Permanente Northern California, a large health maintenance organization that introduced cotesting in 2003. Women were screened using conventional Pap tests and a DNA test for a pool of 13 high-risk HPV genotypes. Women with HPV-positive atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance and other abnormal cervical cytology, independent of their HPV results, routinely underwent colposcopy. Results were stratified by 5-year age groups from 30 to 64.High-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (HSIL), atypical squamous cells, cannot exclude HSIL (ASC-H), and atypical glandular cells were more strongly associated with cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 3 while low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (LSIL) and HPV-positive atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance were more strongly associated with cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 2 (CIN2). Cervical cancer was most commonly found in women with HSIL and atypical glandular cells cytology. Human papillomavirus-negative women with ASC-H cytology were at a reduced but significant risk of CIN2 or more severe (CIN2+) (10.6%) compared with HPV-positive women with ASC-H cytology. Human papillomavirus-negative women with LSIL were at a 4.0% risk of CIN2+, and among women 50 and older, at a 0.5% risk of CIN2+ with no cancers were diagnosed.Human papillomavirus testing may be useful for triage for colposcopic referral for LSIL cytology in older women but not for ASC-H cytology at any age.II.The sensitivity and specificity of p16(INK4a) cytology vs HPV testing for detecting high-grade cervical disease in the triage of ASC-US and LSIL pap cytology results.We analyzed the performance of p16(INK4a) immunocytochemistry on a series of 810 retrospectively collected atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US) and low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL) cases with available biopsy follow-up data, including 94 cases of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) 2 and 128 cases of CIN 3. Human papillomavirus (HPV) testing was performed from the same residual liquid-based cytologic specimen, and results for both tests were correlated with histologic follow-up data. Sensitivity values for high-grade CIN (HGCIN) confirmed on biopsy within 6 months were 92.6% (ASC-US) and 92.2% (LSIL) for cytotechnologists' reviews of p16 cytology and 90.1% (ASC-US) and 95.7% (LSIL) for HPV testing. Sensitivity rates of initial pathologists' reviews were slightly lower, 76.4% to 80.1%, with levels comparable to cytotechnologists' results after adjudication. The specificity of p16 cytology for HGCIN detection was significantly higher than for HPV testing for cytotechnologists and pathologists: 63.2% to 71.1% (p16 cytology) vs 37.8% for HPV in ASC-US (P < .001) and 37.3% to 53.3% (p16 cytology) vs 18.5% for HPV in LSIL (P < .001). This evaluation of the diagnostic performance of p16 cytology confirms the potential of this stain for the efficient triage of ASC-US and LSIL cytologic results.Clinical validation of the Cervista HPV HR and 16/18 genotyping tests for use in women with ASC-US cytology.High-risk (HR) human papillomavirus (HPV) testing is important in cervical cancer screening for triage to colposcopy. This study evaluated the clinical performance of the Cervista HPV HR and 16/18 genotyping tests for detection of HPV in cervical cytology specimens.The tests were prospectively evaluated in a multicenter clinical study. DNA was extracted from approximately 4000 residual liquid-based cytology specimens collected during routine liquid-based Papanicolaou tests at standard of care visits and was assessed for the presence of HR HPV and/or HPV types 16 and 18. All women with cytology results of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US) or greater underwent colposcopic examination and biopsies were collected. Test results were compared with local colposcopy and histology results from a central pathology review panel.There were 1347 subjects with complete data sets of cytology, HR HPV, colposcopy, and histology included in the analysis of the HPV HR test. Sensitivity of the HPV HR test for detection of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) 2+ among women with ASC-US cytology was 92.8% (95% confidence interval [CI]: 84.1-96.9) and the negative predictive value (NPV) was 99.1% (95% CI: 98.1-99.6). Sensitivity for detection of > or =CIN 3 in women with ASC-US was 100% (95% CI: 85.1-100) and the NPV was 100% (95% CI: 99.4-100). The specificity of the test for detection of > or =CIN 2 and > or =CIN 3 was 44.2% (95% CI: 41.5-46.9) and 43% (95% CI: 40.3-45.7), respectively. The HPV 16/18 genotyping test also performed as expected in women with ASC-US cytology who were positive for HR HPV.The Cervista HPV HR test can be clinically used for detecting HR HPV types in conjunction with cervical cytology for use in triage of women with ASC-US cytology during routine cervical cancer screening.Assessment of HPV DNA test value in management women with cytological findings of ASC-US, CIN1 and CIN2.The aim of this retrospective study was to answer the following questions: 1) is HPV DNA test for high-risk types able to predict lesion behaviour in women with cytological abnormalities lower than CIN3 (ASC-US, CIN1 and CIN2); 2) how to predict the histological diagnosis CIN3, and 3) is its use in diagnostic management in these patients justified or not? The study included 345 women (11 ASC-US, 312 CIN1 and 22 CIN2) that underwent conventional diagnostic management (repeat cytology and colposcopy with or without histology) and HPV testing for high-risk HPV types by PCR method. The value of HPVDNA test in predicting lesion regression/persistence was assessed in 275 subjects without histology. In 70 subjects, diagnostic accuracy (sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive value) of repeat cytology and HPV DNA test in predicting severe intraepithelial lesion (CIN3) was determined on the basis of colposcopy guided biopsy. The prevalence of persistent lesions was significantly higher in the group of HPV positive than in the group of HPV negative subjects (37.7% vs. 16.4%; p < 0.001). Positive HPV test was associated with a 3.1-fold risk of lesion persistence [OR (95% CI) = 3.095 (1.65-5.82)]. However, on screening to predict the outcome of cytologically diagnosed cervical lesion with sensitivity of 39.7% and positive predictive value of 37.7% showed that a positive test could not be considered a reliable indicator of lesion persistence. In contrast, the specificity of 82.5% and negative predictive value of 83.6% suggested that a negative test result could be taken as a good indicator of lesion regression. In comparison with repeat cytology, HPV test showed higher sensitivity (69.2% vs. 61.5%) but significantly lower specificity (63.2% vs. 93.0%) and positive predictive value (30.0% vs. 66.7%), and comparable negative predictive value (90.0% vs. 91.4%) in predicting histologically verified CIN3. In one patient with a histological diagnosis of squamous cell carcinoma with minimal invasion, repeat cytology indicated CIN3, whereas HPV test was negative. Due to authors experience in women with cytological abnormalities lower than CIN3, HPV testing is not a method to reliably predict lesion behaviour (regression, persistence) or presence of CIN3. HPV testing is of limited value in daily routine and should not be widely used until it is definitely demonstrated to be superior to conventional methods in improving the sensitivity, specificity and positive predictive value of CIN3 and invasive carcinoma detection.Human papillomavirus-based triage of women showing a cervical cytology result of borderline or mild dyskaryosis.The role of human papillomavirus testing in the management of women with low-grade abnormalities: multicentre randomised controlled trial.To assess the value of a single human papillomavirus (HPV) test in making decisions on management of women with cervical cytology showing borderline nuclear abnormality (BNA) or mild dyskaryosis. In particular, to determine whether information on high-risk (hr) HPV status would be valuable in the choice between (1) cytological surveillance versus immediate referral to colposcopy, and (2) at colposcopy, between biopsy and recall versus immediate large loop excision of the transformation zone (LLETZ).Multicentre individually randomised controlled trial, nested within the NHS Cervical Screening Programmes, investigating the value of HPV testing by testing for interactions between HPV status and (1) cytological surveillance versus colposcopy, and (2) biopsy and recall versus immediate LLETZ. Setting Grampian, Tayside and Nottingham. Population Women (n = 4439), aged 20-59 years, with a cytology test showing borderline nuclear abnormalities or mild dyskaryosis during October 1999 to October 2002.High-risk HPV status was determined at recruitment using the polymerase chain reaction assay with the GP5+/6+ general primer system. The results of this HPV testing were not disclosed to either the participating women or to those involved in their management. Women were randomised to either (1) 6-monthly cytological screening in primary care or (2) referral for colposcopy. Human papillomavirus status was used to stratify both randomisations. All women were followed for 3 years, concluding with an invitation to an exit appointment at which colposcopic examination was undertaken. In addition, in women who were randomised to initial colposcopy and underwent colposcopy, the association between hrHPV status and presence of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) grade 2 or more severe disease (henceforth CIN2 or worse) was examined.Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values of the HPV test for predicting CIN2 or worse and the implications for the choice of management between cytological surveillance and immediate referral for colposcopy.There were no significant interactions between management and HPV status. Hence, in women with mild dyskaryosis or BNA who are HPV positive, there is no advantage of (1) immediate colposcopy over cytological surveillance (P = 0.76) or (2) immediate LLETZ over biopsy and recall (P = 0.27). The sensitivity of HPV testing for detection of CIN2 or worse was 75.2% (95% CI 68.8-81.0%) among women with mild dyskaryosis and 69.9% (95% CI 61.7-77.3%) among those with BNA. Specificity was higher in those with BNA (71.3%; 95% CI 68.5-74.1%) than in those with mild dyskaryosis (46.9%; 95% CI 42.2-51.6%). Sensitivity decreased with increasing age whereas specificity increased. The negative predictive value was high, particularly among women with BNA (94.5%; 95% CI 92.9-96.0%). Across all ages, 22% of women who had CIN2 or worse were HPV negative. Conversely, 40% of those who were HPV positive did not have CIN. HPV was a much more reliable predictor in women aged over 40 years.We conclude that in younger women with low-grade cytological abnormalities, a single HPV test would not be useful in determining who should be referred for colposcopy or the most effective management at colposcopy. In women over 40, a negative HPV test could be used to rule out further investigation.The relationship between HPV16 and HPV18 viral load and cervical lesions progression.Cervical cancer remains one of the most important mortality causes worldwide. It is already known that high risk HPV (HR-HPV) has the main role in the development of pre- or cancerous lesions. Despite the fact that many studies focused on the HR-HPV viral loads as possible biomarkers, the viral load quantification utility for all HR-HPV genotypes is still a controversy. The purpose of our study was to determine if HPV16 and 18 viral load values might be a potential marker for HPV infection clearance versus of pre- and cancerous lesions development.80 women who tested positive for HPV16 and 18 were selected from a cohort of 250 patients. The samples, consisting in cervical smears, were collected in transport media ESwab (Copan). The patient's average age was 36.26 years. HPV DNA detection, genotyping and viral load determination were performed twice for each patient (within one year follow-up).HPV 16 viral load was significantly higher in normal cytology samples and in HGSIL patients than in ASCUS/LGSIL (p value < 0.0312). HPV 18 viral load was also significantly higher in HGSIL cases than in ASCUS/LGSIL (p = 0,038). Independently of cervical cytology, HPV 18 viral load was lower (7.93 x 10(4) copies/microL) than HPV 16 viral load (5 x 10(13)) copies/microL).For HPV types 16 or 18 positive patients with LGSIL cytology the viral load might have predictive value. Our study suggested that patients with elevated viral loads are at disease risk progression and should be carefully evaluated.Long-term follow-up of cervical disease in women screened by cytology and HPV testing: results from the HART study.Several studies have shown that testing for high-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) types results in an improved sensitivity for CIN2+, compared with cytology, although with a somewhat lower specificity.We obtained follow-up results, with at least one smear after participation in the HART study, which compared HPV testing (HC-II) with cytology as a primary screening modality.With a median follow-up of 6 years, 42 additional cases of CIN2+ were identified; women who were HPV positive at baseline were more likely to develop CIN2+ than those who were HPV negative (hazard ratio (HR) 17.2; 95% confidence interval (CI) (9.3-31.6)) and the risk increased with increasing viral load. Compared with HPV-negative women (relative light unit (RLU) <1), the HR (95% CI) was 5.4 (1.6, 18.2) for 1-10 RLU and 25.5 (13.6, 47.9) for RLU > or = 10. Positive cytology (borderline or worse compared with negative) was also predictive of developing CIN2, although to a lesser extent (HR 8.7; 95% CI (4.5-17.1)). Only one case of CIN3 and three cases of CIN2 were found in women who showed a positive cytology result but were HPV negative at baseline.After 5 years of follow-up, CIN2+ occurred in 0.23% of women who were HPV negative at baseline compared with 0.48% of women who showed a negative cytology result, indicating a much longer low-risk interval for CIN2+ after HPV testing.A randomized controlled trial of Human Papillomavirus (HPV) testing for cervical cancer screening: trial design and preliminary results (HPV FOCAL Trial).In the HPV FOCAL trial, we will establish the efficacy of hr-HPV DNA testing as a stand-alone screening test followed by liquid based cytology (LBC) triage of hr-HPV-positive women compared to LBC followed by hr-HPV triage with > or = CIN3 as the outcome.HPV-FOCAL is a randomized, controlled, three-armed study over a four year period conducted in British Columbia. It will recruit 33,000 women aged 25-65 through the province's population based cervical cancer screening program. Control arm: LBC at entry and two years, and combined LBC and hr-HPV at four years among those with initial negative results and hr-HPV triage of ASCUS cases; Two Year Safety Check arm: hr-HPV at entry and LBC at two years in those with initial negative results with LBC triage of hr-HPV positives; Four Year Intervention Arm: hr-HPV at entry and combined hr-HPV and LBC at four years among those with initial negative results with LBC triage of hr-HPV positive casesTo date, 6150 participants have a completed sample and epidemiologic questionnaire. Of the 2019 women enrolled in the control arm, 1908 (94.5%) were cytology negative. Women aged 25-29 had the highest rates of HSIL (1.4%). In the safety arm 92.2% of women were hr-HPV negative, with the highest rate of hr-HPV positivity found in 25-29 year old women (23.5%). Similar results were obtained in the intervention arm HPV FOCAL is the first randomized trial in North America to examine hr-HPV testing as the primary screen for cervical cancer within a population-based cervical cancer screening program.International Standard Randomised Controlled Trial Number Register, ISRCTN79347302.Human papillomavirus genotypes in asymptomatic young women from public schools in Rio de Janeiro, Brazil.The aim of this work was to survey HPV information from a random population of young women from Rio de Janeiro, Brazil.This cross-sectional study included cervical samples from 241 female students. To determine human papillomavirus status, polymerase chain reaction amplification was performed. HPV typing was determined by restriction fragment length polymorphism analysis. Demographic data, life style, sexual and gynecological history were obtained through use of a structured questionnaire.The average age of the women was 19.6 years-old (SD=3.4 years). HPV prevalence was 27.4%. Nineteen different HPV genotypes were detected, including 13 high risk types. HPV 16 was the most prevalent type (6.2%), followed by 31 (4.1 %) and 66 (3.7%). Most of the oncogenic types belonged to the A9 species (28/48). The frequency of women infected by at least one oncogenic type was significantly higher than those only infected by low risk types (18.7% versus 7.5%). Cervical changes were detected in 12.5% of the sample and were significantly linked to infection with HPV types of the A9 species. Demographic variables, sexual initiation, or number of sexual partners were not associated with HPV prevalence, variety of HPV genotypes or oncogenic types.The relative frequency of HPV genotypes other than vaccine types in young females should be taken into account when evaluating vaccination strategies. Due to the high prevalence of HPV infection among the population studied, implementation of sex education in schools, promotion of condom use and an organized screening program to prevent cervical cancer must be encouraged for this age group.Comparison of HPV genotyping by type-specific PCR and sequencing.Human papillomavirus (HPV) infection is the most common sexually transmitted disease worldwide and there is a strong link between certain high-risk viral types and cervical carcinogenesis. Although there are several typing methods, it is still unclear which test is the best. This study compared the effectiveness of type-specific PCR (TS-PCR) and sequencing, with a focus on their clinical application. A total of 260 cervical samples from HPV-positive patients were tested for types 6, 11, 16, 18, 31, 33 and 35 using TS-PCR and sequencing. The genotype was identified in 36% of cases by TS-PCR and in 75% by sequencing. Sequencing was four times more likely to identify the viral type in positive samples than TS-PCR (p = 0.00). Despite being more effective for virus genotyping, sequencing was unable to identify viral types in multiple infections. Combining both techniques resulted in highly sensitive detection (87% of cases), showing that they are complementary methods. HPV genotyping is an important step in HPV management, helping to identify patients with a higher risk of developing cervical cancer and contributing to the development of type-specific vaccines.Triage of women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US): results of an Italian multicentric study.To compare the performance of immediate colposcopy, repeat Pap test and HPV test as triage options for women diagnosed as having atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US) while attending organised screening for cervical carcinoma in five centres of the Veneto region.Women consecutively diagnosed as having ASC-US were included in a prospective study, and underwent colposcopy and collection of cervico-vaginal cells for conventional Pap test and HPV test (Hybrid Capture 2, High-risk probe set, Digene). Repetition of all three tests was scheduled for 12 months later. DNA was subsequently extracted from residual cells of positive samples, and analysed by polymerase chain reaction with several primers for typing of HPV sequences. Sensitivity, specificity and positive predictive value (PPV) of the different triage options for histology-confirmed cervical intraepithelial neoplasia, grade 2 or worse (CIN2+) were calculated among all women and by age (under and above 35 years).Seven hundred forty-nine women 25-64 years old (median age 42 years) were enrolled in the study. Pap smears at enrolment were read as ASC-US or more severe in 211 (29.4%) cases, colposcopy disclosed an atypical transformation zone in 254 (34.2%) women, and HPV test was positive in 181 (24.2%). High-grade cervical lesions developed in 29/749 (3.9%) women. HPV typing was possible in 163 (90%) of the samples, and carcinogenic types were present in 123.HPV test showed the best performance; overall, it had the highest sensitivity (92.3%), specificity (78.6%) and PPV (14.9%).[The significance of HPV-DNA genotyping assays in the ASC].To disscuss different outcomes of ASC-UC and ASC-H, two subtypes of ASC, and the significance of HPV-DNA genotyping assays in these two subtypes.We reviewed and analyzed colposcopic and biopsy results of 1256 cases of ASC between Jan. 2005 to Dec. 2007, of which 580 cases have results of HPV-DNA genotyping assays.In 1256 ASC cases, ASC-US and ASC-H cases account for 90.1% and 9.9% respectively, CIN2 and higher levels diagnosed via colposcopy and cervical biopsy are 8.5% and 24.2% respectively (P = 0.000). In ASC-US cases, the infection rate of HPV-DNA high risk types is 67.2%, there is statistic significance among different HPV-DNA results and biopsy pathology (P = 0.000). In ASC-H cases, the infection rate of HPV-DNA high risk types is 47.3%, there is no statistic significance among them (P = 0.054).The clinical outcomes of ASC-US and ASC-H are different, we should distinguish and treat. HPV-DNA genotyping assay is available in ASC-US triage, but Colposcopy is proposed for all ASC-H patients.P634A4 and TAp73 immunocytochemistry in liquid-based cervical cytology--potential biomarkers for diagnosis and progress prediction of cervical neoplasia.P63 and p73 are two homologues of the important tumor suppressor gene p53. In this study, we investigated p63 and p73 expression by immunocytochemistry using antibodies for TAp73 and p634A4 isoforms in 91 high-grade and 107 low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions, 212 atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance, 9 squamous cell carcinomas and 63 normal samples from an Asian screening population together with 47 hospital samples of carcinomas. There was significant correlation between the TAp73 and p634A4 indices (P<0.0001). Significantly, higher TAp73 and p634A4 indices were found in high-grade lesions or carcinoma when compared with atypical squamous cells and low-grade lesions (P<0.0001). Among atypical squamous cells, p634A4 indices of cases that subsequently progressed to low-grade (P=0.031) or high-grade lesions (P=0.006) were significantly higher than those that did not. For atypical squamous cells positive for high-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) as detected by Digene (61%), cases with high p634A4 index were still more likely to have subsequent high-grade lesions detected (P=0.016). Among low-grade lesions, significantly higher TAp73 (P=0.038) was found in cases that subsequently progressed to high-grade lesions. There was significant correlation between presence of high-risk HPV and p634A4 index (P=0.01). In summary, p63 and p73 immunocytochemistry are potential good markers for detection of carcinoma and high-grade lesions in cervical cytology samples and for triage management of women with atypical squamous cells and low-grade lesions.Diagnostic value of p16INK4A, Ki-67, and human papillomavirus L1 capsid protein immunochemical staining on cell blocks from residual liquid-based gynecologic cytology specimens.This study was conducted to evaluate the reliability and role of cell block preparations in the diagnosis of neoplastic and preneoplastic lesions of the cervix and to improve the value of cell block preparations in diagnosing and predicting the prognosis of cervical lesions through immunostaining of p16INK4A (p16), Ki-67, and human papillomavirus (HPV) L1 capsid protein (HPV L1).In total, 138 specimens were diagnosed on liquid-based cytology (LBC) and cell block preparations, and 63 specimens were subjected subsequently to tissue follow-up and immunostaining for p16, Ki-67, and HPV L1 on cell block sections.In 42 specimens that were diagnosed as low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion, high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HSIL), and squamous cell carcinoma (SCC) on cell blocks, 38 specimens (90.5%) were confirmed by histopathologic reports, and there was slightly better than 81.6% agreement between LBC and tissue follow-up. Immunointensity and cells that were positive for p16 were enhanced according to increased pathologic grade and differed statistically between cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 1 (CIN-1) and CIN-2/CIN-3 as well as SCC. The positive rates of HPV L1 decreased gradually according to the severity of cervical neoplasia, and HPV L1/p16 expression patterns were related to the severity of cervical lesions.The cell block preparation technique was complementary to LBC, and the authors concluded that the application of LBC combined with cell block preparations may improve the diagnostic accuracy of cytology. Immunostaining for p16 and Ki-67 on cell block preparations can help to improve the diagnostic accuracy of HSIL and SCC. A combined expression pattern of p16 and HPV L1 may serve as a valuable index for predicting prognosis and follow-up of cervical dysplastic lesions.Association of polymorphism in FcGR3A gene and progression of low-grade precursor lesions of cervical carcinoma.Polymorphisms in receptors of the constant part of antibodies (FcR) have been associated with susceptibility to disease and viral infections but have not been studied in cervical carcinogenesis. The distribution of the polymorphism V158F (rs396991) in FcGR3A in cervical smears was detected in a group of 84 women with stable or regressed low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (group I) and a group of 54 women with high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (HSIL) (group II). Human papillomavirus (HPV) genotyping was also performed. In 27.4% of women from group I, FF genotype was found, whereas this genotype was observed in 51.9% of patients in group II (p = 0.003; odds ratio = 2.856 (95% confidence interval = 1.4-5.8)). When only women infected with high-risk HPV were analyzed these differences were found to be even higher (p = 0.0013; odds ratio = 3.8 (95% confidence interval = 1.7-8.8)). FF genotype in FcGR3A gene seems to be associated with increased risk of low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions to HSIL progression suggesting that its presence may play a role in HPV tolerance, persistent infection, and HSIL development.Impact of improved classification on the association of human papillomavirus with cervical precancer.Misclassification of exposure and surrogate endpoints of disease can obscure causal relations. Using data from the Atypical Squamous Cells of Undetermined Significance/Low-Grade Squamous Intraepithelial Lesion Triage Study (ALTS, 1997-2001), the authors explored the impact of exposure (human papillomavirus (HPV) detection) and endpoint (histologic cervical precancer) classification on their mutual association. Women referred into this study with an atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance Papanicolaou test with satisfactory results for all 4 HPV tests were included in this analysis (n = 3,215; 92.2%). HPV testing results were related to different definitions of cervical precancer, based on paired, worst 2-year histologic diagnoses, by calculating clinical sensitivity, specificity, and odds ratios. The authors found that HPV test sensitivity increased and specificity decreased with increasing certainty of cervical precancer, with HPV testing having the highest sensitivity (92%-98%) and lowest specificity (46%-54%) for consensus cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 3 (CIN 3). The overall accuracy of each HPV test, as measured by odds ratios, was greatest for consensus CIN-3 diagnoses, from 2- to 4-fold greater than for a less stringent precancer definition of any diagnosis of CIN 2 or more severe. In summary, there was convergence of greater certainty of carcinogenic HPV with greater certainty of a precancerous diagnosis, such that all 4 HPV tests almost always tested positive in women most likely to have cervical precancer. Finding increasingly strong associations when both test and diagnostic misclassification are reduced is a useful sign of "true association" in molecular epidemiology.Optimal threshold for a positive hybrid capture 2 test for detection of human papillomavirus: data from the ARTISTIC trial.We present data on the use of the Hybrid Capture 2 (HC2) test for the detection of high-risk human papillomavirus (HR HPV) with different thresholds for positivity within a primary screening setting and as a method of triage for low-grade cytology. In the ARTISTIC population-based trial, 18,386 women were screened by cytology and for HPV. Cervical intraepithelial neoplasia lesions of grade two and higher (CIN2+ lesions) were identified for 453 women within 30 months of an abnormal baseline sample. When a relative light unit/cutoff (RLU/Co) ratio of > or = 1 was used as the threshold for considering an HC2 result positive, 15.6% of results were positive, and the proportion of CIN2+ lesions in this group was 14.7%. The relative sensitivity for CIN2+ lesion detection was 93.4%. When an RLU/Co ratio of > or = 2 was used as the threshold, there was a 2.5% reduction in positivity, with an increase in the proportion of CIN2+ lesions detected. The relative sensitivity decreased slightly, to 90.3%. Among women with low-grade cytology, HPV prevalences were 43.7% and 40.3% at RLU/Co ratios of > or = 1 and > or = 2, respectively. The proportions of CIN2+ lesions detected were 17.3% and 18.0%, with relative sensitivities of 87.7% at an RLU/Co ratio of > or = 1 and 84.2% at an RLU/Co ratio of > or = 2. At an RLU/Co ratio of > or = 1, 68.3% of HC2-positive results were confirmed by the Roche line blot assay, compared to 77.2% of those at an RLU/Co ratio of > or = 2. Fewer HC2-positive results were confirmed for 35- to 64-year-olds (50.3% at an RLU/Co ratio of > or = 1 and 63.2% at an RLU/Co ratio of > 2) than for 20- to 34-year-olds (78.7% at an RLU/Co ratio of > or = 1 and 83.7% at an RLU/Co ratio of > 2). If the HC2 test is used for routine screening as an initial test or as a method of triage for low-grade cytology, we would suggest increasing the threshold for positivity from the RLU/Co ratio of > or = 1, recommended by the manufacturer, to an RLU/Co ratio of > or = 2, since this study has shown that a beneficial balance between relative sensitivity and the proportion of CIN2+ lesions detected is achieved at this threshold.Papillary squamous intraepithelial lesions of the uterine cervix: human papillomavirus-dependent changes in cell cycle expression and cytologic features.Most human papillomavirus-associated squamous intraepithelial lesions of the uterine cervix are flat; some have papillary architecture that shows a spectrum of differentiation from low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions to high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions. For this subset of lesions, there are few data relating human papillomavirus type to cytology and cell cycle activity. Here, we collected 24 cases of papillary squamous intraepithelial lesions with either low-risk (15 cases) or high-risk (9 cases) human papillomavirus infection. We described their morphology and performed immunohistochemical staining with cell cycle-related markers Ki-67, p53, pRb, and P16INK4a. The Ki-67 labeling index was significantly lower in the low-risk group than in the high-risk group (P < .001). A cut point of less than 50% labeling index detected all but one low-risk group case. Degradation of p53 and pRb was less evident in the low-risk group than in the high-risk group (p53, P < .001; pRb, P = .006). P16INK4a produced an unexpectedly high positive rate of staining in the low-risk group (60%). However, a specific top-heavy distribution pattern was noted, with evident nuclear but faint cytoplasmic staining, whereas the high-risk group showed strong full-thickness nuclear and cytoplasmic staining. The detection of these lesions by smear examination was not reliable, given the wide expression pattern. Papillary structure was evident in none. We conclude that cell cycle-related markers are helpful in distinguishing low- and high-risk lesions. The strong p16INK4a staining in the low-risk group may imply that more cell cycle-controlling pressure is elicited in papillary lesions than in flat lesions. The distribution pattern of p16INK4a staining is important when making a diagnosis; cytology is not effective. Human papillomavirus type, histology, and cell cycle markers could clearly separate these lesions into either a low-risk or a high-risk group, properly designated low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions or high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions in current management algorithms. Thus, the previously used terms papillary immature metaplasia and immature condyloma, although descriptive for low-risk group lesions, are confusing and should be discarded.Co-expression of p53 and Bcl-2 proteins in human papillomavirus-induced premalignant lesions of the uterine cervix: correlation with progression to malignancy.To analyze aberrant expression of the apoptotic protein p53 and the anti-apoptotic protein Bcl-2 in premalignant lesions of the uterine cervix induced by human papillomavirus (HPV) infection and its significance for early diagnosis of cervical cancer.Cytological adequate smears (n = 382) from various grades of squamous intraepithelial lesions (SILs; n = 142), 'atypical squamous cells of unknown significance' (ASCUS; n = 128) and normal tissue (n = 112) were investigated immunocytochemically for aberrant expression of p53 and Bcl-2 proteins using the streptavidin-biotin-peroxidase method; HPV status was analyzed in cervical smears using general and type-specific primers.HPV-DNA of any type was detected in 25.7% (98/382) of cases. HPV16 was seen in 58.2% (57/98), HPV18 in 20.4% (20/98) and other HPV types in 21.4% (21/98). Abnormal nuclear expression of p53 protein and cytoplasmic expression of Bcl-2 protein were noted in cervical dysplasia and an association with the presence of HPV16/HPV18 was noted. The intensity of immunoreactivity for p53 and Bcl-2 proteins varied between different cytological grades of cervical smears. Follow-up data revealed that cases with high-risk HPV and co-induced expression of apoptosis-regulatory proteins presented a trend to progressive disease.The detection of both p53 and Bcl-2 proteins in cervical smears can be used as independent diagnostic marker for early-stage HPV-associated cervical cancer.HPV vaccine protein L1 predicts disease outcome of high-risk HPV+ early squamous dysplastic lesions.Prediction of the clinical outcome of nonadvanced, early dysplastic lesions is one of the unresolved problems of cervical cancer screening programs. We examined the influence of human papillomavirus (HPV) L1 capsid protein detection in a randomized, prospective study of 187 high-risk HPV+ early dysplastic lesions during 36 to 46 months. The difference in the clinical outcome of the HPV L1- cases and the HPV L1+ cases was highly statistically significant (P < .0001) and independent of the classification of low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (mild dysplasia) and high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion of the moderate dysplastic type. L1+ mild and moderate dysplasias, reflecting productive HPV infection, showed low malignant potential, justifying a wait-and-watch strategy to prevent overtreatment, especially in young women. L1- early dysplastic lesions, as nonproductive infections or precancerous lesions, have a high malignancy potential and close follow-up with colposcopy and histologic evaluation should be advised.Women >or=30 years of age with low grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL) have low positivity rates when cotested for high-risk human papillomavirus: should we reconsider HPV triage for LSIL in older women?High-risk human papillomavirus (HR-HPV) testing for colposcopy triage of low grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL) is not recommended because of high positive rates in young women. It remains unclear whether HR-HPV testing may be useful for triage of older women. We compiled HR-HPV data for women aged >or=30 years with LSIL for the period March 1, 2006 to February 28, 2008. Follow-up cervical biopsy information was collected for the period March 1, 2006 to August 15, 2008. We used the Hybrid Capture II test performed on residual material from liquid-based Pap tests. Of 735 women, 254 had HR-HPV testing, and of these 144 had positive HR-HPV results. Among women with positive HR-HPV results 79 underwent biopsy (54.9%) and 11 had cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) 2 or 3 (13.9% of women with biopsy follow-up). A total of 481 women did not undergo HR-HPV testing, of whom 192 underwent biopsy (39.9%) and 11 had CIN 2 or 3 (5.7% of biopsied women [P = 0.04]). Among women who tested negative for HR-HPV and had follow-up biopsies, only one had a high grade lesion found (CIN 2). The overall HR-HPV positive rate in tested women >or=30 years old with LSIL was 56.7% if women who had reflex HR-HPV testing for ASC-US are included. The HR-HPV positive rate in residual material from Pap tests interpreted as LSIL was 63.8%. Among women >or=30 years of age with LSIL, CIN 2-3 is significantly more likely in HR-HPV positive women. Relatively few older women with LSIL test positive for HR-HPV. Colposcopy triage using HR-HPV may be justified in this population.Living with uncertainty: equivocal Pap test results and the evolution of ASC terminology.Communication of equivocal findings and their significance has been a significant challenge related to Pap testing throughout its history. Terminology to report these findings has changed considerably to accommodate the changes in understanding of cervical neoplasia, and to accommodate new management strategies, tests, and technologies. This article reviews the evolution of terminology for equivocal Pap test findings from the original Papanicolaou classification to the current the Bethesda System 2001 atypical squamous cells terminology, the implication and use of these terms, and the changing landscape of cervical neoplasia screening, which prompted these terminology changes. Emerging issues related to improving risk stratification through the introduction of additional terms and the impact of human papillomavirus testing may alter terminology of equivocal findings in the future.Clinical performance of human papillomavirus E6 and E7 mRNA testing for high-grade lesions of the cervix.Infection with high-risk (HR) human papillomavirus (HPV) is the major cause of cervical cancer. However, relatively few infections progress to malignant disease. Progression to malignancy requires the overexpression of the E6 and E7 genes in the integrated HPV genome. It follows that the E6 and E7 transcripts could be useful markers of disease progression. The study presented here tests this possibility, using data from colposcopy and from cytological and histological tests to compare RNA assays for the E6 and E7 genes with DNA testing. A total of 180 women underwent colposcopy, cytology, and biopsy of suspected lesions (143 cases). Cervical brush specimens were analyzed for HPV DNA and for E6 and E7 mRNA. DNA from HR HPV was found in 57.8% of the specimens; E6 and E7 transcripts were found in 45%. The rates of detection of HPV DNA and of E6 and E7 transcripts were 33.3% and 25%, respectively, for specimens with normal findings; 51.4% and 31.9%, respectively, for specimens with cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 1 (CIN1); and 61.1% and 44.2% for specimens with CIN2, respectively. All specimens with CIN3 and 95.5% of specimens from patients with squamous cell carcinoma were positive by both assays. Thirty-seven patients with normal colposcopy findings did not undergo biopsy. HPV DNA and mRNA transcripts were found in 32.4% and 18.9% of these cases, respectively. Comparisons with cytological tests produced similar results. Overall, the mRNA tests showed a higher specificity than the DNA tests for high-grade lesions (72.7% and 56.2%, respectively) and a higher positive predictive value (59.3% and 49.0%, respectively). These findings suggest that mRNA assays could be more powerful than DNA testing for predicting the risk of progression and offer a strong potential as a tool for triage and patient follow-up.Does the ThinPrep Imaging System increase the detection of high-risk HPV-positive ASC-US and AGUS? The Women and Infants Hospital experience with over 200,000 cervical cytology cases.Published reports have demonstrated that introduction of the ThinPrep Imaging System (Imager) to the cytology screening services has increased the detection rate of high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (HSILs). In accordance with recent clinical treatment guidelines, patients with atypical squamous or glandular cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US or AGUS) are often tested for high-risk HPV infection using the Hybrid Capture HPV DNA test. We took the opportunity to investigate whether the Imager had resulted in any significant differences in our diagnostic categories, as well as whether the Imager increased the detection of high-risk HPV-DNA-positive (HRHPV+) ASC-US or AGUS.Cytology cases with the diagnosis of ASC-US and AGUS were retrieved from the archival files of our institution during periods of 11 months prior to and 11 months after the introduction of the Imager. The total number of cases in each category was correlated with results of reflex high-risk HPV DNA testing when the latter were available. All AGUS diagnoses were correlated with subsequent biopsy follow-up. Statistical analyses were performed using the chi-Square test with Yate's Correction and Fisher's Exact test.A total of 108,371 and 104,555 of ThinPrep Pap Test (TPPT) cases were reviewed during 11 months pre- and post-imager introduction. The ASC-US rate was 5.4% in the pre-Imager and 5.3% in the post-Imager period. The HPV reflex test was 38% and 34% positive respectively in the pre- and post-Imager period (P>0.124). Similarly, 0.14% and 0.12% AGUS were found in the pre- and post-Imager period. The positive HPV reflex test was 14% versus 23% (P = 0.1690). The abnormal biopsy follow-up rate in the AGUS category was increased from 20.9% in the pre-Imager period to 31% in the post-Imager period (P = 0.1471). The ASCUS/SIL ratios were 1.9 and 1.6 respectively.The ASC-US and AGUS rates did not change statistically before and after the introduction of the Imager in our cytology laboratory. Although use of the Imager did not increase detection of HPV+ ASC-US, it did appear to increase the detection rate of HPV+ AGUS and subsequent abnormal biopsy follow-up rates in all categories. However, the increase in the detection rate did not reach the point of statistical significance.Comparison of the clinical significance of the Papanicolaou test interpretations LSIL cannot rule out HSIL and ASC-H.Despite the two-tiered classification of dysplasia in The Bethesda System (TBS), rare cases fall into the category squamous intraepithelial lesion (SIL) of indeterminate grade. These Pap tests are often interpreted as "LSIL/ASC-H" or "LSIL" with a comment indicating the presence of cells with features approaching HSIL. Patients with LSIL/ASC-H have a significant risk of CIN 2 or worse (29-61.5%) on follow-up cervical biopsies, similar to the risk of CIN 2 or worse in patients with ASC-H Pap tests (24-68%). The purpose of this study was to compare patients with ASC-H and LSIL/ASC-H Pap tests. Women with LSIL/ASC-H had a slightly lower incidence of CIN 2 or worse (PPV = 35.6%, 95% CI: 29.8-41.4%) on follow-up cervical biopsy than the control ASC-H group (PPV = 40.2%, 95% CI: 31.9-56.3%); this difference was not statistically significant. The difference in the distribution of the biopsy results between the two groups was statistically significant (P < 0.001). The current guidelines for the management of cervical cytologic abnormalities from the American Society for Colposcopy and Cervical Pathology (ASCCP) advocate similar treatment algorithms for both LSIL and ASC-H. The main difference is the option of cytologic follow-up or HPV testing for certain "special populations," as an alternative to colposcopy, for LSIL Pap test results. Based on our results, we recommend (1)LSIL/ASC-H to be added to TBS classification and (2) Pap test cases of LSIL/ASC-H may need to be clinically followed in a manner similar to ASC-H, i.e., colposcopy for all patients.Human papillomavirus typing and viral gene expression analysis for the triage of women with abnormal results from papanicolaou test smears to colposcopy.A cascade of molecular tests for human papillomavirus (HPV), as a follow-up to Papanicolaou test screening, could eliminate unnecessary colposcopy. Tests based on detection of HPV E6 messenger RNA (mRNA) are already being used as screening tools, but there is a good biological rationale for expecting that an increase in the relative amounts of HPV E6 mRNA in cervical samples may better predict cancerous transformation.To compare some of the available diagnostic methods and our novel method of relative quantification (RQ) of HPV gene expression for the effective triage of women with abnormal results from Papanicolaou tests to colposcopy.Sensitivities, specificities, and likelihood ratios were calculated for repeat Papanicolaou test smears, HPV DNA polymerase chain reactions, HPV genotyping, HPV-16 E6 mRNA detection, and the RQ of HPV-16 E6 mRNA calibrated to cellular RNA and DNA levels and standardized to viral load.Human papillomavirus genotype in combination with a repeat Papanicolaou test can be used to categorize most women (96%) with cervical intraepithelial neoplasia of grade 2 or higher for colposcopy while eliminating 44% of women with cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 1 or less. The presence of HPV-16 E6 mRNA (P < .001) and RQ of HPV-16 E6 mRNA (P < .001) displayed significant median differences among the various grades of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia. Further testing of women who are positive for HPV-16 demonstrated that the RQ of E6 mRNA has diagnostic potential when combined with Papanicolaou testing in populations with higher disease prevalence.The RQ of HPV E6 mRNA and HPV genotype could be useful in a cascade of diagnostic testing designed to refer women with findings of cervical abnormalities for colposcopy or treatment while reducing triage numbers.The use of p16(INK4A) immunocytochemistry in "Atypical squamous cells which cannot exclude HSIL" compared with "Atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance" in liquid-based cervical smears.Even though p16(INK4a) (p16) immunocytochemistry has proven a useful accessory tool verifying the identification of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US) categorized smears, the procedure still has limitations. To date few studies examining the usefulness of p16 immunocytochemistry in atypical squamous cells which cannot exclude HSIL (ASC-H), compared with ASC-US in liquid-based cervical smears. Therefore, we examined the correlation of p16 immunocytochemical staining with follow-up biopsy results on ASC-H categorized smears and compared the data with those classified as ASC-US on 105 liquid-based cytology samples. We found no statistical significance in the p16 expression of ASC-US smears and the presence of squamous intraepithelial lesions (SIL) in follow-up biopsies (p = 0.546). However, p16 expression did significantly correlate with the presence of SIL (p = 0.002) in ASC-H smears. There was a statistically significant relationship between p16 expression and presence of high grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (HSIL) or more on the follow-up biopsies in both ASC-US (p = 0.012) and ASC-H (p < 0.001) categorized smears. In ASC-US categorized smears, there was no statistical significance between p16 expression and the HR-HPV viral load (p = 0.091). But there was a statistical significance between p16 expression and the HR-HPV viral load (p < 0.001) in ASC-H categorized smears. Our results indicate that p16 immunostaining is a much better useful marker for HR-HPV infection and detection of SIL in ASC-H categorized smears compared to those defined as ASC-US.Follow-up findings for women with human papillomavirus-positive and atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance screening test results in a large women's hospital practice.Reflex human papillomavirus (HPV) testing has been designated in consensus guidelines as "preferred" for women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US) liquid-based cytology (LBC) results, and colposcopy is currently recommended for patients with HPV-positive ASC-US results. Data from large clinical practices using newer screening methods and current cytology terminology are limited.We analyzed data from patients with ASC-US LBC and positive HPV test results. We also assessed the impact of the presence or absence of an endocervical cell/ transformation zone sample (EC/TZS) on biopsy diagnoses.The information system of a large women's hospital serving an older-than-average population was searched over a 21-month period between July 1, 2005, and March 31, 2007, for HPV-positive cases interpreted as ASC-US (Bethesda System 2001) using computer-imaged LBC. Histologic diagnoses, patient ages, and presence or absence of an EC/TZS were analyzed. The average follow-up period was 7.5 months.Among 4273 women with HPV-positive ASC-US results, the cumulative cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 2 or 3 (CIN 2/3) and CIN 1 rates for 2192 women with available biopsies were 5.1% and 43.6%, respectively. Cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 2/3 and CIN 1 rates for women with HPV-positive ASC-US results were not significantly different for women with and without an EC/TZS.The risk of CIN 2/3 in the study population was significantly lower than reported in widely cited trial data. Neither presence nor absence of an EC/TZS, nor the age of the patient, had a statistically significant impact on the likelihood of biopsy diagnoses of CIN 2/3 and CIN 1 for patients with HPV-positive ASC-US test results.Image-guided ThinPrep Papanicolaou tests and cotesting with high-risk human papillomavirus in women aged 30 years and older in a low-risk private practice population.Screening for cervical cancer precursors has evolved considerably with the introduction of new technologies to improve the early detection of disease. The objective of this study was to analyze the accuracy and effectiveness of combined screening with cytology and high-risk human papillomavirus (HR-HPV) testing in a low-risk population of women aged >or=30 years.Consecutive unselected samples from a group of 1871 women aged >or=30 years were screened with image-guided ThinPrep tests and HR-HPV tests during a 6-month period. Histologic follow-up was reviewed among women with positive HR-HPV tests.A total of 85 (4.5%) women had positive HR-HPV tests. In 48 HR-HPV-positive women with follow-up biopsies, 41 (85%) were found to have histologic abnormalities. Thirty-three (1.9%) women with cytologically normal Papanicolaou (Pap) tests harbored HR-HPV, and a cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) 2+ lesion was detected in 1 (16%) of 6 women with histologic follow-up. Conversely, 2 (28%) of 7 women with high-grade intraepithelial lesion on cytology tested negative for HR-HPV during the same period. A case of serous carcinoma with atypical glandular cells on cytology was also negative for HR-HPV, as expected.In this low-risk population of women aged >or=30 years, histology-confirmed CIN2+ lesions were identified in women with negative cytology and positive HR-HPV tests, as well as in those with positive cytology and negative HR-HPV tests. Because both cytology and HPV testing alone missed significant lesions, cotesting with Pap and HR-HPV in women aged >or=30 years appears to be a reasonable option in a low-risk population.Hybrid capture 2 human papillomavirus DNA testing for women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance Papanicolaou results in SurePath and ThinPrep specimens.Human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA testing using Hybrid Capture 2 assay with ThinPrep Papanicolaou (Pap) collection is the only US Food and Drug Administration-approved method for the triage of women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS). Although SurePath Pap collection has been used for Hybrid Capture 2 HPV DNA testing, clinical validation of this method has been scarce.From a cervical cancer-screening program in Mississippi, we analyzed data from screenings of 8380 women with ASCUS Pap results who underwent reflex Hybrid Capture 2 HPV DNA tests during a course of 4 years. Of these, 4145 were screened with the ThinPrep collection system, and 4235 were screened with SurePath. Results of follow-up biopsies within 3 months of Pap tests were available for the ThinPrep group (229 cases) and the SurePath group (455 cases). Hybrid Capture 2 positive rates and the follow-up biopsy results from both groups were compared.Hybrid Capture 2 detected high-risk HPV DNA in 68.8% of ThinPrep and 66.7% of SurePath-collected specimens (P = .37). Detection rates for CIN2+ and CIN3+ were also comparable between ThinPrep (21.4%, 3.1%) and SurePath (15.4%, 4.2%) using Hybrid Capture 2 (P = .06, P = .45). In ThinPrep-collected specimens, 4.4% were quantitatively insufficient for Hybrid Capture 2 testing. Significantly more equivocal Hybrid Capture 2 results were observed in SurePath (11.4%) than in ThinPrep specimens (3.2%). However, 67.4% of women with equivocal Hybrid Capture 2 results had negative 1-year Pap cytology follow-up in the SurePath group.Hybrid Capture 2 positive rates and CIN2-3 detection rates were comparable for the SurePath and ThinPrep Pap collection systems, thus supporting the use of SurePath for Hybrid Capture 2 testing.Human papillomavirus testing for cervical cancer screening: results from a 6-year prospective study in rural China.Long-term follow-up evaluations of cervical screening approaches are limited in low-resource areas. This prospective study assessed the risk of future cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 2 or worse (CIN2+) associated with baseline human papillomavirus (HPV) and cytologic status. In rural China, 1,997 women were screened with 6 screening tests, including colposcopic evaluations, and underwent biopsies in 1999. In December 2005, 1,612 women with cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 1 or less at baseline were rescreened by visual inspection, liquid-based cytology, and HPV-DNA testing. All women underwent colposcopy at follow-up, with biopsies taken from women with visually apparent lesions or cytologic abnormalities. Twenty women developed incident CIN2+. The crude relative risk of CIN2+ for baseline HPV-positive women was 52 (95% confidence interval: 12.1, 222.5). The crude relative risk of CIN2+ was 167 (95% confidence interval: 21.9, 1,265) for baseline and follow-up repeatedly HPV-positive women compared with repeatedly HPV-negative women. Among 1,374 baseline HPV-negative women, 2 and no incident CIN2+ cases were detected in baseline cytologically normal and abnormal subgroups, respectively. Among 238 baseline HPV-positive women, 6 of 18 incident cases of CIN2+ developed in the cytologically normal group. This study demonstrates that a single oncogenic HPV-DNA test is more effective than cytology in predicting future CIN2+ status.Value of high-risk HPV-DNA testing in the triage of ASCUS.OBJECTIVE. Atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) cells, occurring in organized cytological screening, may be either high-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) positive or negative. To refine the assessment of women with ASCUS, a high-risk HPV-DNA test is recommended as triage in Sweden.A total of 197 consecutive women (mean age 39 years, range 21-60) with a diagnosis of ASCUS from the primary screening were selected for triage. Their cervical smears were collected and evaluated by using conventional cytological examination in combination with a high-risk HPV-DNA test (hybrid capture 2). The women were categorized into four groups: Group A, Cytology + /HPV + ; Group B, Cytology-/HPV + ; Group C, Cytology + /HPV-; and Group D, Cytology-/ HPV-. Women within Groups A-C were admitted for colposcopy and cervical biopsy. The women in Group D were considered as a low-risk group for tumor development, and were re-examined after three years in the next round of the organized screening.In women in Group A (n=58) the prevalence of histological verified CIN2-3 was 41%, in Group B (n=41) 20%, and in Group C (n=9) 0%. In Group D (n=89), repeated primary screening three years later revealed CIN2-3 in two biopsies from 74 women studied (<3%). The prevalence of a high-risk HPV infection decreased with age in women with ASCUS. It was 74% in women <30 years and 19% in women > or =50 years.Adding a high-risk HPV test in secondary screening increased the identification of women with CIN2-3 lesions by 33% in comparison with repeat cytology (p=0.01). The clinical significance of the ASCUS diagnosis varied with age of the women.Value of p16(INK4a) as a marker of progression/regression in cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 1.The objective of this study was to evaluate the usefulness of p16(INK4a) staining to classify cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 1 according to its progression/regression risk.Patients with a histologic diagnosis of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 1 were prospectively recruited (n = 138). Simultaneous detection of high-risk human papillomaviruses and p16(INK4a) evaluation were performed. Follow-up was conducted every 6 months by cytology and colposcopy and annually by high-risk human papillomavirus testing, for at least 12 months (mean, 29.0). Progression was defined as a histologic diagnosis of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grades 2-3, regression as a negative cytology and high-risk human papillomaviruses, and persistence as a cytologic result of low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions and/or a positive test for high-risk human papillomaviruses.Progression was observed in 14 women (10.1%), 66 (47.6%) regressed, and 58 (42.0%) had a persistent disease. p16(INK4a) was positive in 77 (55.8%) initial biopsy specimens. Progression to cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grades 2-3 was identified in 14 of 77 (18.2%) women with positive and none of 61 (0.00%) women with negative p16(INK4a) immunostaining (P < .001).p16(INK4a) negative cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 1 lesions rarely progress and may benefit from a less intensive follow-up.The clinical performance of Invader technology and SurePath when detecting the presence of high-risk HPV cervical infection.Testing for high-risk genotypes of the human papillomavirus (HR HPV) has been fully integrated into the management algorithms for the prevention of cervical cancer. The literature is limited with regard to the evaluation of the clinical performance of laboratory-developed tests (LDT) utilizing Invader V2.0 assay (ThirdWave/Hologic, Madison, WI, USA) for the detection of HR HPV.To evaluate the clinical performance of Invader V2.0 LDT by determining its sensitivity, negative predictive value (NPV), specificity and positive predictive value (PPV).This study evaluated Invader V2.0 assay results from 12,490 SurePath Pap specimens and 1,931 cervical biopsies in order to assess the clinical performance of the Invader V2.0 assay. The cervical biopsy results were correlated with Invader V2.0 results to determine clinical sensitivity, NPV, clinical specificity, and PPV.The clinical sensitivity and NPV of Invader V2.0 LDT for cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 3 (CIN 3) or higher were 97.4% and 99.1% respectively. The clinical specificity and PPV for CIN 3 were 10.3% and 3.7% respectively.The results support the use of the Invader V2.0 in identifying patients who are at low risk for CIN 3 or higher. The power of the assay implies that it could be used as a primary screening tool for prevention of cervical cancer if a paradigm shift in cervical screening ever occurs.Clinical performance of the APTIMA HPV Assay for the detection of high-risk HPV and high-grade cervical lesions.Human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA testing is widely used in conjunction with Papanicolaou (Pap) testing in cervical cancer screening programs to improve the detection of high-grade lesions. While HPV DNA test sensitivity is good, an improvement in specificity is desired. Detection of HPV mRNA may improve specificity. The APTIMA HPV Assay detects the mRNA of 14 high-risk HPV types in liquid-based cytology specimens.To evaluate APTIMA HPV Assay performance for detection of high-risk HPV and high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) compared to Qiagen's Hybrid Capture 2 HPV DNA (HC2) test.Liquid Pap specimens were collected from 800 women referred to colposcopy and tested with the APTIMA HPV Assay and the HC2 test. Complete results were available for 753 subjects. A subset of samples (n = 393) were typed using Roche's Linear Array HPV Genotyping Test.Sensitivity and specificity for detection of high-risk HPV were >92% and 99% for the APTIMA HPV Assay and 93% and 82% for the HC2 test. Clinical sensitivity and specificity were 91% and >55% for detection of CIN 2+, and 98% and 53% for detection of CIN 3+ for the APTIMA HPV Assay; values for the HC2 test were 95% and 47% for CIN 2+, and 99% and 44% for CIN 3+.The APTIMA HPV Assay is sensitive and very specific for detection of high-risk HPV. The APTIMA HPV Assay had similar clinical sensitivity for disease detection but higher clinical specificity than the HC2 test, which may improve patient management and reduce the cost of care.High-risk HPV detection and concurrent HPV 16 and 18 typing with Abbott RealTime High Risk HPV test.High-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) is the causative agent of cervical cancer. Among the high-risk types, infection with HPV 16 and 18 is associated with significantly higher risk of disease progression, and consequently these two types together cause approximately 70% of invasive cervical cancer worldwide. Identification of HPV 16 and HPV 18 can provide valuable information for risk stratification and clinical management of patients infected with these two types in both ASC-US triage and primary screening in women over age 30. It may also be valuable in the assessment of HPV vaccine efficacy. Abbott RealTime High Risk (HR) HPV is a recently developed test for the detection of 14 high-risk HPV types with the ability to concurrently identify HPV 16 and 18.To evaluate the clinical performance of Abbott RealTime HR HPV test.Abbott RealTime HR HPV was evaluated with 253 cervical specimens obtained from patients with CIN 3 and 340 specimens from patients with cervical cancer to determine clinical sensitivity of the test and the prevalence of types 16 and 18. Additionally, 757 cervical specimens obtained from women 30 years of age or older with normal cytology in a general screening population were tested to determine high-risk HPV positivity rate.The Abbott RealTime HR HPV test detected 97.2% (246/253) of CIN 3 specimens and 98.5% (335/340) of cancer specimens. HPV 16 was the most prevalent type in both CIN 3 (72.8%) and cancer specimens (64.5%). HPV 16 and 18 combined were detected in 78.9% of high-risk HPV positive CIN 3 and 84.8% of high-risk HPV positive cancer specimens. In specimens from women 30 years of age or older with normal cytology in a screening population, the HPV positivity rate was 6.5% (49/757).Abbott RealTime HR HPV is a highly sensitive test for detection of high-grade cervical disease and cancer. The HPV 16 and HPV 18 typing capability of the test offers the advantage of stratifying patients at greater risk of progression and may thus aid in better patient care and management.Age-specific prevalence of HPV genotypes in cervical cytology samples with equivocal or low-grade lesions.To define the spectrum of human papillomavirus (HPV) types and establish an age limit for triage HPV testing in atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) and low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL).343 liquid-based cytological samples from the population-based screening programme with minor abnormalities were subjected to HPV genotyping (Linear Array, Roche, Basel, Switzerland).High-risk human papillomavirus (HR-HPV) was found in 71% of LSIL and 49% of ASCUS cases (P<0.001). High-risk human papillomavirus prevalence was age-dependent in LSIL (P=0.01), with decreasing prevalence until the age of 50 years, followed by a slight increase. Human papillomavirus type 16 was the most common HR-HPV, found in 23% of HPV-positive women. Human papillomavirus type 18 was the sixth most common, found in 9.9% (P<0.001). An age-dependent quadratic trend was observed for multiple infections (P=0.01) with a trough at about 42 years. The most common HR-HPV types to show a coinfection with HPV16 (clade 9) were HPV39 (28%), 45 (38%), and 59 (46%), belonging to HPV18 clade 7. The frequency of low-risk (LR) vs probable HR and HR-HPV also followed an age-dependent quadratic trend.After the age of 25 years, HR-HPV prevalence is similar in LSIL and ASCUS cases, motivating a low age limit for triage HPV testing. Multiple infections and LR/HR-HPV dominance are age-dependent. Genotyping in longitudinal design is needed to elucidate the importance of multiple infections in cancer progression and in cross-protection from vaccination.Human papillomavirus-specific genotypes in cervical lesions of women referred for smears with atypical glandular cells or adenocarcinoma in situ.This study was designed to analyze whether specific human papillomavirus (HPV) genotypes may predict histologic outcomes in women with glandular abnormalities in their cervical smears. Of the 160 women included, 111 were diagnosed with atypical glandular cells, 35 had both atypical glandular cells and high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions, whereas 14 women had AIS, in 1 case associated with high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions. All women underwent colposcopic examinations and biopsy was performed in 129/160 (80.6%). Thirty-one women (19.3%) were considered negative for neoplasia and scheduled for follow-up. All specimens were tested for 27 HPV genotypes by Roche's polymerase chain reaction-reverse line blot assay. Histologic diagnoses were either cervical intraepithelial neoplasia or invasive carcinoma in 75 (58%) women, and negative for neoplasia in 54 (42%). The overall prevalence of HPV was 43%. HPV 16 was the most prevalent type followed by HPV 18. HPV 16 was significantly associated with squamous and glandular neoplasia and HPV 18 with glandular neoplasia. In women with cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 2 or 3, 11 different HPV genotypes were found, whereas in those who had invasive glandular or invasive carcinoma HPV 16 and HPV 18 were found predominantly. The detection of HPV 16 in women with glandular abnormalities in cervical smears did not help differentiating squamous from glandular lesions. However, the detection of HPV 53 in abnormal smears can predict squamous neoplasia, whereas HPV 18 can predict glandular neoplasia as histologic diagnoses.Human papillomavirus infection and its association with cervical dysplasia in Ecuadorian women attending a private cancer screening clinic.Women living in Latin American countries bear a disproportionate burden of cervical cancer, a condition caused by infection with the human papillomavirus (HPV). We performed a study in Santa Elena, Guayas (currently Santa Elena Province), Ecuador, to determine how often HPV could be detected in women attending a private cancer screening clinic. Participants underwent a Pap test, and vaginal and cervical swabs were performed for HPV testing by the polymerase chain reaction (PCR). Each participant completed a verbally administered survey. The mean age of 302 participants was 37.7 years (range 18 to 78 years). The majority of cervical and vaginal specimens contained sufficient DNA to perform PCR. Overall, 24.2% of the participants had either a cervical or vaginal swab that tested positive for HPV. In general, there was a good correlation between the HPV types detected in the cervical and vaginal swabs from the participants, but vaginal swabs were more likely to contain HPV DNA than were cervical swabs. The high-risk HPV types 16, 52, 58, and 59 and the low-risk HPV types 62, 71, 72, and 83 were the most frequently detected HPV types. The number of lifetime sexual partners was positively associated with detection of any HPV type, detection of oncogenic HPV, and abnormal Pap smears. Further studies are needed to determine if these results are representative of all Ecuadorian women and to determine if cervical cancers in Ecuadorian women are caused by the same HPV types found in the swab specimens obtained in this study.The accuracy of colposcopic grading for detection of high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia.To relate aspects of online colposcopic image assessment to the diagnosis of grades 2 and 3 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN 2+).To simulate colposcopic assessment, we obtained digitized cervical images at enrollment after acetic acid application from 919 women referred for equivocal or minor cytologic abnormalities into the ASCUS-LSIL Triage Study. For each, 2 randomly assigned evaluators from a pool of 20 colposcopists assessed images using a standardized tool online. We calculated the accuracy of these assessments for predicting histologic CIN 2+ over the 2 years of study. For validation, a subset of online results was compared with same-day enrollment colposcopic assessments.Identifying any acetowhite lesion in images yielded high sensitivity: 93% of women with CIN 2+ had at least 1 acetowhite lesion. However, 74% of women without CIN 2+ also had acetowhitening, regardless of human papillomavirus status. The sensitivity for CIN 2+ of an online colpophotographic assessment of high-grade disease was 39%. The sensitivity for CIN 2+ of a high-grade diagnosis by Reid Index scoring was 30%, and individual Reid Index component scores had similar levels of sensitivity and specificity. The performance of online assessment was not meaningfully different from that of same-day enrollment colposcopy, suggesting that these approaches have similar utility.Finding acetowhite lesions identifies women with CIN 2+, but using subtler colposcopic characteristics to grade lesions is insensitive. All acetowhite lesions should be assessed with biopsy to maximize sensitivity of colposcopic diagnosis with good specificity.The significance of marked nuclear atypia in grade 1 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia.Approximately 10% to 15% of cases of grade 1 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia are found to have progressed to a high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion or higher at follow-up, and there are presently no reliable morphological predictors of this subset. It has recently been reported that cases of grade 1 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia that display marked nuclear atypia (defined as cases with at least 5 epithelial cells with nuclear enlargement of at least 5 times the size of an intermediate cell, and/or multinucleation of at least 5 nuclei.) have a substantially higher rate of high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion on short-term follow-up and may, therefore, require more aggressive initial management. We report herein our experience with a cohort of such cases. After a review of consecutive cervical biopsies, 352 cases with grade 1 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia were classified into group 1 (grade 1 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia with marked atypia, n = 31) and group 2 (grade 1 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia without marked atypia, n = 321). The average follow-up rates for groups 1 and 2 were 93.55% (29/31) and 90.65% (291/321), respectively. Average follow-up durations were 14.3 and 17.9 months, respectively. The follow-up high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion rate of the cases with marked atypia was 10.34%, as compared with 11.68% for cases without marked atypia. The follow-up interpretive frequency (in cytologic samples) of "low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion" was significantly higher in group 1(19/29 versus 114/291, P = .009). However, no significant differences were identified between groups 1 and 2 regarding the interpretive frequencies of either high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (3/29 versus 34/291, P = 1) or "negative for intraepithelial lesion or malignancy" (6/29 versus 56/291, P = .8) in follow-up cytologic samples. In subsets of both groups in which high-risk human papillomavirus testing was performed in the Papanicolaou test sample that immediately preceded the index cervical biopsies, no significant differences in viral load were found. In conclusion, grade 1 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia with marked atypia does not have a higher follow-up high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion rate than grade 1 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia without marked atypia in our patient population. Further studies are required to address the significance of marked atypia in grade 1 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia and whether patients with this finding should be managed differently.[Comparison of efficacy of combined use of liquid cytology and immunohistochemical assay of p16ink4 and standard procedure and high risk evaluation by polymerase chain reaction of human papillomavirus infection in diagnosing cervical dysplasia and carcinoma].Efficacy of liquid cytology, on the one hand, and those of standard one, appraisal of high risk of cancer by polymerase chain reaction (PCR) of human papillomavirus infection and immunohistochemical assay of p16ink4 high risk in cervical carcinoma diagnosis, on the other, was evaluated PCR of high risk of cancer (dysplasia-free) was detected in 73% (n = 73), CIN I-II--78%, CIN II-III--89%, CIN III and carcinoma--100%. p16ink4 was not detected in dysplasia-free cases and it was--(16%) in CIN I-II, (89%) CIN II-III, (90%) CIN III and (100%)--in carcinoma. Hence, unlike p16ink4 expression (p < or = 0.001), a correlation between the increase in the number of those infected with papillomavirus was not significantly higher than that of dysplasia grade (p < or = 0.05). It is suggested that combined use of liquid cytology and immunohistochemical assay of p16ink4 is more effective.Histologic follow-up results in 662 patients with Pap test findings of atypical glandular cells: results from a large academic womens hospital laboratory employing sensitive screening methods.Atypical glandular cell (AGC) Pap interpretations and screening for glandular neoplasias remain major challenges. We document the largest reported AGC histopathologic follow-up experience and include verification bias-adjusted data on laboratory screening sensitivity.AGC Pap tests of endocervical origin (AGC-EC), endometrial origin (AGC-EM), and not otherwise specified (AGC-NOS) were documented at a center serving an older low risk population. 98% of Pap tests were liquid-based cytology (LBC) specimens screened using computer-assisted screening. Follow-up diagnoses were correlated with cytology and stratified into age groups. Screening sensitivity was assessed by examining Pap results during 1 year preceding neoplastic diagnoses. Verification bias was adjusted with findings in over 2000 patients with hysterectomies.Of 247,131 Pap tests, 1021 (0.41%) reported AGC results and 662 cases had tissue follow-up. Precancerous or malignant neoplastic histologic outcomes were documented in 101 patients (15.3%), including 8.3% cervical, 6.3% endometrial, and 0.6% ovarian. AGC results were most often associated with neoplastic cervical outcomes in women younger than 40 and with neoplastic endometrial outcomes in women 50 or older. AGC-NOS with a squamous cell abnormality and AGC-EC results suggested cervical neoplasia, while AGC-EM results suggested endometrial neoplasia.AGC Pap results detected significant numbers of cervical and non-cervical neoplasias. Since 38 of 44 (86%) of AGC-detected carcinomas were endometrial or ovarian, HPV co-testing would not have aided screening in detecting the majority of malignancies diagnosed after AGC Pap results. Verification bias-adjusted Pap screening sensitivity in the laboratory for detection of significant neoplastic cervical disease was 93%.Molecular analysis of HPV 16 E6I/E6II spliced mRNAs and correlation with the viral physical state and the grade of the cervical lesion.The presence of HPV 16 E6*I/E6*II spliced transcripts, in cervical lesions of different grade, was analyzed to characterize the transcription pattern. The presence and amount of spliced transcripts were correlated with DNA viral markers such as E2/E6 ratio and physical state. The detection of HPV 16 E6*I/E6*II mRNAs was set up by an SYBR Green real-time reverse transcriptase PCR assay with an optimal dynamic range and sensitivity. The assay was applied to the analysis of 71 specimens, positive to HPV 16 as a sole infection, from women with abnormal cervical smears, precisely 31 low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions and 40 high-grade lesions. Samples negative to both transcripts were found only in low-grade cervical lesions. Three different transcription profiles were found in the low- and high-grade lesions analyzed: in low-grade lesions samples positive only to E6*II and in high-grade lesions samples positive only to E6*I were detected. In low- and high-grade lesions, samples positive to both E6*I and E6*II were found. In the samples positive for both transcripts, the E6*I/E6*II ratio was higher than that in the majority of high-grade lesions and lower than that in all the low-grade lesions. Analyzing the transcription pattern in relation to E2/E6 ratio and to the DNA physical state, the presence of high values of E6*I was associated mainly with low values of E2/E6 ratio and of mixed DNA forms. The detection of HPV 16 E6*I/E6*II mRNAs may serve to identify transcription patterns indicative of cervical disease progression and help physicians to decide clinical management.High-throughput two-step LNA real time PCR assay for the quantitative detection and genotyping of HPV prognostic-risk groups.Human papillomavirus (HPV) infection is a necessary event in the development of cervical carcinoma. High risk (HR) HPV genotypes, however, may progress differentially from low grade lesions to malignancy.The necessity to genotype and quantify HPV-DNA in cervical screening programs, in the follow up post-surgical treatments and in monitoring the effectiveness of HPV vaccination programs, requires access to economical, high-throughput and flexible molecular technologies.A high-throughput two-step LNA real time PCR assay was developed consisting of real time PCR reactions with fluorescent Locked Nucleic Acid (LNA) probes. The first step permits classification into three prognostic-risk groups of nine HR HPV genotypes (16, 18, 31, 33, 35, 45, 52, 56 and 58) most frequently found associated with cervical lesions in Europe. The second step allows us to genotype/quantify the HPV-DNA only when clinical, epidemiological or prophylactic aims exist.The specificity, repeatability, detection and quantitation limit, and linearity of the assay were evaluated and appear to be in agreement with guidelines for the validation of analytical procedures. The overall genotype concordance on cervical samples between our assay and INNOLiPA test was 94% (k 0.83) indicating good agreement.The two-step PCR assay can give much information relative to the predictive value of different HR HPV types and can quantify the genotype-specific viral load. In particular, its ability to detect and quantify nine HR HPV genotypes can help provide more efficient and successful patient care and may be useful for the monitoring of the efficacy of HPV vaccines.Comparison between the Hybrid Capture 2 and the hpVIR real-time PCR for detection of human papillomavirus in women with ASCUS or low grade dysplasia.Human papillomavirus (HPV) testing is an important part of cervical carcinoma screening, and the most widely used assay for detection of HPV is Hybrid Capture 2 (HC2).We compare the HC2 with the real-time PCR hpVIR assay for detection of HPV in follow-up smears of 398 women diagnosed with atypical squamous cells of unknown significance (ASCUS) or low grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN 1) in their initial smear.The two assays target the same set of high-risk (HR) HPVs with exception of HPV68. hpVIR identify individual or groups of HPV types as well as their viral load, while HC2 identify HR HPVs without specification of type.34% (131/391) of the women were positive with HC2 and 45% (175/391) with hpVIR. 16% (63/391) were positive only with hpVIR and among those with cytology available 6% (3/52) had a CIN 2. The 3% (13/391) of women positive only with HC2 either contained low-risk HPVs or copy numbers below the cut-off for the hpVIR assay.The hpVIR assay has a similar sensitivity and specificity as HC2, but hpVIR detect a higher frequency of high-risk HPV infections.A 7.5-year prospective study of longer than 18 months type-specific human papillomavirus persistence in a routine cytology-based cervical screening population of about 31,000 women in West Germany.The objective of this study was to analyse the prevalence, infection pattern, duration and outcome of long-term, type-specific, persistent human papillomavirus (HPV) infections in a routine cytology-based cervical screening population of West German women followed up for 7.5 years. From a screening population of 31,000 women, a strictly selected cohort of 100 patients with > or =18-month persistent, type-specific HPV infection were prospectively followed up for a mean of 35.52 months (+/-13.0). HPV type prevalence and odds ratios for regression, progression and steady state were analysed, as well as the influence of age and HPV coinfection on outcome. Altogether, 21 different genotypes were detected. Seventy-two percent of women were infected with high-risk HPVs, 24% with low-risk and 4% with unknown risk HPV types; 44% of cases had coinfections with multiple HPV types. The risk of progression in low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions and high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions was the highest for infections with high-risk HPVs [odds ratio: 2.2 (0.79-6.11, 95% confidence interval)], whereas cases with low-risk and unknown risk HPVs tended to regress or remained unchanged during follow-up. The mean duration of infections showed considerable variation among the different HPV types and risk groups detected and ranged between 19.7 and 54.3 months. Age was not significantly associated with disease progression and infection duration, and histology had a poor sensitivity for detecting high-grade dysplasia. In conclusion, detecting long-term persistent HPV infections by genotyping may help to identify women with cervical intraepithelial lesions who are at lower and higher risk of developing high-grade precancer and cancer. This may influence future screening strategies and therapy decisions.Comparison of three management strategies for patients with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance, after six months delay: a three-year experience in an Iranian university hospital.A Pap test result of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) presents a clinical challenge. Only 5-10% of women with ASCUS harbour serious cervical disease.We screened 3619 women, who attended to Mirza Koochak Khan Hospital at Tehran University of Medical Sciences with Pap smears, of whom 100 returned with ASCUS. After six months, each subject underwent a standard cytology (conventional Pap smear), human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA testing (identifying high-risk HPV types with polymerase chain reaction) and colposcopy with multiple cervical biopsies.Mean age was 44.09 +/- 8.6 years. The estimated prevalence of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) II or higher was 4%. When histologically verified high-grade lesions (> or = CIN II) were observed, the relative sensitivity of HPV DNA testing was 100% compared with conventional Pap smear, which performed 75% versus 100% relative sensitivity, respectively, using cytological diagnosis high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion, or low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL) as the cut-off. Negative and positive predictive values (NPV and PPV) of Pap test were 98.9% and 100%. The NPV and PPV of HPV DNA testing were 100%.Although less complicated than colposcopy, the repeat Pap smear triage algorithm for ASCUS may underdiagnose some women with high-grade CIN, when compared with colposcopy. Considering the high sensitivity of HPV testing, it may be useful as an alternative to the current policy of six-month repeat cytology for women with ASCUS results.High-risk human papillomavirus DNA test results are useful for disease risk stratification in women with unsatisfactory liquid-based cytology pap test results.This study assesses whether high-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA test results from residual vial fluid of unsatisfactory liquid-based cytology(LBC) samples might provide useful information on disease risk.Patients with unsatisfactory imaged ThinPrep Pap test results and available Hybrid Capture 2 high-risk HPV results were identified at an academic women's hospital laboratory between July 1, 2005, and July 31, 2007. Follow-up repeat cytology results, HPV results, and available biopsy results were analyzed.Three hundred four patients with unsatisfactory cytology results and HPV test results were studied. Eleven (3.6%) of 304 tested positive for HPV DNA, and 293 tested HPV negative. Five (45%) of 11 HPV-positive patients had detectible low-grade squamous intraepithelial/cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 1 during a mean follow-up period of almost 6 months. Among 293 women with negative HPV results, only 1 case of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 1 was identified during roughly the same follow-up period.A positive high-risk HPV result associated with an unsatisfactory ThinPrep Pap test result identified patients at risk for diagnosis of an undetected squamous intraepithelial/cervical intraepithelial neoplasia. Negative high-risk HPV results associated with an unsatisfactory LBC had high negative predictive value in this limited study. The overall low detection rate for significant disease on follow-up of all patients with unsatisfactory imaged LBC is similar to findings reported in another LBC study but differs from studies reporting increased risk for undetected disease in women screened with unsatisfactory conventional Pap smears.The utility of human papillomavirus testing in the management of atypical glandular cells on cytology.To determine the value of human papillomavirus (HPV) testing for HPV-associated cervical disease (HPV-AD) and overall disease (atypical glandular cell [AGC]-associated cervical disease) in women with AGCs.A literature search was conducted from January 1993 through September 2007 using various AGC-related terms with the exploded Medical Subject Heading (MeSH) term "HPV." Findings from 7 studies were used to calculate disease rates according to HPV status.The rate of AGC-associated cervical disease for 661 cases of AGC with concurrent HPV testing was 23.3%. The rate of HPV-AD was higher in HPV-positive, versus negative, cases (53% vs 3%, respectively). Human papillomavirus-positive, versus negative, status predicted a higher likelihood of a cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 2/3 lesion (odds ratio = 39.6, 95% CI = 17.9-87.4, p <.001). The rate of HPV-nonassociated cancers was significantly higher in patients who were negative, versus positive, for HPV (4% vs 0.4%; p =.016). Human papillomavirus testing had an overall 90% sensitivity, 79% specificity, 53% positive predictive value, and 97% negative predictive value for cases of HPV-AD. Atypical glandular cell with concurrent atypical squamous cell (ASC) or squamous intraepithelial lesion (SIL) (ASC/SIL) had higher rates of disease than AGC alone. The positive predictive value of HPV testing for AGC with concurrent ASC/SIL was higher than that for AGC alone.All women with AGC should undergo a comprehensive initial examination regardless of HPV status. The presence of HPV identifies a group of women at higher risk for cervical disease who should be followed closely. Women positive for human papillomavirus with AGC and concurrent ASC/SIL are at even higher risk. If, after a comprehensive initial examination, women with AGC not-otherwise-specified and positive HPV have no identifiable disease, a cervical conization may be considered.Gene expression profiling in cervical cancer: identification of novel markers for disease diagnosis and therapy.Cervical cancer, a potentially preventable disease, remains the second most common malignancy in women worldwide. Human papillomavirus is the single most important etiological agent in cervical cancer. HPV contributes to neoplastic progression through the action of two viral oncoproteins E6 and E7, which interfere with critical cell cycle pathways, p53, and retinoblastoma. However, evidence suggests that HPV infection alone is insufficient to induce malignant changes and other host genetic variations are important in the development of cervical cancer. Advances in molecular biology and high throughput gene expression profiling technologies have heralded a new era in biomarker discovery and identification of molecular targets related to carcinogenesis. These advancements have improved our understanding of carcinogenesis and will facilitate screening, early detection, management, and personalised targeted therapy. In this chapter, we have described the use of high density microarrays to assess gene expression profiles in cervical cancer. Using this approach we have identified a number of novel genes which are differentially expressed in cervical cancer, including several genes involved in cell cycle regulation. These include p16ink4a, MCM 3 and 5, CDC6, Geminin, Cyclins A-D, TOPO2A, CDCA1, and BIRC5. We have validated expression of mRNA using real-time PCR and protein by immunohistochemistry.Cervical cytology screening and management of abnormal cytology in adolescents.The consensus guidelines recognize adolescents as a special group and allow for more conservative follow- up of abnormal cytology and histology. The guidelines recognize the role of high rates of HPV infection and reinfection in teens, along with high rates of clearance of HPV and low rates of invasive cervical cancer. Risks of treatment are balanced with risk for disease progression. The cervical cancer vaccine is now recommended for teens. The approved vaccine protects against HPV related disease caused by four subtypes of HPV 6, 11, 16, and 18. The Food and Drug Administration has approved the vaccine as routine for 11- and 12-year-old girls. The vaccine is most effective prior to HPV exposure or before the sexual debut. In South Carolina only 4.8% of high school girls indicate having sexual intercourse before age 13. Vaccination provides an opportunity to review risky behaviors with adolescent patients and to encourage healthy, safe lifestyles. Vaccination is not protective for sexually transmitted infections and this can be emphasized at vaccination visits as well. The importance of cancer screening can also be reviewed with patients at vaccination visits.Smoking worsens the prognosis of mild abnormalities in cervical cytology.To examine the effect of smoking on the incidence of low- and high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) in women with a baseline Pap smear of atypical squamous cells (ASC) or a low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL).Prospective study in which a cohort of women with normal colposcopy and ASC/LSIL at baseline were followed at 6-month intervals of up to 36 months. Women were grouped in post-hoc analysis according to their smoking behavior: never (or past) smokers and current smokers.This report was based on data from the Latin American Screening Study, conducted in Sao Paulo, Campinas, Porto Alegre (Brazil) and Buenos Aires (Argentina).A subset of 150 women derived from a cohort of 1,011 women.Multivariate Cox analysis and Kaplan-Meier curves were used.Low- and high-grade CIN during follow-up.The only factor related to an increased risk of developing CIN was the positive high-risk (hr) HPV status (hazard ratio (HR) = 3.42; 95% CI: 1.11-9.43). A total of 21 cases of incident CIN were detected during follow-up. Of these, 11 appeared in the group of 67 smokers and 10 among the 83 non-smoker women (log-rank, p=0.33). Smoking status was not associated with the risk of developing CIN (HR = 0.73; 95% CI: 0.40-1.33). However, when restricting the analysis to high-grade CIN only (11 cases), the probability of developing the disease was significantly higher among smokers (p=0.04).Smoking contributes additional risk for developing high-grade CIN in women with ASC or LSIL cytology but normal colposcopy.Five-year experience of human papillomavirus DNA and Papanicolaou test cotesting.To estimate the 5-year age group-specific test positives for Pap tests and human papillomavirus (HPV) testing in a large, general screening population of women 30 and older.Using data from Kaiser Permanente Northern California, a large health maintenance organization that introduced cotesting in 2003, we evaluated the cotesting results overall and by 5-year age groups. Women (n=580,289) who opted for and underwent cotesting (n cotests=812,598) between January 2003 and April 2008 were included in the analysis. Pap tests interpreted as atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US) or more severe were considered to be positive. Women were tested for carcinogenic HPV using an assay approved by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration. Binomial exact 95% confidence intervals (CIs) were calculated.Overall, 6.27% (95% CI 6.21-6.32%) of cotests were carcinogenic HPV positive, and only 3.99% (95% CI 3.94-4.03%) cotests had normal cytology and were carcinogenic HPV positive. By comparison, 5.18% (95% CI 5.13-5.23%) of cotests had ASC-US or more severe cytology, and 2.87% (95% CI 2.84-2.91%) of cotests had ASC-US or more severe cytology and were carcinogenic HPV negative.In a general screening population, concerns about excessive HPV test positives among women aged 30 years and older are not borne out.The evaluation of human papillomavirus genotyping in cervical liquid-based cytology specimens; using the Roche Linear Array HPV genotyping assay.To ascertain the usefulness of the Roche Linear Array human papillomavirus (HPV) genotyping assay for assessing HPV genotypes in liquid-based cytology (LBC) samples and to evaluate this methodology within a cytopathology laboratory. These tests are of importance as persistent infection with high-risk HPV genotypes is considered a causal factor in the development of cervical cancer.A total of 175 cervical LBC samples were tested using the Roche Linear Array HPV genotyping test. The suitability of the assay use in routine cytopathology laboratory was considered. HPV genotypes were matched to the cervical cytology results, which included negative, borderline nuclear abnormalities, mild, moderate and severe dyskaryosis.The assay could be applied to screening samples with the combined result available at the reporting stage. There were no test failures. All samples used after cytological analysis had sufficient DNA for testing. The results were reproducible and easily read and there was concordance of results between biomedical scientists. The results of the assay showed co-infection with multiple HPV genotypes was common in both high-grade and low-grade cytology samples. The percentage of HPV+ samples in the normal cytology samples (although in this grouping the number of samples was low) was 37%. In the cytology samples reported as severe dyskaryosis the HPV genotypes most commonly found were HPV16 and HPV51.The assay was able to detect multiple HPV infection with a wide range of genotypes in LBC samples sent for routine cytological analysis. It would be suitable for use in a cytopathology laboratory. The results of the assay show that the genotype profile has some variation from other geographical regions, and more work is needed to determine population prevalence, to ascertain the impact of the HPV vaccine, to evaluate test for cure and HPV triage management.Increased risk of oncogenic human papillomavirus infections and incident high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia among smokers: experience from the Latin American screening study.The purpose of this study was to assess the effect of smoking on the prevalence and incidence of high-risk human papillomavirus (hr-HPV) infection and cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) in a large sample of Latin American women.The study examines baseline data on over 12,000 women included in the Latin American Screening Study (Brazil and Argentina), and over 1000 women followed-up for a period of 36 months. Three groups were formed: never smokers, current, and past smokers. The prevalence of hr-HPV infection and CIN were compared between the study groups. In the prospective analysis, women were controlled at 6-month intervals to assess the cumulative risk of incident hr-HPV infection, smear abnormalities, and CIN.A higher prevalence (21.7%) of hr-HPV infection was found among current smokers as compared to never smokers (16.5%) or past smokers (13.5%). Being current smoker was significantly (P <0.01) associated with hr-HPV detection (OR = 1.6; 95% CI = 1.2-2.1). Being a current smoker was a significant predictor of incident hr-HPV during the follow-up [Hazards ratio (HR) = 1.4; 95% CI 1.0-1.9]. For incident CIN2+, being a past smoker (HR = 3.6; 95% CI 1.6-9.8) or current smoker (HR = 3.6; 95% CI 1.5-8.6) were the significant independent predictors. Current and past smokers had a significantly increased risk of incident CIN2+ (P <0.01).Smoking increases the risk of contracting hr-HPV infection and modifies the effect of a persistent hr-HPV infection by further increasing the risk of developing CIN2+. It seems that this effect modification persists over several years after smoking cessation.Multiplex chemiluminescence microscope imaging of P16(INK4A) and HPV DNA as biomarker of cervical neoplasia.Classification of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) lesions in low-grade (CIN1) or high-grade (CIN2-3) ones is crucial for optimal patient management, but current histological diagnosis on bioptic samples is often hampered by inter-observer variability. To allow objective classification, we have exploited the peculiar characteristics of chemiluminescence detection, such as high sensitivity and easy quantification of the luminescence signal, to perform sequentially in the same tissue section both an immunohistochemical quantitative detection of p16(INK4A) (a protein marker of high-grade CIN lesions) and an in situ hybridization for human papillomavirus (generally accepted as a necessary but insufficient cause of cervical carcinoma). Different label enzymes (alkaline phosphatase and horseradish peroxidase) were employed in order to avoid any interference between the two assays, and quantitative chemiluminescence image analysis was used to obtain objective evaluation of sample positivity. The multiplexed method allowed detection of two complementary biomarkers and provided discrimination between different lesions (non-neoplastic, low-grade and high-grade CIN). This assay might thus represent an accurate and objective diagnostic test providing important information for counseling, selection of therapy and follow up after surgical treatment.The Mexican Cervical Cancer Screening Trial: self-sampling for human papillomavirus with unaided visual inspection as a secondary screen.The Mexican Cervical Cancer Screening (MECCS) study took place in the State of Michoacán. Primary screening was by self-sampling for high-risk human papillomavirus (HR-HPV). The objectives were to increase the specificity of primary HPV screening by requiring 2 positive HPV tests 1 year apart in women whose secondary screen was negative according to an acetic acid-aided visual inspection (VIA). In addition, we postulated that the sensitivity of VIA would be sufficient to identify large preinvasive lesions and cancers unsuitable for cryotherapy if applied in a see-and-treat algorithm.A total of 8621 women (aged 30-50 years) were screened, and 14.3% were positive for HR-HPV. In phase 1, 11.9% of the HPV-positive women were VIA-positive and were referred for colposcopy with directed and random biopsies. If VIA-negative, women repeated the self-sample 1 year later to detect persistent HR-HPV (25.2% were positive). If persistently HR-HPV-positive in phase 2, patients again had VIA, then all women (both VIA-positive and -negative) received directed and random biopsies. If cryotherapy had been used to treat HPV- and VIA-positive women in phase 1 or persistent HR-HPV-positive (phase 2), the potential risk of undertreatment would have been 4.1%, and 66.4% of the treated patients would have had normal or cervical intraepithelial neoplasia I on biopsy. The VIA triage would refer 0.73% of the patients to colposcopy owing to the lesion size, location, or the presence of a cancer. On the basis of this pilot study, we are encouraged to explore and evaluate a rapid, more sensitive, and more specific self-test.Cervical infections by multiple human papillomavirus (HPV) genotypes: Prevalence and impact on the risk of precancerous epithelial lesions.A large proportion of human papillomavirus (HPV) infections is sustained by multiple genotypes. The effect of multiple infections on the risk of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) and the potential efficacy of vaccine on these infections are controversial. We performed viral typing by SFP(10)-LIPA on a consecutive series of 1,323 women undergoing colposcopy, 69% of whom had cervical biopsy, and correlated CIN severity with the type and number of HPVs. Overall prevalence of HPV-DNA was 68.9%, 97.3% in CIN1, and 98.1% in CIN>/=2. HPV positivity correlated with younger age (35.9 vs. 37.3 years, P = 0.026) and history of CIN (P < 0.001). Multiple types were detected in 44.2% of cases, including 63.1% CIN1 and 80.8% CIN>/=2. Twenty-three different types were detected, HPV-16, 31 and 52 being the most frequent. Infections by HPV-6, 11, 16, or 18 occurred in 59.4% of CIN1 and 71.3% of CIN>/=2. Number of viral types and class of oncogenic risk were linearly correlated with CIN severity (P < 0.0001) by univariate and multivariate analyses controlling for age and history of CIN. The effect of the number of HPV types was maintained after exclusion from the model of infections by HPV-6, 11, 16, and 18. Frequency, distribution, and clinical correlates of multiple HPV infections highlight the importance of assessing individual types in the management and the prediction of outcome of women with abnormal baseline cytology and point to potential limitations in current vaccine strategies.Quantitative multiplex PCR assay for the detection of the seven clinically most relevant high-risk HPV types.High-risk HPV DNA detection has become a valuable tool for the triage of borderline, questionable and abnormal cytologic findings in cervical carcinoma screening programs. This knowledge is largely based on studies which could only discriminate between low-risk (LR-) and high-risk (HR-) HPV groups. However, it is becoming increasingly clear that HPV genotyping may allow further risk stratification and may offer different treatment options in the future.To establish a fast and cost-effective system not only for genotyping but also for quantification of viral DNA.Development and validation of a 5' exonuclease fluorescent probe multiplex real-time PCR assay (TaqMan format) for the detection and quantification of the 7 most frequent HR-HPV types (16, 18, 31, 33, 45, 52 and 58) which account for over 87% of cervical carcinomas world-wide. Two PCR reactions are required to detect the designated HPV types.Experiments with plasmid constructs of all 18 HR-HPV DNA showed that the multiplex real-time PCR assay was highly sensitive and specific. Evaluation of DNA extracted from archived cell pellets of cervical scrapes by the multiplex assay and the GP5+/6+-EIA showed identical genotyping for 234 of 261 (89.6%) samples and an almost perfect agreement when considering all typing results (kappa 0.901). Viral load did not correlate with disease progression within the CIN spectrum but significant differences were evident when comparing all CIN with the group lacking CIN (p=0.0028) or with the cancer group (p=0.0001).Our multiplex assay will be useful to address questions related to viral persistence at the genotype level, the kinetics of viral load and disease recurrence.Human papillomavirus type 18 DNA load and 2-year cumulative diagnoses of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grades 2-3.The clinical relevance of the amount of human papillomavirus type 18 (HPV18) DNA in cervical tissue (ie, HPV18 DNA load) is unknown.Study subjects were 303 women who were HPV18 positive at enrollment into the Atypical Squamous Cells of Undetermined Significance (ASC-US) and Low-Grade Squamous Intraepithelial Lesion (LSIL) Triage Study. HPV18 DNA load, expressed as copies of HPV18 per nanogram of cellular DNA, at enrollment was quantitatively measured. Subjects were followed up semiannually for a period of 2 years for detection of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 2-3 (CIN2-3). A linear regression model was used to examine associations of CIN2-3 with HPV18 DNA load. All statistical tests were two-sided.CIN2-3 was confirmed in 92 of 303 (30.4%) HPV18-positive women. Among women without CIN2-3, HPV18 DNA load was positively associated with increasing severity of cervical cytology at enrollment (Ptrend < .001). However, among those with CIN2-3, HPV18 DNA load was not associated with severity of cervical cytology at enrollment (Ptrend = .33). The ratios of geometric means of HPV18 DNA load at enrollment among women with CIN2-3, relative to those without, were 6.06 (95% confidence interval [CI] = 0.31 to 117.92) for those with normal cytology at enrollment, 0.50 (95% CI = 0.10 to 2.44) for those with ASC-US, 0.11 (95% CI = 0.03 to 0.46) for those with LSIL, and 0.07 (95% CI = 0.01 to 0.80) for those with high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HSIL). After adjusting for age and coinfection with other high-risk HPVs, a statistically significant association of lower HPV18 DNA load with CIN2-3 was observed among women with LSIL or HSIL at enrollment (P = .02). Within the 2-year period, HPV18 DNA load was unrelated to the timing of CIN2-3 diagnosis. Overall results were similar when the outcome was CIN3.HPV18 DNA load was higher for women with LSIL or HSIL at enrollment with no evidence of CIN2-3 during the 2-year follow-up period than it was for women with CIN2-3. Thus, testing for high levels of HPV18 DNA does not appear to be clinically useful.Prevalence of human papillomavirus types 6, 11, 16 and 18 in young Austrian women - baseline data of a phase III vaccine trial.Cervical cancer is the second most common cancer among women worldwide. In the absence of changing risk or intervention, it is projected that in comparison with 2002 there will be a 40% increase in the number of new cases of cervical cancer by 2020. HPV types 16 and 18 cause 70% of cervical cancers worldwide, 50% of high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasias and 25% of low-grade neoplasias. HPV types 6 and 11 are the causative agent of > 90% of genital warts. The aim of this study was to assess the baseline prevalence of infection with HPV 6, 11, 16 and 18 in young Austrian women.Austrian females aged 16-24 (n = 123) were enrolled in a double-blind, placebo-controlled, randomized phase III trial of a quadrivalent HPV (types 6, 11, 16, 18) vaccine (FUTURE I, ClinicalTrials.gov number NCT00092521). Healthy women who were not pregnant and had no prior history of genital warts or abnormal results on cervical cytologic testing and had fewer than five lifetime sex partners were eligible for enrollment. The study sub-population was recruited primarily from university settings.Analysis of the sexual history of the Austrian subjects showed that 92.7% (114/123) were non-virgins and 46.3% were current smokers. At enrollment, 15 (13.5%) had positive serological or PCR tests for HPV 6, 11, 16 or 18. Serologically, 14 (12.3%) of women were positive to HPV 6, 11, 16 or 18: of these, 13 (11.4%) were positive for HPV 16, four (3.5%) were positive for HPV 18, and one (0.9%) for HPV 6. By PCR all were negative for HPV 6 and 11, whereas seven (6.1%) were positive for HPV 16 and one (0.9%) for HPV 18. Abnormal cytology was observed in 12 (10.3%) women.Although the prevalence of vaccine HPV types among young Austrian women with fewer than five lifetime sexual partners was lower than in international data, we observed a high prevalence of abnormal cytology and smoking. These data suggest that a substantial number of Austrian women are at risk for HPV-related disease.Is smoking an independent risk factor for invasive cervical cancer? A nested case-control study within Nordic biobanks.The strong correlation between smoking and exposure to oncogenic human papillomaviruses (HPVs) has made it difficult to verify the independent role of smoking in cervical carcinogenesis. Thus, the authors evaluated this role. Five large Nordic serum banks containing samples from more than 1,000,000 subjects were linked with nationwide cancer registries (1973-2003). Serum samples were retrieved from 588 women who developed invasive cervical cancer and 2,861 matched controls. The samples were analyzed for cotinine (a biomarker of tobacco exposure) and antibodies to HPV types 16 and 18, herpes simplex virus type 2, and Chlamydia trachomatis. Smoking was associated with the risk of squamous cell carcinoma (SCC) among HPV16- and/or HPV18-seropositive heavy smokers (odds ratio=2.7, 95% confidence interval: 1.7, 4.3). A similar risk of SCC (odds ratio=3.2, 95% confidence interval: 2.6, 4.0) was found in heavy smokers after adjustment for HPV16/18 antibodies. The point estimates increased with increasing age at diagnosis and increasing cotinine level. This study confirms that smoking is an independent risk factor for cervical cancer/SCC in women infected with oncogenic HPVs. These findings emphasize the importance of cervical cancer prevention among women exposed to tobacco smoke.Cervical cancer screening with liquid cytology in women with developmental disabilities.To evaluate the use of liquid cytology in Pap smears in women with developmental disabilities (DD) for endocervical cell yield and abnormalities, via speculum examination or blind technique.We used retrospective chart review of gynecological visits by women with DD from October 2002 to November 2005. Cervical cytology screening included speculum examination or blind technique. Endocervical cell yield was analyzed via Pearson's chi-square test.Of 240 attempted liquid cytology Pap smears, 199 (82.9%) were completed. Of these, 193 met inclusion criteria for the study, and 120 (62.2%) contained endocervical cells. The endocervical cell yield with liquid cytology/speculum was 80.0% and was 43.6% with liquid cytology/blind (p < 0.001). Two blind smears (1.0%) were abnormal; both revealed atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) with subsequent negative human papillomavirus (HPV) typing.Cervical screening with liquid cytology in women with DD provides an overall rate of endocervical cells of approximately 44%-80% depending on the technique used. Although this is much lower than in the general population, this compares favorably with slide Pap smear in women with DD. The 44% yield of endocervical cells and the finding of abnormal Pap smears with the blind technique suggest this is a reasonable alternative for obtaining Pap smears in women with difficult pelvic examinations who otherwise would not receive cervical screening.Atypical squamous cells, cannot exclude a high-grade intraepithelial lesion and its clinical significance in postmenopausal, pregnant, postpartum, and contraceptive-use patients.Previous studies have confirmed the low predictive value of a diagnosis of atypical squamous cells, cannot exclude a high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (ASC-H) in a Papanicolaou (Pap) smear for subsequent high-grade dysplasia in the postmenopausal age group. It appears plausible that the decrease in estrogen inherent in the postmenopausal state likely produces reactive cytologic atypia, which is misinterpreted as ASC-H. The change in hormone levels observed in pregnant patients, postpartum patients, and contraceptive users, as a corollary, potentially could create a similar diagnostic dilemma. In the current study, the impact of age and altered hormone status on the frequency of ASC-H was assessed to answer the following questions: Is the low predictive value of ASC-H in postmenopausal women an age-related phenomenon, and do other states that result in decreased levels of estrogen relative to progesterone have a similar association?Pap smears that were diagnosed as ASC-H were divided into postmenopausal, pregnant, postpartum, and contraceptive-use categories. Each Pap smear slide was reviewed to assess the degree of atrophy and the character of atypical cells. The frequency of high-grade follow-up (histology and/or Digene Hybrid Capture II) in the postmenopausal group was compared with the frequency of high-grade follow-up in the pregnant, postpartum, and contraceptive-use categories using the chi-square test. The pregnant, postpartum, and contraceptive-use categories also were compared statistically among each other with the chi-square test.In total, 195 cases met the criteria for study inclusion. The percentage of patients who had subsequent high-grade follow-up was 22.5% in the postmenopausal group, 79.6% in the pregnant group, 66.7% in the postpartum group, and 60% in the contraceptive-use group. When these data were subjected to the chi-square test, there was a statistically significant difference (P<.0001) between the predictive value of subsequent high-grade follow-up in the postmenopausal group compared with the other patient groups. When the chi-square test was applied to the intercomparison of the pregnant, postpartum, and contraceptive-use categories, there were no significant differences (P > .05) in high-grade follow-up between any of these groups.The diagnosis of ASC-H in postmenopausal Pap smears has a low predictive value in the subsequent diagnosis of high-grade squamous lesions in stark contrast to the pregnant, postpartum, and contraceptive-use categories. This suggests that age rather than hormone alterations affects the capacity of ASC-H to predict subsequent high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions. In addition, there are no definite cytomorphologic criteria that can be used to distinguish reliably between benign cellular changes and possible high-grade squamous lesions in these Pap smears. Digene Hybrid Capture II testing, although helpful, does not have 100% correlation with subsequent tissue/Pap smear follow-up and cannot be used alone to triage this group of women for colposcopy.Comparison of HPV detection technologies: Hybrid capture 2, PreTect HPV-Proofer and analysis of HPV DNA viral load in HPV16, HPV18 and HPV33 E6/E7 mRNA positive specimens.Human papillomavirus (HPV) testing using molecular methods in liquid based cytology (LBC) specimens may be useful as an adjunct to cervical screening by cytology. We compared the positivity rate of the commercially available HPV DNA method hybrid capture 2 (hc2) and the commercially available E6/E7 mRNA method PreTect HPV-Proofer in cytological specimens (n=299). LBC specimens collected (n=299) represented the following cervical cytological disease categories: Normal (n=60), borderline nuclear abnormalities (BNA) (n=34), CIN1 (n=121), CIN2 (n=60), CIN3 (n=24). Overall, 69% (205/299) of the cases were positive by hc2 and 38% (112/299) of the cases were positive by PreTect HPV-Proofer. Concordance rates between the two tests were highest in the high-grade cytology cases (CIN2: 67% and CIN3: 83%) and the normal cytology cases (88%) and lowest in the BNA and CIN1 categories (56% and 52%). HPV DNA viral load analyses were carried out on HPV16 (n=55), HPV18 (n=9) and HPV33 (n=13) samples that were positive by PreTect HPV-Proofer. The sensitivity and specificity of PreTect HPV-Proofer and the hc2 DNA test for the detection of high-grade cytology (i.e. CIN2+) were 71.4% and 75.8% vs 100% and 43.7%, respectively. The relatively low detection rate observed by PreTect HPV-Proofer in the whole range of cytological positive cases, combined with a relatively higher specificity and PPV, suggests that PreTect HPV-Proofer may be more useful than hc2 for triage and in predicting high-grade disease.ProEx C immunocytochemistry and high-risk human papillomavirus DNA testing in papanicolaou tests with atypical squamous cell (ASC-US) cytology: correlation study with histologic biopsy.Papanicolaou tests with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US) cytology and adjunct testing for high-risk human papillomaviruses (hr-HPV) are helpful in detecting high-grade disease. Detection of disease may be further improved with molecular markers known to be overexpressed in cervical carcinoma. ProEx C detects 2 such molecular markers, minichromosome maintenance protein 2 and topoisomerase II, which are associated with abnormal cell cycle regulation.To determine the utility of ProEx C as a marker for high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 2+ disease when compared with hr-HPV status in Papanicolaou tests with ASC-US cytology.A SurePath slide was prepared on all ASC-US cases from the residual SurePath vial pellet and stained using the ProEx C reagent prediluted with water-bath antigen retrieval, using a Dako autostainer. Nuclear staining of cytologically atypical squamous cells was considered a positive result. Adjunct testing for hr-HPV used Digene Hybrid Capture 2. Follow-up biopsy results were available for review following the Papanicolaou test.Two hundred patients with ASC-US diagnoses were part of this study. The sensitivities of ProEx C and hr-HPV testing in detecting high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 2+ disease were 98.04% and 82.35%, respectively, whereas the specificity for detecting high-grade disease was 74.50% and 73.15%, respectively.ProEx C staining is a more sensitive and specific biomarker for detecting cervical disease than adjunct testing for hr-HPV status in Papanicolaou tests with ASC-US.Use of p16-INK4A overexpression to increase the specificity of human papillomavirus testing: a nested substudy of the NTCC randomised controlled trial.Human-papillomavirus (HPV) testing is more sensitive, but less specific, than conventional cytology for detecting high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN). We assessed whether HPV testing with triage by p16-INK4A overexpression can increase specificity while maintaining sensitivity.HPV-positive women were enrolled between June 10, 2003, and Dec 31, 2004 in a multicentre randomised controlled trial, which compared stand-alone HPV testing by Hybrid Capture 2 (experimental group) with conventional cytology, were referred for colposcopy. In seven of nine centres, cytospin preparations from these women were tested for p16-INK4A overexpression by immunostaining. The sensitivity and specificity for CIN grade 2 or more, determined at blind review of histology, were calculated for these women. We also estimated the relative sensitivity and relative referral to colposcopy that would have been obtained by HPV testing with p16-INK4A triage compared with conventional cytology. This trial is registered as a Standard Randomised Controlled Trial, number ISRCTN81678807.24 661 women were randomly assigned to the experimental group. 1137 women (74% of those undergoing colposcopy in relevant centres), including 50 with CIN2 and 42 with CIN3 or cancer, had valid p16-INK4A immunostaining. For the endpoint of CIN2+, sensitivity and specificity of p16-INK4A (deemed positive with any number of stained cells-except endocervical, metaplastic, and atrophic cells if morphologically normal) in HPV-positive women of any age were 88% (81 of 92; 95% CI 80-94) and 61% (633 of 1045; 57-64), respectively. In the 35-60-year age group, the relative sensitivity of HPV testing and p16-INK4A triage versus conventional cytology for CIN2+ was 1.53 (95% CI 1.15-2.02) and relative referral was 1.08 (0.96-1.21). In the 25-34-year age group, relative sensitivity was 3.01 (1.82-5.17) and relative referral was 1.15 (0.96-1.37). In the latter age group, when 5% or more stained cells were deemed positive, the corresponding values were 2.06 (1.20-3.68) and 0.58 (0.46-0.73), respectively.HPV testing with p16-INK4A triage produces a significant increase in sensitivity compared with conventional cytology, with no substantial increase in referral to colposcopy.Cytological distinction between high-risk and low-risk human papillomavirus infections in SurePath liquid-based cell preparations.To investigate the correlation of various diagnostic cytological features in SurePath liquid-based cell preparations with high-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) infection.Case-control study. SurePath specimens from 510 cases that had been tested for HPV DNA by Hybrid Capture 2 assay were retrieved and re-examined for 10 cytological features. Distribution of these features in high- and low-risk HPV types was compared and risk statistics were estimated. Effects of cervicitis on the manifestation of HPV cytological changes were adjusted by means of logistic regression.Cytological features of nuclear hyperchromasia, multinucleation and atypical metaplastic cells were predominantly noted in high-risk HPV infection in the category of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance/low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion. The odds ratios of these three features were 6-12 times higher in high-risk than low-risk HPV infection.Some diagnostic cytological features can be used as markers in Pap smear screening for assessing the types of HPV infection.Significance of high-risk human papillomavirus DNA-positive atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance pap smears in perimenopausal and postmenopausal women.To determine the risk of high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HSIL)/cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) 2 or 3 in perimenopausal and postmenopausal women with high-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA-positive atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) on Pap tests.A total of 752 perimenopausal and postmenopausal women (patients 45 years) with an ASCUS interpretation on ThinPrep Pap tests were identified in 2002 and 2003. High risk HPVDNA was detected in 191 (25.4%) women. The follow-up results in these 136 women were compared with those of women <45 years.Of the 136 perimenopausal and postmenopausal women, 64.7% became negative on cytology or biopsy and 30.9% revealed persistent low-grade SIL (LSIL)/CIN 1. Furthermore, 5 women (3.68%) were diagnosed with HSIL/CIN 2 or 3, and 1 patient had squamous cell carcinoma (0.74%). The rate of HSIL/CIN 2 or 3 or worse detected in perimenopausal and postmenopausal women was significant lower than 10.6% in women <45 years (p = 0.028).Our study showed that perimenopausal and postmenopausal women with high-risk HPV positivity and an ASCUS interpretation have a significantly lower risk of HSIL/CIN 2 or 3 detected. Nonetheless, the risk of a significant finding on workup, including invasive carcinoma, indicates the need for colposcopic evaluation of these women.Human papillomavirus 'reflex' testing as a screening method in cases of minor cytological abnormalities.The aim was to evaluate human papillomavirus (HPV) 'reflex genotyping' in cases of minor cytological abnormalities detected in the gynaecological screening programme in Stockholm, Sweden. Liquid-based cytology samples showing minor cytological abnormalities were analysed using HPV genotyping (Linear Array, Roche diagnostics). Colposcopically directed cervical biopsies were obtained and the HPV test results were correlated with the histological results. In all, 63% (70/112) of the samples were high-risk (HR) HPV (HR-HPV) positive. A statistically significant correlation was found between high-grade cervical lesions and HR-HPV (P=0.019), among which HPV 16, 18, and 31 were the most important. The negative predictive value of HR-HPV detection for histologically confirmed high-grade lesions was 100%. An age limit for HPV reflex testing may be motivated in cases of low-grade squamous intraepithelial neoplasia (LSIL), because of high HR-HPV prevalence among younger women. By using HPV reflex genotyping, additional extensive workup can safely be avoided in about 50% of all cases of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) and LSIL among women 30 years. This screening strategy could potentially reduce the total abnormal cytology-reporting rate in the Swedish screening programme by about 1% and provide more accurately directed follow-up, guided by cytological appearance and HPV test results.Prognostic significance of the detection of human papilloma virus L1 protein in smears of mild to moderate cervical intraepithelial lesions.To investigate whether it is possible to use detection of the human papillomavirus (HPV) L1 capsid protein to predict the course of mild or moderate cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN).Pap smears from 279 women in whom CIN 1 and CIN 2 had been diagnosed by cytology and histology, who were known to have a high-risk HPV status and had a median follow-up of 25 months, were immunohistochemically stained for the HPV L1 protein. The staining results were correlated with the clinical course of the disease.HPV L1-positive patients showed regression in 49.1% of cases, stable disease in 41.5%, and progressive disease in 9.4%, whereas HPV L1-negative women had progression in 25.9% of cases (regression 33.3%, stable disease 40.7%; p=0.001). The effect was clearest in the group under 30 years of age. HPV L1-negative patients experienced progression significantly more often than women with a positive HPV L1 test (odds ratio 3.391).HPV L1-positivity was found to have prognostic significance in relation to disease progression in women with CIN 1 and CIN 2 and particularly in those less than 30 years of age.Linear array genotyping and hybrid capture II assay in detecting human papillomavirus genotypes in women referred for colposcopy due to abnormal Papanicolaou smear.The main objective of this study was to assess the feasibility of human papillomavirus (HPV) genotyping in women referred for colposcopy due to abnormal Papanicolaou (Pap) smear. A series of 248 women referred for colposcopy due to an abnormal Pap smear were analysed with the Roche Linear Array HPV genotyping test detecting 37 most frequent HPV types, and compared with hybrid capture II (HCII) assay for oncogenic (high-risk [HR] HPV) types as well as for p16INK4a expression using immunocytochemistry. All tests were performed in cervical samples collected in PreservCyt liquid media for liquid-based cytology (ThinPrep), and colposcopic biopsy and/or loop electro excision procedure cone biopsy was used as the gold standard. HPV16 was the single most frequent genotype (29/258; 11.7%), followed by HPV51 (4.4%), HPV66 (3.6%), HPV42, 52 and 56 (3.2% for all). Linear array genotyping test significantly predicts both abnormal colposcopy (odds ratio [OR] = 9.0; 3.12-25.93), high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (OR = 9.6; 1.26-74.17) and cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) 3+ (OR = 29.3; 3.95-218.06). In detecting CIN3, linear array was equivalent (97.6%) to colposcopy in sensitivity (SE), both being superior to HCII (92.7%). Concordance between linear array and HCII was moderate (Cohen's kappa kappa = 0.547; 95% confidence interval [CI]: 0.435-659). Specificity (SP) and positive predictive value (PPV) of linear array were significantly improved, if only HPV16 genotype was considered. Performance in the best balance is obtained, when linear array and colposcopy are combined, giving 82.9% SE, 93.9% SP, 73.9% PPV and 96.3% negative predictive value (NPV) as predictor of CIN3+ (OR 74.5; 95% CI: 27.36-202.72). In conclusion, linear array for HR-HPV is a highly sensitive test (97.6%) with high NPV (98.9%) in detecting CIN3+ lesions. HPV16 genotyping alone significantly improves SP and PPV of this test in management of women with abnormal cytology.Value of combining HPV-DNA testing with follow-up Papanicolaou smear in patients with prior atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance.To address human papillomavirus (HPV) testing on negative Pap tests preceded by atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US) without reflex HPV testing.Positive HPV test results with concurrent negative Pap tests over 1 year were identified. Pathology records for all patients diagnosed with ASCUS without reflex HPV testing in the previous year were reviewed; all cytologic and surgical specimens over the subsequent 2 years were evaluated for squamous abnormalities.Fifty patients had positive HPV DNA (HPV-DNA) test result combined with a negative Pap test. Twenty-three had a previous Pap test interpretation of ASC-US (without HPV testing) within the preceding year. On follow-up, 8 of 23 developed a squamous intraepithelial lesion (SIL) within 1 year. Four additional cases developed SIL in the second year after positive HPV testing. All dysplasias in the first year of follow-up were low grade; 1 of 4 developing in the second year was high grade.Negative Pap smear following an ASC-US interpretation without a concurrent HPV test is associated with significant false negative rate. We suggest consideration of combining HPV-DNA testing to all initial follow-up negative Pap tests of patients with previous ASC-US, if reflex HPV testing has not been performed.Are adjunctive markers useful in routine cervical cancer screening? Application of p16(INK4a) and HPV-PCR on ThinPrep samples with histological follow-up.The objectives of the study were to evaluate 1) the diagnostic sensitivity and specificity of p16(INK4a) as a marker for high-grade cervical lesions, 2) the results of a real-time polymerase chain reaction detecting high-risk human papillomavirus, and 3) the interobserver variability of the p16(INK4a) interpretation.A total of 232 ThinPrep samples were stained for p16(INK4a), and HPV-DNA PCR was performed on 107 specimens with inclusion of both benign and abnormal cytology. Histological follow-up information was collected. The diagnostic sensitivity of ASC+ with CIN2+ in histology as endpoint was 96% for p16(INK4a) and 100% for HR-HPV DNA PCR, and the diagnostic specificity was 41% and 27%, respectively. If p16(INK4a) had been used for triage of the ASC samples, then 18 patients (42%) could have been spared unnecessary follow-up procedures compared to six patients (21%) with the HR-HPV DNA test.Longitudinal clinical evaluation of a novel antibody cocktail for detection of high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions on cervical cytology specimens.Although cervical cancer screening by cytology is successful, the test continues to show relatively poor operating characteristics. Cell cycle markers may enhance detection of high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions.To determine the clinical usefulness of ProExC, an immunocytochemical assay for cell cycle components, performed on routine cervical cytology samples.Cervical cytology samples were collected using the SurePath method. Residual cells remaining after preparation of the Papanicolaou-stained slide were used to make a second slide for ProExC staining using an indirect polymer-based immunoperoxidase method. Only adequately cellular slides were evaluated for the presence of nuclear staining within cytologically abnormal epithelial cells. Results were correlated with clinical follow-up.Six hundred twenty-four samples were satisfactorily cellular and stained. Correlation with clinical follow-up for subsequent cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 2+ on biopsy/high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion on cytology (CIN 2+/HSIL) showed that 434 results were true negative, 78 true positive, 18 false-negative, and 94 false-positive, resulting in a sensitivity/specificity of 81%/82%. When ProExC results were combined with any level of cytologic atypia, sensitivity for CIN 2+/HSIL was 92% and specificity was 84%.ProExC shows promise as an aid in enhancing the sensitivity and specificity of cervical cytology for subsequent CIN 2+/HSIL and may be useful in identifying those cervical lesions most apt to progress.Prediction of recurrent disease by cytology and HPV testing after treatment of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia.To assess the role of human papillomavirus (HPV) testing and cytology as predictors of residual/recurrent disease after treatment of high-grade cervical intraepithelial lesions.One hundred and thirty-eight women with cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) grade 2/3 lesion on biopsy were included in a prospective follow-up study in Belgium and Nicaragua. All women were treated with loop electrosurgical excision procedure (LEEP) and follow-up visits took place at 6 weeks, 6 months, 1 year and 2 years. During these visits, a Papanicolaou (Pap) smear test was taken, colposcopy was performed and specimens were collected for HPV testing. Cytology, high-risk (HR) HPV presence, persistent HR HPV infection and combinations of these tests at different time points during follow-up were correlated with histologically confirmed residual/recurrent disease.Thirteen patients (9%) developed residual/recurrent disease during follow-up. Abnormal cytology at 6 weeks after treatment was significantly correlated with residual/recurrent disease. Nine of thirty-seven patients with abnormal cytology at 6 weeks had recurrent disease versus three of seventy with a normal cytology [odds ratio (OR): 7.2; 95% confidence interval (CI): 1.8-28.5; P = 0.003). Sensitivity of this test was 75.0%, specificity 70.5%. Combining abnormal cytology and the presence of HR HPV within the first 6 months after treatment gave the best correlation with residual/recurrent disease: of the 54 women with abnormal cytology and/or HR HPV presence within the first 6 months, 11 developed residual/recurrent disease (OR 10.2; 95% CI: 2.2-48.3). Sensitivity of this combination was 84.6% and specificity 65.0%.Cytology remains the cornerstone in the early follow-up after LEEP for CIN lesions of the cervix. HPV testing can add value as it increases the sensitivity of cytology in concomitant testing within the first 6 months.HPV testing as an adjunct to cytology in the follow up of women treated for cervical intraepithelial neoplasia.To evaluate human papillomavirus (HPV) testing in combination with cytology in the follow up of treated women.A prospective study.Three UK centres: Manchester, Aberdeen and London.Women treated for cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN).Women were recruited at 6 months of follow up, and cytology and HPV testing was carried out at 6 and 12 months. If either or both results were positive, colposcopy and if appropriate, a biopsy and retreatment was performed. At 24 months, cytology alone was performed.Cytology and histology at 6, 12 and 24 months.Nine hundred and seventeen women were recruited at 6 months of follow up, with 778 (85%) and 707 (77.1%) being recruited at 12 and 24 months, respectively. At recruitment, 700 women had had high-grade CIN (grades 2 or 3) and 217 had CIN1. At 6 months, 14.6% were HPV positive and 10.7% had non-negative cytology. Of those with negative cytology, 9% were HPV positive. Of the 744 women who were cytology negative/HPV negative at baseline, 3 women with CIN2, 1 with CIN3, 1 with cancer and 1 with vaginal intraepithelial neoplasia (VAIN)1 were identified at 24 months. Nine of 10 cases of CIN3/cervical glandular intraepithelial neoplasia (CGIN) occurred in HPV-positive women. At 23 months, cancer was identified in a woman treated for CGIN with clear resection margins, who had been cytology negative/HPV negative at both 6 and 12 months.Women who are cytology negative and HPV negative at 6 months after treatment for CIN can safely be returned to 3-year recall.Human papillomavirus genotyping for the eight oncogenic types can improve specificity of HPV testing in women with mildly abnormal Pap results.To evaluate whether human papillomavirus (HPV) genotyping for the selected oncogenic HPV types can improve the efficacy of HPV DNA testing in predicting cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN 2/3) in women with mildly abnormal Pap results, we compared HPV DNA testing and HPV genotyping for eight oncogenic types (16, 18, 31, 33, 35, 45, 52 and 58) in Pap specimens with abnormal results (HSIL, 20 cases; LSIL, 42 cases; ASC-US, 94 cases) and follow-up biopsies. Using consensus primer-mediated PCR assays, HPV DNA was detected in 90% (18/20) of HSIL, 95% (40/42) of LSIL and 64% (60/94) of ASC-US cases. HPV DNA positivity was significantly associated with CIN 2/3/carcinoma (P<0.001) in women with ASC-US, but not in women with LSIL (P=0.52). Of HPV DNA-positive specimens, the eight oncogenic HPV types were detected in 83% of HSIL cases (15/18), 53% of LSIL cases (21/40), and 47% of ASC-US cases (28/60). The eight oncogenic HPV types were significantly associated with CIN 2/3/carcinoma (OR, 10.6; 95% CI, 3.98-28.10; P<0.001), whereas no significant association was observed between the non-eight oncogenic HPV types and CIN 2/3/carcinoma (OR, 2.20; 95%CI, 0.80-6.03; P=0.125). In women with ASC-US, HPV genotyping for the eight oncogenic types showed higher specificity (81 vs 46%) and positive predictive value (PPV, 44 vs 26%) in predicting CIN 2/3/carcinoma compared to HPV DNA testing. Similarly, in women with LSIL, higher specificity (69 vs 8%) and PPV (62 vs 39%) for predicting CIN 2/3/carcinoma were also observed using HPV genotyping test for the eight oncogenic types compared to HPV DNA testing. Our findings suggested that HPV genotyping for the eight oncogenic types might be useful to improve the efficacy of HPV DNA testing for predicting CIN 2/3/carcinoma in women with mildly abnormal Pap results, which may lead to personalized clinical management with improved patient compliance for follow-up.Use of the ThinPrep Imaging System does not alter the frequency of interpreting Papanicolaou tests as atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance.Automated screening of Papanicolaou tests (Pap tests) improves the productivity of cytopathology laboratories. The ThinPrep Imaging System (TIS) has been widely adopted primarily for this reason for use on ThinPrep Pap tests (TPPT). However, TIS may also influence the interpretation of Pap tests, leading to changes in the frequency of various interpretive categories. The effect of the TIS on rates of TPPT interpretation as atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US) is of concern because any shift in the frequency of ASC-US will alter the sensitivity and specificity of the Pap test. We have sought to determine whether automated screening of TPPT has altered ASC-US rates in our institution when compared with manual screening (MS) of TPPT.A computerized search for all ASC-US with reflex Human Papillomavirus (HPV) testing over a one-year-period (7/1/06 to 6/30/07) was conducted. Cases included both TPPT screened utilizing TIS and screened manually. HPV test results for both groups were recorded. Pertinent follow-up cervical cytology and histology results were retrieved for the period extending to 11/30/07. Automated screening was in clinical use for 10 months prior to the start of the study.Automated screening was performed on 23,103 TPPT, of which 977 (4.23%) were interpreted as ASC-US. Over the same period, MS was performed on 45,789 TPPT, of which 1924 (4.20%) were interpreted as ASC-US. Reflex HPV testing was positive for high risk (HR) types in 47.4% of the TIS cases and 50.2% of MS cases. Follow-up cervical dysplasia found by colposcopy was also distributed proportionally between the two groups. Cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) was found on follow-up biopsy of 20.1% of the TIS cases (5.2% CIN 2/3) and 21.2% of MS cases (5.1% CIN 2/3). None of these differences were statistically significant.Use of the ThinPrep Imaging System did not appreciably change ASC-US rates or follow-up reflex HPV test results in our laboratory. This demonstrates that the benefits of automated screening may be obtained without increasing the rate of referral to colposcopy for ASC-US follow-up.[Importance of human papillomavirus (HPV) screening in the follow-up after CIN2-3 treatment].Cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) 2 and CIN3 lesions clearly represent precancerous states even if some of them would heal spontaneously. Management is based on surgical excision of part of the uterine cervix because such lesions can potentially progress into carcinomas. In most cases, this treatment leads to the cure of intraepithelial lesions. However, even after such an efficient treatment, theses patients are still at a higher risk of developing an invasive cervical cancer. That is why guidelines recommend a specific follow-up in order to screen for residual disease (incomplete excision) or for recurrences (after a complete excision). The actual problem in the follow-up strategy lies in the screening tools in use - cervical smears and colposcopy - whose sensitivities are low and hence, not quite sufficient when applied to a high risk population. These intraepithelial lesions are due to high risk human papillomaviruses (HPV) and there cannot be any lesion progression without HPV. Consequently, a viral testing would help in identifying a high risk subpopulation of women after cone loop cervical excision.We studied, retrospectively, the contribution of HPV testing (Hybrid Capture 2((R))) in the follow-up after CIN2-3 treatment in 386 cone loop cervical excisions performed at a single centre during 80 months.Between three to six months follow-up after surgery, HPV remained present in 22.5% cases. The sensitivity of HPV testing in the screening for residual lesions or for recurrences was 100%, that of cervical smears cytology was 72%, whereas that of the pathological analysis of margins reached only 67%. The negative predictive value of a negative HPV detection associated with a normal cytology was 100%.Owing to its clinical relevance, HPV testing optimises postoperative follow-up and leads to the rapid and efficient selection of a subgroup, representing less than one upon three patients who are really at risk of an invasive lesion and to wholly reassure the others. Indeed, a negative HPV testing, associated with a normal cervical cytology, obtained after surgery correspond to a negative predictive value of almost 100% and this allows us to increase the time-interval between two screenings and to rapidly place the patient in a routine follow-up.[Expression of epidermal growth factor receptor and the correlation with HPV16/18 infection in cervical intraepithelial neoplasia and cervical carcinoma].The aim of this study was to elucidate the role of EGFR expression and HPV infection and their relationship in the genesis and progression of cervical carcinoma.This analysis included 60 cases of cervical carcinoma, 40 cases of CIN and 30 cases of control group. Patients of cervical carcinoma group were all subjected to radical hysterectomy with bilateral pelvic lymphadenectomy in Tumour Hospital, Zhongshan University from 1997 to 2001. The FIGO stage was I a - II b. EGFR protein was stained by S-P immunohistochemistry, and HPV16/18 DNA was detected by PCR.The moderate/ strong expression of EGFR was observed in 0, 42.5%, 76.7% of normal cervical epithelium, CIN and cervical tumor tissue, respectively, with a significant difference among them (P < 0.05). The infection of HPV16/18 was observed in 6.7%, 67.5%, 58.3% of normal cervical tissue, CIN and cervical tumors, respectively. The infection rate of CIN or cervical carcinoma was significantly higher than that in normal cervicaltissue (P = 0.000), but no statistically significant difference was observed between cervical carcinoma and CIN. The moderate/strong expression of EGFR demonstrated an association with the cervical invasion depth. The EGFR expression increased significantly as the invasion depth progressed from less than or equal to a half cervical stroma to deeper than that (89.2% vs. 56.5%, P = 0.004). The infection of HPV16/18 demonstrated a correlation with the cervical canal invasion. The infection increased significantly in the cases with cervical invasion than that in the cases without invasion (88.2% vs. 46.5%, P = 0.003). But no significant correlation was observed between EGFR and HPV. Neither EGFR nor HPV had a significant association with carcinoma prognosis.EGFR and HPV demonstrate a significant correlation with genesis and progression of cervical carcinoma. In our study, neither EGFR nor HPV demonstrates a significant association with tumor prognosis, and no significant correlation is observed between EGFR and HPV.Correlation of Pap smear, cervical biopsy, and clinical follow-up with an HPV typing microarray system.A human papillomavirus (HPV) microarray system allows the determination of HPV type in clinical samples. The purpose of this study was to determine the presence of HPV in liquid-based Pap smears with the MyGene MyHPV Chip Kit HPV genotyping microarray test (MyGene Assay), and to correlate this with the cytology and biopsy diagnoses, clinical follow-up, HPV Hybrid Capture data, and HPV sequence analyses. Four hundred and two Pap smears (93 ThinPrep, 309 SurePath) were available for study. Correlation of HPV DNA detection by the MyGene Assay with the Pap smear diagnosis showed a detection rate of 19/97 (19%) for normal Pap smears, 181/242 (74%) for atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS), and 61/63 (97%) for squamous intraepithelial lesions (SILs). Biopsy data on 248 women were available. HPV was noted by the MyGene Assay in the Pap smear in 98/100 (98%) of the cases, for which the corresponding biopsy had been diagnosed as SIL, compared with 103/148 (69%) of the cases for which the biopsy had been negative for SIL. Clinical follow-ups were available for 200 women with ASCUS Pap smears. A significant increase was observed in the rate of biopsy-proven SILs in women with ASCUS Pap smears that were HPV-positive (63/66=95%) as compared with those that were HPV-negative (96/134=71%, P<0.05). The MyGene Assay and Hybrid Capture system gave equivalent results for all the categories studied, except for the presence of multiple infections, as determined by viral sequence analysis. Specifically, the Hybrid Capture system overestimated the presence of dual infection (low-risk and high-risk positive) by 48% and missed many cases of multiple infections, especially when 2 or more high-risk types were present. It is concluded that the MyGene Assay allows for the routine typing of HPV in liquid-based Pap smears, and that the presence of HPV DNA in ASCUS Pap smears is strongly correlated with a biopsy-proven SIL.A randomized trial of basing treatment on human papillomavirus and/or cytology results in low-grade cervical lesion triage.This study was undertaken to compare management algorithms that base treatment with loop electrosurgical excision procedure on human papillomavirus and/or repeat Papanicolaou test smear results.A randomized trial that referred 674 women with either atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance or low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions cytology results, detected in organized screening to treatment either (1) if they were positive in a repeat Papanicolaou test smear and/or a human papillomavirus test or (2) if they were positive in the repeat Papanicolaou test smear test only. Women who tested positive were treated, regardless of colposcopic findings.There were 208 of 337 (62%) women who were treated in the human papillomavirus /Papanicolaou test smear group (187/337 because of HPV positivity) and 138 of 337 (41%) in the Papanicolaou test smear only group. Histopathologically diagnosed cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 2 or worse was found among 112 of 337 (33.2%) women in the human papillomavirus/Papanicolaou test smear group compared with 85 of 337 (25.2%) women in the Papanicolaou test smear only group (P < .05). Twenty-one women with cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 2+ had normal colposcopy.For adequate cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 2+ sensitivity, the decision to use loop electrosurgical excision procedure needs to be based on human papillomavirus testing results and should not exclude women with normal colposcopy.Conservative management of adolescents with abnormal cytology and histology.Adolescents remain vulnerable to human papilloma virus (HPV) infection because of certain physiologic characteristics inherent in this age group and common sexual behaviors, including lack of condom use. The commonness of HPV in this age group also results in frequent abnormal cytology. Fortunately, most of the infections are transient, with frequent clearance of HPV and the lesion. Current strategies for adolescents with abnormal cytology include conservative management, avoiding invasive procedures. For cytologic atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance or squamous intraepithelial lesions (SIL), management can be obtaining cytology only at 1-year intervals for up to 2 years before referral for colposcopy is necessary. For biopsy-proven cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) I, management is similar with yearly cytology indefinitely or until high-grade-SIL or CIN II/III develops. CIN II in adherent adolescents can be managed with 6-month cytology and colposcopy.Comparison of p16INK4A and Hybrid Capture 2 human papillomavirus testing as adjunctive tests in liquid-based gynecologic SurePath preparations.p16(INK4a), cyclin-dependent kinase inhibitor, is functionally inactivated in many tumors, including cervical cancer. We compared p16(INK4A) immunocytochemical staining and Hybrid Capture 2 (HCII) on SurePath specimens using tissue biopsies (as the gold standard). Their utility in a spectrum of atypical and preneoplastic lesions, and their ability to accurately identify underlying lesions of CIN II or greater was assessed using biopsy follow-up data. One-hundred and seventeen residual SurePath samples were collected: 43 atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS), 47 low-grade (LGSIL), and 27 high-grade (HGSIL) squamous intraepithelial lesions. Two slides were prepared from each sample; one stained with the SurePath autocyte stain and one immunostained using the CINtec p16(INK4a) Cytology Kit (Dakocytomation). High-risk HPV testing was performed using the HCII DNA test (Digene, Gaithersburg, MD). Available tissue biopsy follow-up data was retrieved. p16(INK4a) was positive in 32.6% (14/43) ASCUS, 46.8% (22/47) LGSIL, and 48.1% (13/27) HGSIL specimens. HCII DNA test was positive in 41.9% (18/43) ASCUS, 78.7% (37/47) LGSIL, and 96.3% (26/27) HGSIL samples. The sensitivity, specificity, positive (PPV) and negative (NPV) predictive values of p16(INK4a) and HCII were: 58.7% and 89.8%, 58.6% and 34.6%, 69.2% and 72.1%, 47.2% and 64.3%, respectively. In patients with cervical biopsies, the PPV of HCII (92.3%) results for a biopsy with CINII/III was significantly higher than the PPV of p16(INK4a) (52%) (P=0.001). Using liquid-based cytology specimens, HCII is a more sensitive test than p16(INK4a) for detection of abnormal cytology. HCII has a higher PPV than p16(INK4a) for identifying CIN II/III.[Progression and regression low grade intraepitelial squamous lesions in context of positivity of high risk human papillomavirus].Evaluation of regression and progression of histologically confirmed low grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (LG SIL) in women under the age of 35 in context of positivity of high risk human papillomavirus (HPV HR). Evaluation of sensitivity of PAP smear and HPV HR test in women with LG SIL.Prospective study.Department of Obstetrics and Gynecology, Charles University Prague, 2nd Medical Faculty, University Hospital Motol.166 women with SIL low or repeated ASC-US PAP smear were included to the study. 1 to 3 punch biopsy under the expert colposcopy and HPV HR test were performed in all women. Follow up were done every 6 month in all women with histologically confirmed LG SIL.LG SIL was detected in 120 women. Sensitivity of PAP smear was 72.3% and sensitivity of HPV HR test 60.2 % in women with LG SIL. 84 women (70 %) were HPV HR positive. Regression of LG SIL was detected in 20 (23 %) HPV HR positive women and in 18 (50%) HPV HR negative women. This difference is statistically significant (p = 0.0094). Progression of LG SIL was detected in 24 (29 %) HPV HR positive women and in 4 (11%) women HPV HR negative women. This difference is borderline statistically significant (p = 0.058). Progression of LG SIL to the carcinoma in situ or invasive cancer had not been detected during follow up period.PAP smear is a standard for LG SIL detection in women under the age of 35 and HPV HR test is not so important for LG SIL detection in this group of women. HPV HR test could be useful for prediction of the risk of progression, but positivity of HPV HR in LG SIL cannot indicate surgical treatment (conisation) in this cohort of women under the age of 35.Human papillomavirus (HPV) in atypical squamous cervical cytology: the Invader HPV test as a new screening assay.In surveillance for cervical neoplasia, a diagnosis of cytologically atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) presents a significant clinical issue, often dependent on testing for high-risk (HR) human papillomavirus (HPV) for the triage of patients. HPV type 16 now appears to be a critical concern in the follow-up of patients with ASCUS. The Invader HPV (Inv2) test, by Third Wave Technologies, Inc., is a recently developed analyte-specific reagent assay that uses probe sets for the detection of 14 HR HPV subtypes. These probe sets are A5/A6 (HPV types 51, 56, and 66), A7 (HPV types 18, 39, 45, 59, and 68), and A9 (HPV types 16, 31, 33, 35, 52, and 58). This report describes the performance characteristics of the Inv2 test in the screening of ASCUS cervical cytology specimens and correlates the results of the Inv2 test with those of the Hybrid Capture II HPV (HC2) test by Digene. The linear array HPV genotyping test (Roche Molecular Systems) was used as a reference method for the testing of samples with discordant results. Ninety-four Pap smear samples with a cytological diagnosis of ASCUS and 39 samples with a negative diagnosis were tested. The results of the Inv2 test demonstrated a good (86.6%) concordance with those of the HC2 test, with an overall sensitivity and specificity of 96% for the Inv2 test. Additionally, the Inv2 assay, which offers high-throughput, semiautomated DNA extraction, allows the subgrouping of HPV types by differential probe sets, could provide a useful test for screening for HPV, and has the potential to provide an improved means of risk stratification and the selection of patients for further HPV subtyping.Longitudinal cytological follow-up of patients with a papanicolaou test interpretation of "atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance" that was followed by a negative reflex test for high-risk human papillomavirus types.The 2001 consensus guidelines essentially equated the follow-up management of patients with a Papanicolaou (Pap) test interpretation of negative for intraepithelial lesion or malignancy and those with an interpretation of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US) that was followed by a negative reflex test for high-risk human papillomavirus (HR HPV) types: follow-up cytology in 12 months. As several years have elapsed since these guidelines attained some measure of widespread implementation, we sought to determine whether, in routinely diagnosed cases, the full spectrum of follow-up cytological findings are indeed identical in these 2 groups. Clinical and pathological data of consecutive patients with a Pap test interpretation of ASC-US during a 6-week period (n = 587), in which reflex human papillomavirus testing was performed (n = 497) and in which HR HPV types were not detected (n = 300), were reviewed (study group). A randomly selected control group of 300 patients whose Pap tests were reported as negative (negative for intraepithelial lesion or malignancy) during the same period were similarly reviewed. The follow-up Pap tests were classified into the various Bethesda 2001 diagnostic categories, and both groups were compared. The average follow-up duration in the study and control groups was 26.03 and 25.9 months, respectively. When all of the follow-up Pap tests in each group (study, n = 555; control, n = 356) were used for the comparisons, patients in the study group were significantly more likely to have an abnormal follow-up Pap test result than the control group patients (24.9% vs 7.6%, P < 0.0001); this was primarily attributable to the more frequent repeat interpretations of ASC-US in the former group (20.5% vs 5.1%, P < 0.0001). The HR HPV detection rates in the follow-up ASC-US cases were not significantly different between the study and control groups. There were no significant differences between both groups regarding the diagnostic frequencies of low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion and atypical squamous cells-cannot exclude high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HGSIL). No examples of HGSIL or invasive cancer were identified in the follow-up of either group. All comparisons of statistical significance retained their significance when only 1 follow-up Pap test per patient, the most severe interpretation, was used. Our findings suggest that some significant differences exist between these 2 groups, most notably the comparatively increased frequency of repeat ASC-US interpretations in the study group. However, the extraordinary rarity of the most clinically significant interpretations of HGSIL and carcinoma in this setting can be confirmed because no such cases were identified during the follow-up of either group.[Application of high-risk human papillomavirus testing in women with abnormal cytology].To detect the high-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) infectious condition in women with abnormal cytology and evaluate its values in the screening of high grade squamous intraepithelial lesion.We used hybrid capture 2 (hc2) method to examine 949 patients with abnormal cervical cytology results [ > or =atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US) according to the 2001 The Bethesda System diagnosis criteria]. All subjects also received colposcopy for tissue studies.Among 949 patients with abnormal cytology, the diagnoses of atypical squamous cells (ASC), low grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL), and high grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HSIL) were made in 432, 310, and 207 patients, respectively. The high-risk HPV positive rate in ASC, LSIL, and HSIL were 40.3%, 44.8%, and 89.4%, respectively. The numbers of patients with pathologically confirmed results of negative intraepithelial lesion or malignancy (NILM), cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 1, 2, 3 (CIN 1, 2, 3), and squamous cell carcinoma (SCC) were 335, 388, 118, 101, and 7, and the high-risk HPV positive rate was 17.3%, 66.2%, 92.4%, 97.0%, and 100%, respectively. Among patients with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US), rate of HSIL in high-risk HPV positive group and negative group were 10.2% and 0.8%, respectively (P < 0.01). In screening HSIL, the sensitivities of cytology [ > or = ASC cannot exclude HSIL (ASC-H)] and cytology ( > or = ASC-H) plus high-risk HPV testing were 0.925 and 0.991, and the specificities were 0.510 and 0.748, respectively (P < 0.01). Sensitivitives of cytology ( > or = LSIL) and cytology (> or = LSIL) plus high risk HPV in detecting HSIL were 0.898 and 0.982, respectively, while the specificitives were 0. 567 and 0.779, respectively (P < 0.01).The positive rate of high-risk HPV increases with the gravity of cervical lesions. In patients with abnormal cervical cytology, high-risk HPV testing can improve the sensitivity and specificity in the screening of HSIL.Comparison of linear array and line blot assay for detection of human papillomavirus and diagnosis of cervical precancer and cancer in the atypical squamous cell of undetermined significance and low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion triage study.We evaluated Linear Array (LA), a newly commercialized PGMY09/11 L1 consensus primer PCR test that detects 37 human papillomavirus (HPV) genotypes by reverse line blot hybridization, for the detection of individual HPV genotypes and carcinogenic HPV and its clinical performance for detecting 2-year cumulative cervical precancer and cancer using archived specimens from the Atypical Squamous Cell of Undetermined Significance (ASCUS) and Low-Grade Squamous Intraepithelial Lesion Triage Study. LA testing was conducted on enrollment specimens from women referred because of an ASCUS Pap test. To gauge the performance of the new test, the results were compared to those of its prototype predecessor assay, Line Blot Assay (LBA), restricted to paired results (n = 3,335). LA testing was done masked to LBA results and clinical outcomes. The results of LA and LBA testing were compared for detection of carcinogenic HPV and clinical outcomes of cervical precancer and cancer. Overall, 50% and 55% of the women tested positive for carcinogenic HPV by LBA and LA, respectively (P < 0.0001). The percent agreement for carcinogenic HPV detection was 88%, percent positive agreement was 80%, and kappa was 0.76 for detection of carcinogenic HPV by the two assays. There was a significant increase in detection by LA for most of the 37 HPV genotypes targeted by both assays, including for 13 of 14 carcinogenic HPV genotypes. LA detected more multiple-genotype infections for all HPV genotypes among HPV-positive women (P < 0.0001) and for carcinogenic HPV genotypes among carcinogenic-HPV-positive women (P < 0.0001). LA was more sensitive (92.3% versus 87.1%; P = 0.003) and less specific (48.2% versus 54.0%; P < 0.0001) than LBA for 2-year cumulative cervical precancer and cancer as diagnosed by the Pathology Quality Control Group. In conclusion, we found LA to be a promising assay for the detection of HPV genotypes and carcinogenic HPV, and it may be clinically useful for the detection of cervical precancer and cancer in women with equivocal cytology.[The clinical significance and management of cervico-cytologically diagnosed ASCUS/LSIL].To investigate the clinical significance and management of ASCUS/LSIL.254 patients who were examined with cervical cytology in the Cancer Institute and Hospital Chinese Academy of Medical Sciences were ASCUS/LSIL, of whom 136 cases underwent colposcopy, Data were analyzed retrospectively according to the golden criterion of pathology outcome.140 cases were ASCUS, and 114 cases were LSIL. Cervical intra-epithelial neoplasia (CIN) were diagnosed in 51.5% of patients with ASCUS, compared with 59.6% of patients with LSIL (P>0.05). High-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia were diagnosed in 22.9% of patients with ASCUS, compared with 30.7% of patients with LSIL (P >0.05). In the 136 patients examined with colposcopy, inflammation was found in 47 cases, low-grade intraepithelial lesion in 53 cases, High-grade intraepithelial lesion in 36 cases. The pathological results show inflammation in 55 cases, low-grade intraepithelial lesion in 41 cases, High-grade intraepithelial lesion in 40 cases (Kappa=0.314, U=0.064, P less than 0.05). CIN were diagnosed in 79% (67/84) of HPV-positive patients identified by pathology, compared with 43.5% (74/170) of HPV-negative patients (chi2=29.88 P less than 0.05). 83.5% of 254 patients were between 35 to 55 years old, and that was consistent with HPV-positive women age peak.Patients with ASCUS should be paid the same attention with LSIL patients and colposcopy examination should be done immediately to avoid missed diagnosis and missed follow-up examination, especially for HPV positive patients between 35 to 55 years old.Outcome of "Atypical squamous cells" in a cervical cytology screening program: implications for follow up in resource limited settings.(1) To study the incidence and outcome of "Atypical squamous cells (ASC)" diagnosis in a hospital based cytology screening programme. (2) To work out a feasible strategy for follow up of Atypical squamous cells-undetermined significance (ASC-US) and Atypical squamous cells-cannot exclude high grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (ASC-H) in resource limited settings. A total of 29,475 women were screened cytologically through Pap tests. The epithelial cell abnormalities (ECA) detected on screening were reviewed by the cytopathologists and classified according to Bethesda 2001 system. The women with ASC-US reports were followed up by two repeat cytology tests at 3 and 6 months of the initial visit. The persistent ASC-US cases or the cases which revealed squamous intraepithelial lesion (SIL) on follow up smears; as well as all ASC-H and above cases were referred for coloposcopic evaluation. ASC diagnosis comprised 3.6% of all reports. These were qualified as ASC-US (3.36%) and ASC-H (0.22%). On follow up, only 7 CIN 2 or worse (3.2%) lesions were detected on 218 biopsies in ASC-US category while in ASC-H qualifier 16 CIN 2 and above lesions (30.8%) were picked up on 52 colposcopic biopsies. The difference between ASC-US and ASC-H categories for a CIN 2 or worse outcome was highly significant (P < 0.001). ASC-H qualifier has a high likelihood for an ominous histological outcome and warrants an immediate colposcopic evaluation. On the other hand, ASC-US cases can be managed conservatively by repeat cytology tests at regular intervals without a significant risk of missing a high grade lesion. Diligent screening of cervical smears can judiciously downgrade some cases overcalled as ASC because of inflammatory atypia and thereby reduce referrals in geographic settings with high prevalence of reproductive tract infections. High risk HPV (HR HPV) testing may be a useful adjunct to further reduce referrals by selecting the women who require colposcopic evaluation.A human papillomavirus testing system in women with abnormal Pap results: a comparison study with follow-up biopsies.To evaluate the efficacy of INFORM HPV using the SurePath collection method in women whose Pap tests indicated abnormal results.Ninety-two women from the gynecology clinics at The University of Texas M.D. Anderson Cancer Center who had Pap tests and underwent follow-up biopsies were selected for the study. This included 51 women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS), 23 women with low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL), 15 women with high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HSIL) and 3 women with negative Pap results. The INFORM HPV, an in situ hybridization assay, testing for oncogenic types of HPV was performed, and the results were compared with follow-up biopsies.The positive rate of the INFORM HPV increased with higher grades of cytology diagnoses. The sensitivity of the INFORM HPV testing for predicting high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN 2/3) also increased with higher grades of cytology diagnoses. A negative predictive value (NPV) of 94.9% and a specificity of 80.4% for predicting CIN 2/3 were observed in the ASCUS group.Using SurePath Pap specimens, the INFORM HPV lacks sufficient sensitivity and NPV for predicting CIN 2/3 in women with ASCUS. Therefore, use of the test as a triage tool is limited.Outcomes of women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance and high-risk human papillomavirus DNA.To study the risk of high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HSIL) and cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) 2 or 3 in women with human papillomavirus (HPV)-positive atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) cytology over a 2-year period using the 2001 Bethesda System and ThinPrep Paps.In 2002, 846 patients with ThinPrep cervical cytology having an ASCUS interpretation and positive for high-risk HPV DNA were identified. A cohort of 514 (60.8%) patients with follow-up by repeat cytology, cervical biopsy or both was included in the study. Patient age was 12-81 years, with a median of 25 years.There were 291 women (56.6%) with negative status by cytology, HPV testing or biopsy with a median interval of 8.5 months, and an additional 174 patients (33.9%) had persistent ASCUS, positive HPV DNA or low-grade SIL/CIN 1. Finally, 49 patients (9.5%) had CIN 2 or 3, with a median interval of 8.5 months.Our study suggests that HSIL or CIN 2 or 3 will be detected in 1 in 10 women with HPV-positive index ASCUS cervical cytology at initial colposcopy or within a 2-year follow-up period.Comparative evaluation of smear cytology & hybrid capture II for the diagnosis of cervical cancer.There is no ideal screening method for cervical cancer in India with the role of human papilloma virus (HPV) detection yet to be established. This study was undertaken to compare the diagnostic accuracy of HPV testing by hybrid capture II (HC-II) with conventional cervical smear cytology for squamous intraepithelial lesions (SIL).This prospective study was conducted at New Delhi during 2003-2004 with patients selected from the gynaecology out patients of the All India Institute of Medical Sciences. Initial screening by a questionnaire and per-speculum examination were used to select high-risk patients. Patients, in whom conventional cytology, HC-II test and colposcopy-directed biopsy were done, formed the basis of this study.Of the 133 patients included in the study, incidence on biopsy of low grade SIL (L-SIL) was 6.77 per cent, high grade SIL (H-SIL) was 8.27 per cent and carcinoma was 3.00 per cent. Sensitivity and specificity of cytology for detection of H-SIL and above lesions was 93.33 and 83.49 per cent while for HC-II it was 93.33 and 90.83 per cent, respectively. HC-II had higher diagnostic accuracy of 91.13 per cent versus 84.68 per cent for cytology. Kappa for HC-II was higher (0.67) than cytology (0.52). Among patients diagnosed to have atypical squamous cells (ASC-US & ASC-H) and L-SIL, HC-II helped to select patients who had significant lesions on biopsy.The main utility of HC-II is in the triage of patients with cytology smear diagnosis of ASC-US, ASC-H or L-SIL, for referral to colposcopic examination. HC-II alone has the best diagnostic accuracy but owing to high cost it is unsuitable for general screening in developing countries. Combining HC-II with cytology will refer smaller numbers for colposcopy,improving efficient utilization of available resources.Comparison of the AMPLICOR human papillomavirus test and the hybrid capture 2 assay for detection of high-risk human papillomavirus in women with abnormal PAP smear.Infection with human papillomavirus (HPV) is a necessary step in the progression to cervical cancer. Many methods for HPV testing are currently available, mostly developed to detect pools of HPV types. Hybrid Capture 2 (HC2) is one of the most widely used. A new PCR-based assay, the Roche AMPLICOR HPV test, has been recently developed. Both assays recognize a group of 13 HR HPV types contemporaneously. This study evaluated the performance of both methods for detecting high-grade cervical lesions as a part of management for abnormal PAP smears. The study population was composed of 213 women, all referred to colposcopy and histologic diagnosis following an abnormal PAP test. Biopsy-confirmed high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia was used as a gold standard. Overall agreement was 84.9% with a kappa value of 0.6. When comparing the ability to detect moderate cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN2+) and high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN3+/cancer), AMPLICOR proved slightly more sensitive than HC2, a finding that is important when HPV testing is used in a triage of borderline smear results. Genotyping of discordant results showed a prevalence of LR-HPV types in HC2 positive/AMPLICOR negative samples, and a similar prevalence of HR- and LR-HPV types in AMPLICOR positive/HC2 negative samples. In conclusion, the study shows that the AMPLICOR assay is more sensitive than HC2, which makes it a valid alternative for routine clinical use.HPV triage testing or repeat Pap smear for the management of atypical squamous cells (ASCUS) on Pap smear: is there evidence of process utility?A two-stage standard gamble was used to evaluate women's preferences for alternative managements of atypical squamous cells of undermined significance (ASCUS) on Pap smear (repeat Pap smear compared with immediate HPV test), and to test for the evidence of process utility. Women's utilities for the health state scenarios were clustered towards the upper end of the 0-1 scale with considerable variability in women's preferences. There was evidence of process utility, with immediate human papillomavirus (HPV) testing strategies having lower valuations than repeat Pap smear, where the clinical outcome was the same. Mean (95% CI) utilities for HPV testing (negative test) followed by resolution were 0.9967 (0.9957-0.9978) compared with repeat Pap smear followed by resolution: 0.9972 (0.9964-0.9980). Mean (95% CI) utilities for immediate HPV testing (positive test), followed by colposcopy, biopsy and treatment were 0.9354 (0.8544-1.0) compared with repeat Pap smear followed by colposcopy, biopsy and treatment: 0.9656 (0.9081-1.0). Our results add to the existing evidence that the impact of healthcare interventions on well-being is not limited to the effect of the intervention on the health outcomes expected from the intervention; process of care can have quality of life implications for the individual. A modelled application of trial-based data will allow characterisation of the true population costs, benefits, risks and harms of alternative triage strategies and subsequent policy implications thereof.ASC-US diagnosis and triage.Resolution of equivocal results with the Hybrid Capture II high-risk HPV DNA test: a cytologic/histologic review of 191 cases.The Hybrid Capture II (HC II, Digene) high-risk human papilloma virus (HPV) (hrHPV) DNA test is an in vitro nucleic acid hybridization assay that uses enhanced chemiluminescence for the qualitative and semiquantitative detection of hrHPV in cervical samples. Patient samples are concomitantly tested with positive and negative DNA controls and results reported as positive or negative on the basis of a ratio of relative light units to a cutoff value derived from the positive control (RLU/CO). Samples with a ratio <1.0 RLU/CO are expressed as negative for hrHPV, samples with a ratio >2.5 RLU/CO are expressed as positive for hrHPV, and samples with a ratio between these numbers are submitted for retesting. These "equivocal" values are resulted as positive for hrHPV if either of 2 subsequent test values equals or exceeds 1.0 RLU/CO. Samples that show <1.0 RLU/CO after 2 repeat tests are resulted as negative for hrHPV.In this study, we evaluated all hrHPV test results over a 17-month period in our institution. Initial tests showing an equivocal result were analyzed for final retesting result, and for all corresponding and subsequent cytology and histology results. All hrHPV tests were conducted on SurePath (TriPath) or ThinPrep (Cytyc) cervical cytology specimens using the HC II hrHPV DNA test. Subsequent hrHPV tests also were correlated with incident and follow-up findings.A total of 4792 hrHPV test results were evaluated. Of these, 191 (4%) showed equivocal initial results. When retested, 178 of the 191 samples (93%) resulted positive for hrHPV on first retest and an additional 8 resulted positive for hrHPV on the second retest, bringing the total positive tests to 186 out of 191 (97.4%). Five samples (2.6%) out of 191 were finally expressed as negative for hrHPV. Corresponding cytologic interpretations for the 191 specimens were as follows: NILM-30, atypical squamous cell of undetermined significance (ASC-US)-138, atypical squamous cells--cannot exclude HSIL-13 (ASC-H-13), LSIL-9, and high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HSIL)-1. Follow-up histology was available for 60 of the 191 equivocal cases and showed cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) II or CIN III in 7 cases, CIN I in 13 cases, and negative or reactive changes in 40 cases.On the basis of the results, repeat testing of equivocal specimens might not be necessary as these specimens are overwhelmingly found to be positive for hrHPV. Additionally, hrHPV tests falling in the equivocal range should be considered as definite positive tests, as follow-up results in this cohort demonstrate that significant histologic abnormalities are associated with 10.5% of these cases (20/191), and with 33% of those biopsied (20/60) cases.Management and triage of women with human papillomavirus infection in follow-up for low-grade cervical disease: association of HPV-DNA and RNA-based methods.Type-specific persistent infection with Human Papillomavirus (HPV) is a significant risk factor for the development of cervical diseases. Persistent infection could be further refined by a sequencing approach to detect early cervical lesions that are at high risk of developing an invasive squamous cervical cancer. The aim of the present study is to investigate the clinical utility of detecting mRNA transcripts of HPV oncogenes E6/E7 by using a Real-time NASBA technology (mRNA test) and to identify women with low-grade cytological disease but with an increased risk of developing high-grade cervical abnormalities or invasive squamous cervical cancer. Our preliminary results show that E6/E7 is detected in only a subset of HR-HPV-positive cases. Since viral persistence is considered to be the true precursor of neoplastic progression, only the detection of E6/E7 mRNA can identify the infection which is more likely to persist and induce neoplasia in future. For these reasons we believe that this test would be useful for the characterization of women with HR-HPV DNA positivity who should be effectively treated because at high-risk of developing a high grade cervical lesion or an invasive squamous cervical cancer.Visual appearance of the uterine cervix: correlation with human papillomavirus detection and type.Infection with carcinogenic human papillomaviruses (HPVs) is necessary for cervical precancer and cancer, but the effects of type-specific HPV infection on cervical appearance are poorly understood.Twenty expert colposcopists evaluated a total of 939 digitized cervigrams that were obtained during the ASCUS (atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance)-LSIL (low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion) Triage study after the application of 5% acetic acid. Each reviewer rated the number and severity of lesions in 112 pictures that were matched on histologic diagnoses and HPV typing results so that > or = 2 reviewers rated each image. We used standard tests of association and correlation to relate HPV type and visual appearance.Pairs of reviewers were significantly (P < .05) more likely to agree that a definite lesion was present when HPV DNA was found, particularly HPV16, regardless of histologic diagnosis. However, the link between infection status and visual appearance was weak for each individual reviewer. Interestingly, many women with multiple HPV infections had no visible lesions and vice versa.HPV16 causes more definite visual abnormalities than other HPV types, regardless of eventual histologic diagnosis. Otherwise, the associations between HPV infection and lesion recognition are weak.Risk of precancer and follow-up management strategies for women with human papillomavirus-negative atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance.To investigate the relative performances of follow-up cytology and carcinogenic human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA testing among carcinogenic HPV-negative women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS), for detection of cervical precancer.Twelve-month follow-up management strategies to detect cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 3 (CIN3) or worse using cytology or HPV testing or both were compared among women with HPV-negative ASCUS in the Atypical Squamous Cells of Undetermined Significance-Low-Grade Squamous Intraepithelial Lesion (ASCUS-LSIL) Triage Study.Overall only 22 of 1,559 (1.4%) HPV-negative ASCUS women developed CIN grade 3 or worse during follow-up compared with 269 of 1,767 (15.2%) HPV-positive ASCUS women (P<.001). Because of the low risk of disease among HPV-negative ASCUS women, only 7 cases of CIN3 were diagnosed between 12 and 24 months of follow-up, limiting power to distinguish meaningful differences in sensitivity among 12-month testing strategies. The specificity of HPV testing (84%) was significantly higher than cytology using an ASCUS threshold (71%) (P<.001). Cotesting with cytology and HPV testing at 12 months resulted in even lower specificity (61%). Because cases were uncommon, the positive predictive value for subsequent CIN3 or worse was low for cytology (2.6%), Hybrid Capture 2 (3.8%), and cotesting with cytology and HPV testing (2.2%). The negative predictive value for all three management strategies was very high (99.70%, 99.82%, and 100.0% for HPV testing, cytology, or cotesting, respectively.)Women with HPV-negative ASCUS have very low absolute risk of subsequently detected CIN3 or worse in the subsequent 2 years, similar to women with a negative cytology in the absence of HPV testing. The results suggest that women with HPV-negative ASCUS should return to routine screening intervals which may be longer than 1 year depending on age and screening history. However, if increased surveillance is chosen, a single HPV test for carcinogenic types at 12 months has significantly higher specificity and lower referrals than cytology.Comparison of the Digene Hybrid Capture 2 assay and Roche AMPLICOR and LINEAR ARRAY human papillomavirus (HPV) tests in detecting high-risk HPV genotypes in specimens from women with previous abnormal Pap smear results.The development of cervical cancer is strongly associated with the presence of persistent high-risk (HR) human papillomavirus (HPV) infection. Recently, the commercially manufactured PCR-based Roche AMPLICOR (AMP) and LINEAR ARRAY (LA) HPV tests have become available for HPV detection. However, knowledge of their clinical performance compared to the U.S. Food and Drug Administration-approved Hybrid Capture 2 (HC2) assay is limited. This study evaluated the concordance between the HC2, AMP, and LA tests in detecting HR-HPV among a cohort of 1,679 women with previous abnormal Pap smear results. Overall, 1,393 specimens (81.3%) generated concordant results for HR-HPV presence or absence by the three assays. The concordance levels were substantial between the HC2 and AMP tests (84.4%, kappa = 0.6419) and between the HC2 and LA tests (84.0%, kappa = 0.6341) and nearly perfect between the AMP and LA tests (97.8%, kappa = 0.9441). HR-HPV prevalence, as detected by the AMP or LA tests, was significantly higher among women with cytological or histological high-grade disease (CIN2 or greater) than that detected by HC2 (P < 0.0001). The AMP and LA tests exhibited greater sensitivity, but lower specificity, than HC2 for detecting HR-HPV among this cohort of women with underlying cervical abnormalities, particularly among subjects with histologically proven high-grade disease. Both PCR-based HPV tests may be valuable in the management of care for women with underlying cervical abnormalities, in predicting treatment success, and in studying the clearance or acquisition of new infections.HPV DNA testing as an adjunct in the management of patients with low grade cytological lesions in Finland.Patients with recurrent low grade cytological abnormalities are at increased risk for high grade lesions. We wanted to see whether these patients could be identified by HPV DNA and pap tests.A prospective study of 663 patients referred for a colposcopy on the basis of ASC-US or LSIL cytology. High-risk HPV DNA positivity and cytology were compared with histology.In total 65.6% samples were positive for HC2, and the overall proportion of CIN2+ lesions was 14.6%. No CIN2+lesions were found in patients testing HC2-, pap-. There were 5/97 (5.2%) high grade lesions, which were HC2-negative but pap-positive, including 1 cervical adenocarcinoma in situ. The corresponding histological sections were all positive for p16INK in immunostaining. In further analysis by PCR, 3 samples were positive for HPV DNA. High-risk HPV type 67, which is not included in the HC2 probe cocktail, was found in 1 case, and 2 cases were HPV positive but could not be typed. One CIN3 and one AIS remained HPV negative. In these 5 cases, the concomitant pap smear showed ASC-USx1, LSILx1, HSILx2 and AGCx1. During 6-month follow-up, a relatively high number of CIN2+(28/557, 5.0%) emerged from the non-CIN-CIN1 group.The HC2 test or pap test alone were not sensitive enough to detect all CIN2+lesions. A relatively high number of CIN2+cases emerged from the non-CIN-CIN1 group after 6 months. Adequate follow-up of patients with mild cytological abnormalities, including a repeat pap smear taken during colposcopy and control at 6 months is underscored. Combination of hrHPV DNA and pap test should be considered, since it had high negative predictive value.High-risk human papillomavirus DNA testing and high-grade cervical intraepithelial lesions.To explore the role of high-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA testing in the improvement of the recognition of cervical cancer and precancerous lesions in women with abnormal cervical cytology.A total of 2152 women with abnormal cervical cytology were submitted to both HPV DNA testing and biopsy guided by colposcopy and the results were correlated.Positive rate of high-risk HPV DNA in groups of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US), atypical squamous cells, cannot exclude high-grade (ASC-H), low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions and high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions was 53.7, 53.2, 84.6 and 93.0%, respectively. In each group, the detection rate of grade 2,3 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN 2,3) or cervical cancer in patients with positive HPV DNA was significantly higher than that with negative HPV DNA (P<0.05). In ASC-US group, the negative predictive value of high-risk HPV DNA testing for detection of CIN 2,3 and cervical cancer was 99.8% and the sensitivity 98%.HPV DNA testing is a useful indicator in the management of patients with ASC-US and plays an important role in the evaluation of risk for CIN 2,3 and cervical cancer.An economic analysis of human papillomavirus triage for the management of women with atypical and abnormal Pap smear results in Germany.We developed decision-analytic models to determine the cost effectiveness of incorporating human papillomavirus (HPV) testing into the management of atypical and abnormal Pap smear results in Germany. The models compare three management strategies: (1) repeat Pap smear, (2) triage with HPV DNA testing, or (3) immediate treatment. The primary outcome measure is incremental cost per case of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) 2+ detected and treated. The models take the perspective of the German health system. For patients with initial PapIIw, III, and IIId results, incremental cost effectiveness ratios for HPV triage versus repeat Pap smears are 2,232 euro, 815 euro, and 487 euro per additional case of CIN2+ detected and treated. In addition, the number of cases of CIN2+ detected and treated in a hypothetical population of 1,000 women increases from 17 to 35, 61 to 130, and 157 to 332 for each population, respectively. For patients with initial PapIII and IIId results, immediate treatment of 1,000 patients detects only four and 11 additional cases of CIN2+ versus HPV triage at incremental cost effectiveness ratios of 39,684 euro and 10,716 euro per case, respectively. For each of the populations evaluated, HPV triage is the most cost-effective management strategy versus either repeat Pap smear or immediate treatment.[Contribution of HPV sequences detection in cervical carcinoma screening].At the present time, Human Papillomaviruses (HPV) is a leading cause of squamous intraepithelial lesions (SIL) and invasive carcinoma of the cervix. The aim of this article was to review the main taxonomic and epidemiologic data on HPV infection and to assess the potential clinical implications of the different HPV tests in staging women with borderline cytologies (ASC-US; ASC-H; LSIL); for follow-up after treatment of high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN), for primary screening as the sole screening modality, or in association with cytology.HPV triage for low grade (L-SIL) cytology is appropriate for women over 35 in mass cervical cancer screening using liquid based cytology.In the experimental arm of a randomised trial, women were tested both for liquid-based cytology and human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA and referred for colposcopy if cytology was ASCUS (atypical cells of undetermined significance) or more severe. We considered those with ASCUS (757) or LSIL (low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions) (485) and a valid HPV test who received colposcopy. We computed sensitivity, specificity and ROC curves with different values of relative light units (RLU, that are related to viral load) as cut off, using cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 2 or more severe (CIN2+) at blind histology review as the endpoint. The area under the receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve was significantly less among women aged 25-34 years than in those older, both considering ASCUS/AGUS (atypical glandular cells of undetermined significance) (p=0.0355) and LSIL (p=0.0009). At age 35-60 the curves for ASCUS and LSIL were similar, while at age 25-34 the area under the curve for LSIL was significantly less than for ASCUS (p=0.0084). With LSIL cytology, specificity of Hybrid Capture 2 with 2 RLU cut-off was 35.0% (95%CI 28.4-42.1) at age 25-34 and 64.5% (95%CI 58.3-70.3) at age 35-60. In conclusion, triaging by HPV testing performed better in women aged over 35 years than those younger. For older women, HPV triaging should also be considered for managing those with LSIL cytology.Prospective evaluation of the Hybrid Capture 2 and AMPLICOR human papillomavirus (HPV) tests for detection of 13 high-risk HPV genotypes in atypical squamous cells of uncertain significance.The use of high-risk human papillomavirus (hrHPV) testing as an adjunct to cervical cytology in population-based screening programs is currently based on DNA hybridization and PCR assays. The aim of this study was to prospectively assess the diagnostic performance of the Hybrid Capture 2 test (HC2; Digene Corporation) in comparison with that of the recently developed PCR-based AMPLICOR HPV test (Roche Molecular Systems) for the detection of 13 hrHPV types. A reverse line blot hybridization assay (Innogenetics) was used as an internal reference standard in discordant cases. Two hundred seventy-one patients with atypical squamous cells of uncertain significance (ASCUS) in cervical samples underwent hrHPV testing. The chi-square test was performed to compare respective proportions. Totals of 160/271 (59%) and 156/271 (58%) were found to be positive for hrHPV with HC2 and AMPLICOR, respectively. Concordant results were obtained for 235 (86.7%) of the 271 samples (kappa statistic, 0.73 +/- 0.04). Considering types 26, 53, and 66 as oncogenic types, negative predictive values (NPVs) of HC2 and AMPLICOR were 92.8% and 87.8%, respectively (difference was not significant), and their respective accuracies were 94.8% and 91.9% (difference was not significant). Considering types 26, 53, and 66 as not oncogenic, the respective HC2 and AMPLICOR NPVs were 92.8% and 97.4% (difference was not significant), and accuracy was significantly higher for the AMPLICOR assay (95.9% versus 90.8% for HC2) (P<0.05). For ASCUS samples, the NPV was 92.8% for HC2 testing and might be compromised if the copy number of HPV DNA was low. The NPV was 97.4% for the AMPLICOR assay and might be compromised if HPV types 26, 53, and 66 were considered oncogenic. The accuracy of these two assays is good and is compatible with routine clinical use in the triage of ASCUS cases.A comparison of the clinical utility of p16(INK4a) immunolocalization with the presence of human papillomavirus by hybrid capture 2 for the detection of cervical dysplasia/neoplasia.Evidence suggests that overexpression of p16(INK4a) protein indicates infection and genomic integration of high-risk human papillomavirus (HR HPV) and predicts progression to cervical high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (HSILs) and carcinoma. The authors compared the ability of p16(INK4a) and HR HPV detection by Hybrid Capture 2 (HC2) to detect the presence of significant cervical disease. METHODS.: Four hundred ThinPrep specimens (100 each in 4 categories: 100 specimens that were negative for intraepithelial lesions, 100 specimens of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance [ASC-US], 100 specimens of low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions [LSILs], and 100 specimens of HSILs) were analyzed. p16(INK4a) protein was immunolocalized using a specific monoclonal antibody, and the detection of HR HPV in all 400 specimens was determined using HC2.p16(INK4a) was found to be positive in 78% of HSIL specimens, 42% of LSIL specimens, and 36% of ASC-US specimens; whereas HC2 was positive in 92% of HSIL specimens, 81% of LSIL specimens, and 45% of ASC-US specimens. In the HSIL category, the sensitivity, which was calculated using Grade 2 or greater cervical intraepithelial neoplasia as the endpoint, was 78% (50 of 66 specimens) for p16(INK4a) and 91% (60 of 66 specimens) for HC2. For LSIL, the sensitivity was 75% (3 of 4 specimens) for p16(INK4a) and 100% (4 of 4 specimens) for HC2. In the ASC-US category, the sensitivity was 89% (8 of 9 specimens) for p16(INK4a) and 100% (9 of 9 specimens) for HC2. Overall, the sensitivity for HSIL was 92% for HC2 and 78% for p16(INK4a). The specificity for HC2 was 8.3% for HSIL, 16.9% for LSIL, and 48.7% for ASC-US; whereas the specificity for p16(INK4a) was 25% in HSIL, 59.1% in LSIL, and 68.4% in ASC-US. The overall specificity was 25% for HC2 and 56% for p16(INK4a).Although both p16(INK4a) and HC2 may aid in the clinical management of patients with clinically significant lesions, HC2 was found to have greater sensitivity, and p16(INK4a) greater specificity. The labeling of normal cells and bacteria may preclude the use of p16(INK4a) in automated screening or nonmorphologic assays.Clinical utility of atypical glandular cells (AGC) classification: cytohistologic comparison and relationship to HPV results.To determine the utility of the category of atypical glandular cells (AGC) in the management of patients with putative cervical neoplasia and to correlate HPV-DNA test results when available.The Johns Hopkins Hospital cytopathology records of 50,668 women patients were searched for all liquid-based gynecologic cytology (LBP) results of Atypical Glandular cells of Undetermined Significance (AGUS) and AGC from January 1, 2001 through December 31, 2003, yielding 98 patients (0.19%). Oncogenic HPV-DNA tests were performed on the residual fluids of 43 of these patients, 37 of whom had follow-up biopsy. During the period of January 1, 2000 and December 31, 2002, we identified 237 patients (0.58%) with conventional Pap smears in the AGUS or AGC category, among 41,024 conventional smears collected contemporaneously. To avoid confusion in this paper, AGC will be used to replace those results that originally were AGUS.Following the 98 LBP AGC interpretations, 24 lesions (33.8%) were discovered out of 71 biopsies. HPV-DNA tests were performed on the residual of 43 LBPs, 18 (41.9%) were positive for oncogenic HPV. Only 37 patients had follow-up biopsy and 15 (40.5%) were positive for oncogenic HPV, of which 40% (6/15) had a significant lesion. Of the 237 conventional AGC Paps, 18 lesions (15.3%) were discovered out of 118 biopsies.Comparison of liquid-based and conventional Pap tests revealed a significant difference (33.8% vs. 15.3% respectively) (OR: 2.84, 95% CI: 1.4-5.73, p=0.004) in the detection of glandular and squamous lesions. HPV testing may prove beneficial to triage AGC patients with negative colposcopic findings and positive HPV results.Human papillomavirus genotypes and the cumulative 2-year risk of cervical precancer.Prospective data on the risks of cervical precancer associated with specific human papillomavirus (HPV) genotypes are limited.In 5060 women participating in the Atypical Squamous Cells of Undetermined Significance/Low-Grade Squamous Intraepithelial Lesions Triage Study (ALTS), we determined the cumulative 2-year risks of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) grade 2 or more severe (> or =CIN2) and of grade 3 or more severe (> or =CIN3) for 38 individual HPV genotypes, as detected by polymerase chain reaction.The most common HPV genotypes detected at baseline, in descending order of prevalence, were 16, 52, 51, 31, 18, 53, 39, 56, 62, 59, and 58. When detected as a single-type HPV infection, HPV-16 had a 2-year cumulative risk of 50.6% (95% confidence interval [CI], 44.1%-57.2%) for > or =CIN2 and 39.1% (95% CI, 32.9%-45.7%) for > or =CIN3. For other singly detected carcinogenic HPV types, the risk of > or =CIN2 ranged from 4.7% (for HPV-59) to 29.5% (for HPV-31), and the risk of > or =CIN3 ranged from 0.0% (for HPV-59) to 14.8% (for HPV-31). Multiple infections with HPV genotypes of different risk classes resulted in a risk that was similar to, and not significantly different from, the risk observed for the HPV genotype of the highest risk class.Genotype-specific HPV testing may be useful for identifying women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance and low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions who are at higher and lower risk of prevalent and incipient cervical precancer.Introducing HPV triage into the English cervical cancer screening program: consequences for participation.To predict the likely impact of adding human papillomavirus (HPV) triage for minor abnormalities on participation in the English cervical cancer screening program.Contingent valuations of the existing Pap program and a possible HPV-augmented screening program, obtained from questionnaires completed by 1141 women in east-central England.The value of participating in Pap screening was negatively associated with age, positively associated with educational level, and positively associated with the level of household income. Higher levels of worry about cervical cancer were associated with higher valuations of screening. Adding HPV-based triage to the Pap program lowered the value of screening participation for only two women, whereas for the sample as a whole, it increased the average valuation by about 47 percent. Supposedly-negative characteristics of HPV testing, when described, were expected to trigger psychosocial concerns in respondents and thereby give rise to significant decreases in valuations of participating in a Pap-plus-HPV program. For most women, however, such information changed their valuations of participation in screening little, if at all.Accepting the proposition that higher contingent valuations indicate stronger behavioural preferences, our results offer insubstantial grounds for believing that the inclusion of HPV triage would detrimentally affect participation in Pap screening for cervical cancer.Clinical implications of the diagnosis "atypical squamous cells, cannot exclude high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion" in pregnant women.Atypical squamous cells, cannot exclude high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (ASC-H) has a high predictive value for high-grade intraepithelial lesion (HSIL) in the general population. However, the significance of ASC-H in pregnant women remains to be elucidated. The objective of this study was to investigate the clinical implications and pathologic significance of ASC-H in pregnant women, so that these patients will be managed appropriately.All Papanicolaou tests that were diagnosed as ASC-H in pregnant women over 1.5 years (total, 60 women) were reviewed and correlated with histologic and/or cytologic follow-up. High-risk type of human papillomavirus (HPV) status was also correlated with follow-up findings. The following cytomorphologic parameters were evaluated for each woman and were compared between the squamous intraepithelial lesion (SIL) follow-up group and the benign follow-up group: inflammatory background, the number of atypical cells, cell arrangement pattern, nuclear irregularity/grooves, hyperchromasia, and cell shape.Among 30 women who had histologic follow-up, 3 women (10%) had HSIL, and 13 women (43%) had low-grade intraepithelial lesion (LSIL). Among 32 women who had cytologic follow-up, 2 women (6%) had HSIL, 3 women (9%) had LSIL, 1 woman (3%) had ASC-H, and 3 women (9%) had atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS). HPV was detected in 24 of 43 women (56%). The cytomorphologic features were similar in the SIL follow-up group and the benign follow-up group. No specific cytomorphologic features that predicted underlying SIL were identified.ASC-H in pregnant women had a lower predictive value for an underlying HSIL compared with the general population. A positive HPV test result was not a good indicator for an underlying SIL, but a negative result appeared to be useful for ruling out an underlying HSIL. Because of low positive predictive value for HSIL and the difficult colposcopic examination, a more conservative follow-up may be reasonable for pregnant women who have a diagnosis of ASC-H. HPV testing may be used as an adjunctive test.Reflex high-risk human papilloma virus DNA test is useful in the triage of women with atypical squamous cells cannot exclude high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion.This study is aimed to investigate the role of reflex high-risk human papilloma virus (HPV) DNA testing as an alternative triage method to colposcopy for women with atypical squamous cells cannot exclude high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (ASC-H) on Papanicolaou (Pap) tests. Reflex HPV DNA testing using Hybrid Capture II method was carried out on 88 women with ASC-H diagnosed by Thin Prep Pap test. Correlation with follow-up biopsies was available on 42 of these patients. The reflex HPV DNA test showed an overall positive rate of 67% and negative rate of 33% in 88 patients with ASC-H. Using age 30 as the cut off point, the positive rate had increased to 83.3% (35/42) in patients 30 yr or younger, while the positive rate for patients older than 30 yr had decreased to 52.2% (24/46). Follow-up colposcopic biopsy results were available in 35 of 59 HPV-positive women, which revealed 15 (43%) high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (HSIL), 12 low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (LSIL), and 8 negative for dysplasia. In 7 HPV-negative patients, the follow-up biopsies showed no evidence of HSIL or LSIL. Correlation between clinical risk factors and the HPV results demonstrated no significant differences in HPV positivity between the high-risk and low-risk patients. The high sensitivity (100%) and negative predictive rate (100%) in detecting HSIL in our study provide strong evidence that, instead of automatic referral to colposcopy, reflex HPV DNA testing may be used as an alternative triage method for women diagnosed with ASC-H on Thin Prep Pap test, especially for women older than 30 yr of age.Predicting absolute risk of CIN3 during post-colposcopic follow-up: results from the ASCUS-LSIL Triage Study (ALTS).At present, clinical management of women referred to colposcopy but found to have <CIN2 remains unclear. Using data from the ASCUS-LSIL Triage Study (ALTS) to inform clinical management, we calculated the absolute risk for developing CIN3 within 2 years of referral to an enrollment colposcopy.Women included in the analyses: (1) were initially referred to ALTS with a community cytologic interpretation of atypical squamous cell of undetermined significance (ASCUS) or low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (LSIL); (2) had a colposcopic evaluation and biopsy, if indicated, resulting in a diagnosis <CIN2; and, therefore (3) were followed without treatment. Results from subsequent human papillomavirus (HPV) testing, liquid-based cytology interpretations, and a second colposcopic evaluation at least 6 months after and within 2 years of the first colposcopic evaluation were used to calculate absolute risks for CIN3.Women with HPV-negative test results were at low risk for CIN3 regardless of other test results. Among HPV-positive women, increasing absolute risks of CIN3 were observed with increasing cytology severity: 7% (normal), 11% (ASCUS and LSIL), and 45% (HSIL). The highest absolute risk for CIN3 (67%) was observed for HPV-positive women with HSIL and a colposcopic impression of high-grade/cancer on the second colposcopy.In the ALTS population, after the first colposcopic diagnosis of <CIN2, clear risk stratification for CIN3 outcomes was obtained among women with a subsequent HPV-positive test. Because absolute risk for histologic CIN3 outcomes was high for women with HPV positive tests, HSIL cytology, and a high-grade impression at second colposcopy, it is worth considering whether this combination of findings might warrant immediate excisional therapy in some circumstances.Clinical significance of cytologic diagnosis of atypical squamous cells, cannot exclude high grade, in perimenopausal and postmenopausal women.We used cytohistologic correlation to determine the clinical significance of atypical squamous cells, cannot exclude high grade (ASC-H) in perimenopausal and postmenopausal women. A computer search identified 250 Papanicolaou smears from women older than 45 years with a diagnosis of ASC- H. Cases were considered perimenopausal (45 to < 55 years; 150 cases) and postmenopausal ((3)55 years; 100 cases). No follow-up data were available for 33 cases, which were excluded. The remaining 217 cases (perimenopausal, 127; postmenopausal, 90) had surgical or cytologic follow-up. Results of follow-up colposcopic biopsy were available for 176 (81.1%) and cytology for 41 (18.9%) women. Follow-up results were as follows: perimenopausal women, negative, 50 (39.4%); mild dysplasia (low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion [LSIL]), 46 (36.2%); high-grade dysplasia (high-grade SIL [HSIL]); 28 (22.0%); and ASC of undetermined significance (ASC-US), 3 (2.4%); postmenopausal women, negative, 52 (58%); LSIL, 31 (34%); HSIL, 5 (6%); and ASC-US, 2 (2%). The diagnosis of ASC-H in postmenopausal women usually is associated with LSIL or a negative diagnosis on follow-up, suggesting a less aggressive surveillance and treatment regimen is needed for postmenopausal women with ASC-H.Impact of reflex HPV testing on interpretation and management of ThinPrep Pap tests.HPV testing for high-risk types is the preferred method to triage women with atypical squamous cells (ASC) on ThinPrep Pap tests for management. The impact of this practice on the cytopathologists' interpretation is unknown. A significant percentage of providers at the Beth Israel Deaconess Medical Center (BIDMC) are not requesting reflex HPV testing. This offers a unique opportunity to examine its impact. Consecutive ThinPreps submitted to the cytology laboratory at the BIDMC for a 3-mo period were identified retrospectively. The ThinPreps were divided into those with a request for reflex HPV testing (reflex testing request group), those without such a request, and those with a request for HPV testing regardless of the diagnosis. Cytologic diagnoses, results of HPV testing and subsequent cervical biopsies within 6 mo after the ThinPrep were recorded and correlated in these cases. A total of 4,590 ThinPreps were processed during this period. 2,659 had a request for reflex HPV testing, 1,849 did not have such a request, and 82 had a request for HPV testing regardless of diagnosis. The numbers (%) of abnormal results in these three groups were 155 (5.8%), 141 (7.6%), and 22 (27%), respectively. The ASC:SIL ratios for these three groups were 1.2, 0.86, and 0.62, respectively. 38/71 (54%) women with ASC in the reflex testing request group were positive for high-risk HPV types. Of those with ASC in the reflex testing request and no request groups, 15/73 (21%) and 12/56 (21%) underwent biopsies with 2 (of 15) and 2 (of 12) showing HSIL on histology, respectively. Our study demonstrates that at our institution a request for reflex HPV testing did not significantly affect cytopathologists' interpretation of ThinPreps. Furthermore, HPV testing did not seem to have influenced the subsequent management of women with ASC diagnosis.Human papillomavirus type-specific 18-month risk of high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia in women with a normal or borderline/mildly dyskaryotic smear.High-risk human papillomavirus (hrHPV) DNA testing is an increasingly used instrument in cervical cancer prevention along cervical cytology. The inclusion of hrHPV testing in cervical screening requires efficient management as many hrHPV infections are transient. We investigated the potential value of hrHPV genotyping in normal and borderline/mildly dyskaryotic (BMD) smears.From a screening population of 44,102 women in the Netherlands, we included hrHPV-positive women with a normal or BMD smear. We assessed the type-specific 18-month risk of high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN).In hrHPV-positive women, 18-month risk of CIN grade 3 or invasive cancer (> or =CIN3) was 6% [95% confidence interval (95% CI), 4-9] after normal cytology and 20% (95% CI, 16-25) after BMD. If positive for HPV16, > or =CIN3 risks were 14% (95% CI, 9-21) and 37% (95% CI, 28-48), respectively. In the subset of hrHPV-positive women without HPV16, HPV18 was associated with an increased risk of high-grade CIN after normal cytology and HPV31 and HPV33 were associated with an increased risk, particularly after BMD. HPV16 and HPV18 were also associated with an increased risk of high-grade CIN in women with an hrHPV-positive normal baseline smear and a repeat normal smear at 6 months.HrHPV-positive women without type 16, 18, 31, or 33 had a relatively low risk of high-grade CIN. Among women with baseline normal cytology and among women with a baseline and repeat normal smear, HPV16/18-positive women showed an increased risk of high-grade CIN. This warrants more aggressive management of HPV16/18-positive women compared with other hrHPV-positive women.Atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance, human papillomavirus, and cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 2 or 3 in adolescents: ASC-US, age, and high-grade cervical neoplasia.To determine rates of and factors associated with cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) 2 or 3 among women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US) and oncogenic human papillomavirus (HPV) infection.This is a retrospective review of 357 women with ASC-US and known high-risk HPV infection. To be eligible for inclusion, patients had to have subsequently undergone colposcopic-directed cervical biopsy and/or endocervical sampling. Univariate and multivariable regression analyses were used to estimate crude and adjusted odds ratios of CIN 2 or 3 by risk factors associated with HPV and CIN.Thirty-three of 215 (15%) women with ASC-US and oncogenic HPV who underwent histological sampling demonstrated CIN 2 or 3. In the adjusted model, only nulliparity (adjusted odds ratio = 2.2, 95% CI = 1.0-4.8) retained a marginal association with the outcome. No significant age-related differences in the prevalence of high-grade disease emerged. The high-grade lesions seen in adolescents consisted of single, small lesions.In the light of these findings, and in conjunction with the high rate of oncogenic HPV infection among adolescents with ASC-US, both reflex HPV testing and immediate colposcopy do not appear to be of benefit in the initial management of teenagers with this cytological diagnosis.Trial of management of borderline and other low-grade abnormal smears (TOMBOLA): Trial design.Cervical screening reduces the risk of cervical cancer by detecting and treating cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN). The management of women with low-grade cervical abnormalities is controversial. Two management policies exist: repeat smears in primary care and colposcopy examination. It is not clear which of these is the more effective and efficient. There is also uncertainty as to the most effective and efficient management of women at colposcopy when an area of abnormality is seen on the cervix - immediate treatment or biopsy and selective recall for treatment if the biopsy result suggests this is necessary. The result of a human papillomavirus (HPV) test might assist in deciding the appropriate management of women with low-grade abnormalities. TOMBOLA, a pragmatic randomised-controlled trial set within the cervical screening programmes in Scotland and England, addresses these three areas of uncertainty. Almost four and a half thousand women aged 20-59 with a low-grade cervical abnormality have been recruited and randomised to either repeat smears or colposcopy examination. Women in the colposcopy arm of the trial are further randomised to a policy of either immediate treatment or biopsy and selective recall for treatment if they have an abnormal transformation zone. Women are followed up to an exit examination at 3 years. HPV testing is undertaken at recruitment and at the exit examination. The primary endpoint is cumulative incidence of CIN2/3. A range of other clinical, psychosocial and economic outcomes is being considered. This paper describes the design of the trial, and discusses the rationale underlying aspects of the design and the challenges faced in designing and implementing the trial.Analyses of atypical squamous cells refined by the 2001 Bethesda System: the distribution and clinical significance of follow-up management.This study was conducted to analyze the clinical significance of follow-up diagnostic methods of atypical squamous cells (ASC) (the 2001 Bethesda System) cases according to age. A computerized search of the cytology database was performed to retrieve all cases diagnosed as ASC from 2001 to 2003. The pathologic reports for all follow-up diagnoses were reviewed. We divided the patients into two groups according to their age, younger than 50 years of age and 50 years and older, and follow-up diagnoses were compared between the two groups. ASC was identified in 1035 (2.0%) of 49,882 women screened, and a total of 914 patients were eligible. In atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US) cases, colposcopically directed biopsy showed CIN I (CIN is cervical intraepithelial neoplasia) or higher grade lesions in 34.9% of cases younger than 50 years of age and in 17.4% of cases 50 years and older (P= 0.000). However, repeat Pap smears and human papillomavirus DNA testing showed no differences between the two groups. In contrast, the three methods did not exhibit significant difference between the two groups in patients with atypical squamous cells, cannot exclude high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (ASC-H) (P= 0.743). Colposcopically directed biopsy for the ASC-US was more useful in patients younger than 50 years of age than in those who were 50 years and older. It is suggested that age should be considered in deciding follow-up diagnostic methods in patients with ASC-US.Performance of Pap smear and human papilloma virus testing in the follow-up of women with cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 1 managed conservatively.Conservative management (follow-up) of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 1 (CIN1) is acceptable, but evidence on performance of follow-up tools, such as Pap smear and human papilloma virus (HPV) test, is still needed.A cohort of 78 women with histologically confirmed CIN1, referred because of atypical squamous cell or low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion in their Pap smear, was enrolled between August 2000 and September 2002 and was prospectively followed-up at 6 and 12 months, until September 2003. Follow-up examinations included Pap test and Hybrid Capture II (HCII) with high-risk HPV, colposcopy, and cervical biopsies in patients with persistent abnormalities. Odds ratios and performance indicators (with 95% confidence interval) were calculated for HPV and Pap test results in detecting biopsy-confirmed CIN during the follow-up.Thirty-seven (47%) of the women were HPV-positive at baseline. At first follow-up visit, 30 women had persistent CIN1 and one woman progressed to CIN2; 15 patients had CIN1 and one patient CIN2 at the second follow-up visit. Women with persistent CIN1 (or progression) during follow-up had a significantly higher HPV detection rate and abnormal Pap tests, compared to women with regressive disease. Cytology had a far better sensitivity in detecting CIN than HCII at the first follow-up visit (81 versus 52%, respectively), whereas both examinations had equivalent sensitivities at the second follow-up visit (69 and 56%, respectively). Cytology had a superior negative predictive value at the first follow-up visit and better positive predictive value, in addition, at the second visit.Because cytological abnormalities correlated generally better with the persistence of biopsy-confirmed CIN1 in this follow-up protocol, HCII test is the second-hand option to Pap test, but the use of both Pap and HCII together seems an unnecessary waste of resources.Human papillomavirus triage for young women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance.Human papillomavirus testing is a cost-effective strategy for the management of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance. Young women have a high prevalence of transient human papillomavirus infections and low incidence high-grade cervical lesions, which may limit the usefulness of human papillomavirus testing in this cohort. We sought to estimate the usefulness of human papillomavirus testing for young women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance.A retrospective study of women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance was undertaken. Reflex human papillomavirus results and pathologic follow-up were evaluated. Age-stratified rates of human papillomavirus positivity, rates of high-grade dysplasia, and sensitivity and specificity were estimated.A total of 1,290 women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance cytology were identified. The rate of human papillomavirus positivity decreased with age from 55% for those aged 25 years or younger to 12% for women aged older than 50 years (P < .001). The cumulative rate of high-grade lesions increased with age; 12% for patients aged 25 years or younger compared with 24% for women aged older than 50 years (P = .05). A negative human papillomavirus test more effectively excluded high-grade disease in the young women. No high-grade lesions were detected in the human papillomavirus negative women aged 25 years or younger compared with 3.8% of those aged older than 50 years (P = .04). The sensitivity for detection of high-grade disease was higher in women aged younger than 25 years compared with those aged older than 50 years (100% compared with 50%), whereas specificity was lower (14% compared with 44%).Given the high prevalence of human papillomavirus and low occurrence of high-grade lesions in young women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance, a human papillomavirus-based triage strategy will result in the referral of a large number of women for colposcopy and may limit its cost-effectiveness.III.[Assessment of human papillomavirus testing on liquid-based Cyto-screen system for women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance. Effect of age].Analyse the performance of human papillomavirus testing with hybrid capture II on liquid-based CYTO-screen system for women diagnosed with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance according to the age.Were included all women diagnosed with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance for whom human papillomavirus testing was performed and cytological and histological procedures were available over a follow-up period of 6 to 18 months.Human papillomavirus testing was performed in 3,047 patients, and results were compared to cytological and histological follow-up diagnosis in 1,880 cases (61.7%). The sensitivity for diagnosing cervical intraepithelial neoplasia was 93.3% in women less than 30 of age and 89.7% in women more than 30 of age. Specificity was 44.9% in women less than 30 of age and 64.4% in women more than 30 of age. Likelihood ratios confirmed these results as they show a low discriminatory power in case of positive result specifically in women less than 30 of age but an excellent performance in case of negative result.The use of human papillomavirus testing after a diagnosis of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance with the residual material of Cyto-screen system is a possible triage procedure to identify patients needing a colposcopy. Its specificity is better for women over 30.Usefulness of combining testing for p16 protein and human papillomavirus (HPV) in cervical carcinoma screening.To evaluate the value of the combination of p16 and HPV detection in the screening for cervical cancer.186 patients with previous abnormal cervical lesion were studied. After colposcopic examination, two conventional Pap slides were prepared: the first was Papanicolaou-stained and examined by cytologist; the second was immunocytochemically stained for p16. Cervical cells were collected by brush using for HPV detection by Hybrid Capture II. Biopsy of any colposcopically abnormal lesions was performed.The 186 cervical samples were classified cytologically as normal (148), ASCUS (13), low-grade (11), high-grade (12) dysplasia and squamous cell carcinoma (2). P16 and HPV were found in all high-grade dysplasia and SCC, and in 64% and 27% of low-grade dysplasia, 62% and 0% of ASCUS and 7.4% and 3.4% of normal, respectively. 18 of p16-positive cases (11%) were HPV-negative, 14 of them in the ASCUS and normal group. Compared to histological results, all of the p16-positive cases of squamous metaplasia, CIN II/III and SCC were HR-HPV-positive. Therefore, the cases that were positive for both with normal cytology (5 cases) or low-grade dysplasia (3 cases) may comprise a high-risk group for neoplastic change.The combination of p16 and HPV detection may be useful in cervical cancer screening to identify high-risk patients requiring early and proper management.Effect of HIV infection on atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance.Detection of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) is a cervical cytologic finding that is suggestive but not definitive of squamous intraepithelial lesions (SILs).We examined the risk, characteristics, and progression of ASCUS in women with and without human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) infection. Cervical Papanicolou (Pap) test and colposcopy data were obtained at the first 10 semiannual visits for the HIV Epidemiology Research study of 774 HIV-infected and 480 demographically similar, HIV-uninfected women in the United States. Multiple logistic regression models and Cox proportional hazards models were utilized.ASCUS was more common among HIV-infected women (odds ratio [OR], 1.6 [95% confidence interval {CI}, 1.3-2.0] to 2.6 [95% CI, 1.9-3.6]) after adjustment for human papillomavirus (HPV) infection and other risk factors (e.g., race, condyloma, and prior Pap test result). Among women with normal Pap test results at enrollment, the cumulative incidence of ASCUS was 78% among HIV-infected women and 38% among HIV-uninfected women. HIV-infected and HIV-uninfected women with ASCUS did not differ by prevalence of indices of inflammation (inflammation on Pap test and leukocytes on cervical gram stain). HPV infection, including high risk types, was more common among HIV-infected women with ASCUS. Among women with ASCUS, 60% of HIV-infected and 25% of HIV-uninfected women developed SILs (P < .01). Compared with HIV-infected women with higher CD4+ lymphocyte counts, HIV-infected women with CD4+ lymphocyte counts < 200 cells/microL were more likely to present subsequently with a SIL detected by Pap test (OR, 1.7; 95% CI, 0.8-3.6).Higher risk of SIL following the appearance of ASCUS among HIV-infected women, especially women with low CD4+ lymphocyte counts, supports the need for follow up with colposcopy and histologic examination, as indicated, to allow early detection and treatment of SIL.High-risk human papillomavirus DNA testing: a marker for atypical glandular cells.Cervical/endocervical cytology screening has decreased morbidity and mortality, and implementing adjunctive human papilloma virus (HPV) DNA testing for atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance has improved the specificity for detecting premalignant squamous lesions. Currently, there are no guidelines to perform HPV DNA testing on cervical/endocervical ThinPreps with atypical glandular cells (AGC). To assess the potential role of HPV DNA testing on AGC cases, Hybrid Capture 2 (Digene Corp.) testing was performed on 144 cervical/endocervical AGC specimens. One hundred three of 144 cases had follow-up; 60/103 (58.3%) were high-risk HPV negative and 43/103 (42.3%) were high-risk HPV positive. Of 43 HPV-positive patients, 37 had adenocarcinoma in situ (AIS), atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS), or cervical squamous intraepithelial neoplasia, while only one patient without high-risk HPV had a squamous intraepithelial neoplasia. Furthermore, most high-risk HPV positive AGC cases harbored high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HSIL) rather than AIS. Our data support HPV DNA testing of all AGC specimens to detect cervical, especially squamous, neoplasia.Role of human papillomavirus DNA testing in management of women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance.To find the sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of the high-risk group human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA testing as a triage tool to detect high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (HSILs, ie, cervical intraepithelial neoplasia [CIN] 2 or worse) in women with a cytologic smear showing atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US). All new cases with cytologic smears showing ASC-US that presented in King Chulalongkorn Memorial Hospital from January 2003 to November 2003, excluding known cases of HSILs and pregnancies, were enrolled. Cervical cell samplings were done by cervical cytobrush technique and tested for high-risk group HPV with the Hybrid Capture 2 (HC2) test. All participants were examined under a colposcope. Then cervicographs were taken before colposcopic-directed cervical biopsies were done. Of the 90 ASC-US cases enrolled, the pathologic results were normal in 30.0%, squamous metaplasia in 16.7%, CIN 1 in 37.8%, CIN 2 in 1.1%, CIN 3 in 11.1%, and microinvasive cervical carcinoma in 3.3%. The prevalence of HSILs and the prevalence of high-risk HPV detection were 15.6% and 38.9%, respectively. Using pathologic results from cervical biopsy as the gold standard, the HC2 has the sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of 85.7%, 69.7%, 34.3%, and 96.4%, respectively, to detect HSILs. High-risk group HPV detection can be used as an additional triage test to detect HSILs in women having ASC-US with high sensitivity and negative predictive value.Distribution of human papillomavirus types in ThinPrep Papanicolaou tests classified according to the Bethesda 2001 terminology and correlations with patient age and biopsy outcomes.A survey of the distribution of human papillomavirus (HPV) types across the spectrum of cervical cytologic categories defined by the Bethesda 2001 guidelines was conducted with the objective of examining how HPV detection by polymerase chain reaction (PCR) analysis may benefit the management of patients who have abnormal Papanicolaou (Pap) test results.DNA samples from women with no intraepithelial lesion or malignancy (NLM) (n = 300 samples); atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US) (n = 200 samples); low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL) (n = 200 samples); atypical squamous cells, cannot rule out high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (ASC-H) (n = 200 samples); and high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HSIL) (n = 200 samples) were tested for HPV using a modified general primer (GP)5+/GP6+ PCR assay and dot-blot hybridization with type-specific oligonucleotide probes (PCR assay analytical sensitivity: 1-100 copies of HPV, depending on the HPV type, in a background of 100 ng human DNA).HPV was detected in 27% of NLM samples, in 89.5% of ASC-US samples, in 97.5% of LSIL samples, in 93% of ASC-H samples, and in 96.5% of HSIL samples. Thirty-seven different HPV types were identified in total. One or more of 13 high-risk (HR) HPV types (16, 18, 31, 33, 35, 39, 45, 51, 52, 56, 58, 59, and 68) were detected in 53% of samples that were diagnosed as ASC-US (59.0% of patients younger than age 30 yrs; 45.5% of patients age 30 yrs and older), in 55.5% of samples that were diagnosed as LSIL (60.0% of patients younger than age 30 yrs; 44.0% of patients age 30 yrs and older), in 80% of samples that were diagnosed as ASC-H, and in 87.5% of samples that were diagnosed as HSIL (P < 0.001). HPV-16 was detected in 17.5% of ASC-US samples, in 15.5% of LSIL samples, in 48.5% of ASC-H samples, and in 49.0% of HSIL samples (P < 0.001). Among abnormal smears, HR HPV was significantly more common in women younger than age 30 years compared with women age 30 years and older (P < 0.002). Follow-up biopsy data were obtained for 359 patients. A "benign" biopsy result was recorded for 47 of 64 women (73.5%) with ASC-US, 30 of 66 women (45.5%) with LSIL, 39 of 87 women (45.0%) with ASC-H, and 26 of 142 women (18.0%) with HSIL and was most common in women age 30 years and older (P < 0.0001). Cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) Grade I (CIN-I) was found in 14.0% of women with ASC-US, in 39.5% of women with LSIL, in 8.0% of women with ASC-H, and in 7.0% of women with HSIL. CIN-II was diagnosed in 9.5% of women with ASC-US, in 13.5% of women with LSIL, in 19.5% of women with ASC-H, and in 24.0% of women with HSIL. CIN-III was identified in 2 women (3.0%) with ASC-US, in 1 woman (1.5%) with LSIL, in 24 women (27.5%) with ASC-H, and in 71 women (50.0%) with HSIL.HR HPV testing by PCR of samples diagnosed according to the Bethesda 2001 guidelines may benefit the management of patients with ASC-US or patients with LSIL, especially among women age 30 years and older, by allowing exclusion from referral for biopsy of women who are negative for HR HPV types. However, the small numbers of women who had CIN-III detected after a diagnosis of ASC-US or LSIL limited the assessment of test sensitivity.Cost-effectiveness analysis based on the atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance/low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion Triage Study (ALTS).The ALTS (atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance [ASCUS] and low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion [LSIL] Triage Study) suggests that, for women diagnosed with ASCUS, human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA testing followed by referral to colposcopy of only those women with oncogenic HPV (i.e., HPV DNA testing) is as effective at detecting cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) 3 or cancer (CIN3+) as referring all women with ASCUS for immediate colposcopy. We conducted a cost-effectiveness analysis of the ALTS trial to determine whether HPV DNA testing is a cost-effective alternative to immediate colposcopy or conservative management with up to three cytology examinations.Data from the ALTS trial were used in conjunction with medical care costs in a short-term decision model. The model compared the incremental costs per case of CIN3+ detected as measured by the incremental cost-effectiveness ratio (ICER) for the following management strategies for women with ASCUS: immediate colposcopy, HPV DNA testing, and conservative management with up to three cytology examinations.The least costly and least sensitive strategy was conservative management with one repeat cytology examination using a threshold of high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HSIL) for referral to colposcopy. Compared with this strategy, triage to colposcopy based on a positive HPV DNA test result had an ICER of 3517 dollars per case of CIN3+ detected. Immediate colposcopy and conservative management with up to three repeat cytology visits detected fewer cases of CIN3+ and were more costly than HPV DNA testing. Immediate colposcopy became cost-effective at 20,370 dollars compared with HPV DNA testing only if colposcopy and biopsy were assumed to be 100% sensitive.HPV DNA testing is an economically viable strategy for triage of ASCUS cytology. The less than perfect sensitivity of colposcopy and biopsy needs to be accounted for in future clinical guidelines and policy analyses.Human papillomavirus triage of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance: cost-effective, but at what cost?Role of P16(INK4a) expression in identifying CIN2 or more severe lesions among HPV-positive patients referred for colposcopy after abnormal cytology.p16 is strongly overexpressed in dysplastic cervical cells because of the transforming activity of the E7 oncogene of all high-risk human papillomavirus (HR-HPV) types and may be easily revealed by immunochemistry: p16 may, therefore, be considered a surrogate marker for the activated oncogene expression of HR-HPV in dysplastic cervical cells.HPV and p16(INK4a) testing were performed in a consecutive series of 283 patients with abnormal cytology referred to colposcopy assessment or follow-up. Triage of patients to colposcopy by HPV or HPV and p16 testing was simulated, and the relative sensitivity, specificity, and positive predictive value (PPV) of HPV and p16 testing for > CIN2 lesions was determined as well as the cost balance of the two triage types.Compared to current protocol, triage by HPV testing reduced the number of colposcopies by 44.2%, but also reduced the > CIN2 detection rate by 10.7%, and was associated with a cost of euro 54.16 per assessed woman and of euro 613.20 per > CIN2 detected. Compared with current protocol, triage by HPV and p16 testing combined reduced the number of colposcopies by 73.1%, but reduced > CIN2 detection rate by 21.5%, and was associated with a cost of euro 54.73 per woman assessed and of euro 704.09 per > CIN2 detected.Triage by HPV and p16 improves considerably the PPV of diagnostic assessment, but decreases > CIN2 detection rate, and is associated with substantially higher costs. Further decrease of molecular immunochemistry testing due to technological progress may allow HPV and p16 testing to become a cost effective procedure in the future.When to test women for human papillomavirus.Lifetime effects, costs, and cost effectiveness of testing for human papillomavirus to manage low grade cytological abnormalities: results of the NHS pilot studies.To predict the incremental lifetime effects, costs, and cost effectiveness of using human papillomavirus testing to triage women with borderline or mildly dyskaryotic cervical smear results for immediate colposcopy.Modelling study.Three centres participating in NHS pilot studies, United Kingdom. Population Women aged 25-64 with borderline or mildly dyskaryotic cervical smear results.Screening using conventional cytology, liquid based cytology, and four strategies with different age cut-off points and follow up times that used combined liquid based cytology and human papillomavirus testing (adjunctive human papillomavirus testing).The model predicts that compared with using conventional cytology without testing for human papillomavirus, testing for the virus in conjunction with liquid based cytology for women with borderline or mildly dyskaryotic cervical smear results (aged 35 or more) would cost 3735 pounds sterling (5528 euros; 6474 dollars) per life year saved. Extending adjunctive human papillomavirus testing in combination with liquid based cytology to include women aged between 25 and 34 costs an additional 4233 pounds sterling per life year saved. Human papillomavirus testing is likely to reduce lifetime repeat smears by 52%-86% but increase lifetime colposcopies by 64%-138%.Testing for human papillomavirus to manage all women with borderline or mildly dyskaryotic cervical smear results is likely to be cost effective. The predicted increase in lifetime colposcopies, however, deserves careful consideration.Refining the management of low-grade cervical abnormalities in the UK National Health Service and defining the potential for human papillomavirus testing: a commentary on emerging evidence.Evaluation of cervical screening strategies with adjunct high-risk human papillomavirus testing for women with borderline or mild dyskaryosis.The management of women with a smear read as borderline/mild dyskaryosis (BMD) found by cervical cancer screening is still under discussion as only few of these cases are associated with high-grade lesions. To determine the optimal screening strategy for these women, a simulation model of cervical cancer development was used that is based on high-risk human papillomavirus (hrHPV) infection. The current strategy of repeat cytological testing at 6 and 18 months after BMD was compared to strategies with adjunct hrHPV testing. Calculations were done for both conventional and liquid-based cytology as the primary screening tool. In comparison to current screening, adjunct hrHPV testing was more effective in preventing cancer and more woman-friendly (reduction in colposcopy referrals with outcome < cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN2) of up to 56% and in repeat smears of 30-100%). In combination with conventional cytology, cost-effective strategies were the ones in which a sample for high-risk human papillomavirus (hrHPV) testing is collected at a return visit within 1 month or in which hrHPV testing is restricted to repeat smears taken at 6 and 18 months. For these strategies, co-collection of samples for hrHPV testing at baseline is not necessary which has organizational and cost advantages. In combination with liquid-based cytology, it was cost-effective to perform a reflex hrHPV test at baseline from the liquid-based specimen. Liquid-based screening was more effective than conventional screening, but annual diagnosis costs were euro5 million higher (population size 16 million). In conclusion, our calculations indicate that implementation of hrHPV testing for the management of women with borderline or mild dyskaryosis (BMD) is feasible both in settings where conventional and liquid-based cytology is current practice.A comparison of the human papillomavirus test and Papanicolaou smear as a second screening method for women with minor cytological abnormalities.Of the estimated one million Papanicolaou (pap) smears performed annually in Sweden, about 4% show any degree of abnormality. Approximately, 1% of these cases contain moderate or severe atypia (high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions) and the rest contain low-grade atypia. Recommendations for the management of minor abnormalities vary in various parts of Sweden. Generally, a second Pap smear is obtained 4-6 months after the first one showing low-grade atypia. The aim of this study is to compare the sensitivity of human papilloma virus (HPV)-DNA testing for the detection of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) 2-3 with that of a second Pap smear in women, who had low-grade atypia in their first Pap smear.Women with low-grade atypia in the Stockholm area, detected at a population-based cytology screening, were enrolled. A repeat Pap smear, HPV test, and colposcopically directed biopsies were obtained. For the detection of HPV, Hybrid Capture II (HC II) was used.The HPV-DNA test was positive in 66% of the 177 participating women. The sensitivity of the second Pap smear and HPV-DNA test to detect CIN 2-3 was 61 (95% CI = 45-74) and 82% (95% CI = 67-91), respectively. The positive and negative predictive values of HPV testing were 27 (95% CI = 18-35) and 89% (95% CI = 80-97), respectively.In Sweden, a second Pap smear is often obtained for the follow-up of women with low-grade atypia. The results of our study show that compared to the second Pap smear, HPV testing with HC II is a more sensitive method for detecting high-grade lesions.Which test is a better strategy to determine the outcome of atypical glandular cell-categorized Pap smears? Immunocytochemical p16INK4A expression or human papillomavirus test--a retrospective cohort study.This study was to correlate high-risk human papillomavirus (HR-HPV) viral load to p16(INK4A) (p16) expression in atypical glandular cell (AGC)-categorized Pap smears with follow-up biopsies for elucidating their relationships.We enrolled 36 AGC-categorized Pap smears with subsequent follow-up biopsies. HR-HPV viral load was determined by Hybrid Capture II assay in each AGC-diagnosed Pap smear. Both smears and biopsies were immunostained with a primary anti-p16 antibody, clone E6H4. Correlations between HR-HPV viral load in each AGC-diagnosed Pap smear and p16 expression of smears with follow-up biopsies were performed.Comparative analysis of two tests disclosed both consistencies and discrepancies. There were significant differences (P=0.02) between negative or weak p16 expression of Pap smears with the presence of reactive lesion or LSILs/CIN1s in follow-up biopsies and negative HR-HPV viral load. However, no significant difference (P=0.317) was found between p16 expression of Pap smears with the presence of HSIL/CIN2, 3 and AIS or adenocarcinoma in follow-up biopsies and high HR-HPV viral load. In addition, there were significant differences (P=0.012) in specificity, but no significant differences were found in sensitivity (P=0.604), positive and negative predictive value (P=0.066 and 0.264) between p16 immunoexpression and HR-HPV viral load.Pathogenic activity of HR-HPV was indicated by p16 expression on smears and tissue sections, which appears to be a better strategy than HR-HPV viral load test for the detection of clinically insignificant lesions from AGC-categorized Pap smears.Should women with atypical squamous cells, cannot exclude high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion, receive reflex human papillomavirus-DNA testing?The 2001 American Society for Colposcopy and Cervical Pathology Consensus Guidelines recommend that women who have Papanicolaou (Pap) smears diagnosed as atypical squamous cells (ASC), cannot exclude high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HSIL) (ASC-H) should be referred for immediate colposcopic examination. The objective of this pilot study was to evaluate whether reflex human papillomavirus (HPV)-DNA testing performed on smears diagnosed as ASC-H may obviate the need for immediate colposcopic examination.All ThinPrep Pap smears that were diagnosed as ASC-H or atypical squamous metaplastic cells (ASMT) between 2001-2003 and that had HPV-DNA testing and subsequent histologic and/or cytologic follow-up were evaluated. Those smears that were diagnosed as ASMT were reviewed and reclassified under the 2001 Bethesda System as either ASC of undetermined significance (ASCUS) or ASC-H. Smears that were diagnosed as ASCUS were excluded from the study.The study included of 48 smears that were diagnosed as ASC-H. All patients with biopsy-proven HSIL had positive high-risk (HR)-HPV results (100% negative predictive value). Approximately 80% of patients with ASC-H who had biopsy-proven, low-grade intraepithelial lesion on follow-up had positive HR-HPV results. Among the patients who had ASC-H with negative follow-up, 50% had positive HR-HPV results, and 50% had negative HR-HPV results.Among patients with ASC-H, a negative HR-HPV result was found to be an excellent predictor of the absence of HSIL. The results of this pilot study suggested that HPV-DNA testing may serve as a means to better select which patients with ASC-H on Pap smear should undergo colposcopic examination. This approach potentially may reduce medical costs and eliminate the need for routine colposcopic examination among patients with ASC-H Pap smears.The utility of HPV DNA triage in the management of cytological AGC.Given the demonstrated utility of human papilloma virus DNA triage in the management of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance, this study sought to evaluate the potential role of human papilloma virus DNA testing in the evaluation and management of cytological atypical glandular cells.Following institutional review board approval, 28 women presenting with cytological atypical glandular cells underwent repeat thin-prep cytology, Hybrid Capture 2 human papilloma virus DNA testing, colposcopic evaluation, Fisher electrosurgical conization, and endometrial sampling. Human papilloma virus test results in each patient were then correlated with histologic lesions, if present.Sixteen of the 28 study patients had pathologic lesions (11/28 high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion, 3/28 low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion, 1/28 adenocarcinoma in situ, 1/28 simple endometrial hyperplasia). Human papilloma virus DNA testing was available in 24 of 28 subjects (86%). The sensitivity of human papilloma virus positivity to predict the presence of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia was 100% (confidence interval 77% to 100%), specificity 64% (confidence interval 35% to 85%), positive predictive value 76%, and negative predictive value 100%. Women who tested human papilloma virus positive were 12 times more likely to have cervical intraepithelial neoplasia than women who were human papilloma virus negative (Fisher P<.001). Human papilloma virus positivity was not predictive of endometrial pathology; women who were human papilloma virus positive were less likely to have endometrial pathology than were women who were human papilloma virus negative (risk ratio 1.6, 95% confidence interval 0.01-1.7).Atypical glandular cells can represent a variety of lesions. The majority of the lesions will be squamous intraepithelial lesions of the cervix (50%), with high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion present in 40% of subjects. Human papilloma virus DNA testing is a sensitive test for the presence of squamous intraepithelial lesion, with excellent negative predictive value for the absence of squamous intraepithelial lesion. The results of this study suggest human papilloma virus DNA testing might be an effective screening test in the initial evaluation and management of cytological atypical glandular cells.Atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance-favour reactive compared to atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance-favour dysplasia: association with cervical intraepithelial lesions and human papillomavirus infection.The current study compared the cervical cytological sub-category "atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance-favour reactive (AFR)", recently recommended to be eliminated by the Bethesda system, to the sub-category "atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance-favour dysplasia (ASC-US)", in terms of prevalence of coexistent squamous intraepithelial lesions of either low-grade (LSIL) or high-grade (HSIL) and rate of human papillomavirus (HPV) infection.One hundred women with AFR and 100 with ASC-US were consecutively included in the study. All patients underwent colposcopy, followed by biopsy when necessary, and were screened for HPV infection by the combined use of Hybrid Capture II (DIGENE) and PCR with MY09/11 primers, the latter followed by direct sequencing of the amplifications products for HPV genotyping.LSIL were detected in 5.6% of AFR and 18.5% of ASC-US (p=0.00812), HSIL only in 4.3% of ASC-US. HPV infection was diagnosed in 11.2% of AFR and 38.0% of ASC-US (p=0.00003); high-risk HPV types (namely, HPV-16, -18, -31, -66, -67 and -70) were found in 6.7% of AFR and 22.8% of ASC-US (p=0.00239). Evidence of HPV infection in absence of SIL was proven in 7.1% of AFR and in 22.5% of ASC-US (p=0.00622).The association of AFR with SIL and high-risk HPV infection is low but not inexistent. Thus, to avoid the risk of leaving some high-risk AFR patients untreated or without follow-up, it could be proposed to keep AFR as a cytological category and to triage it by HPV testing, similarly to what has been already recommended for ASC-US.Performance of the Roche AMPLICOR human papillomavirus (HPV) test in prediction of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) in women with abnormal PAP smear.To assess the performance of a novel PCR-based assay (Roche AMPLICOR HPV test) in detection of cervical pathology as a part of management for abnormal PAP smear (MAPS) and in women participating in cervical cancer screening.Altogether, 504 women comprising 270 patients referred for colposcopy due to an abnormal Pap smear and another 234 women participating in cervical cancer screening (tested for comparison) were analyzed for oncogenic (HR) Human papillomavirus (HPV) types 16, 18, 31, 33, 35, 39, 45, 51, 52, 56, 58, 59, and 68 using the Roche AMPLICOR HPV test in cervical samples collected in PreservCyt liquid media. Colposcopic biopsy and/or LEEP cone biopsy was used as the gold standard in the triage group, while liquid-based cytology (LBC) was the reference test in the screening group.The prevalence of HPV was significantly higher in the MAPS group (65.9%) than in the screening group (31.2%) (P = 0.0001). There was a poor concordance between the referral PAP and the current LBC, being only moderate in the screening series, ICC (weighted kappa) = 0.291 (95%CI 0.070-0.459) (P = 0.007), and almost poor in the MAPS Series, with ICC = 0.217 (95%CI 0.04-0.384) (P = 0.023). AMPLICOR HPV positivity increased linearly with the increasing grade of cervical lesions. In detecting high-grade (CIN2-3), colposcopy was the most sensitive test (96.5%), very similar to AMPLICOR (95.2%) (P = 0.731), while LBC with HSIL cutoff was by far the most specific test (99.5%) and showed the highest PPV (96.1%). NPV of colposcopy (97.2%) and AMPLICOR (96.7%) were similar (P = 0.839). Together with abnormal colposcopy and HSIL cytology, the AMPLICOR HPV test is a powerful independent predictor of high-grade CIN2-3, and as such suitable to replace cervical cytology in management of women with abnormal PAP test (MAPS).The Roche AMPLICOR HPV test is comparable to other HPV tests (HCII, PCR) in detecting CIN in MAPS. However, more data are clearly needed on the performance of AMPLICOR test in management of abnormal PAP and particularly as a screening tool.HPV DNA testing in the triage of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS): cost comparison of two methods.Human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA testing for triage of cervical cytologies showing atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) has become the standard of practice. Currently, Hybrid Capture II (HCII) is the preferred method for ASCUS triage. In situ hybridization for HPV represents an alternative to HCII and appears to have a superior specificity but is more expensive. We compare the reimbursement rates of ASCUS triage (HPV high risk) using the methods of HCII and INFORM (in situ hybridization for HPV) in a series of 431 ASCUS patients. The patients were followed for 1 yr, during which each patient had either colposcopic biopsy or follow-up cervical cytology after ASCUS HPV DNA triage. Eighty-nine patients were excluded from the analysis because of incomplete follow-up. The HPV triage percentages, colposcopic biopsy positivity rates and cervical cytology positivity percentages were calculated for each method. The reimbursement rates of the tests/procedures used in the analysis were those in effect at the University of Utah in 2003. The total triage and follow-up reimbursement costs were calculated for HCII and INFORM and compared.HCII referred 19.9% of patients to colposcopy, with a biopsy positivity rate of 25.6% for dysplasia. INFORM referred 11.8% of patients to colposcopy, of whom 34% had a biopsy diagnosis of dysplasia. HCII negative cases revealed 19% to have ASCUS or higher on the follow-up cervical cytology, while 19.9% of INFORM negative cases had a reading of ASCUS or higher at follow-up cytologic examination. The 1-yr HPV DNA triage and follow-up reimbursements for HCII were 316,942.00 US dollars per 1,000 women, and for the INFORM methodology, the reimbursements were 369,484.00 US dollars per 1,000 women. The INFORM method was associated with higher specificity and sent fewer (41%) patients to colposcopy than did HCII. Although this smaller referral rate reduced reimbursement costs associated with colposcopy, the increased reimbursement paid for follow-up cytologies and office visits of HPV DNA negative patient and the greater cost of the INFORM test results in higher overall reimbursement for INFORM. Based on these costs and diagnostic accuracies, it appears that the INFORM HPV technology represents a viable option to HCII ASCUS triage. INFORM HPV appears to be 16% more expensive than HCII but has the advantage of sending 41% fewer women to colposcopy.Reflex human papilloma virus infection testing detects the same proportion of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 2-3 in young versus elderly women.The American Society for Colposcopy and Cervical Pathology recently recommended triage of women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) through reflex human papilloma virus (HPV) infection testing. Because age is an important determinant of the incidence of both ASCUS and HPV infection, the current study was conducted to determine the impact of age on reflex HPV infection test performance.The authors reviewed all liquid-based Papanicolaou tests submitted for reflex HPV infection testing to the University of Alabama Medical Center during the period from January 2002 to January 2004. To assess the impact of age on reflex HPV infection testing, women were divided into 6 age groups (<25, 25-34, 35-44, 45-54, 55-64, >64 years). Trend of different diagnostic categories with age was assessed using the chi-square test for linear trend. As a measure of test performance, the proportions of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) lesions confirmed by biopsy through reflex testing (of the total CIN lesions detected in the study population) were then compared among different age groups.During the study period, 25,164 ThinPrep tests were performed during the study period, with 2672 (11%) cases of ASCUS and 1371 (5%) cases of squamous intraepithelial lesions (SILs). A total of 2309 (86%) ASCUS cases were tested for HPV infection, of which 789 (34%) were positive. Biopsy specimens were obtained from 831 patients with SILs and from 316 patients with HPV+ASCUS. Of 246 patients with CIN Grade 2-3 (CIN2-3) detected on biopsy, 36 (15%) were triaged through reflex HPV infection testing and the rest were triaged through cytologic diagnosis of SILs. Despite the trend in the prevalence of HPV+ASCUS and SILs with increasing age (P < 0.05), there was no significant difference in the proportion (range, 9-23%) of CIN2-3 detected through reflex HPV infection testing in different age groups.Reflex HPV infection testing performed similarly for women in different age groups, including perimenopausal and postmenopausal women.HPV triage of women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance: a 3-year experience in an Italian organized programme.The purpose of our study was to determine if Hybrid Capture II assay (HCII) on Liquid Based Cytology (LCB) improves the accuracy (higher sensitivity, similar specificity) than the repeat conventional Pap smear in smears with Atypical Squamous Cell (ASC) of Undetermined Significance diagnosis.HPV testing was used to manage women, especially the older ones, with cervical abnormalities detected through our triennial organized screening in order to avoid unnecessary colposcopy and excessive follow-up if the woman is HPV negative. The HPV DNA Triage was offered without any charge to 909 women with ASC. The Bethesda System was used for the classification of these equivocal cytological findings and more precisely the 1991 version (ASCUS) until the summer 2001 (315 cases) and the new one 2001 classification (ASC-US and ASC-H) after this date (594 cases). The presence or absence of a cervical intraepithelial neoplasia of grade I or worse [CIN1+], and of grade II or worse [CIN2+], was confirmed by biopsy.The HPV DNA Triage showed a good accuracy (specificity over 94%, sensitivity of 37% and PPV for CIN2+ lesions around 30%). The higher values of ASC-H lesions (.462) for the sensitivity for CIN 2+ probably signify that this lesion is already a SIL.Our data were comparable with those recently published on the meta-analysis by Arbyn et al., confirming the promising approach of our guidelines for the treatment of these patients even in terms of Health Technology Assessment (HTA).Genital human papillomavirus testing by in situ hybridization in liquid atypical cytologic materials and follow-up biopsies.To describe cases of HPV testing by DNA in situ hybridization performed on atypical cervicovaginal samples collected by a liquidsed method that were negative for HPV DNA on cytology but revealed cervical intraepithelial neoplasia on follow-up biopsies.Three hundred ninety-five consecutive SurePath atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US) cytologic samples from asymptomatic, reproductive-age women were tested for human papillomaviruses (HPVs) by the in situ hybridization (ISH) method (Ventana Inform HPV Test, Tucson, Arizona, U.S.A). One hundred (25%) cases underwent follow-up colposcopic biopsy within 3 months of cytology. All the tests (cytology, ISH, histology) were independently evaluated without knowledge of the other tests.One hundred twenty-two (33%) cytologic samples were positive for HPVs. Of a total of 100 (HPV positive and negative) follow-up biopsies, 55 were positive for cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN). Fourteen cases of biopsy-proven CIN tested negative for all HPV types in the prior cytologic samples. Retesting of the 14 CIN tissues by ISH was negative in 10, positive for HPV in 2 and inconclusive in 2.There is a small but significant (14%) false negative rate with HPV testing by the Ventana ISH method. Clinically suspicious cases should be followed even if an HPV test is negative.Is p16(INK4A) expression more useful than human papillomavirus test to determine the outcome of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance-categorized Pap smear? A comparative analysis using abnormal cervical smears with follow-up biopsies.To correlate high-risk human papillomavirus (HR-HPV) viral load to p16(INK4A) expression in atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS)-categorized Pap smears with follow-up biopsies in order to elucidate their relationships in gynecological pathology.We studied 66 ASCUS-categorized Pap smears with subsequent follow-up biopsies. HR-HPV viral load was determined by Hybrid Capture II assay from the cervical swab in each ASCUS-diagnosed Pap smear. Both smears and biopsies were immunostained with a primary anti-p16 antibody, clone E6H4, and we analyzed the correlations between HR-HPV viral load in each ASCUS-diagnosed Pap smear and p16 expression of smears with follow-up biopsies.Correlation analyses of the corresponding histological diagnoses from 66 ASCUS-diagnosed Pap smears revealed that 21 (32%) cases had only reactive changes and 45 cases showed cervical intraepithelial neoplasia including LSIL (24 cases, 36%) and HSIL or higher (21 cases, 32%). Tests for HR-HPV viral load revealed 17 (26%) negative cases and 49 (74%) positive cases. Immunostaining showed that 26 cases (39%) were negative and 40 (61%) were positive for p16 expression. Comparative analysis of these two tests indicated consistencies as well as discrepancies. They showed significant differences (P < 0.001) between negative p16 expressions of Pap smears with the presence of reactive lesions in follow-up biopsies and HR-HPV viral load. However, no significant difference (P = 0.739 and 0.606) between p16 expression of Pap smears with the presence of LSIL, HSIL or higher in follow-up biopsies and high HR-HPV viral load was found. In addition, there were significant differences (P < 0.001) in specificity and positive predictive value, but no significant differences were found in sensitivity (P = 0.606) and negative predictive value (P = 0.062) between p16 immunostaining and HR-HPV viral load.The results indicate that there is a close association between weak or strong p16 expressions in ASCUS-categorized smears with the presence of SILs in follow-up biopsies and positive HR-HPV viral loads. Conversely, there is also a clear association between the lack of p16 expression and the absence of significant lesions in follow-up biopsies, but this is not consistent with a negative HR-HPV viral load. It is concluded that p16 expression is an indicator of pathogenic activity of HR-HPV, which is an objective biomarker for clarification of ASCUS-categorized Pap smears in gynecological cytopathology. Furthermore, through comparative analysis, directly visualized p16 immunostaining on smears appears to be a more effective method than HR-HPV viral load for the detection of reactive changes and LSILs from ASCUS-categorized Pap smears.Immunocytochemical expression of p16INK4A and Ki-67 in cytologically negative and equivocal pap smears positive for oncogenic human papillomavirus.This study was designed to analyze the cross-sectional comparison of the p16 and Ki-67 immunocytochemical expression in negative and equivocal (atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US)) liquid-based cytology (LBC) samples testing positive for high-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) types with HC2 assay or polymerase-chain reaction (PCR). A series of 199 consecutive LBC specimens derived from the same number of women participating in the ongoing Latin American Screening Study at Leonor Mendes de Barros Hospital, Sao Paulo, were analyzed using immunocytochemistry for expression of p16 and Ki-67 in negative and equivocal LBC samples testing positive for high-risk HPV types with hybrid capture II test (HC2) or PCR. All patients with at least one test positive (cytology, PCR, and/or HC2) were followed each 6 months for 3 years. The follow-up procedure consisted of visual examination, colposcopic inspection, cytology, and HC2 assay. Among the negative cytologic samples, 101 were HPV-positive and 55 HPV-negative. Of the HPV-positive group, 59 of 101 cases (58.4%) were positive for both p16 and Ki67 immunostaining, and 17 of 101 (16.8%) were negative for both. The proportion of Ki-67-positivity increased almost in parallel with the increasing grade of p16-positivity (p = 0.0001 for linear trend). In the HPV-negative group, both markers were negative in 41 of 55 cases (74.5%), and no statistical relationship was observed between the two markers (Pearson, p = 0.595). HPV-positive ASC-US samples demonstrated a simultaneous positive immunoreaction for p16 and Ki67 in 11 of 16 cases (68.7%), whereas 3 (18.7%) were concurrently negative. The relationship between the two markers was of borderline significance (Pearson, p = 0.053), but no linear relationship was found between the graded p16 and Ki-67 expression (p = 0.065 for linear trend). In the HPV-negative ASC-US group, there was no statistical association between the graded p16 and Ki-67 positivity (Pearson, p = 0.281). After 36 months of follow-up of the ASC-US patients, 6 women still displayed ASC-US smear, of which 4 of 6 were HPV-positive and expressed both p16 and Ki-67 markers. Two of 43 ASC-US smears had high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions diagnosed (4.6%), and 1 had low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (2.3%). All of those were positive for HPV, p16 and Ki-67. Patients with ASC-US diagnosis and positive high-risk HPV status and positive for p16 Ki67 should be carefully observed to exclude occurrence of a squamous intraepithelial lesion. The combination of these two markers can be a useful implement for management of women with equivocal cytology.Triage using HPV-testing in persistent borderline and mildly dyskaryotic smears: proposal for new guidelines.In the Netherlands 2% of cervical smears in the cervical cancer screening program are read as borderline or mildly dyskaryotic cytology (BMD smear). Only in about 10% of these women a high-grade CIN lesion (CIN II-III) is present; therefore referral is for the majority unnecessary. In our study triage with high-risk HPV (hrHPV) testing was used to identify women at risk for development of high-grade CIN lesions after a repeat BMD smear. A "wait-and-see" period was incorporated allowing clearance of HPV and regression of the lesion. Women with a low-grade lesion, irrespective of their HPV status, were monitored at 12 months; women with a high-grade lesion were monitored at 6 and 12 months. Fifty-one of the 105 women (49%) were hrHPV negative at baseline; none of them showed progression of the lesion within the first year of follow-up (NPV 100%). High-grade CIN was present in 1 patient who was HPV negative at baseline (2%); she demonstrated regression after 12 months. Nineteen of the hrHPV positive women (35%) demonstrated a high-grade CIN lesion at baseline and 3 cleared hrHPV after 6 months, with a subsequent regression of CIN. Ten women remained hrHPV positive with persistence of high-grade CIN and were eventually treated. At baseline, 35 hrHPV positive women demonstrated a low-grade lesion, 19 remained hrHPV positive after 12 months and 5 developed high-grade CIN. Sixteen out of the 35 cleared the hrHPV infection without progression of the lesion. In conclusion, triage, using hrHPV testing for women with persistent BMD cytology, can select women who are not at risk for development of high-grade CIN. We recommend return to the screening program without referral for colposcopic examination if hrHPV is absent. For hrHPV positive women, a repeat hrHPV test after another 6 months is suggested. Referral is only required if persistence of hrHPV is established.Reflex high-risk human papillomavirus testing for women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance in cytologic smears: effects since implementation in a large clinical practice.Reflex high-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) testing often is used in the management of women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance identified in cervicovaginal screening. Following implementation of reflex testing, our laboratory processed 8,022 specimens during a 20-month period; sufficient material was available for testing in 7,334 specimens. High-risk HPV was detected in 34.10% of these specimens. Detection rates varied with age, with positive rates as high as 58.46% in women 20 years old or younger, decreasing to 14.58% in women older than 35 years. The detection rate, categorized in 5-year age increments, showed a significant decrease until after 35 years, when the rate remained fairly constant (P < .0001). The detection rate decreased over the time of the study. These results demonstrate that high-risk HPV detection might vary according to the age mix of the population tested and the interval after implementation of testing.Predicting CIN2+ when detecting HPV mRNA and DNA by PreTect HPV-proofer and consensus PCR: A 2-year follow-up of women with ASCUS or LSIL Pap smear.It has been suggested that human papillomavirus (HPV) testing improves follow-up of atypical cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) and low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL) in cervical cancer screening programs. To evaluate the prognostic value of including HPV testing as an adjunct to cytology, we carried out a 2-year follow-up study of 77 women with ASCUS or LSIL Papanicolaou (Pap) smear in the Norwegian Cervical Cancer Screening Program (NCCSP) for detection of histological cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) 2+. The study includes a comparison between viral mRNA and DNA detection. PreTect HPV-Proofer was used for HPV E6/E7 mRNA detection from the 5 high-risk types 16, 18, 31, 33 and 45, and Gp5+/6+ consensus PCR was used for HPV DNA detection. Twice as many women were positive for HPV DNA (54.6%) than for HPV mRNA (23.4%). PreTect HPV-Proofer and consensus PCR had a sensitivity of 85.7% (95% confidence interval [CI] = 42.1-99.6) for detecting CIN2+ during follow-up. The specificity was significantly higher for PreTect HPV-Proofer, 84.9% (95% CI = 73.9-92.5), than for consensus PCR, 50.0% (95% CI = 37.4-62.6). PreTect HPV-Proofer positive women were 69.8 times (95% CI = 4.3-1137.3) more likely to be diagnosed with CIN2+ within 2 years than PreTect HPV-Proofer negative women. Consensus PCR-positive women were 5.7 times (95% CI = 0.6-52.0) more likely to be diagnosed with CIN2+ within 2 years than PCR-negative women. With equal sensitivity and higher specificity than consensus PCR, the PreTect HPV-Proofer might offer an improvement for the triage of women with ASCUS or LSIL Pap smear.Triage with human papillomavirus testing of women with cytologic abnormalities prompting referral for colposcopy assessment.The current study was conducted to evaluate the cost-effectiveness of triaging for colposcopy using human papillomavirus (HPV) testing.HPV tests were performed in a consecutive series of women who were referred for colposcopy for persistent atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS)-favor reactive (n = 35 women), ASCUS-favor squamous epithelial lesion (n = 164 women), atypical glandular cells of undetermined significance (n = 74 women), low-grade squamous epithelial lesion (n = 161 women), or high-grade squamous epithelial lesion (n = 78 women). The cost effectiveness of triaging women with ASCUS results using HPV testing was determined compared with the current protocol.The sensitivity of HPV testing for cervical intraepithelial neoplasia > Grade 2 was very high. Cost analysis showed a moderate increase in cost with the addition of HPV triage.Because HPV testing is highly sensitive, it may be useful as an alternative to the current policy of 6-month repeat cytology for women with ASCUS.Human papillomavirus DNA detection and histological findings in women referred for atypical glandular cells or adenocarcinoma in situ in their Pap smears.To evaluate the association between high-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA detection and histological diagnosis in women referred for atypical glandular cells (AGC) or adenocarcinoma in situ (AIS) at Pap smear.In this cross-sectional study, 146 women referred for AGC (124), AGC with high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HSIL) (15), or AIS (7) were tested for HPV DNA using Hybrid Capture II (HC II). All women underwent colposcopic examination, and cervical biopsy was performed for 95 patients. Fifty-one women referred due to AGC with normal colposcopy and normal second Pap smear were scheduled for control visits every 4 months.The overall prevalence of HPV DNA was 38%. HPV DNA was detected in 93% of the women with HSIL associated with AGC and in 71% of women with AIS Pap smear, being significantly higher when compared with the prevalence (29%) in women with AGC alone. Forty-five women (30.8%) had clinically significant histological lesions (CIN 2 or worse). High-risk HPV DNA was detected in only 16% of the women without significant abnormalities in biopsy, in contrast to 96% of those who had CIN 2 or CIN 3 and 75% of women with AIS. Eighty-five percent of women with invasive cervical carcinoma (squamous or adenocarcinoma) tested positive for HPV DNA. HPV DNA detection was significantly associated with histological diagnosis of CIN 2 or worse, with an odds ratio (OR) = 51.8 (95% CI 14.3-199.9).HPV DNA detection was strongly associated with the severity of cervical lesion (CIN 2 or worse) in women referred for AGC or AIS in their Pap smear. These data implicate the use of HPV testing in triage of women with AGC Pap smears.The predictive value of p16(INK4a) and hybrid capture 2 human papillomavirus testing for high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia.We performed p16(INK4a) immunocytochemical analysis and Hybrid Capture 2 (HC2; Digene, Gaithersburg, MD) high-risk HPV testing on 210 abnormal SurePath (TriPath Imaging, Burlington, NC) Papanicolaou specimens diagnosed as low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL) or high grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HSIL). The results were compared with 121 follow-up biopsy specimens. p16(INK4a) was positive in 57.9% of women with LSIL compared with 97.1% of women with HSIL. In contrast, HC2 testing was positive in 85.0% of women with LSIL and 86.4% of women with HSIL. The differences in the positive rates for16(INK4a) between LSIL and HSIL was significant (P < .001), whereas, for HC2, it was not (P = .264). In patients who had cervical biopsies following a cytologic diagnosis of LSIL, the positive predictive value (PPV) of p16(INK4a) for a biopsy of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 2 or 3 (CIN2/3; 33.3%) was significantly higher than the PPV of HC2 results (21.2%) (P < .001). Using liquid-based cytology specimens, p16(INK4a) immunocytochemical analysis has a higher PPV than reflex HC2 HPV testing for identifying CIN2/3 among patients with LSIL and might be useful for selecting patients with LSIL for colposcopy.ASC-US and HPV testing in women aged 40 years and over.High-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA triage is commonly performed for cervical cytology specimens interpreted as atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US), but little is known about testing results in women > or =40 yr of age. The extent to which clinical follow-up after HPV testing reflects the most recent management guidelines is unknown also. Data from 108 patients > or =40 yr of age with concurrent (93 patients) or recent (15 patients) ASC-US interpretations and HPV testing were reviewed. Twenty-five (23.1%) of these patients were positive for high-risk HPV. The HPV(+) rate was higher in women with a current interpretation of ASC-US (26.9%) compared with those with a previous ASC-US result (0%). Many patients were not managed exactly according to the "2001 Consensus Guidelines for the Management of Women with Cervical Cytologic Abnormalities." The majority (52.6%) of women with HPV(+) ASC-US did not receive colposcopy in our institution, and 41.3% of women with HPV(-) ASC-US received follow-up testing within 8 mo. These results show the potential for inadequate evaluation of women with HPV(+) ASC-US, as well as unnecessary early repeat cytology in HPV(-) ASC-US patients. Therefore, additional clinician education and reminders to correlate cytology and HPV test results may be warranted to optimize patient care.Detection of high-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA by Hybrid Capture II in women referred due to atypical glandular cells in the primary screening.We assessed the detection of high-risk human papillomavirus DNA (HPV-DNA) in women examined by a second Pap smear due to atypical glandular cells (AGC) detected in their screening Pap smear. In 91 women included in the study, a second Pap smear was taken and HPV-DNA test was performed using Hybrid Capture II (HC II). The second Pap smear showed no abnormalities in 28 (31%) cases, ACG in 17 (19%) cases, and high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (HSIL) or worse in 24 (26%). HC II test was positive in 36% of the cases. Considering the second Pap smear diagnosis, HPV-DNA was detected in 87% of the women with HSIL, 100% of women with in situ adenocarcinoma, and only in 11% of the women with no abnormalities. The use of the second Pap smear combined with HPV-DNA may improve the management of women with AGC in the primary screening.Prevalence and typing of HPV DNA by hybrid capture II in women with ASCUS, ASC-H, LSIL, and AGC on ThinPrep Pap tests.Testing for human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA is now a viable option for the management of women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS). The utility of reflexive HPV DNA testing for women with a cytologic diagnosis of atypical glandular cells-not otherwise specified (AGC-NOS), ASCUS subtypes, and low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL) has not been well established. In the present investigation, reflex Hybrid Capture II HPV DNA testing results were evaluated for HPV prevalence and type in 371 women with abnormal cytologic diagnoses of ASCUS-not otherwise specified (ASCUS-NOS), ASCUS-suspicious for low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (ASCUS-L), atypical squamous cells-cannot exclude high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (ASC-H), AGC-NOS, and LSIL on ThinPrep Pap tests. Positive high-risk HPV DNA was identified in 53.6% of the study samples, including ASCUS-NOS 40.2% ASCUS-L 71.4%, ASC-H 37.5%, LSIL 88.6%, and AGC-NOS 0%. We conclude that reflex HPV DNA testing appears to not be useful for colposcopy triage for cytologic diagnoses of LSIL or AGC-NOS.HPV testing for triage of HIV-infected women with papanicolaou smears read as atypical squamous cells of uncertain significance.To assess the utility of testing for high-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA as a triage strategy for detecting cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) grade 2/3 in women with human immunodeficiency virus-1 (HIV-1) infection and cytology read as atypical cells of uncertain significance (ASCUS).Conventional cervical cytology and cervicovaginal lavage were obtained at 6-month intervals between October 1, 1994, and September 30, 2002, from women enrolled in the Women's Interagency HIV Study, a multicenter cohort studying the natural history of HIV in women. HPV typing was performed by PCR. HPV types 16, 18, 31, 33, 35, 39, 45, 51, 52, 56, 58, 59, and 68 were classified as carrying high oncogenic risk. Women with ASCUS smears were referred for colposcopy. Analyses of the sensitivity of HPV testing were cross-sectional, using colposcopy results within 90 days of first ASCUS result.Of the 270 women evaluated, 7 (3%) had CIN 2, and 3 (1%) had CIN3 or adenocarcinoma in situ. High-risk HPV DNA was found in 81 (30%) of the 270 participants. The sensitivity of high-risk HPV DNA detection for CIN 2/3 was 50% (95% CI 0.19, 0.81), the specificity was 71% (95% CI 0.65, 0.76), the positive predictive value was 6% (95% CI 0.01, 0.11), and the negative predictive value was 97% (95% CI 0.95, 1.00). HPV of any risk type was found in 176 (65%) of the 270 women, including 9 of 10 women with CIN 2/3, for a sensitivity of 90% (95% CI 0.56, 1.00), a specificity of 36% (95% CI 0.30, 0.42), a positive predictive value of 5% (95% CI 0.02, 0.08), and a negative predictive value of 99% (95% CI 0.94, 1.00).For women with HIV and Papanicolaou smears read as ASCUS, DNA testing for high risk HPV may not be sensitive enough for clinical use.Atypical glandular cells of undetermined significance. Outcome predictions based on human papillomavirus testing.Cases of atypical glandular cells (AGC) diagnosed on liquid-based preparations were culled from a 3-year period. When available, residual cellular material was analyzed for human papillomavirus (HPV) by polymerase chain reaction and correlated with cytologic and histologic (biopsy) outcome. Of 178,994 cytologic cases, 187 (0.1045%) contained AGC compared with 8,740 (4.8828%) atypical squamous cells (ASC) for an AGC/ASC ratio of 0.021. HPV results and follow-up were available for 108 specimens from 106 patients. Depending on the end-point (histologic/cyto-logic), the sensitivity range of HPV testing for significant cervical disease (high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion [SIL], adenocarcinoma in situ [ACIS], invasive carcinoma) was 83% with a specificity range of 78% to 82%, a positive predictive value of 57% to 61%, and a negative predictive value of 91% to 95%. Fifteen false-positive results included concurrent ASC or low-grade SIL, ASC on follow-up cytology, and previous ACIS with a negative follow-up cone biopsy result. Noncervical glandular neoplasia (including atypical endometrial hyperplasia) was confirmed in 13 cases (1 recurrent), only 2 of which scored positive for HPV. HPV-positive AGC has a substantially higher positive predictive value for significant disease than ASC (61% vs historic 20%) and merits consideration in the triage of patients with atypical endocervical cells not otherwise specified. However, noncervical or other HPV-negative glandular neoplasia must be considered in all patients with AGC, particularly older patients.Management of women who test positive for high-risk types of human papillomavirus: the HART study.Certain types of human papillomavirus (HPV) are the primary cause of almost all cervical cancers. HPV testing of cervical smears is more sensitive but less specific than cytology for detecting high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN2+). HPV testing as a primary screening approach requires efficient management of HPV-positive women with negative or borderline cytology. We aimed to compare the detection rate and positive predictive values of HPV assay with cytology and to determine the best management strategy for HPV-positive women.We did a multicentre screening study of 11085 women aged 30-60 years. Women with borderline cytology and women positive for high-risk HPV with negative cytology were randomised to immediate colposcopy or to surveillance by repeat HPV testing, cytology, and colposcopy at 12 months.HPV testing was more sensitive than borderline or worse cytology (97.1% vs 76.6%, p=0.002) but less specific (93.3% vs 95.8%, p<0.0001) for detecting CIN2+. Of 825 randomised women, surveillance at 12 months was as effective as immediate colposcopy. In women positive for HPV at baseline, who had surveillance, 73 (45%) of 164 women with negative cytology and eight (35%) of 23 women with borderline cytology were HPV negative at 6-12 months. No CIN2+ was found in these women, nor in women with an initial negative HPV test with borderline (n=211) or mild (32) cytology.HPV testing could be used for primary screening in women older than 30 years, with cytology used to triage HPV-positive women. HPV-positive women with normal or borderline cytology (about 6% of screened women) could be managed by repeat testing after 12 months. This approach could potentially improve detection rates of CIN2+ without increasing the colposcopy referral rate.The triage of squamous cell abnormalities of cervical cytology by human papilloma virus screening.The aim of the study was to determine the presence of human papilloma virus (HPV) infection in cervical swabs by the use of the Digene Hybrid Capture assay in a cohort of patients with squamous cell abnormalities found in cervical cytologic screening.Thirty-four (0.3%) of 1,100 patients who came for their routine cervical cytologic screening and diagnosed as having squamous cell abnormalities were enrolled in the study. Colposcopy-directed biopsy was obtained from all study patients. HPV DNA was sought in cervical swab specimens placed in Digene transport medium by the use of the Digene Hybrid Capture assay. The findings of cervical cytology, colposcopy-directed biopsy and HPV screening were compared.In a total of 34 women who were diagnosed as having squamous cell abnormalities in their routine cervical cytologic screening, 15 women had atypical squamous cell lesions of undetermined significancy (ASCUS), 16 women had low-grade cervical intraepithelial lesions (LGSIL), and three women had high-grade cervical intraepithelial lesions (HGSIL). Five (15%) of these women tested positive for HPV screening in cervical swabs where four women had infection with high-risk and one woman had infection with low-risk subtypes. None of the patients with koilocytotic changes of the squamous cells in the class of LGSIL histopathologically tested positive for HPV screening. In addition, one patient diagnosed as having invasive cervical carcinoma histopathologically tested negative for HPV screening. Atypical vascularization was seen colposcopically in this 37-year-old woman who had ASCUS cytologically.HPV screening seems to have value in the triage of patients with ASCUS with no clear advantage to colposcopy-directed biopsy. The routine performance of HPV screening for the triage of patients with squamous cell abnormalities has no advantage over colposcopy-directed biopsy.[Contribution of high risk human papillomavirus testing to the management of premalignant and malignant lesions of the uterine cervix].High risk human papillomaviruses (HR-HPV) are consistently associated with premalignant and malignant lesions of the uterine cervix. Thus, the use of molecular techniques to detect HPV has been proposed to improve the results of conventional diagnostic strategies. In the present study, we evaluated the usefulness of the detection of HR-HPV in a cervical pathology unit.1005 women (mean age [SD], 38.4 [12.3]; range, 16-83) were referred for a cytology of atypical cells of unknown origin (ASCUS), squamous intraepithelial lesion (SIL) or carcinoma in the six months previous to the admission. All patients underwent a colposcopy, Pap test and/or histological study as well as HR-HPV detection using the Hybrid Capture II test.HR-HPV was detected in 96% high grade-SIL, 86% carcinomas of the uterine cervix and 86% low grade-SIL, but only in 25% women with no cervical lesions and 0% women with metastatic carcinomas to the cervix (p<0.001). The sensitivity of this test for high grade-SIL or higher was 90.2% and the negative predictive value was 96.5% (odds ratio=18.9; 95% confidence interval, 10.9-33.1). In patients with ASCUS, a negative result for HR-HPV nearly excluded the presence of a cervical lesion (negative predictive value, 98.52%).HR-HPV detection using Hybrid Capture II is useful in the study of lesions of the uterine cervix. It displays a high sensitivity for the diagnosis of squamous intraepithelial lesions and invasive carcinomas and a high usefulness in the management of ASCUS cases.Role of HPV DNA testing in predicting cervical intraepithelial lesions: comparison of HC HPV and ISH HPV.Human papillomavirus (HPV) is widely accepted as the primary agent involved in the development of squamous intraepithelial neoplasia and cervical carcinoma. Several commercial tests are available for detecting HPV DNA. This study compares the efficacy of INFORM HPV (in situ hybridization [ISH] HPV) and HCII (HC HPV) in predicting cervical lesions. A total of 762 sequential Papanicolaou (Pap) smears determined by cytologic examination to be either atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US) or low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (LSIL) were tested by both Hybrid Capture (HC) HPV and ISH HPV; 250 follow-up biopsies were reviewed as the reference standard for presence or absence of a lesion. ISH HPV and HC HPV differed significantly in accurately predicting biopsy findings from ASC-US and LSIL cases. The overall sensitivity and specificity of ISH HPV were 97% (28/29) and 86% (191/221); and HC HPV was 79% (23/29) and 56% (123/221). The positive predictive value (PPV) of ISH HPV was 48% (28/58) vs HC HPV value of 19% (23/121). Negative predictive value (NPV) was also better with ISH HPV at 99% (191/192) and HC HPV at 95% (123/129). Of equal importance, ISH HPV demonstrated a lower false-positive rate compared to HC HPV, 12% (30/250) vs 39% (98/250), as well as having a slightly lower false-negative rate 0.4% (1/250) vs 2.4% (6/250). ISH HPV is more predictive of biopsy histopathology in patients with detectable cervical lesions than is HC HPV. Effective triage of patients by HPV analysis using ISH HPV as compared to HC HPV has the potential of significant public health impact by reducing unnecessary colposcopies, as well as adverse medical, social, and psychological patient consequences.Triage by HPV-DNA testing: is it useful in women with persistent minor smear abnormalities?This study was carried out to evaluate the efficacy of HPV-DNA (Human Papilloma Virus) testing as a triage strategy for persistent borderline and mild cytological abnormalities.A prospective cross-sectional study involving 321 women registered between January and December 2001 with two smears showing borderline or mild dyskaryosis, taken 6 months apart. This study was undertaken in a colposcopy unit in a large district general hospital in central London.Three hundred and twenty-one women referred with persistent borderline and mild dyskaryosis were recruited in this study. HPV-DNA testing was positive in 194 women (60.4%). Histology of colposcopically directed biopsy showed CIN2/3 in 57 women (18%). Fifty-one of these 57 women were detected by HPV-DNA testing (sensitivity for high-grade disease 89.5%). Specificity for high-grade disease was 45.8%. Negative predictive value was 95.3%. Women with a positive HPV-DNA result had a 7.2 times higher risk of having a high-grade cervical cancer precursor lesion.Negative predictive value of HPV-DNA testing for high-grade cervical lesion is very high. Hence, it can be used as a triage strategy for persistent borderline changes and mild dyskaryosis.Triage of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance with hybrid capture II: colposcopy and histologic human papillomavirus correlation.To estimate the effectiveness of Hybrid Capture II to predict high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) from a cytological cervical sample. Evidence of high-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) was also determined from biopsy samples using the polymerase chain reaction (PCR) for women referred with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) Papanicolaou smears.We screened 8170 women with Papanicolaou smears, of whom 278 (3.4%) returned ASCUS. All ASCUS cases underwent colposcopy and Hybrid Capture II testing. High-grade CIN biopsy specimens were tested for high-risk HPV by PCR.Nearly 30% of ASCUS cases had CIN biopsy results (11.9% showing CIN II or CIN III and 17.6% showing CIN I). Hybrid Capture II positive rates were 93.3% for cases with CIN III, 72.2% for CIN II, and 51.0% for CIN I (P <.001). ASCUS-Premalignant Process Favored cases showed a 28.1% high-grade biopsy rate and a 100% Hybrid Capture II positive rate. For ASCUS-Undefined and ASCUS-Reactive Process Favored cases, Hybrid Capture II returned positive in 90.9% of CIN III and 61.5% of CIN II cases (P <.001). Sixty-nine of 178 (38.8%) patients with no evidence of CIN tested positive for Hybrid Capture II. Human papillomavirus deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) high-risk subtypes were detected by PCR in the tissue of all high-grade CIN cases with negative Hybrid Capture II results.Hybrid Capture II returned negative in 25% of cases with biopsy-proven high-grade CIN with associated high-risk HPV DNA by PCR (non-Premalignant ASCUS subset), and positive in 39.3% of cases with normal results; this limits its clinical utility.Detection of telomerase, its components, and human papillomavirus in cervical scrapings as a tool for triage in women with cervical dysplasia.To examine whether the detection of either telomerase and its components or high risk human papillomavirus (HPV) are of value in predicting the presence of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) grade II/III in women referred because of cervical cytology reports showing at most moderate dyskaryosis.Cervical scrapings of 50 women referred with cytological borderline, mild, or moderate dyskaryosis were analysed. Telomerase activity was assessed by a commercially available telomere repeat amplification protocol assay and its components human telomerase RNA (hTR) and human telomerase reverse transcriptase (hTERT) were assessed by reverse transcriptase polymerase chain reaction (PCR). HPV was detected by GP5+/6+ PCR enzyme immunosassay. Histological findings on colposcopy guided biopsies or excised cervical tissue were regarded as the final pathological diagnosis. The sensitivity and specificity for detecting CIN II/III were calculated.Twenty eight women were diagnosed with CIN II/III. Telomerase activity was detected in none, hTR in 88%, hTERT in 23%, and high risk HPV was detected in 79% of these women. As a diagnostic test none of the described analyses combined a sensitivity of at least 90% with a specificity >or= 90%. Despite the small numbers, calculation of the 95% confidence intervals excluded a combined sensitivity and specificity of at least 90% for all of the evaluated parameters.Neither detection of telomerase or its components, nor detection of high risk HPV seem suitable for the triage of women with borderline, mild, and moderate cytological dyskaryosis.Role for HPV testing in ASCUS: a cytologic-histologic correlation.Human papilloma virus (HPV) Hybrid Capture II testing was introduced at our institution in mid-April, 2001. Relatively little data exists on the histologic follow-up of "high-risk HPV-positive ASCUS" patients without a previous abnormal Pap result. The results of the cytologic-histologic correlation of 50 patients over an 11-mo period are presented. Our results indicate that significant lesions may be discovered in patients of the "high-risk HPV-positive ASCUS" category who have no previous abnormal Pap history. Of the 50 patients presented in this study, histologic follow-up demonstrated evidence of squamous carcinoma in one patient (2%), high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HSIL) in eight patients (16%), and low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL) in 19 patients (38%). The other 22 (44%) showed chronic cervicitis, reactive changes, or no pathologic changes. These findings suggest a more aggressive clinical approach may be warranted in the management of new onset ASCUS positive for high risk HPV.Human papillomavirus DNA detection in the management of women with twice mildly abnormal cytological smears.This study was undertaken to investigate the value of HPV testing in women referred with two abnormal smears that were graded as mild dyskaryosis or less who attended for at least three follow-up visits. One hundred forty-nine women were included in the study and a total of 39 high-grade lesions including one cancer were detected. All of these were found to be associated with the persistent presence of one or more of 13 high-risk human papillomavirus types (HPV) as detected by a multiplex type specific PCR technique. Two high-grade lesions were initially missed by cytology. In contrast, no cytological or histological evidence of high-grade lesions was found during a follow-up period of up to 8 years in 62 women with no high-risk HPV infection or in 38 women with only transient high-risk HPV infection. The utility of high-risk HPV detection in the management of women presenting with mild cytological abnormalities is discussed.Evaluation of human papillomavirus testing in primary screening for cervical abnormalities: comparison of sensitivity, specificity, and frequency of referral.Human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA testing of women having Papanicolaou (Pap) smears showing atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) has clinical usefulness. Whether HPV DNA testing alone is useful in primary screening remains to be determined.To determine the accuracy of HPV DNA testing for detecting cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) grade 3 or cancer (the criterion standard).Between December 1997 and October 2000, 4075 women who attended Planned Parenthood clinics in Washington State were screened simultaneously using thin-layer Pap and HPV DNA testing by a polymerase chain reaction (PCR)-based method and by a liquid-based RNA-DNA hybridization capture with signal amplification assay (signal amplification). Women who were positive for high-risk HPV types, or had Pap results of ASCUS or higher, were considered to have positive screening test results and were referred for colposcopy and biopsy. Additionally, a random sample of women with negative screening test results was referred for colposcopy. Based on individual and combined thin-layer Pap, HPV PCR, and HPV signal amplification test results from the screening and the colposcopy visits, 7 colposcopy triage strategies were defined and evaluated.Sensitivity and specificity for detecting cervical lesions graded CIN 3 or higher for each of the 7 triage strategies.The estimated prevalence of CIN 3 or higher was 3.2%. The sensitivity (95% confidence interval) of thin-layer Pap (with a result of > or = ASCUS) for identifying women with CIN 3 or higher was only 61.3% (48.5%-70.9%) compared with 88.2% (78.9%-93.8%) for HPV testing by PCR and 90.8% (83.1%-95.8%) by signal amplification. Differences in specificities were also observed: 82.4% (81.8%-83.1%) for thin-layer Pap (with a result of > or = ASCUS), 78.8% (77.9%-79.7%) for PCR, and 72.6% (69.4%-75.0%) for signal amplification. Compared with referral for colposcopy of all women with ASCUS or higher, signal amplification testing of women with ASCUS and referral of those with a positive result was about as sensitive (61.3% vs 60.3%, respectively) and significantly more specific (82.4% vs 88.9%, respectively). The strategy requiring repeat positive PCR tests on 2 visits had a sensitivity of 84.2% (75.3%-91.0%) and a specificity of 86.2% (85.1%-87.3%). All tests were more specific and less sensitive in older (> or = 30 years) vs younger women.Testing for HPV has higher sensitivity but lower specificity than thin-layer Pap screening. In some settings, particularly where screening intervals are long or haphazard, screening for HPV DNA may be a reasonable alternative to cytology-based screening of reproductive-age women.Utility of HPV DNA detection in thin-layer, liquid-based tests with atypical squamous metaplasia.To determine if testing for HPV is useful in the management of patients with atypical squamous metaplasia (ASM) and to evaluate a small group of patients with atypical squamous cells in the setting of an atrophic cellular profile (estrogen test [ESTT]).Presence of HPV DNA was determined on 104 ASM and ESTT cases on residual ThinPrep specimens using Hybrid Capture II. Results of the HPV DNA test were correlated with subsequent biopsy or repeat Pap test results.Of 63 patients with ASM on ThinPrep Pap tests, 52% were associated with histologically proven SIL when HPV DNA was detected by Hybrid Capture II. None of the 17 patients who were negative for HPV DNA had subsequent evidence of HPV infection by biopsy or repeat Pap test. Among 14 patients with ESTT, none of the 12 who were negative for HPV DNA had subsequent evidence of HPV infection.ASM and ESTT with a negative HPV DNA test can be followed routinely, and a colposcopic examination is not warranted.Comparison of two signal-amplification DNA tests for high-risk HPV as an aid to colposcopy.To compare Hybrid Capture Tube (HCT) and the second-generation Hybrid Capture II (HC II) test for detection of high-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA at the time of colposcopy.Colposcopy and HPV testing were performed by HCT and HC II on 1,309 women for evaluation of abnormal Pap smears. Differences in the proportions were tested with chi 2 and 95% CI calculations.When compared to HCT, HC II was more often positive in women with any abnormal Pap smear (44% [95% CI 41-46%] vs. 34% [31-37%], P < .005) and in the subset of women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance Pap smears (32% [29-35%] vs. 24% [22-27%], P < .005). HC II was more sensitive in detecting cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) 2 or worse (93% [88-97%] vs. 78% [70-84%], P < .005) and had a lower rate of undetected > or = CIN 2 in HPV test-negative subjects (1.5% [0.7-2.7%]) vs. 4.3% [3.0-5.9%], P < .005). HC II was also more often positive in women with negative colposcopic evaluations (29% [25.7-32.4%] vs. 20% [17.6-23.5%], P < .005). The specificity of HC II in detection of > or = CIN 2 was lower than that for HCT (63% [60.5-66.2%] vs. 73% [69.5-74.8%], P < .005).Effects of age and human papilloma viral load on colposcopy triage: data from the randomized Atypical Squamous Cells of Undetermined Significance/Low-Grade Squamous Intraepithelial Lesion Triage Study (ALTS).Testing for oncogenic human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA at a 1.0-pg/mL threshold represents a promising approach for colposcopy triage of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS), but not for low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (LSIL). Considering age or viral load could improve colposcopy triage.We determined the sensitivity for detecting Cervical Intraepithelial Neoplasia 3 (CIN3) and cancer and the percentage of referrals for colposcopy using HPV testing and repeat thin-layer cytopathology in 2198 women with ASCUS and in 848 women with LSIL enrolled in ALTS from November 1996 through December 1998. We analyzed results by age and at two thresholds for HPV load and repeat cytopathology.For ASCUS, the overall sensitivity of HPV testing at 1.0 pg/mL was 96.1% (95% confidence interval [CI] = 92.8 to 99.5%) and varied minimally with age (range, 93.9% to 97.8%). HPV testing at this threshold would refer 31.2% (95% CI = 28.0% to 34.3%) of women aged 29 years or older as compared with more than 65% of younger women. Among women aged 29 years or older with ASCUS, referral for repeat cytopathology of ASCUS had a sensitivity of 90.9% (95% CI = 81.1% to 100.0%) and would refer 50.1% (95% CI = 46.7 to 53.5%). Among all ASCUS, HPV testing using a 10.0-pg/mL threshold decreased sensitivity to 91.5% and referrals to 41.7%. More than 63% of LSIL would have been referred using any strategy achieving 90% sensitivity.For women with ASCUS, HPV testing was highly sensitive for detecting CIN3 and cancer with dramatically fewer referrals of older women. Neither a single HPV test nor repeat cytopathology provides useful triage for women with LSIL.Is the human papillomavirus test in combination with the Papanicolaou test useful for management of patients with diagnoses of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance/low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions?To determine whether human papillomavirus (HPV) testing is useful in the evaluation of patients diagnosed with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS)/low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL) and whether the HPV test is appropriate as an alternative screening method.The results of Papanicolaou (Pap) tests and subsequent hybrid capture tube (HCT) II tests for high-risk-type HPV were analyzed for 457 patients. Among these tests, 208 histologic diagnoses were made and correlated with the results of Pap and HPV tests. The sensitivity and specificity of the Pap test, HPV test, and the combined method of Pap and HPV tests to detect cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) 2/3 and all CIN were also measured.Sixty (63.8%) of 94 women with LSIL and 31 (26.3%) of 118 women with ASCUS tested positive for high-risk HPV. The sensitivity values for Pap tests in detecting all cases of CIN and CIN 2/3 were 91.4% and 92.9%, respectively. The sensitivity values of HCT II tests using the high-risk probe for detecting all cases of CIN and CIN 2/3 were 62.6% and 88.1%, respectively. Biopsies confirmed that 10 (22.7%) of 44 LSIL patients with high-risk HPV had CIN 2/3, but only 1 (4.5%) of 22 LSIL patients without high-risk HPV had CIN 2/3.Testing for high-risk HPV with the HCT II test is useful in the detection of CIN 2/3 in LSIL groups and in the selection of patients for colposcopy in ASCUS groups, but it is not suitable for cervical cancer screening tests.High-risk HPV testing in women with borderline and mild dyskaryosis: long-term follow-up data and clinical relevance.In The Netherlands and most other European countries, women with two serial cervical smears with borderline or mild dyskaryosis (BMD) within 6 months are referred for colposcopy-directed biopsies. Only about 10% of these women have high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN). This study therefore investigated whether human papillomavirus (HPV) testing could identify which women with smears read as BMD are most likely to have high-grade CIN, either at referral or during follow-up and the relationship was determined between clearance of high-risk HPV and regression of abnormal cytology. Women with smears read as BMD (n=278) were referred to the gynaecologist for colposcopy. They were subdivided into two groups; group A comprised women with a single smear (n=172) and group B women with two sequential smears (n=106) read as BMD before referral. High-risk HPV detection with Hybrid Capture II (HC II) was performed on a cervical scrape taken at the first visit before colposcopy (i.e. baseline smear) and during follow-up. Biopsies were taken when lesions suspected for CIN were seen at colposcopy. High-risk HPV DNA was present in the baseline smears of 126 (45.0%) women; 26 (20.6%) of them had histologically confirmed CIN 2/3 at the first visit and another 14 (11.1%) during follow-up. Only one of the 152 women (0.7%) with a negative high-risk HPV test had a CIN 2 lesion at the first visit and no CIN lesions were detected during follow-up of these women. After exclusion of women who were treated for prevalent high-grade CIN, the median follow-up times were 1.3 years (range 0.0-4.3 years) and 1.6 years (range 0.0-4.5 years) for women with HPV-negative and HPV-positive baseline smears, respectively. The sensitivity of a positive high-risk HPV test for CIN 2/3 at the first visit was 96.3%, the specificity 60.2%, the positive predictive value 20.6%, and the negative predictive value 99.3%. These values did not change markedly when stratified for group A or group B. Thus, a high-risk HPV positive test was strongly associated with the presence at the first visit and the development of CIN 2/3 lesions during follow-up. Moreover, regression of abnormal cytology in women with a positive high-risk HPV test at baseline was strongly associated with viral clearance and occurred 0.3 years (range -1.2 to 1.7 years) later than HPV clearance. This study establishes the value of a high-risk HPV positive test for women at risk of high-grade CIN, with virtually no risk for missing CIN 2/3. Addition of a test on high-risk HPV in women with BMD could prevent 55% of the referrals and/or repeat smears.Comparison of three management strategies for patients with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance: baseline results from a randomized trial.More than 2 million U.S. women receive an equivocal cervical cytologic diagnosis (atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance [ASCUS]) each year. Effective colposcopy triage strategies are needed to identify the minority of women who have clinically significant disease while avoiding excessive follow-up evaluation for others.The ASCUS/LSIL (i.e., low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion) Triage Study (ALTS) is a multicenter, randomized trial comparing the sensitivity and specificity of the following three management strategies to detect cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 3 (CIN3): 1) immediate colposcopy (considered to be the reference standard), 2) triage to colposcopy based on human papillomavirus (HPV) results from Hybrid Capture 2(TM) (HC 2) and thin-layer cytology results, or 3) triage based on cytology results alone. This article summarizes the cross-sectional enrollment results for 3488 women with a referral diagnosis of ASCUS. All statistical tests are two-sided.Among participants with ASCUS, the underlying prevalence of histologically confirmed CIN3 was 5.1%. Sensitivity to detect CIN3 or above by testing for cancer-associated HPV DNA was 96.3% (95% confidence interval [CI] = 91.6% to 98.8%), with 56.1% of women referred to colposcopy. Sensitivity of a single repeat cytology specimen with a triage threshold of HSIL or above was 44.1% (95% CI = 35.6% to 52.9%), with 6.9% referred. Sensitivity of a lower cytology triage threshold of ASCUS or above was 85.3% (95% CI = 78.2% to 90.8%), with 58.6% referred.HC 2 testing for cancer-associated HPV DNA is a viable option in the management of women with ASCUS. It has greater sensitivity to detect CIN3 or above and specificity comparable to a single additional cytologic test indicating ASCUS or above.Contribution of human papillomavirus testing by hybrid capture in the triage of women with repeated abnormal pap smears before colposcopy referral.The purpose of this work was to evaluate the ability of testing for high-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) types using the hybrid capture technique to predict the presence of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) II,III in patients with repeated atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) and low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LGSIL) on Pap smears.Hybrid capture testing and tissue biopsy were performed on 503 consecutive women with ASCUS or LGSIL on repeated Pap smears who were referred for colposcopy.A highly significant association (P < 0.0001) was found between a positive test for high-risk HPV types and CIN II,III, with an 87.0% positive predictive value and a 95.7% negative predictive value. In 226 women with ASCUS on repeated Pap smears, a positive test for high-risk HPV types had a 85.7% sensitivity and a 97% specificity for CIN II,III. In 277 patients with LGSIL on repeated Pap smears, a positive test for high-risk HPV types had an 88.2% sensitivity and a 94.7% specificity for CIN I,II. Reserving colposcopy examination for women who were positive for high-risk HPV types would have reduced the number of referrals for colposcopy to 24.6% and maintained a sensitivity of 87.0% for CIN II,III.A positive hybrid capture test for high-risk HPV types was highly sensitive and specific for the presence of CIN II,III in patients with ASCUS and LGSIL on repeated Pap smears. We believe that improved methodology will eventually enable more selective colposcopy referrals without affecting patient safety among these women.Comparison of human papillomavirus DNA testing and repeat Papanicolaou test in women with low-grade cervical cytologic abnormalities: a randomized trial. HPV Effectiveness in Lowgrade Paps (HELP) Study No. 1 Group.Results of cervical cytology screening showing atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) or low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (LSIL) indicate risk for high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN 2 or 3). In a community-based randomized trial we compared the test performance of human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA testing with that of 6-month repeat Papanicolaou (Pap) test in detecting histologically confirmed CIN 2 or 3.We randomly assigned 212 women aged 16-50 years with ASCUS or LSIL on cervical cytology screening to undergo either immediate HPV DNA testing or a repeat Pap test in 6 months. Cervical swabs for the HPV DNA testing and the Pap smears were obtained by their family physicians. We tested the swabs for oncogenic HPV using the Hybrid Capture II assay (Digene Corp., Beltsville, Md.). Community-based pathologists examined the Pap smears. All women were referred for colposcopy by their family physicians. Two gynecological pathologists assessed the histology findings. We calculated test performance in women who completed the trial using CIN 2 or 3 as the reference standard.A total of 159 women completed the study. Compared with HPV DNA testing, which detected 87.5% (7/8) of the cases of CIN 2 or 3, repeat Pap smear showing high-grade intraepithelial neoplasia (HSIL) detected 11.1% (1/9) of cases (p = 0.004), and repeat Pap smear showing ASCUS, LSIL or HSIL detected 55.6% (5/9) (p = 0.16). Corresponding specificities were 50.6%, 95.2% (p = 0.002) and 55.6% (p = 0.61). Loss to follow-up was 17.1% in the HPV test group and 32.7% in the repeat Pap group (p = 0.009). Given the 7 cases of CIN 2 or 3 detected by HPV testing and the 5 cases detected by the repeat Pap smear, the incremental cost of HPV testing was calculated to be $3003 per additional case of CIN identified.HPV DNA testing was more costly but was associated with significantly less loss to follow-up. It may detect more cases of CIN 2 or 3 in women with low-grade cytologic abnormalities.Prediction of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 2-3 using risk assessment and human papillomavirus testing in women with atypia on papanicolaou smears.To determine whether human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA testing and risk assessment can predict cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) 2-3 on biopsies in women with atypia on Papanicolaou smears.One hundred ninety-five consenting women were referred for colposcopy because of atypia on Papanicolaou smears between September 1997 and April 1999. Before colposcopy, women completed risk assessments and had cervical swabs collected for HPV testing using the Hybrid Capture-II assay (Digene Corporation, Silver Spring, MD). Associations of demographic and clinical variables were assessed by chi(2) analysis, and logistic regression was used to assess factors associated with CIN 2-3. The cost-effectiveness of routine colposcopy versus reflex HPV testing by either conventional or liquid-based Papanicolaou smear media was compared.Cervical intraepithelial neoplasia was diagnosed in 70 of 195 women (35.9%), 55 (28.2%) with CIN 1 and 15 (7.7%) with CIN 2-3. High-risk HPV types were detected in 31.3% of all subjects, 36.4% of those with CIN 1, and 93.3% of those with CIN 2-3. By logistic regression, CIN 2-3 was associated only with detection of high-risk HPV (odds ratio 110.08, 95% confidence interval 8.35, 999. 00). The sensitivity of high-risk HPV for detecting CIN 2-3 was 93. 3%, specificity 73.9%, positive predictive value 23.0%, and negative predictive value 99.3%. The cost of reflex HPV testing using conventional smear or liquid-based media was less than routine colposcopy ($4809 and $4308, respectively, versus $4875 per case detected).Triage based on HPV testing would result in referral of approximately 31% of patients to colposcopy and appears to be a sensitive and cost-effective alternative to colposcopy.Quantitative detection of oncogenic HPV DNA using hybrid capture to triage borderline and mildly dyskaryotic Papanicolaou smears.To investigate the use of hybrid capture to triage borderline and mildly abnormal PAP smears to either colposcopy or continued cytological surveillance.A prospective cross-sectional study of 207 women with either mild or borderline dyskaryosis referred to the colposcopy clinic at the Whittington Hospital, London was done. Quantitative detection of oncogenic human papillomavirus deoxyribose nucleic acid was performed using the solution hybridization technique Hybrid Capture I (Digene Diagnostics). Positive or negative hybrid capture results were compared to colposcopically directed punch biopsy or loop excision of the transformation zone.Hybrid capture correctly predicted 1/1 micro-invasive cancers, 23/24 CIN 3 and 20/24 CIN 2, giving a sensitivity to detect significant disease of CIN 2 or above of 90%. For CIN 1, 37/66 were HPV positive making the sensitivity to detect all grades of CIN 70%. Of women with a normal cervix, 39/92 were HPV positive and in total 58% of the women were HPV positive and would have been referred to colposcopy.Hybrid capture was a simple solution hybridization method which provided a sensitive method of detecting CIN 2 and above lesions in women with minor PAP smear abnormalities. However, the sensitivity for CIN 1 and the specificity were low, meaning that further improvements in the technique are needed before it can be used as a triage strategy.Human papillomavirus testing in women with mild cytologic atypia.To evaluate the efficiency of human papillomavirus (HPV) testing by Hybrid Capture II (Digene Diagnostics Inc., Silver Spring, MD) with regard to detecting biopsy-confirmed cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) or high-grade CIN in women with mild atypia, compared with the efficiencies of polymerase chain reaction (PCR), Southern blot hybridization, and cytology.We prospectively studied 378 women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) (n = 111) or low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (SILs) (n = 267) demonstrated by referral cytology. We did repeat cytology, sampling for detection of HPV DNA by Hybrid Capture II, PCR, and Southern blot hybridization, and colposcopic evaluation with cervical biopsies.All participants underwent the Hybrid Capture II test and 320 underwent the three HPV tests. Sensitivities of Hybrid Capture II for detecting CIN and high-grade CIN (0.81 and 0.86, respectively) were similar to those of cytology (0.83 and 0.82, respectively) and PCR (0.77 and 0.95, respectively), and higher than those of Southern blot hybridization (0.48 and 0.45, respectively). Compared with cytology, combined triage with Hybrid Capture II improved sensitivities for detecting CIN (0.94 versus 0.83, P <.001) and high-grade CIN (0.96 versus 0.85), though the latter difference was not significant (P =.17). In women with ASCUS, sensitivities of combined triage and cytology for detecting CIN were 0.94 and 0.71, respectively (P =.01), and sensitivities of the two methods for detecting high-grade CIN were 0.92 and 0.66, respectively (P =.13). The increase in sensitivity was lower among women with low-grade SILs; for these women, cytology had high sensitivity (0.86 for CIN and 1.00 for high-grade CIN). The specificity of combined triage was significantly lower than that of cytology in both groups.Compared with repeat cytology, combined triage with HPV testing markedly improves sensitivity for detecting CIN in women with ASCUS, but at the expense of specificity.Atypical glandular cells of undetermined significance (AGUS): cytopathologic features, histopathologic results, and human papillomavirus DNA detection.We intensively reviewed 137 smears initially classified as atypical glandular cells of undetermined significance (AGUS) to refine cytological criteria for evaluating these cases, evaluate histological outcomes, and assess the value of human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA testing in management. Consenting, nonpregnant study participants were identified from a cohort of 46,009 women receiving routine Pap smear screening in a managed care setting. Colposcopy was performed on all women, and at least one histological sample was obtained from each. Review diagnoses were assigned to smears and biopsy specimens by two separate panels of pathologists. DNA testing for cancer-associated HPV types was performed on rinses of cytological samplers after a smear and thin-layer slide had been made. On review, 47 (34%) smears were reclassified as negative, 44 (32%) as AGUS, 30 (22%) as atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS), and 16 (12%) as squamous intraepithelial lesions (SIL). The 19 smears interpreted as high-grade intraepithelial lesions on review included 13 high-grade SIL (HSIL), two HSIL with AGUS, favor neoplastic (endocervical adenocarcinoma in situ [AIS]), and four AGUS, favor neoplastic (AIS). Review histological diagnoses were negative in 105 (77%), squamous or glandular atypia in four (3%), low-grade SIL (LSIL) in nine (7%), HSIL in 12 (9%), AIS in five (4%, including two with concurrent HSIL), and endometrial carcinoma in one (1%). HPV testing identified 11 (92%) of 12 women with histologically confirmed HSIL and all five with AIS (100%). A high-grade intraepithelial lesion or carcinoma is detected in approximately 14% of women with community-based diagnoses of AGUS who are referred for immediate evaluation. Use of refined cytological criteria and HPV DNA testing may permit improved management of women with AGUS.Identifying women with cervical neoplasia: using human papillomavirus DNA testing for equivocal Papanicolaou results.A Papanicolaou (Pap) test result of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) presents a clinical challenge. Only 5% to 10% of women with ASCUS harbor serious cervical disease, but more than one third of the high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (HSILs) in screening populations are identified from ASCUS Pap test results.To determine whether human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA testing of residual material from liquid-based Pap tests and referral of cases found to be HPV-positive directly to colposcopy could provide sensitive detection of underlying HSILs in women with ASCUS Pap results, compared with repeat Pap testing.Natural history of women with ASCUS Pap smear results, all of whom had liquid-based cytology, HPV testing, and subsequent repeat Pap tests and colposcopy with histologic evaluation, conducted at 12 gynecology clinics in a large managed care organization between October 1995 and June 1996.From a cohort of 46009 women who had routine cervical examinations, 995 women with Pap test results of ASCUS who consented to participate were identified.Cervical histology, HPV test results, and repeat Pap smear results, and sensitivity of HPV testing to identify patients found to have HSIL+ histology.Of 995 participants with ASCUS Pap test results, 973 had both a definitive histologic diagnosis and HPV result. Sixty-five (6.7%) had histologic HSIL or cancer. For women with histologic HSIL+, the HPV test was positive in 89.2% (95% confidence interval [CI], 78.4%-95.2%), and the specificity was 64.1 % (95% CI, 60.9%-67.2%). The repeat Pap smear result was abnormal in 76.2% (95% CI, 63.5%-85.7%). Triage based on HPV testing only or on repeat Pap testing only would refer similar proportions (approximately 39%) to colposcopy. The sensitivity of HPV DNA testing for HSIL was equivalent to, if not greater than, that of the repeat Pap test. We further estimated that an HPV-based algorithm including the immediate colposcopy of HPV-positive women, and then repeat Pap testing of all others, would provide an overall sensitivity of 96.9% (95% CI, 88.3%-99.5%).For women with ASCUS Pap tests, HPV DNA testing of residual specimens collected for routine cervical cytology can help identify those who have underlying HSIL. By testing the specimen collected at initial screening, the majority of high-risk cases can be identified and referred for colposcopy based on a single screening.Does typing of human papillomavirus assist in the triage of women with repeated low-grade, cervical cytologic abnormalities?To evaluate the ability of testing for high-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) using the hybrid capture technique to detect cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) in patients with repeated low-grade cervical cytologic abnormalities and an adequate and normal colposcopy.Hybrid capture testing and LEETZ were performed on 166 women with repeated low-grade cervical cytologic abnormalities who were referred for colposcopy which was to be adequate and normal.A highly significant correlation (P < 0.0001) was found between a positive test for high-risk HPV types and the finding of CIN II,III. In 67 women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance on repeated cytologic studies, a positive test for high-risk HPV types had a sensitivity and specificity of 90 and 96.5%, respectively, for detecting CIN II,III. In 99 patients with low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions found on repeated cytologic study, a positive test for high-risk HPV types identified all patients as having CIN II,III on cone biopsy (sensitivity, 100%), with a specificity of 86.4%. Restriction of tissue sampling to women who were positive for high-risk HPV types would have reduced the number of tissue samplings performed to 20.4%, while identifying 20 of 21 patients with biopsy-confirmed CIN II, III.A positive hybrid capture test for high-risk HPV types is highly sensitive and specific for detecting CIN II,III in patients with repeated low-grade cervical cytologic abnormalities and an adequate and normal colposcopy and may be used in the triage of these women before performing tissue sampling.Evaluation of atypical and low-grade cervical cytology in private practice.To evaluate the adequacy of cytology alone for diagnosis of grade of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) and to study performance of cytology, human papillomavirus (HPV) testing, and colposcopy in the evaluation of cytologic findings suggesting low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (SIL), or atypical squamous (ASCUS) or atypical glandular (AGCUS) cells of undetermined significance.Standard gynecologic and cytologic evaluation and colposcopic inspection as an additional screening approach were performed on women with no prior hysterectomies screened in a private practice between January 1, 1993, and August 1, 1995. Among these 7651 women, 367 had ASCUS, AGCUS, or SIL cytology or clinically or colposcopically visible cervical lesions. Sensitivity, specificity, and relative risk of CIN in the 367 women were compared by colposcopic, cytologic, histologic and virologic diagnoses.The sensitivity of all non-negative Papanicolaou smears for CIN 2-3 and cancer was 92%, combined cytologic categories of high- and low-grade SIL were 59%, and high-grade SIL alone was 22%. Colposcopy was performed in all 367 patients, and positive findings led to biopsies in 48%. Colposcopy of patients with ASCUS increased detection of CIN 2-3 by 32% and CIN 1 by 48%. Cervical cytology was false negative in 8% of patients with CIN 2-3 and in 14% of those with CIN 1. These cases of CIN were detected by screening colposcopic inspection. High-risk HPV DNA was positive in 41% of women with CIN 2-3, and in 25% of those with CIN 1. The positive predictive value of ASCUS cytology increased from 5% to 42% for CIN 2-3 and from 30% to 85% for all grades of CIN in patients carrying high-risk HPV DNA. Virologic studies did not add to an increase in the sensitivity for CIN 2-3 among women in the low- and high-grade SIL cytology groups.Because of the limited sensitivity of the high-grade SIL cytologic category for CIN 2-3, we recommend that all women with ASCUS, AGCUS, low- or high-grade SIL cytology be recalled for colposcopy, with biopsy only when indicated by colposcopic findings.The clinical value of digene hybrid capture HPV DNA testing in a referral-based population with abnormal pap smears.The hybrid capture human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA assay is offered by the manufacturer to assist clinicians with patients with ASCUS pap smear results to assess the risk factor and to potentially direct follow-up of these patients. In our practice, a gynecologic oncology practice that has a referral based population with abnormal pap smears, our purpose was to evaluate the patients referred with all grades of abnormal cervical cytology.One hundred consecutive patients who were referred for evaluation of abnormal cervical cytology: atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS); low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LGSIL); high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HGSIL); or squamous cell carcinoma (SCC) were evaluated by repeat pap smear, hybrid capture HPV DNA analysis and colposcopy. Colposcopic findings were recorded, and if appropriate, cervical biopsies were performed. Hybrid capture results were correlated with histologic and cytologic findings. Using histopathologic diagnosis as the reference standard, the sensitivity and positive predictive value of pap smear and high risk HPV were calculated. The Kappa test was used to correlate colposcopic and histopathologic findings.Repeat pap smears at the time of initial consultation demonstrated 25 patients with normal results, 39 with LGSIL, 30 with HGSIL, 1 SCC and 5 ASCUS. Seventy-eight patients underwent cervical biopsy. Colposcopic findings correlated significantly with histopathologic findings (p<0.0001). Forty-four percent of patients tested positive for HPV DNA: 40 patients with high risk HPV, three patients with low risk HPV, and one patient with both high risk and low risk HPV. Sixteen of 39 patients (41%) with LGSIL on pap smear tested positive for high risk HPV; 37% of patients in this group required cervical conization because cervical biopsies demonstrated moderate/severe dysplasia. The diagnosis of moderate/severe dysplasia significantly correlated with the presence of high risk HPV [OR 78.9 (8.31-389.30)]. There was no significant correlation between the HPV DNA signal strengths and the histologic grade of dysplasia. The sensitivity and the positive predictive value of pap smear alone in identifying moderate/severe dysplasia was 62% and 96%, respectively. The combination of HGSIL pap smears and high risk HPV increased the sensitivity but not the positive predictive value for the detection of moderate/severe dysplasia to 77.7% and 95%, respectively (P=NS).Although in this setting, the use of hybrid capture DNA testing did not significantly improve the sensitivity or positive predictive value of the diagnosis of HGSIL cytology when compared to cytologically indicated plus colposcopically directed cervical biopsies in this population of women at high risk for the presence of disease, the combination of HGSIL pap smears and high-risk HPV did result in a clinically important increase in the diagnosis of moderate/severe dysplasia.Risk factors for high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia in patients with mild cytological dyskaryosis: human papillomavirus testing versus multivariate tree analysis of demographic data.The objective of this study was to compare the use of molecular hybridization by hybrid capture methodology for human papillomavirus (HPV) with the use of demographic and lifestyle variables as intermediate triage in patients with cytological mild dyskaryosis. The study was designed as a prospective study using regression tree analysis of demographic data in consecutive patients who were subjected to colposcopic evaluation at the colposcopy clinic at the First Department of Obstetrics and Gynaecology, University of Milan (Milan, Italy). A total of 177 women were subjected to colposcopy because of a single routine Pap smear showing mild dyskaryosis. A structured interview, sampling for HPV testing for the detection of viral DNA by hybrid capture methodology, and colposcopic evaluation with cervical biopsies were performed for each subject. The accuracies of molecular hybridization for HPV and of the classification model based on the demographic and lifestyle variables in predicting patients with histologically high-grade cervical intraepithelial lesions were measured. The classification model based on the demographic and lifestyle variables showed comparable results with molecular hybridization for HPV (specificity, 0.75 versus 0.73; sensitivity, 0.61 versus 0.67, respectively). The use of demographic and lifestyle variables appears to be a simple and economic possibility for triaging patients with mild dyskaryotic smears in a screening program.Comparison of two tests for detecting carcinogenic HPV in women with Papanicolaou smear reports of ASCUS and LSIL.The detection of cancer-associated types of human papillomavirus (HPV) in cervical specimens predicts the presence and future development of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN). The purposes of this study were (1) to determine the efficacy of a second-generation assay by hybrid capture (HC II) to detect carcinogenic HPV from residual cervical cells of a liquid-based cervical cytologic specimen, and (2) to compare the performance of this second-generation test with the first-generation hybrid capture (HCT) HPV test of material from direct cervical sampling to detect CIN in women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) and low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL) Papanicolaou (Pap) smear reports.Women with a recent Pap smear report of ASCUS or LSIL had a sampling of the cervix using either an Ayre's spatula and cytobrush or an Accellon device sampling for liquid-based cytologic system HC II HPV testing, followed by a Dacron swab sampling of the cervix for standard HCT HPV testing of the paired specimens. All women received colposcopy examinations including cervical biopsy and endocervical curettage, when indicated, to determine criterion standards for comparison.Paired swabs and liquid-based cervical specimens from 242 women were available for testing by standard HCT and the newer HC II HPV DNA assays. The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values for detecting CIN grade 2 or 3 (CIN 2/3) were 61.9%, 57.0%, 12.0%, and 94.0%, respectively, for the HCT test, and 90.5%, 29.4%, 10.9%, and 97.0%, respectively, for the liquid-based cytology HC II assay. When only women with an initial ASCUS Pap smear report were considered, the HC II test results were 88.9%, 40.3%, 9.1%, and 98.2%, respectively.Testing for lower genital tract carcinogenic HPV DNA using a cervical cytology liquid transport media residual sample is clinically feasible. The new HC II microplate HPV test achieved a greater test sensitivity for detecting carcinogenic HPV and correspondingly of CIN 2/3 compared with the currently available first-generation HC HPV test. Use of a liquid-based cervical cytology system combined with intermediate triage by HC II testing of residual cells for carcinogenic HPV alone may help to efficiently identify CIN 2/3 in women who have a prior screening Pap smear report of ASCUS.Triage of women with ASCUS and LSIL on Pap smear reports: management by repeat Pap smear, HPV DNA testing, or colposcopy?The purpose of this study was to determine the efficacy of a repeat Papanicolaou (Pap) smear and the Hybrid Capture tube-based (HCT) HPV DNA test for detecting cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) grade 2 or 3 in women with recent atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) or low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL) Pap smear reports.Women with a recent Pap smear report of ASCUS (n = 169) or LSIL (n = 110) had a repeat Pap smear, sampling of the cervix for HCT HPV DNA assay and a colposcopy examination. Data were evaluated using three different triage thresholds for colposcopy examination: a repeat Pap smear of persistent ASCUS or more severe dysplasia, a finding of persistent LSIL or more severe dysplasia, and a carcinogenic HPV test result.The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values for detecting CIN 2/3 were 70%, 45%, 7%, and 96% for a repeat Pap smear using an ASCUS-positive threshold and 20%, 86%, 8%, and 94% for a repeat Pap smear using an LSIL-positive threshold, respectively, when women with an initial ASCUS Pap smear were considered. HPV testing for carcinogenic viruses alone or in combination with a repeat Pap smear (using ASCUS as a positive threshold) yielded results of 50%, 67%, 9%, and 96%, respectively, and 70%, 37%, 7%, and 95%, respectively, for detecting CIN 2/3. In women with an initial LSIL Pap smear, respective values for detecting CIN 2/3 by a repeat Pap smear with an ASCUS threshold were 92%, 26%, 14%, and 96%, and for an LSIL threshold 23%, 64%, 8%, and 86%, respectively. Hybrid Capture HPV testing alone or in combination with a repeat Pap smear yielded 69%, 43%, 14%, and 91%, respectively, and 100%, 21%, 14%, and 100%, respectively.A Pap smear triage threshold restricted to LSIL or more severe dysplasia for women with prior ASCUS or LSIL Pap smear results was clearly ineffective for detecting high-grade cervical precancerous lesions. In contrast, when the repeat Pap smear triage threshold was expanded to include persistent ASCUS as abnormal, 83% of the women with CIN 2/3 were detected. Detection of carcinogenic HPV DNA using the HCT test was almost as sensitive for detecting CIN 2/3 as a solitary repeat Pap smear using an ASCUS or more severe positive threshold. Combining the HPV test with a repeat Pap smear did not significantly improve the sensitivity of cytology for detecting high-grade CIN. This study suggests that women with ASCUS and particularly LSIL Pap smears should be referred for a colposcopy examination until better triage methods become available.Human papillomavirus testing as triage for atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance and low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions: sensitivity, specificity, and cost-effectiveness.Our purpose was to evaluate the cost-effectiveness of the use of a Food and Drug Administration-approved human papillomavirus test in triaging patients with Papanicolaou smears showing atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance or a low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion for colposcopy compared with an algorithm that used cytologic follow-up.Four hundred sixty-two women referred to our Colposcopy Clinic with a Papanicolaou smear report of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance or a low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion underwent repeat Papanicolaou smear, cervical colposcopy, directed cervical biopsy, and endocervical curettage. In addition, human papillomavirus testing by the Food and Drug Administration-approved HPV Profile (Digene Diagnostics, Silver Spring, Md.) test was done. A comparison of sensitivity, specificity, and cost-effectiveness of an algorithm determining the need for colposcopy on the basis of repeat cytologic testing versus an algorithm that incorporated repeat cytologic testing and human papillomavirus screening was done. The cost-effectiveness of both of these triage algorithms was also compared.As expected, high-risk human papillomavirus deoxyribonucleic acid was detected with greater frequency in relation to increasing severity of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia. In 268 women, the follow-up smear obtained in our clinic was reported as negative. High-risk human papillomavirus types were found in 23.5% of these women. In the human papillomavirus-negative women, 5.9% had grade 2 or 3 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia confirmed on cervical biopsy. In comparison, 20.6% of those with a positive result of the human papillomavirus test had grade 2 or 3 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia on biopsy (p < 0.001). Despite this difference, the sensitivity of a positive result of a high-risk human papillomavirus test in predicting the presence of grade 2 or 3 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia was only 52%. Among the women for whom a follow-up clinic Papanicolaou smear was reported as showing atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance or a low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion, there was no difference in the frequency of biopsy-proved grade 2 or 3 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia between those women with a positive human papillomavirus test result and those with a negative test result. Colposcopy would have been recommended for 194 women because of a repeat clinic smear revealing atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance, a low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion, or a high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion, and in 21.6% of these grade 2 or 3 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia was shown on biopsy (sensitivity 63%, specificity 62%). Colposcopy would have been recommended for 180 women because high-risk human papillomavirus or a high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion was detected at the clinic visit, and in 25% of this group grade 2 or 3 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia was shown on biopsy (sensitivity 67%, specificity 66%). Sensitivity and specificity were virtually identical for the two algorithms, but the cost of human papillomavirus testing was nearly double that of triage based on repeat cytologic testing alone ($692 vs $1246 per case).The Food and Drug Administration-approved HPV Profile test is not a cost-effective triage for patients referred with Papanicolaou smears reported as showing atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance or low-grade squamous lesions.Human papillomavirus deoxyribonucleic acid detection in mildly or moderately dysplastic smears: a possible method for selecting patients for colposcopy.Current screening protocols for cervical cancer dictate that patients with smears read as mild or moderate dysplasia of the uterine cervix undergo colposcopy, although approximately half these women do not prove to have high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions. The aim of this study was to determine whether human papillomavirus testing is capable of discriminating between high- and low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions so as to be useful in reducing the number of colposcopic examinations.We tested 190 consecutive patients with smears read as mild or moderate dysplasia for the presence of human papillomavirus deoxyribonucleic acid by use of two different polymerase chain reactions with the consensus primer pairs CPI/IIG and MY09/11. Typing was carried out by direct sequence analysis of the CPI/IIG amplimers. The MY09/11 amplimers were detected in enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay format with the SHARP (Solution Hybridization Assay for PCR Products) Signal System with two probe mixtures (A and B) to detect nononcogenic and oncogenic human papillomavirus types. The human papillomavirus test results were compared with the histologic diagnosis, which was regarded as the reference standard.Fifty-six of the 190 patients had high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions. The sensitivity was 96% for the CPI/IIG test and 95% for the MY09/11 polymerase chain reaction plus SHARP Signal System when probe B only was used. The specificity was 33% for the CPI/IIG test and 40% for the MY09/11 polymerase chain reaction plus SHARP Signal System when probe B was used.A negative CPI/IIG or SHARP Signal System probe B test can select, respectively, 44 or 54 of the 134 patients without high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions. The use of these human papillomavirus tests as a secondary triage in patients with smears that were read as mild or moderate dysplasia could prevent those patients from undergoing unnecessary colposcopy. However, respectively, 2 or 3 of the 56 patients who have high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions would be missed by human papillomavirus testing.Human papillomavirus testing by hybrid capture appears to be useful in triaging women with a cytologic diagnosis of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance.Our purpose was to determine the clinical value of human papillomavirus deoxyribonucleic acid testing with the hybrid capture test, specifically to examine whether human papillomavirus testing could identify which women with Papanicolaou smears read as atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance were most likely to have histologically confirmed cervical intraepithelial neoplasia.Hybrid capture testing for 14 human papillomavirus types, repeat Papanicolaou smears, and colposcopically directed biopsies were performed concurrently on 217 women referred to a student health colposcopy clinic with a previous Papanicolaou smear read as atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance.Human papillomavirus deoxyribonucleic acid positivity was associated with an eightfold increased likelihood of histologic confirmation of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia. The sensitivity of hybrid capture for any cervical intraepithelial neoplasia was 86% (43/50) and for grade 2 or 3 was 93% (14/15), whereas the corresponding values for the repeat Papanicolaou smear were 60% (30/50) and 73% (11/15), respectively. Moreover, high viral levels of human papillomavirus types known to be associated with cervical cancer were strongly predictive of high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia.Testing for human papillomavirus deoxyribonucleic acid with hybrid capture appears to offer an effective means by which patients whose cervical Papanicolaou smears have been read as atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance could be triaged for colposcopy. In particular, sensitivity for high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia could be maintained and specificity markedly improved by referring only those patients who had elevated levels of human papillomavirus deoxyribonucleic acid of cancer-associated viral types.Comparison of management algorithms for the evaluation of women with low-grade cytologic abnormalities.To present our clinical experience using a repeat Papanicolaou smear and human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA testing to evaluate patients with low-grade cytologic abnormalities.We performed a retrospective chart review of women who were referred for the evaluation of a Papanicolaou smear and were diagnosed as having either atypical cells of undetermined clinical significance or a low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (SIL). All women included in this review had a repeat Papanicolaou smear, HPV DNA testing with the Hybrid Capture method, and a colposcopic examination.The sensitivity and specificity of the repeat Papanicolaou smear for detecting biopsy-confirmed cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) were 0.74 and 0.67, respectively, in the 398 women referred for a previous low-grade SIL or atypical Papanicolaou smear. The sensitivity and specificity of a HPV DNA test positive for "high oncogenic risk" HPV types were 0.73 and 0.66, respectively. Triage using a repeat Papanicolaou smear and an HPV DNA test in combination correctly identified 92% of the women with biopsy-proven CIN, but 71% of the women would have been referred for colposcopy with this form of triage.A repeat Papanicolaou smear combined with a HPV DNA test is a sensitive alternative to colposcopic evaluation for the detection of CIN in women referred for a previous low-grade abnormal Papanicolaou smear. However, because of the low specificity of this approach, it results in only modest cost reductions compared to the more standard triage of performing colposcopy at the first visit.Human papillomavirus status in the prediction of high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia in patients with persistent low-grade cervical cytological abnormalities.The role of human papillomavirus (HPV) detection in the management of patients with persistent low-grade (mild dyskaryosis or less) cervical cytological abnormalities is unclear. We have analysed cytological material from 167 such patients both cytologically and by non-isotopic in situ hybridisation (NISH) for HPV 16, 18, 31 and 33 and consensus primer polymerase chain reaction (PCR) amplification followed by both generic and specific typing for these HPV types. Cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) 2 or 3 was present in 40 of 167 patients (23.9%), and the positive predictive values (PPVs) for the presence of CIN 2 or 3, of moderate or severe dyskaryosis at repeat cytology and an HPV-positive NISH and generic PCR signal were 100%, 66% and 42% respectively. The corresponding sensitivities were 48%, 68% and 87%. Addition of cytology to molecular analysis improved both PPV and sensitivity, the best combination being NISH and cytopathology (PPV 71%, sensitivity 87%). These data demonstrate that the presence of CIN 2 or 3 in patients with mild cytological abnormalities can be predicted by molecular detection of HPV in some cases, particularly when combined with cytological analysis. However, the magnitude of this prediction is dependent on the population of patients studied, and the clinical role of this approach therefore remains to be defined.Should all women with cervical atypia be referred for colposcopy: a HARNET study. Harrisburgh Area Research Network.Clinicians who manage women with Papanicolaou (Pap) smears showing atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) may miss clinically significant cervical disease by repeating the cytology alone. We evaluated the ability of the human papillomavirus (HPV) screen and the naked-eye examination after a cervical acetic acid wash to enhance the follow-up Pap smear in predicting an abnormal colposcopic biopsy.Pap smears were performed on all women (N = 7458) attending six family practice offices for a health maintenance examination from August 1989 through February 1991. Consenting subjects with ASCUS underwent repeat cytological testing, an HPV screen, and a cervical acetic acid wash examination immediately before colposcopy after a 4- to 6-month waiting period.Of the 122 consenting women identified with ASCUS, 67 (55%) demonstrated abnormalities on biopsy, including 26 with condyloma, 26 with cervical intraepithelial neoplasia I (CIN I), and 15 with CIN II to III. The false-negative rate, 58%, of the follow-up Pap smear alone for detecting these cases of condyloma and CIN was significantly decreased (false-negative rate, 27%) with the use of the cervical acetic acid wash as an adjunctive test. There was no additional reduction in the false-negative rate with the use of the HPV screen. Of the 15 subjects with high-grade cervical lesions (CIN II to III), 14 had either an abnormal follow-up Pap smear or an abnormal cervical acetic acid wash examination.Among women with cervical atypia, a single follow-up Pap smear alone failed to detect one third of the cases of high-grade disease. Ninety-three percent of these cases were detected, however, with a follow-up Pap smear and an acetic acid wash. Our one subject with a high-grade lesion missed with this combination of tests had an unsatisfactory Pap smear. Use of both tests together may reliably guide clinical decisions regarding the management of cervical atypia.An evaluation of human papillomavirus testing as part of referral to colposcopy clinics.To determine the usefulness of human papillomavirus (HPV) testing as a triage method for predicting which women referred to a colposcopy clinic were most likely to have histologically confirmed cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN).Papanicolaou tests, ViraPap tests for HPV infection, and colposcopically directed biopsies were performed concurrently on 482 women referred to a student health colposcopy clinic.The results demonstrated that HPV positivity was associated with a greatly increased likelihood of histologic confirmation of CIN, especially among women with concurrent cytologic findings that were negative or showed only atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance.Testing for HPV appears to have a role in the triage of students now being referred to our colposcopy clinic. A combination of HPV testing and repeated cytologic screening would provide reasonably sensitive screening for cervical neoplasia while limiting the use of colposcopic services, which are currently overburdened. The eventual usefulness of HPV testing will depend on the cost and availability of colposcopy services, the cost of Papanicolaou tests, the cost and accuracy of HPV tests, and the predictive value of HPV detection in the population being screened.Triage of women with minor cervical lesions: data suggesting a "test and treat" approach for HPV E6/E7 mRNA testing.Human papillomavirus (HPV) testing is included in the cervical cancer screening program in the triage of women with equivocal (ASC-US) or low-grade (LSIL) cytological lesions. These women have an increased risk for developing high grade dysplasia and cancer (CIN2+) compared to women with normal cytology. However, in order to avoid unnecessary follow-up, as well as overtreatment, a high positive predictive value (PPV) of the triage test is important.The HPV test PreTect HPV-Proofer, detecting E6/E7 mRNA from the HPV types 16, 18, 31, 33 and 45, is used as triage test together with repeat cytology. PPV data for HPV E6/E7 mRNA testing during the period from January 2006 up to June 2009 are reported. In total, 406 of 2099 women (19.3%) had a positive HPV test result. Of the women with a positive test result and with a histological diagnosis (n = 347), 243 women had histological high-grade dysplasia or cancer (CIN2+), giving a PPV of 70.0% (95% confidence interval [CI], 65.2%-74.8%). For HPV 16 or HPV 33 positive women above 40 years of age, the PPV was 83.7% (95% CI, 73.3%-94.0%) and 84.6% (95% CI, 65.0%-100.0%) respectively. The PPV of test positive women with HSIL cytology was 94.2% (95% CI, 88.7%-99.7%).When the result in triage is HPV mRNA positive, our data suggest direct treatment for women above 40 years of age or for women with a concurrent cytological HSIL diagnosis, contributing to better clinical safety for these women. In addition, by decreasing the time to treatment, thereby reducing the number of recalls, the patient management algorithm will be considerably improved, in turn reducing follow-up costs as well as unnecessary psychological stress among patients.Cost-effectiveness of using human papillomavirus 16/18 genotype triage in cervical cancer screening.Testing for human papillomavirus (HPV) 16 and 18 genotypes, which are known to cause approximately 65-70% of invasive cervical cancer cases, may allow clinicians to identify women at highest risk for underlying cervical intraepithelial neoplasia missed by Pap cytology. Our objective was to determine the cost-effectiveness of adding HPV-16 and 18 genotype triage to current cervical cancer screening strategies in the United States.We developed a lifetime Markov model to assess the cost-effectiveness of the following cervical cancer screening algorithms: (1) liquid-based cytology (LBC), (2) LBC+HPV triage, (3) HPV+LBC triage, (4) co-screening, (5) co-screening+HPV genotyping, and (6) HPV only+HPV genotyping. Costs were estimated from a payer perspective in 2007 U.S. dollars. Outcome measures included lifetime risk of cervical cancer, quality-adjusted life years saved (QALYs), and incremental cost-effectiveness ratios (ICERs).In our model, the use of HPV genotyping strategies prevented 51-73 deaths per 100,000 women screened compared to screening using LBC followed by HPV triage and 4-26 deaths compared to co-screening with LBC and high-risk HPV. Use of HPV genotyping to triage all high-risk HPV-positive women every three years had an ICER of $34,074 per QALY compared to HPV and LBC co-screening. HPV genotyping with co-screening was the most effective strategy and had an ICER of $33,807 per QALY compared to HPV genotyping for all high-risk HPV-positive women.The addition of HPV-16 and -18 genotype triage to HPV and LBC co-screening was a cost-effective screening strategy in the United States.Cervical dysplasia: assessing methylation status (Methylight) of CCNA1, DAPK1, HS3ST2, PAX1 and TFPI2 to improve diagnostic accuracy.Diagnosis of cervical neoplasia hinges upon microscopic inspection of cervical samples. This has inherent operator-dependent variability. Testing for high-risk human papilloma virus (HPV) may help to triage patients with pre-invasive disease in determining clinical intervention and follow-up. However, HPV presence/absence does not reflect the cervical epithelial cell's molecular status. Epigenetic modifications, e.g. DNA methylation, have been observed in the early stages of neoplastic change, preceding gene mutations. Here, we assess the correlation between cytologic/histologic results and combined DNA methylation data of 5 genes in different grades of cervical dysplasia.Cervical specimens collected via the liquid-based cytology system were each microscopically examined. Residual cells were subjected to DNA methylation analysis (Methylight) of gene loci CCNA1, PAX1, HS3ST2, DAPK1 and TFPI2. Methylation data were compared with cytologic/histologic reports. Statistical methods were applied to assess the ability of DNA methylation status to subtype the cervical neoplastic lesions according to their corresponding cytologic/histologic reports.A total of 165 subjects provided cytologically proven 63 HSIL, 49 LSIL and 53 normal samples. All patients with HSIL and LSIL underwent colposcopic examination. Patients with LSIL were all found to be CIN1; patients with HSIL were subsequently subdivided into 10 squamous cell carcinoma (SCC), 31 CIN3, 10 CIN2 and 12 CIN1. For each gene, there was increasing frequency of methylation from normal and LSIL (CIN1), through HSIL (CIN2 and CIN3), to SCC. Methylation of ≥1 of genes investigated was observed in 88% of combined HSIL (CIN2 and CIN3) and SCC cases. All genes showed significant increase in methylation level (PMR value) with increasing disease grade (p<0.005). CCNA1 was the only gene that was able to distinguish CIN2 from CIN3 specimens (p=0.016). Based on receiver operating characteristic (ROC) analysis, HS3ST2 was the most significant candidate in segregating HSIL/SCC from normal/LSIL cases (p<0.0001); at an optimal cutoff value, sensitivity and specificity between 70% and 80% were obtained.Development of DNA methylation status of a gene panel to improve diagnostic accuracy in cervical neoplasia is warranted.Assessment of fluorescence in situ hybridization and hybrid capture 2 analyses of cervical cytology specimens diagnosed as low grade squamous intraepithelial lesion for the detection of high grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia.To assess Hybrid Capture 2 (HC2) and fluorescence in situ hybridization (FISH) for the detection of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 2 or worse (CIN 2+) in patients with a cytologic diagnosis of low grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL).Residual samples from 115 LSIL-diagnosed cervical cytology specimens were evaluated by high-risk human papillomavirus (HR-HPV) HC2 testing and FISH using biotin-labeled probes to HR-HPV and chromosomal probes to 3q26 (TERC) and 8q24 (CMYC). A cervical biopsy diagnosis of CIN 2+ was considered as evidence of high grade disease.The positive and negative predictive values of HC2 and FISH for detecting patients with CIN 2+ were 32% vs. 37% and 100% vs. 93%, respectively. The sensitivities of HC2 and FISH for CIN 2+ were not significantly different (100% vs. 90%, p = 0.25), while the specificity of HC2 was significantly lower than that of FISH (28% vs. 48%, p=0.003). FISH diagnosed fewer specimens as positive as compared to HC2 (62% vs. 79%).These preliminary data suggest that FISH testing may be useful for determining which patients with LSIL are most likely to have CIN 2+ on clinical follow-up.Evaluation of the HPV L1 capsid protein in prognosis of mild and moderate dysplasia of the cervix uteri.Cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) can be detected in the cytologic smears years before invasive squamous cancer arises, but no reproducible morphologic criteria exist to predict behavior of cervical lesions. The possibility of predicting the clinical course of cervical lesions could be of high value in clinical practice and some women will spare of unnecessary treatment. HPV L1 capsid protein represents about 90% of the total protein on the surface of the virus and can be detected in mild to moderate dysplasia and rarely in severe dysplasia. The purpose of the study was to evaluate the use of immunodetection of HPV L1 protein on archival Pap smears with findings of mild and moderate dysplasia in predicting its clinical course. Immunochemical analyses with L1 antibody revealed positively stained nuclei of squamous epithelial cells in 56 of 114 smears (49.1%). The staining results were correlated with follow-up smears or with histologic verification. Regression (negativisation of the Pap smear for 24 months or longer) was noticed in 31 of 56 (55.4%) L1-positive cases and in 20 of 58 (34.5%) L1-negative cases. Persistent disease occured in 13 (23.2%) L1-positive cases and in 14 (24.1%) L1-negative cases. Progressive disease occured in 12 (21.4%) L1-positive cases and in 24 (41.4%) L1-negative cases. The difference in the clinical course between the L1-positive and L1-negative patients was statistically significant (p = 0.025). Also, the difference in the clinical course of the L1-negative staining in the under-30 and over-30 years age group was statistically significant (p = 0.04). For conclusion, our data confirm that immunostaining for HPV L1 capsid protein could offer prognostic information about mild and moderate intraepithelial cervical squamous lesions.Atypical squamous cells and low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion in cervical cytology: cytohistological correlation and implication for management in a low-resource setting.To perform an audit of all cervical smears reported as atypical squamous cells (ASC) and low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL) as in the Bethesda system (TBS) 2001, and determine their histological follow-up and outcome when available, in order to define the threshold for colposcopic referral.A total of 25,203 cervical smears were screened over a period of 3 years (January 2006 - December 2008) and all ASC and LSIL smears were reviewed with the corresponding histological follow-up. All cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) grade 2 lesions and above (CIN2+) were considered as clinically significant lesions for analysis.Out of 25,203 cervical smears, 424 (1.7%) were reported as ASC and 113 (0.4%) as LSIL. Additionally, three were reported as atypical cells, not otherwise specified. The ASC : SIL ratio was 2.18 : 1. Follow-up histology was available in 153 (36.8%) of the ASC cases and revealed CIN2+ lesions in 22 (14.4%). Follow-up histology was available in 50 (44.2%) of LSIL cases and revealed clinically significant abnormalities in five (10%), all of which were CIN2. CIN3 and invasive squamous carcinomas were seen in 5.9% and 1.4%, respectively, of cases of ASC, and not seen in LSIL. Reclassification of ASC smears into ASC-US (ASC-undetermined significance) and ASC-H (ASC- high grade SIL not excluded) revealed ASC-H in 2.6% of all ASC smears, with a clinically significant outcome in 45.4%.In a low-resource setting where human papillomavirus testing is unaffordable, the threshold for colposcopic referral and follow-up histology should be ASC rather than SIL.A weakly positive human papillomavirus Hybrid Capture II result correlates with a significantly lower risk of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 2,3 after atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance cytology.The Hybrid Capture II assay (hc2; QIAGEN, Inc) for high-risk human papillomavirus (hrHPV) is an in vitro nucleic acid hybridization assay using chemiluminescence for the qualitative detection of hrHPV DNA in cervical samples. Results are reported as a ratio of relative light units (RLUs) to a cutoff value based on a positive control. Specimens with RLU ratios of 1.0 or higher are scored positive for hrHPV. We tested the hypothesis that hrHPV positives with low-positive RLU ratios (1-10) had a lower prevalence of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 2,3 (CIN 2,3) on histologic follow-up.Relative light unit ratios for 388 consecutive hrHPV-positive cervical cytologic specimens interpreted as atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) were reviewed. Individual RLU ratios were compared with outcome histologic diagnosis in cases with colposcopic follow-up and tissue sampling (biopsy and/or endocervical curettage; n = 236).Of 236 cases with histologic follow-up, 63 had RLU ratios in the range of 1 to 10; of these, 53 (84.1%) were negative for CIN, 7 (11.1%) had CIN 1, 1 (1.6%) had CIN of uncertain grade, and 2 (3.2%) had CIN 2,3. The difference in CIN 2,3 outcome between RLU ratios of 1 to 10 (3.2%) versus over 10 (17.3%) was significant (p =.0047). The difference in prevalence of CIN 1 was not significant (p =.67).An RLU ratio of 10 or less was associated with a significantly lower prevalence of CIN 2,3 on biopsy outcome after a Pap test result of ASCUS. The much lower prevalence of underlying CIN 2,3 in patients who are weakly HPV-positive may justify modification of the management algorithm for this subset of women with ASCUS.Correlation between hybrid capture II high-risk human papillomavirus DNA test chemiluminescence intensity from cervical samples with follow-up histologic results: a cytologic/histologic review of 367 cases.The Hybrid Capture II high-risk human papillomavirus (hrHPV) DNA test is a US Food and Drug Administration-approved nucleic acid hybridization assay using chemiluminescence for the semiquantitative detection of hrHPV in cervical samples. Patient samples and controls are used to calculate results as negative for hrHPV if <1.0, positive for hrHPV if >2.5, and "equivocal" if between 1.0 and 2.5.The authors reported on the cervical histologic results of 209 patients demonstrating "equivocal" results for hrHPV from SurePath (204 patients) or ThinPrep (5 patients) vials, and compared patients in this cohort with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US) cytology on the index cervical Papanicolaou (Pap) test (Group 1; n = 148 patients) with a patient cohort demonstrating unequivocal positive hrHPV test results (Group 2; n = 148 patients). The chemiluminescence intensity of hrHPV tests from patients in Group 2 were correlated with the presence and severity of dysplasia on subsequent histologic results, and patients were thereby stratified for their subsequent risk of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) types II/III.Approximately 97% of hrHPV tests demonstrating "equivocal" results were found to be positive at the time of retesting, and 15% of biopsied cases demonstrated CIN II or III. Results of follow-up histology after an ASC-US diagnosis, expressed as a percentage of the biopsied cohort, were: CIN II/III: 16.5% in Group 1 and 22.4% in Group 2; CIN I: 27% in Group 1 and 23.5% in Group 2; and negative: 56.5% in Group 1 and 54.1% in Group 2. Chemiluminescence intensity did not appear to be correlated with the severity of dysplasia.The percentage of high-grade CIN in the "equivocal" hrHPV cohort is highly significant and therefore the management of these patients should be similar to the unequivocally positive population. After an unequivocal positive hrHPV test, the hrHPV chemiluminescence intensity does not appear to further predict the rate of high-grade CIN.The age-specific relationships of abnormal cytology and human papillomavirus DNA results to the risk of cervical precancer and cancer.To estimate the relationship of human papillomavirus (HPV) detection and abnormal cytology with histologic diagnoses of cervical precancer and cancer.From 2003 to 2008 we examined the HPV, cytology, and diagnostic results from almost one million cervical cancer screenings done on women aged 30 and older who were members in Kaiser Permanente Northern California, a large health maintenance organization that introduced cotesting in 2003. Women were screened using conventional Pap tests and a DNA test for a pool of 13 high-risk HPV genotypes. Women with HPV-positive atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance and other abnormal cervical cytology, independent of their HPV results, routinely underwent colposcopy. Results were stratified by 5-year age groups from 30 to 64.High-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (HSIL), atypical squamous cells, cannot exclude HSIL (ASC-H), and atypical glandular cells were more strongly associated with cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 3 while low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (LSIL) and HPV-positive atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance were more strongly associated with cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 2 (CIN2). Cervical cancer was most commonly found in women with HSIL and atypical glandular cells cytology. Human papillomavirus-negative women with ASC-H cytology were at a reduced but significant risk of CIN2 or more severe (CIN2+) (10.6%) compared with HPV-positive women with ASC-H cytology. Human papillomavirus-negative women with LSIL were at a 4.0% risk of CIN2+, and among women 50 and older, at a 0.5% risk of CIN2+ with no cancers were diagnosed.Human papillomavirus testing may be useful for triage for colposcopic referral for LSIL cytology in older women but not for ASC-H cytology at any age.II.The sensitivity and specificity of p16(INK4a) cytology vs HPV testing for detecting high-grade cervical disease in the triage of ASC-US and LSIL pap cytology results.We analyzed the performance of p16(INK4a) immunocytochemistry on a series of 810 retrospectively collected atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US) and low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL) cases with available biopsy follow-up data, including 94 cases of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) 2 and 128 cases of CIN 3. Human papillomavirus (HPV) testing was performed from the same residual liquid-based cytologic specimen, and results for both tests were correlated with histologic follow-up data. Sensitivity values for high-grade CIN (HGCIN) confirmed on biopsy within 6 months were 92.6% (ASC-US) and 92.2% (LSIL) for cytotechnologists' reviews of p16 cytology and 90.1% (ASC-US) and 95.7% (LSIL) for HPV testing. Sensitivity rates of initial pathologists' reviews were slightly lower, 76.4% to 80.1%, with levels comparable to cytotechnologists' results after adjudication. The specificity of p16 cytology for HGCIN detection was significantly higher than for HPV testing for cytotechnologists and pathologists: 63.2% to 71.1% (p16 cytology) vs 37.8% for HPV in ASC-US (P < .001) and 37.3% to 53.3% (p16 cytology) vs 18.5% for HPV in LSIL (P < .001). This evaluation of the diagnostic performance of p16 cytology confirms the potential of this stain for the efficient triage of ASC-US and LSIL cytologic results.Clinical validation of the Cervista HPV HR and 16/18 genotyping tests for use in women with ASC-US cytology.High-risk (HR) human papillomavirus (HPV) testing is important in cervical cancer screening for triage to colposcopy. This study evaluated the clinical performance of the Cervista HPV HR and 16/18 genotyping tests for detection of HPV in cervical cytology specimens.The tests were prospectively evaluated in a multicenter clinical study. DNA was extracted from approximately 4000 residual liquid-based cytology specimens collected during routine liquid-based Papanicolaou tests at standard of care visits and was assessed for the presence of HR HPV and/or HPV types 16 and 18. All women with cytology results of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US) or greater underwent colposcopic examination and biopsies were collected. Test results were compared with local colposcopy and histology results from a central pathology review panel.There were 1347 subjects with complete data sets of cytology, HR HPV, colposcopy, and histology included in the analysis of the HPV HR test. Sensitivity of the HPV HR test for detection of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) 2+ among women with ASC-US cytology was 92.8% (95% confidence interval [CI]: 84.1-96.9) and the negative predictive value (NPV) was 99.1% (95% CI: 98.1-99.6). Sensitivity for detection of > or =CIN 3 in women with ASC-US was 100% (95% CI: 85.1-100) and the NPV was 100% (95% CI: 99.4-100). The specificity of the test for detection of > or =CIN 2 and > or =CIN 3 was 44.2% (95% CI: 41.5-46.9) and 43% (95% CI: 40.3-45.7), respectively. The HPV 16/18 genotyping test also performed as expected in women with ASC-US cytology who were positive for HR HPV.The Cervista HPV HR test can be clinically used for detecting HR HPV types in conjunction with cervical cytology for use in triage of women with ASC-US cytology during routine cervical cancer screening.Assessment of HPV DNA test value in management women with cytological findings of ASC-US, CIN1 and CIN2.The aim of this retrospective study was to answer the following questions: 1) is HPV DNA test for high-risk types able to predict lesion behaviour in women with cytological abnormalities lower than CIN3 (ASC-US, CIN1 and CIN2); 2) how to predict the histological diagnosis CIN3, and 3) is its use in diagnostic management in these patients justified or not? The study included 345 women (11 ASC-US, 312 CIN1 and 22 CIN2) that underwent conventional diagnostic management (repeat cytology and colposcopy with or without histology) and HPV testing for high-risk HPV types by PCR method. The value of HPVDNA test in predicting lesion regression/persistence was assessed in 275 subjects without histology. In 70 subjects, diagnostic accuracy (sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive value) of repeat cytology and HPV DNA test in predicting severe intraepithelial lesion (CIN3) was determined on the basis of colposcopy guided biopsy. The prevalence of persistent lesions was significantly higher in the group of HPV positive than in the group of HPV negative subjects (37.7% vs. 16.4%; p < 0.001). Positive HPV test was associated with a 3.1-fold risk of lesion persistence [OR (95% CI) = 3.095 (1.65-5.82)]. However, on screening to predict the outcome of cytologically diagnosed cervical lesion with sensitivity of 39.7% and positive predictive value of 37.7% showed that a positive test could not be considered a reliable indicator of lesion persistence. In contrast, the specificity of 82.5% and negative predictive value of 83.6% suggested that a negative test result could be taken as a good indicator of lesion regression. In comparison with repeat cytology, HPV test showed higher sensitivity (69.2% vs. 61.5%) but significantly lower specificity (63.2% vs. 93.0%) and positive predictive value (30.0% vs. 66.7%), and comparable negative predictive value (90.0% vs. 91.4%) in predicting histologically verified CIN3. In one patient with a histological diagnosis of squamous cell carcinoma with minimal invasion, repeat cytology indicated CIN3, whereas HPV test was negative. Due to authors experience in women with cytological abnormalities lower than CIN3, HPV testing is not a method to reliably predict lesion behaviour (regression, persistence) or presence of CIN3. HPV testing is of limited value in daily routine and should not be widely used until it is definitely demonstrated to be superior to conventional methods in improving the sensitivity, specificity and positive predictive value of CIN3 and invasive carcinoma detection.Human papillomavirus-based triage of women showing a cervical cytology result of borderline or mild dyskaryosis.The role of human papillomavirus testing in the management of women with low-grade abnormalities: multicentre randomised controlled trial.To assess the value of a single human papillomavirus (HPV) test in making decisions on management of women with cervical cytology showing borderline nuclear abnormality (BNA) or mild dyskaryosis. In particular, to determine whether information on high-risk (hr) HPV status would be valuable in the choice between (1) cytological surveillance versus immediate referral to colposcopy, and (2) at colposcopy, between biopsy and recall versus immediate large loop excision of the transformation zone (LLETZ).Multicentre individually randomised controlled trial, nested within the NHS Cervical Screening Programmes, investigating the value of HPV testing by testing for interactions between HPV status and (1) cytological surveillance versus colposcopy, and (2) biopsy and recall versus immediate LLETZ. Setting Grampian, Tayside and Nottingham. Population Women (n = 4439), aged 20-59 years, with a cytology test showing borderline nuclear abnormalities or mild dyskaryosis during October 1999 to October 2002.High-risk HPV status was determined at recruitment using the polymerase chain reaction assay with the GP5+/6+ general primer system. The results of this HPV testing were not disclosed to either the participating women or to those involved in their management. Women were randomised to either (1) 6-monthly cytological screening in primary care or (2) referral for colposcopy. Human papillomavirus status was used to stratify both randomisations. All women were followed for 3 years, concluding with an invitation to an exit appointment at which colposcopic examination was undertaken. In addition, in women who were randomised to initial colposcopy and underwent colposcopy, the association between hrHPV status and presence of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) grade 2 or more severe disease (henceforth CIN2 or worse) was examined.Sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values of the HPV test for predicting CIN2 or worse and the implications for the choice of management between cytological surveillance and immediate referral for colposcopy.There were no significant interactions between management and HPV status. Hence, in women with mild dyskaryosis or BNA who are HPV positive, there is no advantage of (1) immediate colposcopy over cytological surveillance (P = 0.76) or (2) immediate LLETZ over biopsy and recall (P = 0.27). The sensitivity of HPV testing for detection of CIN2 or worse was 75.2% (95% CI 68.8-81.0%) among women with mild dyskaryosis and 69.9% (95% CI 61.7-77.3%) among those with BNA. Specificity was higher in those with BNA (71.3%; 95% CI 68.5-74.1%) than in those with mild dyskaryosis (46.9%; 95% CI 42.2-51.6%). Sensitivity decreased with increasing age whereas specificity increased. The negative predictive value was high, particularly among women with BNA (94.5%; 95% CI 92.9-96.0%). Across all ages, 22% of women who had CIN2 or worse were HPV negative. Conversely, 40% of those who were HPV positive did not have CIN. HPV was a much more reliable predictor in women aged over 40 years.We conclude that in younger women with low-grade cytological abnormalities, a single HPV test would not be useful in determining who should be referred for colposcopy or the most effective management at colposcopy. In women over 40, a negative HPV test could be used to rule out further investigation.The relationship between HPV16 and HPV18 viral load and cervical lesions progression.Cervical cancer remains one of the most important mortality causes worldwide. It is already known that high risk HPV (HR-HPV) has the main role in the development of pre- or cancerous lesions. Despite the fact that many studies focused on the HR-HPV viral loads as possible biomarkers, the viral load quantification utility for all HR-HPV genotypes is still a controversy. The purpose of our study was to determine if HPV16 and 18 viral load values might be a potential marker for HPV infection clearance versus of pre- and cancerous lesions development.80 women who tested positive for HPV16 and 18 were selected from a cohort of 250 patients. The samples, consisting in cervical smears, were collected in transport media ESwab (Copan). The patient's average age was 36.26 years. HPV DNA detection, genotyping and viral load determination were performed twice for each patient (within one year follow-up).HPV 16 viral load was significantly higher in normal cytology samples and in HGSIL patients than in ASCUS/LGSIL (p value < 0.0312). HPV 18 viral load was also significantly higher in HGSIL cases than in ASCUS/LGSIL (p = 0,038). Independently of cervical cytology, HPV 18 viral load was lower (7.93 x 10(4) copies/microL) than HPV 16 viral load (5 x 10(13)) copies/microL).For HPV types 16 or 18 positive patients with LGSIL cytology the viral load might have predictive value. Our study suggested that patients with elevated viral loads are at disease risk progression and should be carefully evaluated.Long-term follow-up of cervical disease in women screened by cytology and HPV testing: results from the HART study.Several studies have shown that testing for high-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) types results in an improved sensitivity for CIN2+, compared with cytology, although with a somewhat lower specificity.We obtained follow-up results, with at least one smear after participation in the HART study, which compared HPV testing (HC-II) with cytology as a primary screening modality.With a median follow-up of 6 years, 42 additional cases of CIN2+ were identified; women who were HPV positive at baseline were more likely to develop CIN2+ than those who were HPV negative (hazard ratio (HR) 17.2; 95% confidence interval (CI) (9.3-31.6)) and the risk increased with increasing viral load. Compared with HPV-negative women (relative light unit (RLU) <1), the HR (95% CI) was 5.4 (1.6, 18.2) for 1-10 RLU and 25.5 (13.6, 47.9) for RLU > or = 10. Positive cytology (borderline or worse compared with negative) was also predictive of developing CIN2, although to a lesser extent (HR 8.7; 95% CI (4.5-17.1)). Only one case of CIN3 and three cases of CIN2 were found in women who showed a positive cytology result but were HPV negative at baseline.After 5 years of follow-up, CIN2+ occurred in 0.23% of women who were HPV negative at baseline compared with 0.48% of women who showed a negative cytology result, indicating a much longer low-risk interval for CIN2+ after HPV testing.A randomized controlled trial of Human Papillomavirus (HPV) testing for cervical cancer screening: trial design and preliminary results (HPV FOCAL Trial).In the HPV FOCAL trial, we will establish the efficacy of hr-HPV DNA testing as a stand-alone screening test followed by liquid based cytology (LBC) triage of hr-HPV-positive women compared to LBC followed by hr-HPV triage with > or = CIN3 as the outcome.HPV-FOCAL is a randomized, controlled, three-armed study over a four year period conducted in British Columbia. It will recruit 33,000 women aged 25-65 through the province's population based cervical cancer screening program. Control arm: LBC at entry and two years, and combined LBC and hr-HPV at four years among those with initial negative results and hr-HPV triage of ASCUS cases; Two Year Safety Check arm: hr-HPV at entry and LBC at two years in those with initial negative results with LBC triage of hr-HPV positives; Four Year Intervention Arm: hr-HPV at entry and combined hr-HPV and LBC at four years among those with initial negative results with LBC triage of hr-HPV positive casesTo date, 6150 participants have a completed sample and epidemiologic questionnaire. Of the 2019 women enrolled in the control arm, 1908 (94.5%) were cytology negative. Women aged 25-29 had the highest rates of HSIL (1.4%). In the safety arm 92.2% of women were hr-HPV negative, with the highest rate of hr-HPV positivity found in 25-29 year old women (23.5%). Similar results were obtained in the intervention arm HPV FOCAL is the first randomized trial in North America to examine hr-HPV testing as the primary screen for cervical cancer within a population-based cervical cancer screening program.International Standard Randomised Controlled Trial Number Register, ISRCTN79347302.Human papillomavirus genotypes in asymptomatic young women from public schools in Rio de Janeiro, Brazil.The aim of this work was to survey HPV information from a random population of young women from Rio de Janeiro, Brazil.This cross-sectional study included cervical samples from 241 female students. To determine human papillomavirus status, polymerase chain reaction amplification was performed. HPV typing was determined by restriction fragment length polymorphism analysis. Demographic data, life style, sexual and gynecological history were obtained through use of a structured questionnaire.The average age of the women was 19.6 years-old (SD=3.4 years). HPV prevalence was 27.4%. Nineteen different HPV genotypes were detected, including 13 high risk types. HPV 16 was the most prevalent type (6.2%), followed by 31 (4.1 %) and 66 (3.7%). Most of the oncogenic types belonged to the A9 species (28/48). The frequency of women infected by at least one oncogenic type was significantly higher than those only infected by low risk types (18.7% versus 7.5%). Cervical changes were detected in 12.5% of the sample and were significantly linked to infection with HPV types of the A9 species. Demographic variables, sexual initiation, or number of sexual partners were not associated with HPV prevalence, variety of HPV genotypes or oncogenic types.The relative frequency of HPV genotypes other than vaccine types in young females should be taken into account when evaluating vaccination strategies. Due to the high prevalence of HPV infection among the population studied, implementation of sex education in schools, promotion of condom use and an organized screening program to prevent cervical cancer must be encouraged for this age group.Comparison of HPV genotyping by type-specific PCR and sequencing.Human papillomavirus (HPV) infection is the most common sexually transmitted disease worldwide and there is a strong link between certain high-risk viral types and cervical carcinogenesis. Although there are several typing methods, it is still unclear which test is the best. This study compared the effectiveness of type-specific PCR (TS-PCR) and sequencing, with a focus on their clinical application. A total of 260 cervical samples from HPV-positive patients were tested for types 6, 11, 16, 18, 31, 33 and 35 using TS-PCR and sequencing. The genotype was identified in 36% of cases by TS-PCR and in 75% by sequencing. Sequencing was four times more likely to identify the viral type in positive samples than TS-PCR (p = 0.00). Despite being more effective for virus genotyping, sequencing was unable to identify viral types in multiple infections. Combining both techniques resulted in highly sensitive detection (87% of cases), showing that they are complementary methods. HPV genotyping is an important step in HPV management, helping to identify patients with a higher risk of developing cervical cancer and contributing to the development of type-specific vaccines.Triage of women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US): results of an Italian multicentric study.To compare the performance of immediate colposcopy, repeat Pap test and HPV test as triage options for women diagnosed as having atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US) while attending organised screening for cervical carcinoma in five centres of the Veneto region.Women consecutively diagnosed as having ASC-US were included in a prospective study, and underwent colposcopy and collection of cervico-vaginal cells for conventional Pap test and HPV test (Hybrid Capture 2, High-risk probe set, Digene). Repetition of all three tests was scheduled for 12 months later. DNA was subsequently extracted from residual cells of positive samples, and analysed by polymerase chain reaction with several primers for typing of HPV sequences. Sensitivity, specificity and positive predictive value (PPV) of the different triage options for histology-confirmed cervical intraepithelial neoplasia, grade 2 or worse (CIN2+) were calculated among all women and by age (under and above 35 years).Seven hundred forty-nine women 25-64 years old (median age 42 years) were enrolled in the study. Pap smears at enrolment were read as ASC-US or more severe in 211 (29.4%) cases, colposcopy disclosed an atypical transformation zone in 254 (34.2%) women, and HPV test was positive in 181 (24.2%). High-grade cervical lesions developed in 29/749 (3.9%) women. HPV typing was possible in 163 (90%) of the samples, and carcinogenic types were present in 123.HPV test showed the best performance; overall, it had the highest sensitivity (92.3%), specificity (78.6%) and PPV (14.9%).[The significance of HPV-DNA genotyping assays in the ASC].To disscuss different outcomes of ASC-UC and ASC-H, two subtypes of ASC, and the significance of HPV-DNA genotyping assays in these two subtypes.We reviewed and analyzed colposcopic and biopsy results of 1256 cases of ASC between Jan. 2005 to Dec. 2007, of which 580 cases have results of HPV-DNA genotyping assays.In 1256 ASC cases, ASC-US and ASC-H cases account for 90.1% and 9.9% respectively, CIN2 and higher levels diagnosed via colposcopy and cervical biopsy are 8.5% and 24.2% respectively (P = 0.000). In ASC-US cases, the infection rate of HPV-DNA high risk types is 67.2%, there is statistic significance among different HPV-DNA results and biopsy pathology (P = 0.000). In ASC-H cases, the infection rate of HPV-DNA high risk types is 47.3%, there is no statistic significance among them (P = 0.054).The clinical outcomes of ASC-US and ASC-H are different, we should distinguish and treat. HPV-DNA genotyping assay is available in ASC-US triage, but Colposcopy is proposed for all ASC-H patients.P634A4 and TAp73 immunocytochemistry in liquid-based cervical cytology--potential biomarkers for diagnosis and progress prediction of cervical neoplasia.P63 and p73 are two homologues of the important tumor suppressor gene p53. In this study, we investigated p63 and p73 expression by immunocytochemistry using antibodies for TAp73 and p634A4 isoforms in 91 high-grade and 107 low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions, 212 atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance, 9 squamous cell carcinomas and 63 normal samples from an Asian screening population together with 47 hospital samples of carcinomas. There was significant correlation between the TAp73 and p634A4 indices (P<0.0001). Significantly, higher TAp73 and p634A4 indices were found in high-grade lesions or carcinoma when compared with atypical squamous cells and low-grade lesions (P<0.0001). Among atypical squamous cells, p634A4 indices of cases that subsequently progressed to low-grade (P=0.031) or high-grade lesions (P=0.006) were significantly higher than those that did not. For atypical squamous cells positive for high-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) as detected by Digene (61%), cases with high p634A4 index were still more likely to have subsequent high-grade lesions detected (P=0.016). Among low-grade lesions, significantly higher TAp73 (P=0.038) was found in cases that subsequently progressed to high-grade lesions. There was significant correlation between presence of high-risk HPV and p634A4 index (P=0.01). In summary, p63 and p73 immunocytochemistry are potential good markers for detection of carcinoma and high-grade lesions in cervical cytology samples and for triage management of women with atypical squamous cells and low-grade lesions.Diagnostic value of p16INK4A, Ki-67, and human papillomavirus L1 capsid protein immunochemical staining on cell blocks from residual liquid-based gynecologic cytology specimens.This study was conducted to evaluate the reliability and role of cell block preparations in the diagnosis of neoplastic and preneoplastic lesions of the cervix and to improve the value of cell block preparations in diagnosing and predicting the prognosis of cervical lesions through immunostaining of p16INK4A (p16), Ki-67, and human papillomavirus (HPV) L1 capsid protein (HPV L1).In total, 138 specimens were diagnosed on liquid-based cytology (LBC) and cell block preparations, and 63 specimens were subjected subsequently to tissue follow-up and immunostaining for p16, Ki-67, and HPV L1 on cell block sections.In 42 specimens that were diagnosed as low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion, high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HSIL), and squamous cell carcinoma (SCC) on cell blocks, 38 specimens (90.5%) were confirmed by histopathologic reports, and there was slightly better than 81.6% agreement between LBC and tissue follow-up. Immunointensity and cells that were positive for p16 were enhanced according to increased pathologic grade and differed statistically between cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 1 (CIN-1) and CIN-2/CIN-3 as well as SCC. The positive rates of HPV L1 decreased gradually according to the severity of cervical neoplasia, and HPV L1/p16 expression patterns were related to the severity of cervical lesions.The cell block preparation technique was complementary to LBC, and the authors concluded that the application of LBC combined with cell block preparations may improve the diagnostic accuracy of cytology. Immunostaining for p16 and Ki-67 on cell block preparations can help to improve the diagnostic accuracy of HSIL and SCC. A combined expression pattern of p16 and HPV L1 may serve as a valuable index for predicting prognosis and follow-up of cervical dysplastic lesions.Association of polymorphism in FcGR3A gene and progression of low-grade precursor lesions of cervical carcinoma.Polymorphisms in receptors of the constant part of antibodies (FcR) have been associated with susceptibility to disease and viral infections but have not been studied in cervical carcinogenesis. The distribution of the polymorphism V158F (rs396991) in FcGR3A in cervical smears was detected in a group of 84 women with stable or regressed low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (group I) and a group of 54 women with high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (HSIL) (group II). Human papillomavirus (HPV) genotyping was also performed. In 27.4% of women from group I, FF genotype was found, whereas this genotype was observed in 51.9% of patients in group II (p = 0.003; odds ratio = 2.856 (95% confidence interval = 1.4-5.8)). When only women infected with high-risk HPV were analyzed these differences were found to be even higher (p = 0.0013; odds ratio = 3.8 (95% confidence interval = 1.7-8.8)). FF genotype in FcGR3A gene seems to be associated with increased risk of low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions to HSIL progression suggesting that its presence may play a role in HPV tolerance, persistent infection, and HSIL development.Impact of improved classification on the association of human papillomavirus with cervical precancer.Misclassification of exposure and surrogate endpoints of disease can obscure causal relations. Using data from the Atypical Squamous Cells of Undetermined Significance/Low-Grade Squamous Intraepithelial Lesion Triage Study (ALTS, 1997-2001), the authors explored the impact of exposure (human papillomavirus (HPV) detection) and endpoint (histologic cervical precancer) classification on their mutual association. Women referred into this study with an atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance Papanicolaou test with satisfactory results for all 4 HPV tests were included in this analysis (n = 3,215; 92.2%). HPV testing results were related to different definitions of cervical precancer, based on paired, worst 2-year histologic diagnoses, by calculating clinical sensitivity, specificity, and odds ratios. The authors found that HPV test sensitivity increased and specificity decreased with increasing certainty of cervical precancer, with HPV testing having the highest sensitivity (92%-98%) and lowest specificity (46%-54%) for consensus cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 3 (CIN 3). The overall accuracy of each HPV test, as measured by odds ratios, was greatest for consensus CIN-3 diagnoses, from 2- to 4-fold greater than for a less stringent precancer definition of any diagnosis of CIN 2 or more severe. In summary, there was convergence of greater certainty of carcinogenic HPV with greater certainty of a precancerous diagnosis, such that all 4 HPV tests almost always tested positive in women most likely to have cervical precancer. Finding increasingly strong associations when both test and diagnostic misclassification are reduced is a useful sign of "true association" in molecular epidemiology.Optimal threshold for a positive hybrid capture 2 test for detection of human papillomavirus: data from the ARTISTIC trial.We present data on the use of the Hybrid Capture 2 (HC2) test for the detection of high-risk human papillomavirus (HR HPV) with different thresholds for positivity within a primary screening setting and as a method of triage for low-grade cytology. In the ARTISTIC population-based trial, 18,386 women were screened by cytology and for HPV. Cervical intraepithelial neoplasia lesions of grade two and higher (CIN2+ lesions) were identified for 453 women within 30 months of an abnormal baseline sample. When a relative light unit/cutoff (RLU/Co) ratio of > or = 1 was used as the threshold for considering an HC2 result positive, 15.6% of results were positive, and the proportion of CIN2+ lesions in this group was 14.7%. The relative sensitivity for CIN2+ lesion detection was 93.4%. When an RLU/Co ratio of > or = 2 was used as the threshold, there was a 2.5% reduction in positivity, with an increase in the proportion of CIN2+ lesions detected. The relative sensitivity decreased slightly, to 90.3%. Among women with low-grade cytology, HPV prevalences were 43.7% and 40.3% at RLU/Co ratios of > or = 1 and > or = 2, respectively. The proportions of CIN2+ lesions detected were 17.3% and 18.0%, with relative sensitivities of 87.7% at an RLU/Co ratio of > or = 1 and 84.2% at an RLU/Co ratio of > or = 2. At an RLU/Co ratio of > or = 1, 68.3% of HC2-positive results were confirmed by the Roche line blot assay, compared to 77.2% of those at an RLU/Co ratio of > or = 2. Fewer HC2-positive results were confirmed for 35- to 64-year-olds (50.3% at an RLU/Co ratio of > or = 1 and 63.2% at an RLU/Co ratio of > 2) than for 20- to 34-year-olds (78.7% at an RLU/Co ratio of > or = 1 and 83.7% at an RLU/Co ratio of > 2). If the HC2 test is used for routine screening as an initial test or as a method of triage for low-grade cytology, we would suggest increasing the threshold for positivity from the RLU/Co ratio of > or = 1, recommended by the manufacturer, to an RLU/Co ratio of > or = 2, since this study has shown that a beneficial balance between relative sensitivity and the proportion of CIN2+ lesions detected is achieved at this threshold.Papillary squamous intraepithelial lesions of the uterine cervix: human papillomavirus-dependent changes in cell cycle expression and cytologic features.Most human papillomavirus-associated squamous intraepithelial lesions of the uterine cervix are flat; some have papillary architecture that shows a spectrum of differentiation from low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions to high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions. For this subset of lesions, there are few data relating human papillomavirus type to cytology and cell cycle activity. Here, we collected 24 cases of papillary squamous intraepithelial lesions with either low-risk (15 cases) or high-risk (9 cases) human papillomavirus infection. We described their morphology and performed immunohistochemical staining with cell cycle-related markers Ki-67, p53, pRb, and P16INK4a. The Ki-67 labeling index was significantly lower in the low-risk group than in the high-risk group (P < .001). A cut point of less than 50% labeling index detected all but one low-risk group case. Degradation of p53 and pRb was less evident in the low-risk group than in the high-risk group (p53, P < .001; pRb, P = .006). P16INK4a produced an unexpectedly high positive rate of staining in the low-risk group (60%). However, a specific top-heavy distribution pattern was noted, with evident nuclear but faint cytoplasmic staining, whereas the high-risk group showed strong full-thickness nuclear and cytoplasmic staining. The detection of these lesions by smear examination was not reliable, given the wide expression pattern. Papillary structure was evident in none. We conclude that cell cycle-related markers are helpful in distinguishing low- and high-risk lesions. The strong p16INK4a staining in the low-risk group may imply that more cell cycle-controlling pressure is elicited in papillary lesions than in flat lesions. The distribution pattern of p16INK4a staining is important when making a diagnosis; cytology is not effective. Human papillomavirus type, histology, and cell cycle markers could clearly separate these lesions into either a low-risk or a high-risk group, properly designated low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions or high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions in current management algorithms. Thus, the previously used terms papillary immature metaplasia and immature condyloma, although descriptive for low-risk group lesions, are confusing and should be discarded.Co-expression of p53 and Bcl-2 proteins in human papillomavirus-induced premalignant lesions of the uterine cervix: correlation with progression to malignancy.To analyze aberrant expression of the apoptotic protein p53 and the anti-apoptotic protein Bcl-2 in premalignant lesions of the uterine cervix induced by human papillomavirus (HPV) infection and its significance for early diagnosis of cervical cancer.Cytological adequate smears (n = 382) from various grades of squamous intraepithelial lesions (SILs; n = 142), 'atypical squamous cells of unknown significance' (ASCUS; n = 128) and normal tissue (n = 112) were investigated immunocytochemically for aberrant expression of p53 and Bcl-2 proteins using the streptavidin-biotin-peroxidase method; HPV status was analyzed in cervical smears using general and type-specific primers.HPV-DNA of any type was detected in 25.7% (98/382) of cases. HPV16 was seen in 58.2% (57/98), HPV18 in 20.4% (20/98) and other HPV types in 21.4% (21/98). Abnormal nuclear expression of p53 protein and cytoplasmic expression of Bcl-2 protein were noted in cervical dysplasia and an association with the presence of HPV16/HPV18 was noted. The intensity of immunoreactivity for p53 and Bcl-2 proteins varied between different cytological grades of cervical smears. Follow-up data revealed that cases with high-risk HPV and co-induced expression of apoptosis-regulatory proteins presented a trend to progressive disease.The detection of both p53 and Bcl-2 proteins in cervical smears can be used as independent diagnostic marker for early-stage HPV-associated cervical cancer.HPV vaccine protein L1 predicts disease outcome of high-risk HPV+ early squamous dysplastic lesions.Prediction of the clinical outcome of nonadvanced, early dysplastic lesions is one of the unresolved problems of cervical cancer screening programs. We examined the influence of human papillomavirus (HPV) L1 capsid protein detection in a randomized, prospective study of 187 high-risk HPV+ early dysplastic lesions during 36 to 46 months. The difference in the clinical outcome of the HPV L1- cases and the HPV L1+ cases was highly statistically significant (P < .0001) and independent of the classification of low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (mild dysplasia) and high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion of the moderate dysplastic type. L1+ mild and moderate dysplasias, reflecting productive HPV infection, showed low malignant potential, justifying a wait-and-watch strategy to prevent overtreatment, especially in young women. L1- early dysplastic lesions, as nonproductive infections or precancerous lesions, have a high malignancy potential and close follow-up with colposcopy and histologic evaluation should be advised.Women >or=30 years of age with low grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL) have low positivity rates when cotested for high-risk human papillomavirus: should we reconsider HPV triage for LSIL in older women?High-risk human papillomavirus (HR-HPV) testing for colposcopy triage of low grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL) is not recommended because of high positive rates in young women. It remains unclear whether HR-HPV testing may be useful for triage of older women. We compiled HR-HPV data for women aged >or=30 years with LSIL for the period March 1, 2006 to February 28, 2008. Follow-up cervical biopsy information was collected for the period March 1, 2006 to August 15, 2008. We used the Hybrid Capture II test performed on residual material from liquid-based Pap tests. Of 735 women, 254 had HR-HPV testing, and of these 144 had positive HR-HPV results. Among women with positive HR-HPV results 79 underwent biopsy (54.9%) and 11 had cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) 2 or 3 (13.9% of women with biopsy follow-up). A total of 481 women did not undergo HR-HPV testing, of whom 192 underwent biopsy (39.9%) and 11 had CIN 2 or 3 (5.7% of biopsied women [P = 0.04]). Among women who tested negative for HR-HPV and had follow-up biopsies, only one had a high grade lesion found (CIN 2). The overall HR-HPV positive rate in tested women >or=30 years old with LSIL was 56.7% if women who had reflex HR-HPV testing for ASC-US are included. The HR-HPV positive rate in residual material from Pap tests interpreted as LSIL was 63.8%. Among women >or=30 years of age with LSIL, CIN 2-3 is significantly more likely in HR-HPV positive women. Relatively few older women with LSIL test positive for HR-HPV. Colposcopy triage using HR-HPV may be justified in this population.Living with uncertainty: equivocal Pap test results and the evolution of ASC terminology.Communication of equivocal findings and their significance has been a significant challenge related to Pap testing throughout its history. Terminology to report these findings has changed considerably to accommodate the changes in understanding of cervical neoplasia, and to accommodate new management strategies, tests, and technologies. This article reviews the evolution of terminology for equivocal Pap test findings from the original Papanicolaou classification to the current the Bethesda System 2001 atypical squamous cells terminology, the implication and use of these terms, and the changing landscape of cervical neoplasia screening, which prompted these terminology changes. Emerging issues related to improving risk stratification through the introduction of additional terms and the impact of human papillomavirus testing may alter terminology of equivocal findings in the future.Clinical performance of human papillomavirus E6 and E7 mRNA testing for high-grade lesions of the cervix.Infection with high-risk (HR) human papillomavirus (HPV) is the major cause of cervical cancer. However, relatively few infections progress to malignant disease. Progression to malignancy requires the overexpression of the E6 and E7 genes in the integrated HPV genome. It follows that the E6 and E7 transcripts could be useful markers of disease progression. The study presented here tests this possibility, using data from colposcopy and from cytological and histological tests to compare RNA assays for the E6 and E7 genes with DNA testing. A total of 180 women underwent colposcopy, cytology, and biopsy of suspected lesions (143 cases). Cervical brush specimens were analyzed for HPV DNA and for E6 and E7 mRNA. DNA from HR HPV was found in 57.8% of the specimens; E6 and E7 transcripts were found in 45%. The rates of detection of HPV DNA and of E6 and E7 transcripts were 33.3% and 25%, respectively, for specimens with normal findings; 51.4% and 31.9%, respectively, for specimens with cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 1 (CIN1); and 61.1% and 44.2% for specimens with CIN2, respectively. All specimens with CIN3 and 95.5% of specimens from patients with squamous cell carcinoma were positive by both assays. Thirty-seven patients with normal colposcopy findings did not undergo biopsy. HPV DNA and mRNA transcripts were found in 32.4% and 18.9% of these cases, respectively. Comparisons with cytological tests produced similar results. Overall, the mRNA tests showed a higher specificity than the DNA tests for high-grade lesions (72.7% and 56.2%, respectively) and a higher positive predictive value (59.3% and 49.0%, respectively). These findings suggest that mRNA assays could be more powerful than DNA testing for predicting the risk of progression and offer a strong potential as a tool for triage and patient follow-up.Does the ThinPrep Imaging System increase the detection of high-risk HPV-positive ASC-US and AGUS? The Women and Infants Hospital experience with over 200,000 cervical cytology cases.Published reports have demonstrated that introduction of the ThinPrep Imaging System (Imager) to the cytology screening services has increased the detection rate of high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (HSILs). In accordance with recent clinical treatment guidelines, patients with atypical squamous or glandular cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US or AGUS) are often tested for high-risk HPV infection using the Hybrid Capture HPV DNA test. We took the opportunity to investigate whether the Imager had resulted in any significant differences in our diagnostic categories, as well as whether the Imager increased the detection of high-risk HPV-DNA-positive (HRHPV+) ASC-US or AGUS.Cytology cases with the diagnosis of ASC-US and AGUS were retrieved from the archival files of our institution during periods of 11 months prior to and 11 months after the introduction of the Imager. The total number of cases in each category was correlated with results of reflex high-risk HPV DNA testing when the latter were available. All AGUS diagnoses were correlated with subsequent biopsy follow-up. Statistical analyses were performed using the chi-Square test with Yate's Correction and Fisher's Exact test.A total of 108,371 and 104,555 of ThinPrep Pap Test (TPPT) cases were reviewed during 11 months pre- and post-imager introduction. The ASC-US rate was 5.4% in the pre-Imager and 5.3% in the post-Imager period. The HPV reflex test was 38% and 34% positive respectively in the pre- and post-Imager period (P>0.124). Similarly, 0.14% and 0.12% AGUS were found in the pre- and post-Imager period. The positive HPV reflex test was 14% versus 23% (P = 0.1690). The abnormal biopsy follow-up rate in the AGUS category was increased from 20.9% in the pre-Imager period to 31% in the post-Imager period (P = 0.1471). The ASCUS/SIL ratios were 1.9 and 1.6 respectively.The ASC-US and AGUS rates did not change statistically before and after the introduction of the Imager in our cytology laboratory. Although use of the Imager did not increase detection of HPV+ ASC-US, it did appear to increase the detection rate of HPV+ AGUS and subsequent abnormal biopsy follow-up rates in all categories. However, the increase in the detection rate did not reach the point of statistical significance.Comparison of the clinical significance of the Papanicolaou test interpretations LSIL cannot rule out HSIL and ASC-H.Despite the two-tiered classification of dysplasia in The Bethesda System (TBS), rare cases fall into the category squamous intraepithelial lesion (SIL) of indeterminate grade. These Pap tests are often interpreted as "LSIL/ASC-H" or "LSIL" with a comment indicating the presence of cells with features approaching HSIL. Patients with LSIL/ASC-H have a significant risk of CIN 2 or worse (29-61.5%) on follow-up cervical biopsies, similar to the risk of CIN 2 or worse in patients with ASC-H Pap tests (24-68%). The purpose of this study was to compare patients with ASC-H and LSIL/ASC-H Pap tests. Women with LSIL/ASC-H had a slightly lower incidence of CIN 2 or worse (PPV = 35.6%, 95% CI: 29.8-41.4%) on follow-up cervical biopsy than the control ASC-H group (PPV = 40.2%, 95% CI: 31.9-56.3%); this difference was not statistically significant. The difference in the distribution of the biopsy results between the two groups was statistically significant (P < 0.001). The current guidelines for the management of cervical cytologic abnormalities from the American Society for Colposcopy and Cervical Pathology (ASCCP) advocate similar treatment algorithms for both LSIL and ASC-H. The main difference is the option of cytologic follow-up or HPV testing for certain "special populations," as an alternative to colposcopy, for LSIL Pap test results. Based on our results, we recommend (1)LSIL/ASC-H to be added to TBS classification and (2) Pap test cases of LSIL/ASC-H may need to be clinically followed in a manner similar to ASC-H, i.e., colposcopy for all patients.Human papillomavirus typing and viral gene expression analysis for the triage of women with abnormal results from papanicolaou test smears to colposcopy.A cascade of molecular tests for human papillomavirus (HPV), as a follow-up to Papanicolaou test screening, could eliminate unnecessary colposcopy. Tests based on detection of HPV E6 messenger RNA (mRNA) are already being used as screening tools, but there is a good biological rationale for expecting that an increase in the relative amounts of HPV E6 mRNA in cervical samples may better predict cancerous transformation.To compare some of the available diagnostic methods and our novel method of relative quantification (RQ) of HPV gene expression for the effective triage of women with abnormal results from Papanicolaou tests to colposcopy.Sensitivities, specificities, and likelihood ratios were calculated for repeat Papanicolaou test smears, HPV DNA polymerase chain reactions, HPV genotyping, HPV-16 E6 mRNA detection, and the RQ of HPV-16 E6 mRNA calibrated to cellular RNA and DNA levels and standardized to viral load.Human papillomavirus genotype in combination with a repeat Papanicolaou test can be used to categorize most women (96%) with cervical intraepithelial neoplasia of grade 2 or higher for colposcopy while eliminating 44% of women with cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 1 or less. The presence of HPV-16 E6 mRNA (P < .001) and RQ of HPV-16 E6 mRNA (P < .001) displayed significant median differences among the various grades of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia. Further testing of women who are positive for HPV-16 demonstrated that the RQ of E6 mRNA has diagnostic potential when combined with Papanicolaou testing in populations with higher disease prevalence.The RQ of HPV E6 mRNA and HPV genotype could be useful in a cascade of diagnostic testing designed to refer women with findings of cervical abnormalities for colposcopy or treatment while reducing triage numbers.The use of p16(INK4A) immunocytochemistry in "Atypical squamous cells which cannot exclude HSIL" compared with "Atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance" in liquid-based cervical smears.Even though p16(INK4a) (p16) immunocytochemistry has proven a useful accessory tool verifying the identification of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US) categorized smears, the procedure still has limitations. To date few studies examining the usefulness of p16 immunocytochemistry in atypical squamous cells which cannot exclude HSIL (ASC-H), compared with ASC-US in liquid-based cervical smears. Therefore, we examined the correlation of p16 immunocytochemical staining with follow-up biopsy results on ASC-H categorized smears and compared the data with those classified as ASC-US on 105 liquid-based cytology samples. We found no statistical significance in the p16 expression of ASC-US smears and the presence of squamous intraepithelial lesions (SIL) in follow-up biopsies (p = 0.546). However, p16 expression did significantly correlate with the presence of SIL (p = 0.002) in ASC-H smears. There was a statistically significant relationship between p16 expression and presence of high grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (HSIL) or more on the follow-up biopsies in both ASC-US (p = 0.012) and ASC-H (p < 0.001) categorized smears. In ASC-US categorized smears, there was no statistical significance between p16 expression and the HR-HPV viral load (p = 0.091). But there was a statistical significance between p16 expression and the HR-HPV viral load (p < 0.001) in ASC-H categorized smears. Our results indicate that p16 immunostaining is a much better useful marker for HR-HPV infection and detection of SIL in ASC-H categorized smears compared to those defined as ASC-US.Follow-up findings for women with human papillomavirus-positive and atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance screening test results in a large women's hospital practice.Reflex human papillomavirus (HPV) testing has been designated in consensus guidelines as "preferred" for women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US) liquid-based cytology (LBC) results, and colposcopy is currently recommended for patients with HPV-positive ASC-US results. Data from large clinical practices using newer screening methods and current cytology terminology are limited.We analyzed data from patients with ASC-US LBC and positive HPV test results. We also assessed the impact of the presence or absence of an endocervical cell/ transformation zone sample (EC/TZS) on biopsy diagnoses.The information system of a large women's hospital serving an older-than-average population was searched over a 21-month period between July 1, 2005, and March 31, 2007, for HPV-positive cases interpreted as ASC-US (Bethesda System 2001) using computer-imaged LBC. Histologic diagnoses, patient ages, and presence or absence of an EC/TZS were analyzed. The average follow-up period was 7.5 months.Among 4273 women with HPV-positive ASC-US results, the cumulative cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 2 or 3 (CIN 2/3) and CIN 1 rates for 2192 women with available biopsies were 5.1% and 43.6%, respectively. Cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 2/3 and CIN 1 rates for women with HPV-positive ASC-US results were not significantly different for women with and without an EC/TZS.The risk of CIN 2/3 in the study population was significantly lower than reported in widely cited trial data. Neither presence nor absence of an EC/TZS, nor the age of the patient, had a statistically significant impact on the likelihood of biopsy diagnoses of CIN 2/3 and CIN 1 for patients with HPV-positive ASC-US test results.Image-guided ThinPrep Papanicolaou tests and cotesting with high-risk human papillomavirus in women aged 30 years and older in a low-risk private practice population.Screening for cervical cancer precursors has evolved considerably with the introduction of new technologies to improve the early detection of disease. The objective of this study was to analyze the accuracy and effectiveness of combined screening with cytology and high-risk human papillomavirus (HR-HPV) testing in a low-risk population of women aged >or=30 years.Consecutive unselected samples from a group of 1871 women aged >or=30 years were screened with image-guided ThinPrep tests and HR-HPV tests during a 6-month period. Histologic follow-up was reviewed among women with positive HR-HPV tests.A total of 85 (4.5%) women had positive HR-HPV tests. In 48 HR-HPV-positive women with follow-up biopsies, 41 (85%) were found to have histologic abnormalities. Thirty-three (1.9%) women with cytologically normal Papanicolaou (Pap) tests harbored HR-HPV, and a cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) 2+ lesion was detected in 1 (16%) of 6 women with histologic follow-up. Conversely, 2 (28%) of 7 women with high-grade intraepithelial lesion on cytology tested negative for HR-HPV during the same period. A case of serous carcinoma with atypical glandular cells on cytology was also negative for HR-HPV, as expected.In this low-risk population of women aged >or=30 years, histology-confirmed CIN2+ lesions were identified in women with negative cytology and positive HR-HPV tests, as well as in those with positive cytology and negative HR-HPV tests. Because both cytology and HPV testing alone missed significant lesions, cotesting with Pap and HR-HPV in women aged >or=30 years appears to be a reasonable option in a low-risk population.Hybrid capture 2 human papillomavirus DNA testing for women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance Papanicolaou results in SurePath and ThinPrep specimens.Human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA testing using Hybrid Capture 2 assay with ThinPrep Papanicolaou (Pap) collection is the only US Food and Drug Administration-approved method for the triage of women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS). Although SurePath Pap collection has been used for Hybrid Capture 2 HPV DNA testing, clinical validation of this method has been scarce.From a cervical cancer-screening program in Mississippi, we analyzed data from screenings of 8380 women with ASCUS Pap results who underwent reflex Hybrid Capture 2 HPV DNA tests during a course of 4 years. Of these, 4145 were screened with the ThinPrep collection system, and 4235 were screened with SurePath. Results of follow-up biopsies within 3 months of Pap tests were available for the ThinPrep group (229 cases) and the SurePath group (455 cases). Hybrid Capture 2 positive rates and the follow-up biopsy results from both groups were compared.Hybrid Capture 2 detected high-risk HPV DNA in 68.8% of ThinPrep and 66.7% of SurePath-collected specimens (P = .37). Detection rates for CIN2+ and CIN3+ were also comparable between ThinPrep (21.4%, 3.1%) and SurePath (15.4%, 4.2%) using Hybrid Capture 2 (P = .06, P = .45). In ThinPrep-collected specimens, 4.4% were quantitatively insufficient for Hybrid Capture 2 testing. Significantly more equivocal Hybrid Capture 2 results were observed in SurePath (11.4%) than in ThinPrep specimens (3.2%). However, 67.4% of women with equivocal Hybrid Capture 2 results had negative 1-year Pap cytology follow-up in the SurePath group.Hybrid Capture 2 positive rates and CIN2-3 detection rates were comparable for the SurePath and ThinPrep Pap collection systems, thus supporting the use of SurePath for Hybrid Capture 2 testing.Human papillomavirus testing for cervical cancer screening: results from a 6-year prospective study in rural China.Long-term follow-up evaluations of cervical screening approaches are limited in low-resource areas. This prospective study assessed the risk of future cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 2 or worse (CIN2+) associated with baseline human papillomavirus (HPV) and cytologic status. In rural China, 1,997 women were screened with 6 screening tests, including colposcopic evaluations, and underwent biopsies in 1999. In December 2005, 1,612 women with cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 1 or less at baseline were rescreened by visual inspection, liquid-based cytology, and HPV-DNA testing. All women underwent colposcopy at follow-up, with biopsies taken from women with visually apparent lesions or cytologic abnormalities. Twenty women developed incident CIN2+. The crude relative risk of CIN2+ for baseline HPV-positive women was 52 (95% confidence interval: 12.1, 222.5). The crude relative risk of CIN2+ was 167 (95% confidence interval: 21.9, 1,265) for baseline and follow-up repeatedly HPV-positive women compared with repeatedly HPV-negative women. Among 1,374 baseline HPV-negative women, 2 and no incident CIN2+ cases were detected in baseline cytologically normal and abnormal subgroups, respectively. Among 238 baseline HPV-positive women, 6 of 18 incident cases of CIN2+ developed in the cytologically normal group. This study demonstrates that a single oncogenic HPV-DNA test is more effective than cytology in predicting future CIN2+ status.Value of high-risk HPV-DNA testing in the triage of ASCUS.OBJECTIVE. Atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) cells, occurring in organized cytological screening, may be either high-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) positive or negative. To refine the assessment of women with ASCUS, a high-risk HPV-DNA test is recommended as triage in Sweden.A total of 197 consecutive women (mean age 39 years, range 21-60) with a diagnosis of ASCUS from the primary screening were selected for triage. Their cervical smears were collected and evaluated by using conventional cytological examination in combination with a high-risk HPV-DNA test (hybrid capture 2). The women were categorized into four groups: Group A, Cytology + /HPV + ; Group B, Cytology-/HPV + ; Group C, Cytology + /HPV-; and Group D, Cytology-/ HPV-. Women within Groups A-C were admitted for colposcopy and cervical biopsy. The women in Group D were considered as a low-risk group for tumor development, and were re-examined after three years in the next round of the organized screening.In women in Group A (n=58) the prevalence of histological verified CIN2-3 was 41%, in Group B (n=41) 20%, and in Group C (n=9) 0%. In Group D (n=89), repeated primary screening three years later revealed CIN2-3 in two biopsies from 74 women studied (<3%). The prevalence of a high-risk HPV infection decreased with age in women with ASCUS. It was 74% in women <30 years and 19% in women > or =50 years.Adding a high-risk HPV test in secondary screening increased the identification of women with CIN2-3 lesions by 33% in comparison with repeat cytology (p=0.01). The clinical significance of the ASCUS diagnosis varied with age of the women.Value of p16(INK4a) as a marker of progression/regression in cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 1.The objective of this study was to evaluate the usefulness of p16(INK4a) staining to classify cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 1 according to its progression/regression risk.Patients with a histologic diagnosis of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 1 were prospectively recruited (n = 138). Simultaneous detection of high-risk human papillomaviruses and p16(INK4a) evaluation were performed. Follow-up was conducted every 6 months by cytology and colposcopy and annually by high-risk human papillomavirus testing, for at least 12 months (mean, 29.0). Progression was defined as a histologic diagnosis of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grades 2-3, regression as a negative cytology and high-risk human papillomaviruses, and persistence as a cytologic result of low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions and/or a positive test for high-risk human papillomaviruses.Progression was observed in 14 women (10.1%), 66 (47.6%) regressed, and 58 (42.0%) had a persistent disease. p16(INK4a) was positive in 77 (55.8%) initial biopsy specimens. Progression to cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grades 2-3 was identified in 14 of 77 (18.2%) women with positive and none of 61 (0.00%) women with negative p16(INK4a) immunostaining (P < .001).p16(INK4a) negative cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 1 lesions rarely progress and may benefit from a less intensive follow-up.The clinical performance of Invader technology and SurePath when detecting the presence of high-risk HPV cervical infection.Testing for high-risk genotypes of the human papillomavirus (HR HPV) has been fully integrated into the management algorithms for the prevention of cervical cancer. The literature is limited with regard to the evaluation of the clinical performance of laboratory-developed tests (LDT) utilizing Invader V2.0 assay (ThirdWave/Hologic, Madison, WI, USA) for the detection of HR HPV.To evaluate the clinical performance of Invader V2.0 LDT by determining its sensitivity, negative predictive value (NPV), specificity and positive predictive value (PPV).This study evaluated Invader V2.0 assay results from 12,490 SurePath Pap specimens and 1,931 cervical biopsies in order to assess the clinical performance of the Invader V2.0 assay. The cervical biopsy results were correlated with Invader V2.0 results to determine clinical sensitivity, NPV, clinical specificity, and PPV.The clinical sensitivity and NPV of Invader V2.0 LDT for cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 3 (CIN 3) or higher were 97.4% and 99.1% respectively. The clinical specificity and PPV for CIN 3 were 10.3% and 3.7% respectively.The results support the use of the Invader V2.0 in identifying patients who are at low risk for CIN 3 or higher. The power of the assay implies that it could be used as a primary screening tool for prevention of cervical cancer if a paradigm shift in cervical screening ever occurs.Clinical performance of the APTIMA HPV Assay for the detection of high-risk HPV and high-grade cervical lesions.Human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA testing is widely used in conjunction with Papanicolaou (Pap) testing in cervical cancer screening programs to improve the detection of high-grade lesions. While HPV DNA test sensitivity is good, an improvement in specificity is desired. Detection of HPV mRNA may improve specificity. The APTIMA HPV Assay detects the mRNA of 14 high-risk HPV types in liquid-based cytology specimens.To evaluate APTIMA HPV Assay performance for detection of high-risk HPV and high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) compared to Qiagen's Hybrid Capture 2 HPV DNA (HC2) test.Liquid Pap specimens were collected from 800 women referred to colposcopy and tested with the APTIMA HPV Assay and the HC2 test. Complete results were available for 753 subjects. A subset of samples (n = 393) were typed using Roche's Linear Array HPV Genotyping Test.Sensitivity and specificity for detection of high-risk HPV were >92% and 99% for the APTIMA HPV Assay and 93% and 82% for the HC2 test. Clinical sensitivity and specificity were 91% and >55% for detection of CIN 2+, and 98% and 53% for detection of CIN 3+ for the APTIMA HPV Assay; values for the HC2 test were 95% and 47% for CIN 2+, and 99% and 44% for CIN 3+.The APTIMA HPV Assay is sensitive and very specific for detection of high-risk HPV. The APTIMA HPV Assay had similar clinical sensitivity for disease detection but higher clinical specificity than the HC2 test, which may improve patient management and reduce the cost of care.High-risk HPV detection and concurrent HPV 16 and 18 typing with Abbott RealTime High Risk HPV test.High-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) is the causative agent of cervical cancer. Among the high-risk types, infection with HPV 16 and 18 is associated with significantly higher risk of disease progression, and consequently these two types together cause approximately 70% of invasive cervical cancer worldwide. Identification of HPV 16 and HPV 18 can provide valuable information for risk stratification and clinical management of patients infected with these two types in both ASC-US triage and primary screening in women over age 30. It may also be valuable in the assessment of HPV vaccine efficacy. Abbott RealTime High Risk (HR) HPV is a recently developed test for the detection of 14 high-risk HPV types with the ability to concurrently identify HPV 16 and 18.To evaluate the clinical performance of Abbott RealTime HR HPV test.Abbott RealTime HR HPV was evaluated with 253 cervical specimens obtained from patients with CIN 3 and 340 specimens from patients with cervical cancer to determine clinical sensitivity of the test and the prevalence of types 16 and 18. Additionally, 757 cervical specimens obtained from women 30 years of age or older with normal cytology in a general screening population were tested to determine high-risk HPV positivity rate.The Abbott RealTime HR HPV test detected 97.2% (246/253) of CIN 3 specimens and 98.5% (335/340) of cancer specimens. HPV 16 was the most prevalent type in both CIN 3 (72.8%) and cancer specimens (64.5%). HPV 16 and 18 combined were detected in 78.9% of high-risk HPV positive CIN 3 and 84.8% of high-risk HPV positive cancer specimens. In specimens from women 30 years of age or older with normal cytology in a screening population, the HPV positivity rate was 6.5% (49/757).Abbott RealTime HR HPV is a highly sensitive test for detection of high-grade cervical disease and cancer. The HPV 16 and HPV 18 typing capability of the test offers the advantage of stratifying patients at greater risk of progression and may thus aid in better patient care and management.Age-specific prevalence of HPV genotypes in cervical cytology samples with equivocal or low-grade lesions.To define the spectrum of human papillomavirus (HPV) types and establish an age limit for triage HPV testing in atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) and low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL).343 liquid-based cytological samples from the population-based screening programme with minor abnormalities were subjected to HPV genotyping (Linear Array, Roche, Basel, Switzerland).High-risk human papillomavirus (HR-HPV) was found in 71% of LSIL and 49% of ASCUS cases (P<0.001). High-risk human papillomavirus prevalence was age-dependent in LSIL (P=0.01), with decreasing prevalence until the age of 50 years, followed by a slight increase. Human papillomavirus type 16 was the most common HR-HPV, found in 23% of HPV-positive women. Human papillomavirus type 18 was the sixth most common, found in 9.9% (P<0.001). An age-dependent quadratic trend was observed for multiple infections (P=0.01) with a trough at about 42 years. The most common HR-HPV types to show a coinfection with HPV16 (clade 9) were HPV39 (28%), 45 (38%), and 59 (46%), belonging to HPV18 clade 7. The frequency of low-risk (LR) vs probable HR and HR-HPV also followed an age-dependent quadratic trend.After the age of 25 years, HR-HPV prevalence is similar in LSIL and ASCUS cases, motivating a low age limit for triage HPV testing. Multiple infections and LR/HR-HPV dominance are age-dependent. Genotyping in longitudinal design is needed to elucidate the importance of multiple infections in cancer progression and in cross-protection from vaccination.Human papillomavirus-specific genotypes in cervical lesions of women referred for smears with atypical glandular cells or adenocarcinoma in situ.This study was designed to analyze whether specific human papillomavirus (HPV) genotypes may predict histologic outcomes in women with glandular abnormalities in their cervical smears. Of the 160 women included, 111 were diagnosed with atypical glandular cells, 35 had both atypical glandular cells and high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions, whereas 14 women had AIS, in 1 case associated with high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions. All women underwent colposcopic examinations and biopsy was performed in 129/160 (80.6%). Thirty-one women (19.3%) were considered negative for neoplasia and scheduled for follow-up. All specimens were tested for 27 HPV genotypes by Roche's polymerase chain reaction-reverse line blot assay. Histologic diagnoses were either cervical intraepithelial neoplasia or invasive carcinoma in 75 (58%) women, and negative for neoplasia in 54 (42%). The overall prevalence of HPV was 43%. HPV 16 was the most prevalent type followed by HPV 18. HPV 16 was significantly associated with squamous and glandular neoplasia and HPV 18 with glandular neoplasia. In women with cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 2 or 3, 11 different HPV genotypes were found, whereas in those who had invasive glandular or invasive carcinoma HPV 16 and HPV 18 were found predominantly. The detection of HPV 16 in women with glandular abnormalities in cervical smears did not help differentiating squamous from glandular lesions. However, the detection of HPV 53 in abnormal smears can predict squamous neoplasia, whereas HPV 18 can predict glandular neoplasia as histologic diagnoses.Human papillomavirus infection and its association with cervical dysplasia in Ecuadorian women attending a private cancer screening clinic.Women living in Latin American countries bear a disproportionate burden of cervical cancer, a condition caused by infection with the human papillomavirus (HPV). We performed a study in Santa Elena, Guayas (currently Santa Elena Province), Ecuador, to determine how often HPV could be detected in women attending a private cancer screening clinic. Participants underwent a Pap test, and vaginal and cervical swabs were performed for HPV testing by the polymerase chain reaction (PCR). Each participant completed a verbally administered survey. The mean age of 302 participants was 37.7 years (range 18 to 78 years). The majority of cervical and vaginal specimens contained sufficient DNA to perform PCR. Overall, 24.2% of the participants had either a cervical or vaginal swab that tested positive for HPV. In general, there was a good correlation between the HPV types detected in the cervical and vaginal swabs from the participants, but vaginal swabs were more likely to contain HPV DNA than were cervical swabs. The high-risk HPV types 16, 52, 58, and 59 and the low-risk HPV types 62, 71, 72, and 83 were the most frequently detected HPV types. The number of lifetime sexual partners was positively associated with detection of any HPV type, detection of oncogenic HPV, and abnormal Pap smears. Further studies are needed to determine if these results are representative of all Ecuadorian women and to determine if cervical cancers in Ecuadorian women are caused by the same HPV types found in the swab specimens obtained in this study.The accuracy of colposcopic grading for detection of high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia.To relate aspects of online colposcopic image assessment to the diagnosis of grades 2 and 3 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN 2+).To simulate colposcopic assessment, we obtained digitized cervical images at enrollment after acetic acid application from 919 women referred for equivocal or minor cytologic abnormalities into the ASCUS-LSIL Triage Study. For each, 2 randomly assigned evaluators from a pool of 20 colposcopists assessed images using a standardized tool online. We calculated the accuracy of these assessments for predicting histologic CIN 2+ over the 2 years of study. For validation, a subset of online results was compared with same-day enrollment colposcopic assessments.Identifying any acetowhite lesion in images yielded high sensitivity: 93% of women with CIN 2+ had at least 1 acetowhite lesion. However, 74% of women without CIN 2+ also had acetowhitening, regardless of human papillomavirus status. The sensitivity for CIN 2+ of an online colpophotographic assessment of high-grade disease was 39%. The sensitivity for CIN 2+ of a high-grade diagnosis by Reid Index scoring was 30%, and individual Reid Index component scores had similar levels of sensitivity and specificity. The performance of online assessment was not meaningfully different from that of same-day enrollment colposcopy, suggesting that these approaches have similar utility.Finding acetowhite lesions identifies women with CIN 2+, but using subtler colposcopic characteristics to grade lesions is insensitive. All acetowhite lesions should be assessed with biopsy to maximize sensitivity of colposcopic diagnosis with good specificity.The significance of marked nuclear atypia in grade 1 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia.Approximately 10% to 15% of cases of grade 1 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia are found to have progressed to a high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion or higher at follow-up, and there are presently no reliable morphological predictors of this subset. It has recently been reported that cases of grade 1 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia that display marked nuclear atypia (defined as cases with at least 5 epithelial cells with nuclear enlargement of at least 5 times the size of an intermediate cell, and/or multinucleation of at least 5 nuclei.) have a substantially higher rate of high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion on short-term follow-up and may, therefore, require more aggressive initial management. We report herein our experience with a cohort of such cases. After a review of consecutive cervical biopsies, 352 cases with grade 1 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia were classified into group 1 (grade 1 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia with marked atypia, n = 31) and group 2 (grade 1 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia without marked atypia, n = 321). The average follow-up rates for groups 1 and 2 were 93.55% (29/31) and 90.65% (291/321), respectively. Average follow-up durations were 14.3 and 17.9 months, respectively. The follow-up high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion rate of the cases with marked atypia was 10.34%, as compared with 11.68% for cases without marked atypia. The follow-up interpretive frequency (in cytologic samples) of "low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion" was significantly higher in group 1(19/29 versus 114/291, P = .009). However, no significant differences were identified between groups 1 and 2 regarding the interpretive frequencies of either high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (3/29 versus 34/291, P = 1) or "negative for intraepithelial lesion or malignancy" (6/29 versus 56/291, P = .8) in follow-up cytologic samples. In subsets of both groups in which high-risk human papillomavirus testing was performed in the Papanicolaou test sample that immediately preceded the index cervical biopsies, no significant differences in viral load were found. In conclusion, grade 1 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia with marked atypia does not have a higher follow-up high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion rate than grade 1 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia without marked atypia in our patient population. Further studies are required to address the significance of marked atypia in grade 1 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia and whether patients with this finding should be managed differently.[Comparison of efficacy of combined use of liquid cytology and immunohistochemical assay of p16ink4 and standard procedure and high risk evaluation by polymerase chain reaction of human papillomavirus infection in diagnosing cervical dysplasia and carcinoma].Efficacy of liquid cytology, on the one hand, and those of standard one, appraisal of high risk of cancer by polymerase chain reaction (PCR) of human papillomavirus infection and immunohistochemical assay of p16ink4 high risk in cervical carcinoma diagnosis, on the other, was evaluated PCR of high risk of cancer (dysplasia-free) was detected in 73% (n = 73), CIN I-II--78%, CIN II-III--89%, CIN III and carcinoma--100%. p16ink4 was not detected in dysplasia-free cases and it was--(16%) in CIN I-II, (89%) CIN II-III, (90%) CIN III and (100%)--in carcinoma. Hence, unlike p16ink4 expression (p < or = 0.001), a correlation between the increase in the number of those infected with papillomavirus was not significantly higher than that of dysplasia grade (p < or = 0.05). It is suggested that combined use of liquid cytology and immunohistochemical assay of p16ink4 is more effective.Histologic follow-up results in 662 patients with Pap test findings of atypical glandular cells: results from a large academic womens hospital laboratory employing sensitive screening methods.Atypical glandular cell (AGC) Pap interpretations and screening for glandular neoplasias remain major challenges. We document the largest reported AGC histopathologic follow-up experience and include verification bias-adjusted data on laboratory screening sensitivity.AGC Pap tests of endocervical origin (AGC-EC), endometrial origin (AGC-EM), and not otherwise specified (AGC-NOS) were documented at a center serving an older low risk population. 98% of Pap tests were liquid-based cytology (LBC) specimens screened using computer-assisted screening. Follow-up diagnoses were correlated with cytology and stratified into age groups. Screening sensitivity was assessed by examining Pap results during 1 year preceding neoplastic diagnoses. Verification bias was adjusted with findings in over 2000 patients with hysterectomies.Of 247,131 Pap tests, 1021 (0.41%) reported AGC results and 662 cases had tissue follow-up. Precancerous or malignant neoplastic histologic outcomes were documented in 101 patients (15.3%), including 8.3% cervical, 6.3% endometrial, and 0.6% ovarian. AGC results were most often associated with neoplastic cervical outcomes in women younger than 40 and with neoplastic endometrial outcomes in women 50 or older. AGC-NOS with a squamous cell abnormality and AGC-EC results suggested cervical neoplasia, while AGC-EM results suggested endometrial neoplasia.AGC Pap results detected significant numbers of cervical and non-cervical neoplasias. Since 38 of 44 (86%) of AGC-detected carcinomas were endometrial or ovarian, HPV co-testing would not have aided screening in detecting the majority of malignancies diagnosed after AGC Pap results. Verification bias-adjusted Pap screening sensitivity in the laboratory for detection of significant neoplastic cervical disease was 93%.Molecular analysis of HPV 16 E6I/E6II spliced mRNAs and correlation with the viral physical state and the grade of the cervical lesion.The presence of HPV 16 E6*I/E6*II spliced transcripts, in cervical lesions of different grade, was analyzed to characterize the transcription pattern. The presence and amount of spliced transcripts were correlated with DNA viral markers such as E2/E6 ratio and physical state. The detection of HPV 16 E6*I/E6*II mRNAs was set up by an SYBR Green real-time reverse transcriptase PCR assay with an optimal dynamic range and sensitivity. The assay was applied to the analysis of 71 specimens, positive to HPV 16 as a sole infection, from women with abnormal cervical smears, precisely 31 low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions and 40 high-grade lesions. Samples negative to both transcripts were found only in low-grade cervical lesions. Three different transcription profiles were found in the low- and high-grade lesions analyzed: in low-grade lesions samples positive only to E6*II and in high-grade lesions samples positive only to E6*I were detected. In low- and high-grade lesions, samples positive to both E6*I and E6*II were found. In the samples positive for both transcripts, the E6*I/E6*II ratio was higher than that in the majority of high-grade lesions and lower than that in all the low-grade lesions. Analyzing the transcription pattern in relation to E2/E6 ratio and to the DNA physical state, the presence of high values of E6*I was associated mainly with low values of E2/E6 ratio and of mixed DNA forms. The detection of HPV 16 E6*I/E6*II mRNAs may serve to identify transcription patterns indicative of cervical disease progression and help physicians to decide clinical management.High-throughput two-step LNA real time PCR assay for the quantitative detection and genotyping of HPV prognostic-risk groups.Human papillomavirus (HPV) infection is a necessary event in the development of cervical carcinoma. High risk (HR) HPV genotypes, however, may progress differentially from low grade lesions to malignancy.The necessity to genotype and quantify HPV-DNA in cervical screening programs, in the follow up post-surgical treatments and in monitoring the effectiveness of HPV vaccination programs, requires access to economical, high-throughput and flexible molecular technologies.A high-throughput two-step LNA real time PCR assay was developed consisting of real time PCR reactions with fluorescent Locked Nucleic Acid (LNA) probes. The first step permits classification into three prognostic-risk groups of nine HR HPV genotypes (16, 18, 31, 33, 35, 45, 52, 56 and 58) most frequently found associated with cervical lesions in Europe. The second step allows us to genotype/quantify the HPV-DNA only when clinical, epidemiological or prophylactic aims exist.The specificity, repeatability, detection and quantitation limit, and linearity of the assay were evaluated and appear to be in agreement with guidelines for the validation of analytical procedures. The overall genotype concordance on cervical samples between our assay and INNOLiPA test was 94% (k 0.83) indicating good agreement.The two-step PCR assay can give much information relative to the predictive value of different HR HPV types and can quantify the genotype-specific viral load. In particular, its ability to detect and quantify nine HR HPV genotypes can help provide more efficient and successful patient care and may be useful for the monitoring of the efficacy of HPV vaccines.Comparison between the Hybrid Capture 2 and the hpVIR real-time PCR for detection of human papillomavirus in women with ASCUS or low grade dysplasia.Human papillomavirus (HPV) testing is an important part of cervical carcinoma screening, and the most widely used assay for detection of HPV is Hybrid Capture 2 (HC2).We compare the HC2 with the real-time PCR hpVIR assay for detection of HPV in follow-up smears of 398 women diagnosed with atypical squamous cells of unknown significance (ASCUS) or low grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN 1) in their initial smear.The two assays target the same set of high-risk (HR) HPVs with exception of HPV68. hpVIR identify individual or groups of HPV types as well as their viral load, while HC2 identify HR HPVs without specification of type.34% (131/391) of the women were positive with HC2 and 45% (175/391) with hpVIR. 16% (63/391) were positive only with hpVIR and among those with cytology available 6% (3/52) had a CIN 2. The 3% (13/391) of women positive only with HC2 either contained low-risk HPVs or copy numbers below the cut-off for the hpVIR assay.The hpVIR assay has a similar sensitivity and specificity as HC2, but hpVIR detect a higher frequency of high-risk HPV infections.A 7.5-year prospective study of longer than 18 months type-specific human papillomavirus persistence in a routine cytology-based cervical screening population of about 31,000 women in West Germany.The objective of this study was to analyse the prevalence, infection pattern, duration and outcome of long-term, type-specific, persistent human papillomavirus (HPV) infections in a routine cytology-based cervical screening population of West German women followed up for 7.5 years. From a screening population of 31,000 women, a strictly selected cohort of 100 patients with > or =18-month persistent, type-specific HPV infection were prospectively followed up for a mean of 35.52 months (+/-13.0). HPV type prevalence and odds ratios for regression, progression and steady state were analysed, as well as the influence of age and HPV coinfection on outcome. Altogether, 21 different genotypes were detected. Seventy-two percent of women were infected with high-risk HPVs, 24% with low-risk and 4% with unknown risk HPV types; 44% of cases had coinfections with multiple HPV types. The risk of progression in low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions and high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions was the highest for infections with high-risk HPVs [odds ratio: 2.2 (0.79-6.11, 95% confidence interval)], whereas cases with low-risk and unknown risk HPVs tended to regress or remained unchanged during follow-up. The mean duration of infections showed considerable variation among the different HPV types and risk groups detected and ranged between 19.7 and 54.3 months. Age was not significantly associated with disease progression and infection duration, and histology had a poor sensitivity for detecting high-grade dysplasia. In conclusion, detecting long-term persistent HPV infections by genotyping may help to identify women with cervical intraepithelial lesions who are at lower and higher risk of developing high-grade precancer and cancer. This may influence future screening strategies and therapy decisions.Comparison of three management strategies for patients with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance, after six months delay: a three-year experience in an Iranian university hospital.A Pap test result of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) presents a clinical challenge. Only 5-10% of women with ASCUS harbour serious cervical disease.We screened 3619 women, who attended to Mirza Koochak Khan Hospital at Tehran University of Medical Sciences with Pap smears, of whom 100 returned with ASCUS. After six months, each subject underwent a standard cytology (conventional Pap smear), human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA testing (identifying high-risk HPV types with polymerase chain reaction) and colposcopy with multiple cervical biopsies.Mean age was 44.09 +/- 8.6 years. The estimated prevalence of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) II or higher was 4%. When histologically verified high-grade lesions (> or = CIN II) were observed, the relative sensitivity of HPV DNA testing was 100% compared with conventional Pap smear, which performed 75% versus 100% relative sensitivity, respectively, using cytological diagnosis high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion, or low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL) as the cut-off. Negative and positive predictive values (NPV and PPV) of Pap test were 98.9% and 100%. The NPV and PPV of HPV DNA testing were 100%.Although less complicated than colposcopy, the repeat Pap smear triage algorithm for ASCUS may underdiagnose some women with high-grade CIN, when compared with colposcopy. Considering the high sensitivity of HPV testing, it may be useful as an alternative to the current policy of six-month repeat cytology for women with ASCUS results.High-risk human papillomavirus DNA test results are useful for disease risk stratification in women with unsatisfactory liquid-based cytology pap test results.This study assesses whether high-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA test results from residual vial fluid of unsatisfactory liquid-based cytology(LBC) samples might provide useful information on disease risk.Patients with unsatisfactory imaged ThinPrep Pap test results and available Hybrid Capture 2 high-risk HPV results were identified at an academic women's hospital laboratory between July 1, 2005, and July 31, 2007. Follow-up repeat cytology results, HPV results, and available biopsy results were analyzed.Three hundred four patients with unsatisfactory cytology results and HPV test results were studied. Eleven (3.6%) of 304 tested positive for HPV DNA, and 293 tested HPV negative. Five (45%) of 11 HPV-positive patients had detectible low-grade squamous intraepithelial/cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 1 during a mean follow-up period of almost 6 months. Among 293 women with negative HPV results, only 1 case of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 1 was identified during roughly the same follow-up period.A positive high-risk HPV result associated with an unsatisfactory ThinPrep Pap test result identified patients at risk for diagnosis of an undetected squamous intraepithelial/cervical intraepithelial neoplasia. Negative high-risk HPV results associated with an unsatisfactory LBC had high negative predictive value in this limited study. The overall low detection rate for significant disease on follow-up of all patients with unsatisfactory imaged LBC is similar to findings reported in another LBC study but differs from studies reporting increased risk for undetected disease in women screened with unsatisfactory conventional Pap smears.The utility of human papillomavirus testing in the management of atypical glandular cells on cytology.To determine the value of human papillomavirus (HPV) testing for HPV-associated cervical disease (HPV-AD) and overall disease (atypical glandular cell [AGC]-associated cervical disease) in women with AGCs.A literature search was conducted from January 1993 through September 2007 using various AGC-related terms with the exploded Medical Subject Heading (MeSH) term "HPV." Findings from 7 studies were used to calculate disease rates according to HPV status.The rate of AGC-associated cervical disease for 661 cases of AGC with concurrent HPV testing was 23.3%. The rate of HPV-AD was higher in HPV-positive, versus negative, cases (53% vs 3%, respectively). Human papillomavirus-positive, versus negative, status predicted a higher likelihood of a cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 2/3 lesion (odds ratio = 39.6, 95% CI = 17.9-87.4, p <.001). The rate of HPV-nonassociated cancers was significantly higher in patients who were negative, versus positive, for HPV (4% vs 0.4%; p =.016). Human papillomavirus testing had an overall 90% sensitivity, 79% specificity, 53% positive predictive value, and 97% negative predictive value for cases of HPV-AD. Atypical glandular cell with concurrent atypical squamous cell (ASC) or squamous intraepithelial lesion (SIL) (ASC/SIL) had higher rates of disease than AGC alone. The positive predictive value of HPV testing for AGC with concurrent ASC/SIL was higher than that for AGC alone.All women with AGC should undergo a comprehensive initial examination regardless of HPV status. The presence of HPV identifies a group of women at higher risk for cervical disease who should be followed closely. Women positive for human papillomavirus with AGC and concurrent ASC/SIL are at even higher risk. If, after a comprehensive initial examination, women with AGC not-otherwise-specified and positive HPV have no identifiable disease, a cervical conization may be considered.Gene expression profiling in cervical cancer: identification of novel markers for disease diagnosis and therapy.Cervical cancer, a potentially preventable disease, remains the second most common malignancy in women worldwide. Human papillomavirus is the single most important etiological agent in cervical cancer. HPV contributes to neoplastic progression through the action of two viral oncoproteins E6 and E7, which interfere with critical cell cycle pathways, p53, and retinoblastoma. However, evidence suggests that HPV infection alone is insufficient to induce malignant changes and other host genetic variations are important in the development of cervical cancer. Advances in molecular biology and high throughput gene expression profiling technologies have heralded a new era in biomarker discovery and identification of molecular targets related to carcinogenesis. These advancements have improved our understanding of carcinogenesis and will facilitate screening, early detection, management, and personalised targeted therapy. In this chapter, we have described the use of high density microarrays to assess gene expression profiles in cervical cancer. Using this approach we have identified a number of novel genes which are differentially expressed in cervical cancer, including several genes involved in cell cycle regulation. These include p16ink4a, MCM 3 and 5, CDC6, Geminin, Cyclins A-D, TOPO2A, CDCA1, and BIRC5. We have validated expression of mRNA using real-time PCR and protein by immunohistochemistry.Cervical cytology screening and management of abnormal cytology in adolescents.The consensus guidelines recognize adolescents as a special group and allow for more conservative follow- up of abnormal cytology and histology. The guidelines recognize the role of high rates of HPV infection and reinfection in teens, along with high rates of clearance of HPV and low rates of invasive cervical cancer. Risks of treatment are balanced with risk for disease progression. The cervical cancer vaccine is now recommended for teens. The approved vaccine protects against HPV related disease caused by four subtypes of HPV 6, 11, 16, and 18. The Food and Drug Administration has approved the vaccine as routine for 11- and 12-year-old girls. The vaccine is most effective prior to HPV exposure or before the sexual debut. In South Carolina only 4.8% of high school girls indicate having sexual intercourse before age 13. Vaccination provides an opportunity to review risky behaviors with adolescent patients and to encourage healthy, safe lifestyles. Vaccination is not protective for sexually transmitted infections and this can be emphasized at vaccination visits as well. The importance of cancer screening can also be reviewed with patients at vaccination visits.Smoking worsens the prognosis of mild abnormalities in cervical cytology.To examine the effect of smoking on the incidence of low- and high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) in women with a baseline Pap smear of atypical squamous cells (ASC) or a low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL).Prospective study in which a cohort of women with normal colposcopy and ASC/LSIL at baseline were followed at 6-month intervals of up to 36 months. Women were grouped in post-hoc analysis according to their smoking behavior: never (or past) smokers and current smokers.This report was based on data from the Latin American Screening Study, conducted in Sao Paulo, Campinas, Porto Alegre (Brazil) and Buenos Aires (Argentina).A subset of 150 women derived from a cohort of 1,011 women.Multivariate Cox analysis and Kaplan-Meier curves were used.Low- and high-grade CIN during follow-up.The only factor related to an increased risk of developing CIN was the positive high-risk (hr) HPV status (hazard ratio (HR) = 3.42; 95% CI: 1.11-9.43). A total of 21 cases of incident CIN were detected during follow-up. Of these, 11 appeared in the group of 67 smokers and 10 among the 83 non-smoker women (log-rank, p=0.33). Smoking status was not associated with the risk of developing CIN (HR = 0.73; 95% CI: 0.40-1.33). However, when restricting the analysis to high-grade CIN only (11 cases), the probability of developing the disease was significantly higher among smokers (p=0.04).Smoking contributes additional risk for developing high-grade CIN in women with ASC or LSIL cytology but normal colposcopy.Five-year experience of human papillomavirus DNA and Papanicolaou test cotesting.To estimate the 5-year age group-specific test positives for Pap tests and human papillomavirus (HPV) testing in a large, general screening population of women 30 and older.Using data from Kaiser Permanente Northern California, a large health maintenance organization that introduced cotesting in 2003, we evaluated the cotesting results overall and by 5-year age groups. Women (n=580,289) who opted for and underwent cotesting (n cotests=812,598) between January 2003 and April 2008 were included in the analysis. Pap tests interpreted as atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US) or more severe were considered to be positive. Women were tested for carcinogenic HPV using an assay approved by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration. Binomial exact 95% confidence intervals (CIs) were calculated.Overall, 6.27% (95% CI 6.21-6.32%) of cotests were carcinogenic HPV positive, and only 3.99% (95% CI 3.94-4.03%) cotests had normal cytology and were carcinogenic HPV positive. By comparison, 5.18% (95% CI 5.13-5.23%) of cotests had ASC-US or more severe cytology, and 2.87% (95% CI 2.84-2.91%) of cotests had ASC-US or more severe cytology and were carcinogenic HPV negative.In a general screening population, concerns about excessive HPV test positives among women aged 30 years and older are not borne out.The evaluation of human papillomavirus genotyping in cervical liquid-based cytology specimens; using the Roche Linear Array HPV genotyping assay.To ascertain the usefulness of the Roche Linear Array human papillomavirus (HPV) genotyping assay for assessing HPV genotypes in liquid-based cytology (LBC) samples and to evaluate this methodology within a cytopathology laboratory. These tests are of importance as persistent infection with high-risk HPV genotypes is considered a causal factor in the development of cervical cancer.A total of 175 cervical LBC samples were tested using the Roche Linear Array HPV genotyping test. The suitability of the assay use in routine cytopathology laboratory was considered. HPV genotypes were matched to the cervical cytology results, which included negative, borderline nuclear abnormalities, mild, moderate and severe dyskaryosis.The assay could be applied to screening samples with the combined result available at the reporting stage. There were no test failures. All samples used after cytological analysis had sufficient DNA for testing. The results were reproducible and easily read and there was concordance of results between biomedical scientists. The results of the assay showed co-infection with multiple HPV genotypes was common in both high-grade and low-grade cytology samples. The percentage of HPV+ samples in the normal cytology samples (although in this grouping the number of samples was low) was 37%. In the cytology samples reported as severe dyskaryosis the HPV genotypes most commonly found were HPV16 and HPV51.The assay was able to detect multiple HPV infection with a wide range of genotypes in LBC samples sent for routine cytological analysis. It would be suitable for use in a cytopathology laboratory. The results of the assay show that the genotype profile has some variation from other geographical regions, and more work is needed to determine population prevalence, to ascertain the impact of the HPV vaccine, to evaluate test for cure and HPV triage management.Increased risk of oncogenic human papillomavirus infections and incident high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia among smokers: experience from the Latin American screening study.The purpose of this study was to assess the effect of smoking on the prevalence and incidence of high-risk human papillomavirus (hr-HPV) infection and cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) in a large sample of Latin American women.The study examines baseline data on over 12,000 women included in the Latin American Screening Study (Brazil and Argentina), and over 1000 women followed-up for a period of 36 months. Three groups were formed: never smokers, current, and past smokers. The prevalence of hr-HPV infection and CIN were compared between the study groups. In the prospective analysis, women were controlled at 6-month intervals to assess the cumulative risk of incident hr-HPV infection, smear abnormalities, and CIN.A higher prevalence (21.7%) of hr-HPV infection was found among current smokers as compared to never smokers (16.5%) or past smokers (13.5%). Being current smoker was significantly (P <0.01) associated with hr-HPV detection (OR = 1.6; 95% CI = 1.2-2.1). Being a current smoker was a significant predictor of incident hr-HPV during the follow-up [Hazards ratio (HR) = 1.4; 95% CI 1.0-1.9]. For incident CIN2+, being a past smoker (HR = 3.6; 95% CI 1.6-9.8) or current smoker (HR = 3.6; 95% CI 1.5-8.6) were the significant independent predictors. Current and past smokers had a significantly increased risk of incident CIN2+ (P <0.01).Smoking increases the risk of contracting hr-HPV infection and modifies the effect of a persistent hr-HPV infection by further increasing the risk of developing CIN2+. It seems that this effect modification persists over several years after smoking cessation.Multiplex chemiluminescence microscope imaging of P16(INK4A) and HPV DNA as biomarker of cervical neoplasia.Classification of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) lesions in low-grade (CIN1) or high-grade (CIN2-3) ones is crucial for optimal patient management, but current histological diagnosis on bioptic samples is often hampered by inter-observer variability. To allow objective classification, we have exploited the peculiar characteristics of chemiluminescence detection, such as high sensitivity and easy quantification of the luminescence signal, to perform sequentially in the same tissue section both an immunohistochemical quantitative detection of p16(INK4A) (a protein marker of high-grade CIN lesions) and an in situ hybridization for human papillomavirus (generally accepted as a necessary but insufficient cause of cervical carcinoma). Different label enzymes (alkaline phosphatase and horseradish peroxidase) were employed in order to avoid any interference between the two assays, and quantitative chemiluminescence image analysis was used to obtain objective evaluation of sample positivity. The multiplexed method allowed detection of two complementary biomarkers and provided discrimination between different lesions (non-neoplastic, low-grade and high-grade CIN). This assay might thus represent an accurate and objective diagnostic test providing important information for counseling, selection of therapy and follow up after surgical treatment.The Mexican Cervical Cancer Screening Trial: self-sampling for human papillomavirus with unaided visual inspection as a secondary screen.The Mexican Cervical Cancer Screening (MECCS) study took place in the State of Michoacán. Primary screening was by self-sampling for high-risk human papillomavirus (HR-HPV). The objectives were to increase the specificity of primary HPV screening by requiring 2 positive HPV tests 1 year apart in women whose secondary screen was negative according to an acetic acid-aided visual inspection (VIA). In addition, we postulated that the sensitivity of VIA would be sufficient to identify large preinvasive lesions and cancers unsuitable for cryotherapy if applied in a see-and-treat algorithm.A total of 8621 women (aged 30-50 years) were screened, and 14.3% were positive for HR-HPV. In phase 1, 11.9% of the HPV-positive women were VIA-positive and were referred for colposcopy with directed and random biopsies. If VIA-negative, women repeated the self-sample 1 year later to detect persistent HR-HPV (25.2% were positive). If persistently HR-HPV-positive in phase 2, patients again had VIA, then all women (both VIA-positive and -negative) received directed and random biopsies. If cryotherapy had been used to treat HPV- and VIA-positive women in phase 1 or persistent HR-HPV-positive (phase 2), the potential risk of undertreatment would have been 4.1%, and 66.4% of the treated patients would have had normal or cervical intraepithelial neoplasia I on biopsy. The VIA triage would refer 0.73% of the patients to colposcopy owing to the lesion size, location, or the presence of a cancer. On the basis of this pilot study, we are encouraged to explore and evaluate a rapid, more sensitive, and more specific self-test.Cervical infections by multiple human papillomavirus (HPV) genotypes: Prevalence and impact on the risk of precancerous epithelial lesions.A large proportion of human papillomavirus (HPV) infections is sustained by multiple genotypes. The effect of multiple infections on the risk of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) and the potential efficacy of vaccine on these infections are controversial. We performed viral typing by SFP(10)-LIPA on a consecutive series of 1,323 women undergoing colposcopy, 69% of whom had cervical biopsy, and correlated CIN severity with the type and number of HPVs. Overall prevalence of HPV-DNA was 68.9%, 97.3% in CIN1, and 98.1% in CIN>/=2. HPV positivity correlated with younger age (35.9 vs. 37.3 years, P = 0.026) and history of CIN (P < 0.001). Multiple types were detected in 44.2% of cases, including 63.1% CIN1 and 80.8% CIN>/=2. Twenty-three different types were detected, HPV-16, 31 and 52 being the most frequent. Infections by HPV-6, 11, 16, or 18 occurred in 59.4% of CIN1 and 71.3% of CIN>/=2. Number of viral types and class of oncogenic risk were linearly correlated with CIN severity (P < 0.0001) by univariate and multivariate analyses controlling for age and history of CIN. The effect of the number of HPV types was maintained after exclusion from the model of infections by HPV-6, 11, 16, and 18. Frequency, distribution, and clinical correlates of multiple HPV infections highlight the importance of assessing individual types in the management and the prediction of outcome of women with abnormal baseline cytology and point to potential limitations in current vaccine strategies.Quantitative multiplex PCR assay for the detection of the seven clinically most relevant high-risk HPV types.High-risk HPV DNA detection has become a valuable tool for the triage of borderline, questionable and abnormal cytologic findings in cervical carcinoma screening programs. This knowledge is largely based on studies which could only discriminate between low-risk (LR-) and high-risk (HR-) HPV groups. However, it is becoming increasingly clear that HPV genotyping may allow further risk stratification and may offer different treatment options in the future.To establish a fast and cost-effective system not only for genotyping but also for quantification of viral DNA.Development and validation of a 5' exonuclease fluorescent probe multiplex real-time PCR assay (TaqMan format) for the detection and quantification of the 7 most frequent HR-HPV types (16, 18, 31, 33, 45, 52 and 58) which account for over 87% of cervical carcinomas world-wide. Two PCR reactions are required to detect the designated HPV types.Experiments with plasmid constructs of all 18 HR-HPV DNA showed that the multiplex real-time PCR assay was highly sensitive and specific. Evaluation of DNA extracted from archived cell pellets of cervical scrapes by the multiplex assay and the GP5+/6+-EIA showed identical genotyping for 234 of 261 (89.6%) samples and an almost perfect agreement when considering all typing results (kappa 0.901). Viral load did not correlate with disease progression within the CIN spectrum but significant differences were evident when comparing all CIN with the group lacking CIN (p=0.0028) or with the cancer group (p=0.0001).Our multiplex assay will be useful to address questions related to viral persistence at the genotype level, the kinetics of viral load and disease recurrence.Human papillomavirus type 18 DNA load and 2-year cumulative diagnoses of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grades 2-3.The clinical relevance of the amount of human papillomavirus type 18 (HPV18) DNA in cervical tissue (ie, HPV18 DNA load) is unknown.Study subjects were 303 women who were HPV18 positive at enrollment into the Atypical Squamous Cells of Undetermined Significance (ASC-US) and Low-Grade Squamous Intraepithelial Lesion (LSIL) Triage Study. HPV18 DNA load, expressed as copies of HPV18 per nanogram of cellular DNA, at enrollment was quantitatively measured. Subjects were followed up semiannually for a period of 2 years for detection of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 2-3 (CIN2-3). A linear regression model was used to examine associations of CIN2-3 with HPV18 DNA load. All statistical tests were two-sided.CIN2-3 was confirmed in 92 of 303 (30.4%) HPV18-positive women. Among women without CIN2-3, HPV18 DNA load was positively associated with increasing severity of cervical cytology at enrollment (Ptrend < .001). However, among those with CIN2-3, HPV18 DNA load was not associated with severity of cervical cytology at enrollment (Ptrend = .33). The ratios of geometric means of HPV18 DNA load at enrollment among women with CIN2-3, relative to those without, were 6.06 (95% confidence interval [CI] = 0.31 to 117.92) for those with normal cytology at enrollment, 0.50 (95% CI = 0.10 to 2.44) for those with ASC-US, 0.11 (95% CI = 0.03 to 0.46) for those with LSIL, and 0.07 (95% CI = 0.01 to 0.80) for those with high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HSIL). After adjusting for age and coinfection with other high-risk HPVs, a statistically significant association of lower HPV18 DNA load with CIN2-3 was observed among women with LSIL or HSIL at enrollment (P = .02). Within the 2-year period, HPV18 DNA load was unrelated to the timing of CIN2-3 diagnosis. Overall results were similar when the outcome was CIN3.HPV18 DNA load was higher for women with LSIL or HSIL at enrollment with no evidence of CIN2-3 during the 2-year follow-up period than it was for women with CIN2-3. Thus, testing for high levels of HPV18 DNA does not appear to be clinically useful.Prevalence of human papillomavirus types 6, 11, 16 and 18 in young Austrian women - baseline data of a phase III vaccine trial.Cervical cancer is the second most common cancer among women worldwide. In the absence of changing risk or intervention, it is projected that in comparison with 2002 there will be a 40% increase in the number of new cases of cervical cancer by 2020. HPV types 16 and 18 cause 70% of cervical cancers worldwide, 50% of high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasias and 25% of low-grade neoplasias. HPV types 6 and 11 are the causative agent of > 90% of genital warts. The aim of this study was to assess the baseline prevalence of infection with HPV 6, 11, 16 and 18 in young Austrian women.Austrian females aged 16-24 (n = 123) were enrolled in a double-blind, placebo-controlled, randomized phase III trial of a quadrivalent HPV (types 6, 11, 16, 18) vaccine (FUTURE I, ClinicalTrials.gov number NCT00092521). Healthy women who were not pregnant and had no prior history of genital warts or abnormal results on cervical cytologic testing and had fewer than five lifetime sex partners were eligible for enrollment. The study sub-population was recruited primarily from university settings.Analysis of the sexual history of the Austrian subjects showed that 92.7% (114/123) were non-virgins and 46.3% were current smokers. At enrollment, 15 (13.5%) had positive serological or PCR tests for HPV 6, 11, 16 or 18. Serologically, 14 (12.3%) of women were positive to HPV 6, 11, 16 or 18: of these, 13 (11.4%) were positive for HPV 16, four (3.5%) were positive for HPV 18, and one (0.9%) for HPV 6. By PCR all were negative for HPV 6 and 11, whereas seven (6.1%) were positive for HPV 16 and one (0.9%) for HPV 18. Abnormal cytology was observed in 12 (10.3%) women.Although the prevalence of vaccine HPV types among young Austrian women with fewer than five lifetime sexual partners was lower than in international data, we observed a high prevalence of abnormal cytology and smoking. These data suggest that a substantial number of Austrian women are at risk for HPV-related disease.Is smoking an independent risk factor for invasive cervical cancer? A nested case-control study within Nordic biobanks.The strong correlation between smoking and exposure to oncogenic human papillomaviruses (HPVs) has made it difficult to verify the independent role of smoking in cervical carcinogenesis. Thus, the authors evaluated this role. Five large Nordic serum banks containing samples from more than 1,000,000 subjects were linked with nationwide cancer registries (1973-2003). Serum samples were retrieved from 588 women who developed invasive cervical cancer and 2,861 matched controls. The samples were analyzed for cotinine (a biomarker of tobacco exposure) and antibodies to HPV types 16 and 18, herpes simplex virus type 2, and Chlamydia trachomatis. Smoking was associated with the risk of squamous cell carcinoma (SCC) among HPV16- and/or HPV18-seropositive heavy smokers (odds ratio=2.7, 95% confidence interval: 1.7, 4.3). A similar risk of SCC (odds ratio=3.2, 95% confidence interval: 2.6, 4.0) was found in heavy smokers after adjustment for HPV16/18 antibodies. The point estimates increased with increasing age at diagnosis and increasing cotinine level. This study confirms that smoking is an independent risk factor for cervical cancer/SCC in women infected with oncogenic HPVs. These findings emphasize the importance of cervical cancer prevention among women exposed to tobacco smoke.Cervical cancer screening with liquid cytology in women with developmental disabilities.To evaluate the use of liquid cytology in Pap smears in women with developmental disabilities (DD) for endocervical cell yield and abnormalities, via speculum examination or blind technique.We used retrospective chart review of gynecological visits by women with DD from October 2002 to November 2005. Cervical cytology screening included speculum examination or blind technique. Endocervical cell yield was analyzed via Pearson's chi-square test.Of 240 attempted liquid cytology Pap smears, 199 (82.9%) were completed. Of these, 193 met inclusion criteria for the study, and 120 (62.2%) contained endocervical cells. The endocervical cell yield with liquid cytology/speculum was 80.0% and was 43.6% with liquid cytology/blind (p < 0.001). Two blind smears (1.0%) were abnormal; both revealed atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) with subsequent negative human papillomavirus (HPV) typing.Cervical screening with liquid cytology in women with DD provides an overall rate of endocervical cells of approximately 44%-80% depending on the technique used. Although this is much lower than in the general population, this compares favorably with slide Pap smear in women with DD. The 44% yield of endocervical cells and the finding of abnormal Pap smears with the blind technique suggest this is a reasonable alternative for obtaining Pap smears in women with difficult pelvic examinations who otherwise would not receive cervical screening.Atypical squamous cells, cannot exclude a high-grade intraepithelial lesion and its clinical significance in postmenopausal, pregnant, postpartum, and contraceptive-use patients.Previous studies have confirmed the low predictive value of a diagnosis of atypical squamous cells, cannot exclude a high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (ASC-H) in a Papanicolaou (Pap) smear for subsequent high-grade dysplasia in the postmenopausal age group. It appears plausible that the decrease in estrogen inherent in the postmenopausal state likely produces reactive cytologic atypia, which is misinterpreted as ASC-H. The change in hormone levels observed in pregnant patients, postpartum patients, and contraceptive users, as a corollary, potentially could create a similar diagnostic dilemma. In the current study, the impact of age and altered hormone status on the frequency of ASC-H was assessed to answer the following questions: Is the low predictive value of ASC-H in postmenopausal women an age-related phenomenon, and do other states that result in decreased levels of estrogen relative to progesterone have a similar association?Pap smears that were diagnosed as ASC-H were divided into postmenopausal, pregnant, postpartum, and contraceptive-use categories. Each Pap smear slide was reviewed to assess the degree of atrophy and the character of atypical cells. The frequency of high-grade follow-up (histology and/or Digene Hybrid Capture II) in the postmenopausal group was compared with the frequency of high-grade follow-up in the pregnant, postpartum, and contraceptive-use categories using the chi-square test. The pregnant, postpartum, and contraceptive-use categories also were compared statistically among each other with the chi-square test.In total, 195 cases met the criteria for study inclusion. The percentage of patients who had subsequent high-grade follow-up was 22.5% in the postmenopausal group, 79.6% in the pregnant group, 66.7% in the postpartum group, and 60% in the contraceptive-use group. When these data were subjected to the chi-square test, there was a statistically significant difference (P<.0001) between the predictive value of subsequent high-grade follow-up in the postmenopausal group compared with the other patient groups. When the chi-square test was applied to the intercomparison of the pregnant, postpartum, and contraceptive-use categories, there were no significant differences (P > .05) in high-grade follow-up between any of these groups.The diagnosis of ASC-H in postmenopausal Pap smears has a low predictive value in the subsequent diagnosis of high-grade squamous lesions in stark contrast to the pregnant, postpartum, and contraceptive-use categories. This suggests that age rather than hormone alterations affects the capacity of ASC-H to predict subsequent high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions. In addition, there are no definite cytomorphologic criteria that can be used to distinguish reliably between benign cellular changes and possible high-grade squamous lesions in these Pap smears. Digene Hybrid Capture II testing, although helpful, does not have 100% correlation with subsequent tissue/Pap smear follow-up and cannot be used alone to triage this group of women for colposcopy.Comparison of HPV detection technologies: Hybrid capture 2, PreTect HPV-Proofer and analysis of HPV DNA viral load in HPV16, HPV18 and HPV33 E6/E7 mRNA positive specimens.Human papillomavirus (HPV) testing using molecular methods in liquid based cytology (LBC) specimens may be useful as an adjunct to cervical screening by cytology. We compared the positivity rate of the commercially available HPV DNA method hybrid capture 2 (hc2) and the commercially available E6/E7 mRNA method PreTect HPV-Proofer in cytological specimens (n=299). LBC specimens collected (n=299) represented the following cervical cytological disease categories: Normal (n=60), borderline nuclear abnormalities (BNA) (n=34), CIN1 (n=121), CIN2 (n=60), CIN3 (n=24). Overall, 69% (205/299) of the cases were positive by hc2 and 38% (112/299) of the cases were positive by PreTect HPV-Proofer. Concordance rates between the two tests were highest in the high-grade cytology cases (CIN2: 67% and CIN3: 83%) and the normal cytology cases (88%) and lowest in the BNA and CIN1 categories (56% and 52%). HPV DNA viral load analyses were carried out on HPV16 (n=55), HPV18 (n=9) and HPV33 (n=13) samples that were positive by PreTect HPV-Proofer. The sensitivity and specificity of PreTect HPV-Proofer and the hc2 DNA test for the detection of high-grade cytology (i.e. CIN2+) were 71.4% and 75.8% vs 100% and 43.7%, respectively. The relatively low detection rate observed by PreTect HPV-Proofer in the whole range of cytological positive cases, combined with a relatively higher specificity and PPV, suggests that PreTect HPV-Proofer may be more useful than hc2 for triage and in predicting high-grade disease.ProEx C immunocytochemistry and high-risk human papillomavirus DNA testing in papanicolaou tests with atypical squamous cell (ASC-US) cytology: correlation study with histologic biopsy.Papanicolaou tests with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US) cytology and adjunct testing for high-risk human papillomaviruses (hr-HPV) are helpful in detecting high-grade disease. Detection of disease may be further improved with molecular markers known to be overexpressed in cervical carcinoma. ProEx C detects 2 such molecular markers, minichromosome maintenance protein 2 and topoisomerase II, which are associated with abnormal cell cycle regulation.To determine the utility of ProEx C as a marker for high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 2+ disease when compared with hr-HPV status in Papanicolaou tests with ASC-US cytology.A SurePath slide was prepared on all ASC-US cases from the residual SurePath vial pellet and stained using the ProEx C reagent prediluted with water-bath antigen retrieval, using a Dako autostainer. Nuclear staining of cytologically atypical squamous cells was considered a positive result. Adjunct testing for hr-HPV used Digene Hybrid Capture 2. Follow-up biopsy results were available for review following the Papanicolaou test.Two hundred patients with ASC-US diagnoses were part of this study. The sensitivities of ProEx C and hr-HPV testing in detecting high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 2+ disease were 98.04% and 82.35%, respectively, whereas the specificity for detecting high-grade disease was 74.50% and 73.15%, respectively.ProEx C staining is a more sensitive and specific biomarker for detecting cervical disease than adjunct testing for hr-HPV status in Papanicolaou tests with ASC-US.Use of p16-INK4A overexpression to increase the specificity of human papillomavirus testing: a nested substudy of the NTCC randomised controlled trial.Human-papillomavirus (HPV) testing is more sensitive, but less specific, than conventional cytology for detecting high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN). We assessed whether HPV testing with triage by p16-INK4A overexpression can increase specificity while maintaining sensitivity.HPV-positive women were enrolled between June 10, 2003, and Dec 31, 2004 in a multicentre randomised controlled trial, which compared stand-alone HPV testing by Hybrid Capture 2 (experimental group) with conventional cytology, were referred for colposcopy. In seven of nine centres, cytospin preparations from these women were tested for p16-INK4A overexpression by immunostaining. The sensitivity and specificity for CIN grade 2 or more, determined at blind review of histology, were calculated for these women. We also estimated the relative sensitivity and relative referral to colposcopy that would have been obtained by HPV testing with p16-INK4A triage compared with conventional cytology. This trial is registered as a Standard Randomised Controlled Trial, number ISRCTN81678807.24 661 women were randomly assigned to the experimental group. 1137 women (74% of those undergoing colposcopy in relevant centres), including 50 with CIN2 and 42 with CIN3 or cancer, had valid p16-INK4A immunostaining. For the endpoint of CIN2+, sensitivity and specificity of p16-INK4A (deemed positive with any number of stained cells-except endocervical, metaplastic, and atrophic cells if morphologically normal) in HPV-positive women of any age were 88% (81 of 92; 95% CI 80-94) and 61% (633 of 1045; 57-64), respectively. In the 35-60-year age group, the relative sensitivity of HPV testing and p16-INK4A triage versus conventional cytology for CIN2+ was 1.53 (95% CI 1.15-2.02) and relative referral was 1.08 (0.96-1.21). In the 25-34-year age group, relative sensitivity was 3.01 (1.82-5.17) and relative referral was 1.15 (0.96-1.37). In the latter age group, when 5% or more stained cells were deemed positive, the corresponding values were 2.06 (1.20-3.68) and 0.58 (0.46-0.73), respectively.HPV testing with p16-INK4A triage produces a significant increase in sensitivity compared with conventional cytology, with no substantial increase in referral to colposcopy.Cytological distinction between high-risk and low-risk human papillomavirus infections in SurePath liquid-based cell preparations.To investigate the correlation of various diagnostic cytological features in SurePath liquid-based cell preparations with high-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) infection.Case-control study. SurePath specimens from 510 cases that had been tested for HPV DNA by Hybrid Capture 2 assay were retrieved and re-examined for 10 cytological features. Distribution of these features in high- and low-risk HPV types was compared and risk statistics were estimated. Effects of cervicitis on the manifestation of HPV cytological changes were adjusted by means of logistic regression.Cytological features of nuclear hyperchromasia, multinucleation and atypical metaplastic cells were predominantly noted in high-risk HPV infection in the category of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance/low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion. The odds ratios of these three features were 6-12 times higher in high-risk than low-risk HPV infection.Some diagnostic cytological features can be used as markers in Pap smear screening for assessing the types of HPV infection.Significance of high-risk human papillomavirus DNA-positive atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance pap smears in perimenopausal and postmenopausal women.To determine the risk of high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HSIL)/cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) 2 or 3 in perimenopausal and postmenopausal women with high-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA-positive atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) on Pap tests.A total of 752 perimenopausal and postmenopausal women (patients 45 years) with an ASCUS interpretation on ThinPrep Pap tests were identified in 2002 and 2003. High risk HPVDNA was detected in 191 (25.4%) women. The follow-up results in these 136 women were compared with those of women <45 years.Of the 136 perimenopausal and postmenopausal women, 64.7% became negative on cytology or biopsy and 30.9% revealed persistent low-grade SIL (LSIL)/CIN 1. Furthermore, 5 women (3.68%) were diagnosed with HSIL/CIN 2 or 3, and 1 patient had squamous cell carcinoma (0.74%). The rate of HSIL/CIN 2 or 3 or worse detected in perimenopausal and postmenopausal women was significant lower than 10.6% in women <45 years (p = 0.028).Our study showed that perimenopausal and postmenopausal women with high-risk HPV positivity and an ASCUS interpretation have a significantly lower risk of HSIL/CIN 2 or 3 detected. Nonetheless, the risk of a significant finding on workup, including invasive carcinoma, indicates the need for colposcopic evaluation of these women.Human papillomavirus 'reflex' testing as a screening method in cases of minor cytological abnormalities.The aim was to evaluate human papillomavirus (HPV) 'reflex genotyping' in cases of minor cytological abnormalities detected in the gynaecological screening programme in Stockholm, Sweden. Liquid-based cytology samples showing minor cytological abnormalities were analysed using HPV genotyping (Linear Array, Roche diagnostics). Colposcopically directed cervical biopsies were obtained and the HPV test results were correlated with the histological results. In all, 63% (70/112) of the samples were high-risk (HR) HPV (HR-HPV) positive. A statistically significant correlation was found between high-grade cervical lesions and HR-HPV (P=0.019), among which HPV 16, 18, and 31 were the most important. The negative predictive value of HR-HPV detection for histologically confirmed high-grade lesions was 100%. An age limit for HPV reflex testing may be motivated in cases of low-grade squamous intraepithelial neoplasia (LSIL), because of high HR-HPV prevalence among younger women. By using HPV reflex genotyping, additional extensive workup can safely be avoided in about 50% of all cases of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) and LSIL among women 30 years. This screening strategy could potentially reduce the total abnormal cytology-reporting rate in the Swedish screening programme by about 1% and provide more accurately directed follow-up, guided by cytological appearance and HPV test results.Prognostic significance of the detection of human papilloma virus L1 protein in smears of mild to moderate cervical intraepithelial lesions.To investigate whether it is possible to use detection of the human papillomavirus (HPV) L1 capsid protein to predict the course of mild or moderate cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN).Pap smears from 279 women in whom CIN 1 and CIN 2 had been diagnosed by cytology and histology, who were known to have a high-risk HPV status and had a median follow-up of 25 months, were immunohistochemically stained for the HPV L1 protein. The staining results were correlated with the clinical course of the disease.HPV L1-positive patients showed regression in 49.1% of cases, stable disease in 41.5%, and progressive disease in 9.4%, whereas HPV L1-negative women had progression in 25.9% of cases (regression 33.3%, stable disease 40.7%; p=0.001). The effect was clearest in the group under 30 years of age. HPV L1-negative patients experienced progression significantly more often than women with a positive HPV L1 test (odds ratio 3.391).HPV L1-positivity was found to have prognostic significance in relation to disease progression in women with CIN 1 and CIN 2 and particularly in those less than 30 years of age.Linear array genotyping and hybrid capture II assay in detecting human papillomavirus genotypes in women referred for colposcopy due to abnormal Papanicolaou smear.The main objective of this study was to assess the feasibility of human papillomavirus (HPV) genotyping in women referred for colposcopy due to abnormal Papanicolaou (Pap) smear. A series of 248 women referred for colposcopy due to an abnormal Pap smear were analysed with the Roche Linear Array HPV genotyping test detecting 37 most frequent HPV types, and compared with hybrid capture II (HCII) assay for oncogenic (high-risk [HR] HPV) types as well as for p16INK4a expression using immunocytochemistry. All tests were performed in cervical samples collected in PreservCyt liquid media for liquid-based cytology (ThinPrep), and colposcopic biopsy and/or loop electro excision procedure cone biopsy was used as the gold standard. HPV16 was the single most frequent genotype (29/258; 11.7%), followed by HPV51 (4.4%), HPV66 (3.6%), HPV42, 52 and 56 (3.2% for all). Linear array genotyping test significantly predicts both abnormal colposcopy (odds ratio [OR] = 9.0; 3.12-25.93), high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (OR = 9.6; 1.26-74.17) and cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) 3+ (OR = 29.3; 3.95-218.06). In detecting CIN3, linear array was equivalent (97.6%) to colposcopy in sensitivity (SE), both being superior to HCII (92.7%). Concordance between linear array and HCII was moderate (Cohen's kappa kappa = 0.547; 95% confidence interval [CI]: 0.435-659). Specificity (SP) and positive predictive value (PPV) of linear array were significantly improved, if only HPV16 genotype was considered. Performance in the best balance is obtained, when linear array and colposcopy are combined, giving 82.9% SE, 93.9% SP, 73.9% PPV and 96.3% negative predictive value (NPV) as predictor of CIN3+ (OR 74.5; 95% CI: 27.36-202.72). In conclusion, linear array for HR-HPV is a highly sensitive test (97.6%) with high NPV (98.9%) in detecting CIN3+ lesions. HPV16 genotyping alone significantly improves SP and PPV of this test in management of women with abnormal cytology.Value of combining HPV-DNA testing with follow-up Papanicolaou smear in patients with prior atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance.To address human papillomavirus (HPV) testing on negative Pap tests preceded by atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US) without reflex HPV testing.Positive HPV test results with concurrent negative Pap tests over 1 year were identified. Pathology records for all patients diagnosed with ASCUS without reflex HPV testing in the previous year were reviewed; all cytologic and surgical specimens over the subsequent 2 years were evaluated for squamous abnormalities.Fifty patients had positive HPV DNA (HPV-DNA) test result combined with a negative Pap test. Twenty-three had a previous Pap test interpretation of ASC-US (without HPV testing) within the preceding year. On follow-up, 8 of 23 developed a squamous intraepithelial lesion (SIL) within 1 year. Four additional cases developed SIL in the second year after positive HPV testing. All dysplasias in the first year of follow-up were low grade; 1 of 4 developing in the second year was high grade.Negative Pap smear following an ASC-US interpretation without a concurrent HPV test is associated with significant false negative rate. We suggest consideration of combining HPV-DNA testing to all initial follow-up negative Pap tests of patients with previous ASC-US, if reflex HPV testing has not been performed.Are adjunctive markers useful in routine cervical cancer screening? Application of p16(INK4a) and HPV-PCR on ThinPrep samples with histological follow-up.The objectives of the study were to evaluate 1) the diagnostic sensitivity and specificity of p16(INK4a) as a marker for high-grade cervical lesions, 2) the results of a real-time polymerase chain reaction detecting high-risk human papillomavirus, and 3) the interobserver variability of the p16(INK4a) interpretation.A total of 232 ThinPrep samples were stained for p16(INK4a), and HPV-DNA PCR was performed on 107 specimens with inclusion of both benign and abnormal cytology. Histological follow-up information was collected. The diagnostic sensitivity of ASC+ with CIN2+ in histology as endpoint was 96% for p16(INK4a) and 100% for HR-HPV DNA PCR, and the diagnostic specificity was 41% and 27%, respectively. If p16(INK4a) had been used for triage of the ASC samples, then 18 patients (42%) could have been spared unnecessary follow-up procedures compared to six patients (21%) with the HR-HPV DNA test.Longitudinal clinical evaluation of a novel antibody cocktail for detection of high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions on cervical cytology specimens.Although cervical cancer screening by cytology is successful, the test continues to show relatively poor operating characteristics. Cell cycle markers may enhance detection of high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions.To determine the clinical usefulness of ProExC, an immunocytochemical assay for cell cycle components, performed on routine cervical cytology samples.Cervical cytology samples were collected using the SurePath method. Residual cells remaining after preparation of the Papanicolaou-stained slide were used to make a second slide for ProExC staining using an indirect polymer-based immunoperoxidase method. Only adequately cellular slides were evaluated for the presence of nuclear staining within cytologically abnormal epithelial cells. Results were correlated with clinical follow-up.Six hundred twenty-four samples were satisfactorily cellular and stained. Correlation with clinical follow-up for subsequent cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 2+ on biopsy/high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion on cytology (CIN 2+/HSIL) showed that 434 results were true negative, 78 true positive, 18 false-negative, and 94 false-positive, resulting in a sensitivity/specificity of 81%/82%. When ProExC results were combined with any level of cytologic atypia, sensitivity for CIN 2+/HSIL was 92% and specificity was 84%.ProExC shows promise as an aid in enhancing the sensitivity and specificity of cervical cytology for subsequent CIN 2+/HSIL and may be useful in identifying those cervical lesions most apt to progress.Prediction of recurrent disease by cytology and HPV testing after treatment of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia.To assess the role of human papillomavirus (HPV) testing and cytology as predictors of residual/recurrent disease after treatment of high-grade cervical intraepithelial lesions.One hundred and thirty-eight women with cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) grade 2/3 lesion on biopsy were included in a prospective follow-up study in Belgium and Nicaragua. All women were treated with loop electrosurgical excision procedure (LEEP) and follow-up visits took place at 6 weeks, 6 months, 1 year and 2 years. During these visits, a Papanicolaou (Pap) smear test was taken, colposcopy was performed and specimens were collected for HPV testing. Cytology, high-risk (HR) HPV presence, persistent HR HPV infection and combinations of these tests at different time points during follow-up were correlated with histologically confirmed residual/recurrent disease.Thirteen patients (9%) developed residual/recurrent disease during follow-up. Abnormal cytology at 6 weeks after treatment was significantly correlated with residual/recurrent disease. Nine of thirty-seven patients with abnormal cytology at 6 weeks had recurrent disease versus three of seventy with a normal cytology [odds ratio (OR): 7.2; 95% confidence interval (CI): 1.8-28.5; P = 0.003). Sensitivity of this test was 75.0%, specificity 70.5%. Combining abnormal cytology and the presence of HR HPV within the first 6 months after treatment gave the best correlation with residual/recurrent disease: of the 54 women with abnormal cytology and/or HR HPV presence within the first 6 months, 11 developed residual/recurrent disease (OR 10.2; 95% CI: 2.2-48.3). Sensitivity of this combination was 84.6% and specificity 65.0%.Cytology remains the cornerstone in the early follow-up after LEEP for CIN lesions of the cervix. HPV testing can add value as it increases the sensitivity of cytology in concomitant testing within the first 6 months.HPV testing as an adjunct to cytology in the follow up of women treated for cervical intraepithelial neoplasia.To evaluate human papillomavirus (HPV) testing in combination with cytology in the follow up of treated women.A prospective study.Three UK centres: Manchester, Aberdeen and London.Women treated for cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN).Women were recruited at 6 months of follow up, and cytology and HPV testing was carried out at 6 and 12 months. If either or both results were positive, colposcopy and if appropriate, a biopsy and retreatment was performed. At 24 months, cytology alone was performed.Cytology and histology at 6, 12 and 24 months.Nine hundred and seventeen women were recruited at 6 months of follow up, with 778 (85%) and 707 (77.1%) being recruited at 12 and 24 months, respectively. At recruitment, 700 women had had high-grade CIN (grades 2 or 3) and 217 had CIN1. At 6 months, 14.6% were HPV positive and 10.7% had non-negative cytology. Of those with negative cytology, 9% were HPV positive. Of the 744 women who were cytology negative/HPV negative at baseline, 3 women with CIN2, 1 with CIN3, 1 with cancer and 1 with vaginal intraepithelial neoplasia (VAIN)1 were identified at 24 months. Nine of 10 cases of CIN3/cervical glandular intraepithelial neoplasia (CGIN) occurred in HPV-positive women. At 23 months, cancer was identified in a woman treated for CGIN with clear resection margins, who had been cytology negative/HPV negative at both 6 and 12 months.Women who are cytology negative and HPV negative at 6 months after treatment for CIN can safely be returned to 3-year recall.Human papillomavirus genotyping for the eight oncogenic types can improve specificity of HPV testing in women with mildly abnormal Pap results.To evaluate whether human papillomavirus (HPV) genotyping for the selected oncogenic HPV types can improve the efficacy of HPV DNA testing in predicting cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN 2/3) in women with mildly abnormal Pap results, we compared HPV DNA testing and HPV genotyping for eight oncogenic types (16, 18, 31, 33, 35, 45, 52 and 58) in Pap specimens with abnormal results (HSIL, 20 cases; LSIL, 42 cases; ASC-US, 94 cases) and follow-up biopsies. Using consensus primer-mediated PCR assays, HPV DNA was detected in 90% (18/20) of HSIL, 95% (40/42) of LSIL and 64% (60/94) of ASC-US cases. HPV DNA positivity was significantly associated with CIN 2/3/carcinoma (P<0.001) in women with ASC-US, but not in women with LSIL (P=0.52). Of HPV DNA-positive specimens, the eight oncogenic HPV types were detected in 83% of HSIL cases (15/18), 53% of LSIL cases (21/40), and 47% of ASC-US cases (28/60). The eight oncogenic HPV types were significantly associated with CIN 2/3/carcinoma (OR, 10.6; 95% CI, 3.98-28.10; P<0.001), whereas no significant association was observed between the non-eight oncogenic HPV types and CIN 2/3/carcinoma (OR, 2.20; 95%CI, 0.80-6.03; P=0.125). In women with ASC-US, HPV genotyping for the eight oncogenic types showed higher specificity (81 vs 46%) and positive predictive value (PPV, 44 vs 26%) in predicting CIN 2/3/carcinoma compared to HPV DNA testing. Similarly, in women with LSIL, higher specificity (69 vs 8%) and PPV (62 vs 39%) for predicting CIN 2/3/carcinoma were also observed using HPV genotyping test for the eight oncogenic types compared to HPV DNA testing. Our findings suggested that HPV genotyping for the eight oncogenic types might be useful to improve the efficacy of HPV DNA testing for predicting CIN 2/3/carcinoma in women with mildly abnormal Pap results, which may lead to personalized clinical management with improved patient compliance for follow-up.Use of the ThinPrep Imaging System does not alter the frequency of interpreting Papanicolaou tests as atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance.Automated screening of Papanicolaou tests (Pap tests) improves the productivity of cytopathology laboratories. The ThinPrep Imaging System (TIS) has been widely adopted primarily for this reason for use on ThinPrep Pap tests (TPPT). However, TIS may also influence the interpretation of Pap tests, leading to changes in the frequency of various interpretive categories. The effect of the TIS on rates of TPPT interpretation as atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US) is of concern because any shift in the frequency of ASC-US will alter the sensitivity and specificity of the Pap test. We have sought to determine whether automated screening of TPPT has altered ASC-US rates in our institution when compared with manual screening (MS) of TPPT.A computerized search for all ASC-US with reflex Human Papillomavirus (HPV) testing over a one-year-period (7/1/06 to 6/30/07) was conducted. Cases included both TPPT screened utilizing TIS and screened manually. HPV test results for both groups were recorded. Pertinent follow-up cervical cytology and histology results were retrieved for the period extending to 11/30/07. Automated screening was in clinical use for 10 months prior to the start of the study.Automated screening was performed on 23,103 TPPT, of which 977 (4.23%) were interpreted as ASC-US. Over the same period, MS was performed on 45,789 TPPT, of which 1924 (4.20%) were interpreted as ASC-US. Reflex HPV testing was positive for high risk (HR) types in 47.4% of the TIS cases and 50.2% of MS cases. Follow-up cervical dysplasia found by colposcopy was also distributed proportionally between the two groups. Cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) was found on follow-up biopsy of 20.1% of the TIS cases (5.2% CIN 2/3) and 21.2% of MS cases (5.1% CIN 2/3). None of these differences were statistically significant.Use of the ThinPrep Imaging System did not appreciably change ASC-US rates or follow-up reflex HPV test results in our laboratory. This demonstrates that the benefits of automated screening may be obtained without increasing the rate of referral to colposcopy for ASC-US follow-up.[Importance of human papillomavirus (HPV) screening in the follow-up after CIN2-3 treatment].Cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) 2 and CIN3 lesions clearly represent precancerous states even if some of them would heal spontaneously. Management is based on surgical excision of part of the uterine cervix because such lesions can potentially progress into carcinomas. In most cases, this treatment leads to the cure of intraepithelial lesions. However, even after such an efficient treatment, theses patients are still at a higher risk of developing an invasive cervical cancer. That is why guidelines recommend a specific follow-up in order to screen for residual disease (incomplete excision) or for recurrences (after a complete excision). The actual problem in the follow-up strategy lies in the screening tools in use - cervical smears and colposcopy - whose sensitivities are low and hence, not quite sufficient when applied to a high risk population. These intraepithelial lesions are due to high risk human papillomaviruses (HPV) and there cannot be any lesion progression without HPV. Consequently, a viral testing would help in identifying a high risk subpopulation of women after cone loop cervical excision.We studied, retrospectively, the contribution of HPV testing (Hybrid Capture 2((R))) in the follow-up after CIN2-3 treatment in 386 cone loop cervical excisions performed at a single centre during 80 months.Between three to six months follow-up after surgery, HPV remained present in 22.5% cases. The sensitivity of HPV testing in the screening for residual lesions or for recurrences was 100%, that of cervical smears cytology was 72%, whereas that of the pathological analysis of margins reached only 67%. The negative predictive value of a negative HPV detection associated with a normal cytology was 100%.Owing to its clinical relevance, HPV testing optimises postoperative follow-up and leads to the rapid and efficient selection of a subgroup, representing less than one upon three patients who are really at risk of an invasive lesion and to wholly reassure the others. Indeed, a negative HPV testing, associated with a normal cervical cytology, obtained after surgery correspond to a negative predictive value of almost 100% and this allows us to increase the time-interval between two screenings and to rapidly place the patient in a routine follow-up.[Expression of epidermal growth factor receptor and the correlation with HPV16/18 infection in cervical intraepithelial neoplasia and cervical carcinoma].The aim of this study was to elucidate the role of EGFR expression and HPV infection and their relationship in the genesis and progression of cervical carcinoma.This analysis included 60 cases of cervical carcinoma, 40 cases of CIN and 30 cases of control group. Patients of cervical carcinoma group were all subjected to radical hysterectomy with bilateral pelvic lymphadenectomy in Tumour Hospital, Zhongshan University from 1997 to 2001. The FIGO stage was I a - II b. EGFR protein was stained by S-P immunohistochemistry, and HPV16/18 DNA was detected by PCR.The moderate/ strong expression of EGFR was observed in 0, 42.5%, 76.7% of normal cervical epithelium, CIN and cervical tumor tissue, respectively, with a significant difference among them (P < 0.05). The infection of HPV16/18 was observed in 6.7%, 67.5%, 58.3% of normal cervical tissue, CIN and cervical tumors, respectively. The infection rate of CIN or cervical carcinoma was significantly higher than that in normal cervicaltissue (P = 0.000), but no statistically significant difference was observed between cervical carcinoma and CIN. The moderate/strong expression of EGFR demonstrated an association with the cervical invasion depth. The EGFR expression increased significantly as the invasion depth progressed from less than or equal to a half cervical stroma to deeper than that (89.2% vs. 56.5%, P = 0.004). The infection of HPV16/18 demonstrated a correlation with the cervical canal invasion. The infection increased significantly in the cases with cervical invasion than that in the cases without invasion (88.2% vs. 46.5%, P = 0.003). But no significant correlation was observed between EGFR and HPV. Neither EGFR nor HPV had a significant association with carcinoma prognosis.EGFR and HPV demonstrate a significant correlation with genesis and progression of cervical carcinoma. In our study, neither EGFR nor HPV demonstrates a significant association with tumor prognosis, and no significant correlation is observed between EGFR and HPV.Correlation of Pap smear, cervical biopsy, and clinical follow-up with an HPV typing microarray system.A human papillomavirus (HPV) microarray system allows the determination of HPV type in clinical samples. The purpose of this study was to determine the presence of HPV in liquid-based Pap smears with the MyGene MyHPV Chip Kit HPV genotyping microarray test (MyGene Assay), and to correlate this with the cytology and biopsy diagnoses, clinical follow-up, HPV Hybrid Capture data, and HPV sequence analyses. Four hundred and two Pap smears (93 ThinPrep, 309 SurePath) were available for study. Correlation of HPV DNA detection by the MyGene Assay with the Pap smear diagnosis showed a detection rate of 19/97 (19%) for normal Pap smears, 181/242 (74%) for atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS), and 61/63 (97%) for squamous intraepithelial lesions (SILs). Biopsy data on 248 women were available. HPV was noted by the MyGene Assay in the Pap smear in 98/100 (98%) of the cases, for which the corresponding biopsy had been diagnosed as SIL, compared with 103/148 (69%) of the cases for which the biopsy had been negative for SIL. Clinical follow-ups were available for 200 women with ASCUS Pap smears. A significant increase was observed in the rate of biopsy-proven SILs in women with ASCUS Pap smears that were HPV-positive (63/66=95%) as compared with those that were HPV-negative (96/134=71%, P<0.05). The MyGene Assay and Hybrid Capture system gave equivalent results for all the categories studied, except for the presence of multiple infections, as determined by viral sequence analysis. Specifically, the Hybrid Capture system overestimated the presence of dual infection (low-risk and high-risk positive) by 48% and missed many cases of multiple infections, especially when 2 or more high-risk types were present. It is concluded that the MyGene Assay allows for the routine typing of HPV in liquid-based Pap smears, and that the presence of HPV DNA in ASCUS Pap smears is strongly correlated with a biopsy-proven SIL.A randomized trial of basing treatment on human papillomavirus and/or cytology results in low-grade cervical lesion triage.This study was undertaken to compare management algorithms that base treatment with loop electrosurgical excision procedure on human papillomavirus and/or repeat Papanicolaou test smear results.A randomized trial that referred 674 women with either atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance or low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions cytology results, detected in organized screening to treatment either (1) if they were positive in a repeat Papanicolaou test smear and/or a human papillomavirus test or (2) if they were positive in the repeat Papanicolaou test smear test only. Women who tested positive were treated, regardless of colposcopic findings.There were 208 of 337 (62%) women who were treated in the human papillomavirus /Papanicolaou test smear group (187/337 because of HPV positivity) and 138 of 337 (41%) in the Papanicolaou test smear only group. Histopathologically diagnosed cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 2 or worse was found among 112 of 337 (33.2%) women in the human papillomavirus/Papanicolaou test smear group compared with 85 of 337 (25.2%) women in the Papanicolaou test smear only group (P < .05). Twenty-one women with cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 2+ had normal colposcopy.For adequate cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 2+ sensitivity, the decision to use loop electrosurgical excision procedure needs to be based on human papillomavirus testing results and should not exclude women with normal colposcopy.Conservative management of adolescents with abnormal cytology and histology.Adolescents remain vulnerable to human papilloma virus (HPV) infection because of certain physiologic characteristics inherent in this age group and common sexual behaviors, including lack of condom use. The commonness of HPV in this age group also results in frequent abnormal cytology. Fortunately, most of the infections are transient, with frequent clearance of HPV and the lesion. Current strategies for adolescents with abnormal cytology include conservative management, avoiding invasive procedures. For cytologic atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance or squamous intraepithelial lesions (SIL), management can be obtaining cytology only at 1-year intervals for up to 2 years before referral for colposcopy is necessary. For biopsy-proven cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) I, management is similar with yearly cytology indefinitely or until high-grade-SIL or CIN II/III develops. CIN II in adherent adolescents can be managed with 6-month cytology and colposcopy.Comparison of p16INK4A and Hybrid Capture 2 human papillomavirus testing as adjunctive tests in liquid-based gynecologic SurePath preparations.p16(INK4a), cyclin-dependent kinase inhibitor, is functionally inactivated in many tumors, including cervical cancer. We compared p16(INK4A) immunocytochemical staining and Hybrid Capture 2 (HCII) on SurePath specimens using tissue biopsies (as the gold standard). Their utility in a spectrum of atypical and preneoplastic lesions, and their ability to accurately identify underlying lesions of CIN II or greater was assessed using biopsy follow-up data. One-hundred and seventeen residual SurePath samples were collected: 43 atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS), 47 low-grade (LGSIL), and 27 high-grade (HGSIL) squamous intraepithelial lesions. Two slides were prepared from each sample; one stained with the SurePath autocyte stain and one immunostained using the CINtec p16(INK4a) Cytology Kit (Dakocytomation). High-risk HPV testing was performed using the HCII DNA test (Digene, Gaithersburg, MD). Available tissue biopsy follow-up data was retrieved. p16(INK4a) was positive in 32.6% (14/43) ASCUS, 46.8% (22/47) LGSIL, and 48.1% (13/27) HGSIL specimens. HCII DNA test was positive in 41.9% (18/43) ASCUS, 78.7% (37/47) LGSIL, and 96.3% (26/27) HGSIL samples. The sensitivity, specificity, positive (PPV) and negative (NPV) predictive values of p16(INK4a) and HCII were: 58.7% and 89.8%, 58.6% and 34.6%, 69.2% and 72.1%, 47.2% and 64.3%, respectively. In patients with cervical biopsies, the PPV of HCII (92.3%) results for a biopsy with CINII/III was significantly higher than the PPV of p16(INK4a) (52%) (P=0.001). Using liquid-based cytology specimens, HCII is a more sensitive test than p16(INK4a) for detection of abnormal cytology. HCII has a higher PPV than p16(INK4a) for identifying CIN II/III.[Progression and regression low grade intraepitelial squamous lesions in context of positivity of high risk human papillomavirus].Evaluation of regression and progression of histologically confirmed low grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (LG SIL) in women under the age of 35 in context of positivity of high risk human papillomavirus (HPV HR). Evaluation of sensitivity of PAP smear and HPV HR test in women with LG SIL.Prospective study.Department of Obstetrics and Gynecology, Charles University Prague, 2nd Medical Faculty, University Hospital Motol.166 women with SIL low or repeated ASC-US PAP smear were included to the study. 1 to 3 punch biopsy under the expert colposcopy and HPV HR test were performed in all women. Follow up were done every 6 month in all women with histologically confirmed LG SIL.LG SIL was detected in 120 women. Sensitivity of PAP smear was 72.3% and sensitivity of HPV HR test 60.2 % in women with LG SIL. 84 women (70 %) were HPV HR positive. Regression of LG SIL was detected in 20 (23 %) HPV HR positive women and in 18 (50%) HPV HR negative women. This difference is statistically significant (p = 0.0094). Progression of LG SIL was detected in 24 (29 %) HPV HR positive women and in 4 (11%) women HPV HR negative women. This difference is borderline statistically significant (p = 0.058). Progression of LG SIL to the carcinoma in situ or invasive cancer had not been detected during follow up period.PAP smear is a standard for LG SIL detection in women under the age of 35 and HPV HR test is not so important for LG SIL detection in this group of women. HPV HR test could be useful for prediction of the risk of progression, but positivity of HPV HR in LG SIL cannot indicate surgical treatment (conisation) in this cohort of women under the age of 35.Human papillomavirus (HPV) in atypical squamous cervical cytology: the Invader HPV test as a new screening assay.In surveillance for cervical neoplasia, a diagnosis of cytologically atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) presents a significant clinical issue, often dependent on testing for high-risk (HR) human papillomavirus (HPV) for the triage of patients. HPV type 16 now appears to be a critical concern in the follow-up of patients with ASCUS. The Invader HPV (Inv2) test, by Third Wave Technologies, Inc., is a recently developed analyte-specific reagent assay that uses probe sets for the detection of 14 HR HPV subtypes. These probe sets are A5/A6 (HPV types 51, 56, and 66), A7 (HPV types 18, 39, 45, 59, and 68), and A9 (HPV types 16, 31, 33, 35, 52, and 58). This report describes the performance characteristics of the Inv2 test in the screening of ASCUS cervical cytology specimens and correlates the results of the Inv2 test with those of the Hybrid Capture II HPV (HC2) test by Digene. The linear array HPV genotyping test (Roche Molecular Systems) was used as a reference method for the testing of samples with discordant results. Ninety-four Pap smear samples with a cytological diagnosis of ASCUS and 39 samples with a negative diagnosis were tested. The results of the Inv2 test demonstrated a good (86.6%) concordance with those of the HC2 test, with an overall sensitivity and specificity of 96% for the Inv2 test. Additionally, the Inv2 assay, which offers high-throughput, semiautomated DNA extraction, allows the subgrouping of HPV types by differential probe sets, could provide a useful test for screening for HPV, and has the potential to provide an improved means of risk stratification and the selection of patients for further HPV subtyping.Longitudinal cytological follow-up of patients with a papanicolaou test interpretation of "atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance" that was followed by a negative reflex test for high-risk human papillomavirus types.The 2001 consensus guidelines essentially equated the follow-up management of patients with a Papanicolaou (Pap) test interpretation of negative for intraepithelial lesion or malignancy and those with an interpretation of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US) that was followed by a negative reflex test for high-risk human papillomavirus (HR HPV) types: follow-up cytology in 12 months. As several years have elapsed since these guidelines attained some measure of widespread implementation, we sought to determine whether, in routinely diagnosed cases, the full spectrum of follow-up cytological findings are indeed identical in these 2 groups. Clinical and pathological data of consecutive patients with a Pap test interpretation of ASC-US during a 6-week period (n = 587), in which reflex human papillomavirus testing was performed (n = 497) and in which HR HPV types were not detected (n = 300), were reviewed (study group). A randomly selected control group of 300 patients whose Pap tests were reported as negative (negative for intraepithelial lesion or malignancy) during the same period were similarly reviewed. The follow-up Pap tests were classified into the various Bethesda 2001 diagnostic categories, and both groups were compared. The average follow-up duration in the study and control groups was 26.03 and 25.9 months, respectively. When all of the follow-up Pap tests in each group (study, n = 555; control, n = 356) were used for the comparisons, patients in the study group were significantly more likely to have an abnormal follow-up Pap test result than the control group patients (24.9% vs 7.6%, P < 0.0001); this was primarily attributable to the more frequent repeat interpretations of ASC-US in the former group (20.5% vs 5.1%, P < 0.0001). The HR HPV detection rates in the follow-up ASC-US cases were not significantly different between the study and control groups. There were no significant differences between both groups regarding the diagnostic frequencies of low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion and atypical squamous cells-cannot exclude high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HGSIL). No examples of HGSIL or invasive cancer were identified in the follow-up of either group. All comparisons of statistical significance retained their significance when only 1 follow-up Pap test per patient, the most severe interpretation, was used. Our findings suggest that some significant differences exist between these 2 groups, most notably the comparatively increased frequency of repeat ASC-US interpretations in the study group. However, the extraordinary rarity of the most clinically significant interpretations of HGSIL and carcinoma in this setting can be confirmed because no such cases were identified during the follow-up of either group.[Application of high-risk human papillomavirus testing in women with abnormal cytology].To detect the high-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) infectious condition in women with abnormal cytology and evaluate its values in the screening of high grade squamous intraepithelial lesion.We used hybrid capture 2 (hc2) method to examine 949 patients with abnormal cervical cytology results [ > or =atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US) according to the 2001 The Bethesda System diagnosis criteria]. All subjects also received colposcopy for tissue studies.Among 949 patients with abnormal cytology, the diagnoses of atypical squamous cells (ASC), low grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL), and high grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HSIL) were made in 432, 310, and 207 patients, respectively. The high-risk HPV positive rate in ASC, LSIL, and HSIL were 40.3%, 44.8%, and 89.4%, respectively. The numbers of patients with pathologically confirmed results of negative intraepithelial lesion or malignancy (NILM), cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 1, 2, 3 (CIN 1, 2, 3), and squamous cell carcinoma (SCC) were 335, 388, 118, 101, and 7, and the high-risk HPV positive rate was 17.3%, 66.2%, 92.4%, 97.0%, and 100%, respectively. Among patients with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US), rate of HSIL in high-risk HPV positive group and negative group were 10.2% and 0.8%, respectively (P < 0.01). In screening HSIL, the sensitivities of cytology [ > or = ASC cannot exclude HSIL (ASC-H)] and cytology ( > or = ASC-H) plus high-risk HPV testing were 0.925 and 0.991, and the specificities were 0.510 and 0.748, respectively (P < 0.01). Sensitivitives of cytology ( > or = LSIL) and cytology (> or = LSIL) plus high risk HPV in detecting HSIL were 0.898 and 0.982, respectively, while the specificitives were 0. 567 and 0.779, respectively (P < 0.01).The positive rate of high-risk HPV increases with the gravity of cervical lesions. In patients with abnormal cervical cytology, high-risk HPV testing can improve the sensitivity and specificity in the screening of HSIL.Comparison of linear array and line blot assay for detection of human papillomavirus and diagnosis of cervical precancer and cancer in the atypical squamous cell of undetermined significance and low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion triage study.We evaluated Linear Array (LA), a newly commercialized PGMY09/11 L1 consensus primer PCR test that detects 37 human papillomavirus (HPV) genotypes by reverse line blot hybridization, for the detection of individual HPV genotypes and carcinogenic HPV and its clinical performance for detecting 2-year cumulative cervical precancer and cancer using archived specimens from the Atypical Squamous Cell of Undetermined Significance (ASCUS) and Low-Grade Squamous Intraepithelial Lesion Triage Study. LA testing was conducted on enrollment specimens from women referred because of an ASCUS Pap test. To gauge the performance of the new test, the results were compared to those of its prototype predecessor assay, Line Blot Assay (LBA), restricted to paired results (n = 3,335). LA testing was done masked to LBA results and clinical outcomes. The results of LA and LBA testing were compared for detection of carcinogenic HPV and clinical outcomes of cervical precancer and cancer. Overall, 50% and 55% of the women tested positive for carcinogenic HPV by LBA and LA, respectively (P < 0.0001). The percent agreement for carcinogenic HPV detection was 88%, percent positive agreement was 80%, and kappa was 0.76 for detection of carcinogenic HPV by the two assays. There was a significant increase in detection by LA for most of the 37 HPV genotypes targeted by both assays, including for 13 of 14 carcinogenic HPV genotypes. LA detected more multiple-genotype infections for all HPV genotypes among HPV-positive women (P < 0.0001) and for carcinogenic HPV genotypes among carcinogenic-HPV-positive women (P < 0.0001). LA was more sensitive (92.3% versus 87.1%; P = 0.003) and less specific (48.2% versus 54.0%; P < 0.0001) than LBA for 2-year cumulative cervical precancer and cancer as diagnosed by the Pathology Quality Control Group. In conclusion, we found LA to be a promising assay for the detection of HPV genotypes and carcinogenic HPV, and it may be clinically useful for the detection of cervical precancer and cancer in women with equivocal cytology.[The clinical significance and management of cervico-cytologically diagnosed ASCUS/LSIL].To investigate the clinical significance and management of ASCUS/LSIL.254 patients who were examined with cervical cytology in the Cancer Institute and Hospital Chinese Academy of Medical Sciences were ASCUS/LSIL, of whom 136 cases underwent colposcopy, Data were analyzed retrospectively according to the golden criterion of pathology outcome.140 cases were ASCUS, and 114 cases were LSIL. Cervical intra-epithelial neoplasia (CIN) were diagnosed in 51.5% of patients with ASCUS, compared with 59.6% of patients with LSIL (P>0.05). High-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia were diagnosed in 22.9% of patients with ASCUS, compared with 30.7% of patients with LSIL (P >0.05). In the 136 patients examined with colposcopy, inflammation was found in 47 cases, low-grade intraepithelial lesion in 53 cases, High-grade intraepithelial lesion in 36 cases. The pathological results show inflammation in 55 cases, low-grade intraepithelial lesion in 41 cases, High-grade intraepithelial lesion in 40 cases (Kappa=0.314, U=0.064, P less than 0.05). CIN were diagnosed in 79% (67/84) of HPV-positive patients identified by pathology, compared with 43.5% (74/170) of HPV-negative patients (chi2=29.88 P less than 0.05). 83.5% of 254 patients were between 35 to 55 years old, and that was consistent with HPV-positive women age peak.Patients with ASCUS should be paid the same attention with LSIL patients and colposcopy examination should be done immediately to avoid missed diagnosis and missed follow-up examination, especially for HPV positive patients between 35 to 55 years old.Outcome of "Atypical squamous cells" in a cervical cytology screening program: implications for follow up in resource limited settings.(1) To study the incidence and outcome of "Atypical squamous cells (ASC)" diagnosis in a hospital based cytology screening programme. (2) To work out a feasible strategy for follow up of Atypical squamous cells-undetermined significance (ASC-US) and Atypical squamous cells-cannot exclude high grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (ASC-H) in resource limited settings. A total of 29,475 women were screened cytologically through Pap tests. The epithelial cell abnormalities (ECA) detected on screening were reviewed by the cytopathologists and classified according to Bethesda 2001 system. The women with ASC-US reports were followed up by two repeat cytology tests at 3 and 6 months of the initial visit. The persistent ASC-US cases or the cases which revealed squamous intraepithelial lesion (SIL) on follow up smears; as well as all ASC-H and above cases were referred for coloposcopic evaluation. ASC diagnosis comprised 3.6% of all reports. These were qualified as ASC-US (3.36%) and ASC-H (0.22%). On follow up, only 7 CIN 2 or worse (3.2%) lesions were detected on 218 biopsies in ASC-US category while in ASC-H qualifier 16 CIN 2 and above lesions (30.8%) were picked up on 52 colposcopic biopsies. The difference between ASC-US and ASC-H categories for a CIN 2 or worse outcome was highly significant (P < 0.001). ASC-H qualifier has a high likelihood for an ominous histological outcome and warrants an immediate colposcopic evaluation. On the other hand, ASC-US cases can be managed conservatively by repeat cytology tests at regular intervals without a significant risk of missing a high grade lesion. Diligent screening of cervical smears can judiciously downgrade some cases overcalled as ASC because of inflammatory atypia and thereby reduce referrals in geographic settings with high prevalence of reproductive tract infections. High risk HPV (HR HPV) testing may be a useful adjunct to further reduce referrals by selecting the women who require colposcopic evaluation.A human papillomavirus testing system in women with abnormal Pap results: a comparison study with follow-up biopsies.To evaluate the efficacy of INFORM HPV using the SurePath collection method in women whose Pap tests indicated abnormal results.Ninety-two women from the gynecology clinics at The University of Texas M.D. Anderson Cancer Center who had Pap tests and underwent follow-up biopsies were selected for the study. This included 51 women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS), 23 women with low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL), 15 women with high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HSIL) and 3 women with negative Pap results. The INFORM HPV, an in situ hybridization assay, testing for oncogenic types of HPV was performed, and the results were compared with follow-up biopsies.The positive rate of the INFORM HPV increased with higher grades of cytology diagnoses. The sensitivity of the INFORM HPV testing for predicting high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN 2/3) also increased with higher grades of cytology diagnoses. A negative predictive value (NPV) of 94.9% and a specificity of 80.4% for predicting CIN 2/3 were observed in the ASCUS group.Using SurePath Pap specimens, the INFORM HPV lacks sufficient sensitivity and NPV for predicting CIN 2/3 in women with ASCUS. Therefore, use of the test as a triage tool is limited.Outcomes of women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance and high-risk human papillomavirus DNA.To study the risk of high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HSIL) and cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) 2 or 3 in women with human papillomavirus (HPV)-positive atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) cytology over a 2-year period using the 2001 Bethesda System and ThinPrep Paps.In 2002, 846 patients with ThinPrep cervical cytology having an ASCUS interpretation and positive for high-risk HPV DNA were identified. A cohort of 514 (60.8%) patients with follow-up by repeat cytology, cervical biopsy or both was included in the study. Patient age was 12-81 years, with a median of 25 years.There were 291 women (56.6%) with negative status by cytology, HPV testing or biopsy with a median interval of 8.5 months, and an additional 174 patients (33.9%) had persistent ASCUS, positive HPV DNA or low-grade SIL/CIN 1. Finally, 49 patients (9.5%) had CIN 2 or 3, with a median interval of 8.5 months.Our study suggests that HSIL or CIN 2 or 3 will be detected in 1 in 10 women with HPV-positive index ASCUS cervical cytology at initial colposcopy or within a 2-year follow-up period.Comparative evaluation of smear cytology & hybrid capture II for the diagnosis of cervical cancer.There is no ideal screening method for cervical cancer in India with the role of human papilloma virus (HPV) detection yet to be established. This study was undertaken to compare the diagnostic accuracy of HPV testing by hybrid capture II (HC-II) with conventional cervical smear cytology for squamous intraepithelial lesions (SIL).This prospective study was conducted at New Delhi during 2003-2004 with patients selected from the gynaecology out patients of the All India Institute of Medical Sciences. Initial screening by a questionnaire and per-speculum examination were used to select high-risk patients. Patients, in whom conventional cytology, HC-II test and colposcopy-directed biopsy were done, formed the basis of this study.Of the 133 patients included in the study, incidence on biopsy of low grade SIL (L-SIL) was 6.77 per cent, high grade SIL (H-SIL) was 8.27 per cent and carcinoma was 3.00 per cent. Sensitivity and specificity of cytology for detection of H-SIL and above lesions was 93.33 and 83.49 per cent while for HC-II it was 93.33 and 90.83 per cent, respectively. HC-II had higher diagnostic accuracy of 91.13 per cent versus 84.68 per cent for cytology. Kappa for HC-II was higher (0.67) than cytology (0.52). Among patients diagnosed to have atypical squamous cells (ASC-US & ASC-H) and L-SIL, HC-II helped to select patients who had significant lesions on biopsy.The main utility of HC-II is in the triage of patients with cytology smear diagnosis of ASC-US, ASC-H or L-SIL, for referral to colposcopic examination. HC-II alone has the best diagnostic accuracy but owing to high cost it is unsuitable for general screening in developing countries. Combining HC-II with cytology will refer smaller numbers for colposcopy,improving efficient utilization of available resources.Comparison of the AMPLICOR human papillomavirus test and the hybrid capture 2 assay for detection of high-risk human papillomavirus in women with abnormal PAP smear.Infection with human papillomavirus (HPV) is a necessary step in the progression to cervical cancer. Many methods for HPV testing are currently available, mostly developed to detect pools of HPV types. Hybrid Capture 2 (HC2) is one of the most widely used. A new PCR-based assay, the Roche AMPLICOR HPV test, has been recently developed. Both assays recognize a group of 13 HR HPV types contemporaneously. This study evaluated the performance of both methods for detecting high-grade cervical lesions as a part of management for abnormal PAP smears. The study population was composed of 213 women, all referred to colposcopy and histologic diagnosis following an abnormal PAP test. Biopsy-confirmed high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia was used as a gold standard. Overall agreement was 84.9% with a kappa value of 0.6. When comparing the ability to detect moderate cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN2+) and high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN3+/cancer), AMPLICOR proved slightly more sensitive than HC2, a finding that is important when HPV testing is used in a triage of borderline smear results. Genotyping of discordant results showed a prevalence of LR-HPV types in HC2 positive/AMPLICOR negative samples, and a similar prevalence of HR- and LR-HPV types in AMPLICOR positive/HC2 negative samples. In conclusion, the study shows that the AMPLICOR assay is more sensitive than HC2, which makes it a valid alternative for routine clinical use.HPV triage testing or repeat Pap smear for the management of atypical squamous cells (ASCUS) on Pap smear: is there evidence of process utility?A two-stage standard gamble was used to evaluate women's preferences for alternative managements of atypical squamous cells of undermined significance (ASCUS) on Pap smear (repeat Pap smear compared with immediate HPV test), and to test for the evidence of process utility. Women's utilities for the health state scenarios were clustered towards the upper end of the 0-1 scale with considerable variability in women's preferences. There was evidence of process utility, with immediate human papillomavirus (HPV) testing strategies having lower valuations than repeat Pap smear, where the clinical outcome was the same. Mean (95% CI) utilities for HPV testing (negative test) followed by resolution were 0.9967 (0.9957-0.9978) compared with repeat Pap smear followed by resolution: 0.9972 (0.9964-0.9980). Mean (95% CI) utilities for immediate HPV testing (positive test), followed by colposcopy, biopsy and treatment were 0.9354 (0.8544-1.0) compared with repeat Pap smear followed by colposcopy, biopsy and treatment: 0.9656 (0.9081-1.0). Our results add to the existing evidence that the impact of healthcare interventions on well-being is not limited to the effect of the intervention on the health outcomes expected from the intervention; process of care can have quality of life implications for the individual. A modelled application of trial-based data will allow characterisation of the true population costs, benefits, risks and harms of alternative triage strategies and subsequent policy implications thereof.ASC-US diagnosis and triage.Resolution of equivocal results with the Hybrid Capture II high-risk HPV DNA test: a cytologic/histologic review of 191 cases.The Hybrid Capture II (HC II, Digene) high-risk human papilloma virus (HPV) (hrHPV) DNA test is an in vitro nucleic acid hybridization assay that uses enhanced chemiluminescence for the qualitative and semiquantitative detection of hrHPV in cervical samples. Patient samples are concomitantly tested with positive and negative DNA controls and results reported as positive or negative on the basis of a ratio of relative light units to a cutoff value derived from the positive control (RLU/CO). Samples with a ratio <1.0 RLU/CO are expressed as negative for hrHPV, samples with a ratio >2.5 RLU/CO are expressed as positive for hrHPV, and samples with a ratio between these numbers are submitted for retesting. These "equivocal" values are resulted as positive for hrHPV if either of 2 subsequent test values equals or exceeds 1.0 RLU/CO. Samples that show <1.0 RLU/CO after 2 repeat tests are resulted as negative for hrHPV.In this study, we evaluated all hrHPV test results over a 17-month period in our institution. Initial tests showing an equivocal result were analyzed for final retesting result, and for all corresponding and subsequent cytology and histology results. All hrHPV tests were conducted on SurePath (TriPath) or ThinPrep (Cytyc) cervical cytology specimens using the HC II hrHPV DNA test. Subsequent hrHPV tests also were correlated with incident and follow-up findings.A total of 4792 hrHPV test results were evaluated. Of these, 191 (4%) showed equivocal initial results. When retested, 178 of the 191 samples (93%) resulted positive for hrHPV on first retest and an additional 8 resulted positive for hrHPV on the second retest, bringing the total positive tests to 186 out of 191 (97.4%). Five samples (2.6%) out of 191 were finally expressed as negative for hrHPV. Corresponding cytologic interpretations for the 191 specimens were as follows: NILM-30, atypical squamous cell of undetermined significance (ASC-US)-138, atypical squamous cells--cannot exclude HSIL-13 (ASC-H-13), LSIL-9, and high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HSIL)-1. Follow-up histology was available for 60 of the 191 equivocal cases and showed cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) II or CIN III in 7 cases, CIN I in 13 cases, and negative or reactive changes in 40 cases.On the basis of the results, repeat testing of equivocal specimens might not be necessary as these specimens are overwhelmingly found to be positive for hrHPV. Additionally, hrHPV tests falling in the equivocal range should be considered as definite positive tests, as follow-up results in this cohort demonstrate that significant histologic abnormalities are associated with 10.5% of these cases (20/191), and with 33% of those biopsied (20/60) cases.Management and triage of women with human papillomavirus infection in follow-up for low-grade cervical disease: association of HPV-DNA and RNA-based methods.Type-specific persistent infection with Human Papillomavirus (HPV) is a significant risk factor for the development of cervical diseases. Persistent infection could be further refined by a sequencing approach to detect early cervical lesions that are at high risk of developing an invasive squamous cervical cancer. The aim of the present study is to investigate the clinical utility of detecting mRNA transcripts of HPV oncogenes E6/E7 by using a Real-time NASBA technology (mRNA test) and to identify women with low-grade cytological disease but with an increased risk of developing high-grade cervical abnormalities or invasive squamous cervical cancer. Our preliminary results show that E6/E7 is detected in only a subset of HR-HPV-positive cases. Since viral persistence is considered to be the true precursor of neoplastic progression, only the detection of E6/E7 mRNA can identify the infection which is more likely to persist and induce neoplasia in future. For these reasons we believe that this test would be useful for the characterization of women with HR-HPV DNA positivity who should be effectively treated because at high-risk of developing a high grade cervical lesion or an invasive squamous cervical cancer.Visual appearance of the uterine cervix: correlation with human papillomavirus detection and type.Infection with carcinogenic human papillomaviruses (HPVs) is necessary for cervical precancer and cancer, but the effects of type-specific HPV infection on cervical appearance are poorly understood.Twenty expert colposcopists evaluated a total of 939 digitized cervigrams that were obtained during the ASCUS (atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance)-LSIL (low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion) Triage study after the application of 5% acetic acid. Each reviewer rated the number and severity of lesions in 112 pictures that were matched on histologic diagnoses and HPV typing results so that > or = 2 reviewers rated each image. We used standard tests of association and correlation to relate HPV type and visual appearance.Pairs of reviewers were significantly (P < .05) more likely to agree that a definite lesion was present when HPV DNA was found, particularly HPV16, regardless of histologic diagnosis. However, the link between infection status and visual appearance was weak for each individual reviewer. Interestingly, many women with multiple HPV infections had no visible lesions and vice versa.HPV16 causes more definite visual abnormalities than other HPV types, regardless of eventual histologic diagnosis. Otherwise, the associations between HPV infection and lesion recognition are weak.Risk of precancer and follow-up management strategies for women with human papillomavirus-negative atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance.To investigate the relative performances of follow-up cytology and carcinogenic human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA testing among carcinogenic HPV-negative women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS), for detection of cervical precancer.Twelve-month follow-up management strategies to detect cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 3 (CIN3) or worse using cytology or HPV testing or both were compared among women with HPV-negative ASCUS in the Atypical Squamous Cells of Undetermined Significance-Low-Grade Squamous Intraepithelial Lesion (ASCUS-LSIL) Triage Study.Overall only 22 of 1,559 (1.4%) HPV-negative ASCUS women developed CIN grade 3 or worse during follow-up compared with 269 of 1,767 (15.2%) HPV-positive ASCUS women (P<.001). Because of the low risk of disease among HPV-negative ASCUS women, only 7 cases of CIN3 were diagnosed between 12 and 24 months of follow-up, limiting power to distinguish meaningful differences in sensitivity among 12-month testing strategies. The specificity of HPV testing (84%) was significantly higher than cytology using an ASCUS threshold (71%) (P<.001). Cotesting with cytology and HPV testing at 12 months resulted in even lower specificity (61%). Because cases were uncommon, the positive predictive value for subsequent CIN3 or worse was low for cytology (2.6%), Hybrid Capture 2 (3.8%), and cotesting with cytology and HPV testing (2.2%). The negative predictive value for all three management strategies was very high (99.70%, 99.82%, and 100.0% for HPV testing, cytology, or cotesting, respectively.)Women with HPV-negative ASCUS have very low absolute risk of subsequently detected CIN3 or worse in the subsequent 2 years, similar to women with a negative cytology in the absence of HPV testing. The results suggest that women with HPV-negative ASCUS should return to routine screening intervals which may be longer than 1 year depending on age and screening history. However, if increased surveillance is chosen, a single HPV test for carcinogenic types at 12 months has significantly higher specificity and lower referrals than cytology.Comparison of the Digene Hybrid Capture 2 assay and Roche AMPLICOR and LINEAR ARRAY human papillomavirus (HPV) tests in detecting high-risk HPV genotypes in specimens from women with previous abnormal Pap smear results.The development of cervical cancer is strongly associated with the presence of persistent high-risk (HR) human papillomavirus (HPV) infection. Recently, the commercially manufactured PCR-based Roche AMPLICOR (AMP) and LINEAR ARRAY (LA) HPV tests have become available for HPV detection. However, knowledge of their clinical performance compared to the U.S. Food and Drug Administration-approved Hybrid Capture 2 (HC2) assay is limited. This study evaluated the concordance between the HC2, AMP, and LA tests in detecting HR-HPV among a cohort of 1,679 women with previous abnormal Pap smear results. Overall, 1,393 specimens (81.3%) generated concordant results for HR-HPV presence or absence by the three assays. The concordance levels were substantial between the HC2 and AMP tests (84.4%, kappa = 0.6419) and between the HC2 and LA tests (84.0%, kappa = 0.6341) and nearly perfect between the AMP and LA tests (97.8%, kappa = 0.9441). HR-HPV prevalence, as detected by the AMP or LA tests, was significantly higher among women with cytological or histological high-grade disease (CIN2 or greater) than that detected by HC2 (P < 0.0001). The AMP and LA tests exhibited greater sensitivity, but lower specificity, than HC2 for detecting HR-HPV among this cohort of women with underlying cervical abnormalities, particularly among subjects with histologically proven high-grade disease. Both PCR-based HPV tests may be valuable in the management of care for women with underlying cervical abnormalities, in predicting treatment success, and in studying the clearance or acquisition of new infections.HPV DNA testing as an adjunct in the management of patients with low grade cytological lesions in Finland.Patients with recurrent low grade cytological abnormalities are at increased risk for high grade lesions. We wanted to see whether these patients could be identified by HPV DNA and pap tests.A prospective study of 663 patients referred for a colposcopy on the basis of ASC-US or LSIL cytology. High-risk HPV DNA positivity and cytology were compared with histology.In total 65.6% samples were positive for HC2, and the overall proportion of CIN2+ lesions was 14.6%. No CIN2+lesions were found in patients testing HC2-, pap-. There were 5/97 (5.2%) high grade lesions, which were HC2-negative but pap-positive, including 1 cervical adenocarcinoma in situ. The corresponding histological sections were all positive for p16INK in immunostaining. In further analysis by PCR, 3 samples were positive for HPV DNA. High-risk HPV type 67, which is not included in the HC2 probe cocktail, was found in 1 case, and 2 cases were HPV positive but could not be typed. One CIN3 and one AIS remained HPV negative. In these 5 cases, the concomitant pap smear showed ASC-USx1, LSILx1, HSILx2 and AGCx1. During 6-month follow-up, a relatively high number of CIN2+(28/557, 5.0%) emerged from the non-CIN-CIN1 group.The HC2 test or pap test alone were not sensitive enough to detect all CIN2+lesions. A relatively high number of CIN2+cases emerged from the non-CIN-CIN1 group after 6 months. Adequate follow-up of patients with mild cytological abnormalities, including a repeat pap smear taken during colposcopy and control at 6 months is underscored. Combination of hrHPV DNA and pap test should be considered, since it had high negative predictive value.High-risk human papillomavirus DNA testing and high-grade cervical intraepithelial lesions.To explore the role of high-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA testing in the improvement of the recognition of cervical cancer and precancerous lesions in women with abnormal cervical cytology.A total of 2152 women with abnormal cervical cytology were submitted to both HPV DNA testing and biopsy guided by colposcopy and the results were correlated.Positive rate of high-risk HPV DNA in groups of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US), atypical squamous cells, cannot exclude high-grade (ASC-H), low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions and high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions was 53.7, 53.2, 84.6 and 93.0%, respectively. In each group, the detection rate of grade 2,3 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN 2,3) or cervical cancer in patients with positive HPV DNA was significantly higher than that with negative HPV DNA (P<0.05). In ASC-US group, the negative predictive value of high-risk HPV DNA testing for detection of CIN 2,3 and cervical cancer was 99.8% and the sensitivity 98%.HPV DNA testing is a useful indicator in the management of patients with ASC-US and plays an important role in the evaluation of risk for CIN 2,3 and cervical cancer.An economic analysis of human papillomavirus triage for the management of women with atypical and abnormal Pap smear results in Germany.We developed decision-analytic models to determine the cost effectiveness of incorporating human papillomavirus (HPV) testing into the management of atypical and abnormal Pap smear results in Germany. The models compare three management strategies: (1) repeat Pap smear, (2) triage with HPV DNA testing, or (3) immediate treatment. The primary outcome measure is incremental cost per case of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) 2+ detected and treated. The models take the perspective of the German health system. For patients with initial PapIIw, III, and IIId results, incremental cost effectiveness ratios for HPV triage versus repeat Pap smears are 2,232 euro, 815 euro, and 487 euro per additional case of CIN2+ detected and treated. In addition, the number of cases of CIN2+ detected and treated in a hypothetical population of 1,000 women increases from 17 to 35, 61 to 130, and 157 to 332 for each population, respectively. For patients with initial PapIII and IIId results, immediate treatment of 1,000 patients detects only four and 11 additional cases of CIN2+ versus HPV triage at incremental cost effectiveness ratios of 39,684 euro and 10,716 euro per case, respectively. For each of the populations evaluated, HPV triage is the most cost-effective management strategy versus either repeat Pap smear or immediate treatment.[Contribution of HPV sequences detection in cervical carcinoma screening].At the present time, Human Papillomaviruses (HPV) is a leading cause of squamous intraepithelial lesions (SIL) and invasive carcinoma of the cervix. The aim of this article was to review the main taxonomic and epidemiologic data on HPV infection and to assess the potential clinical implications of the different HPV tests in staging women with borderline cytologies (ASC-US; ASC-H; LSIL); for follow-up after treatment of high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN), for primary screening as the sole screening modality, or in association with cytology.HPV triage for low grade (L-SIL) cytology is appropriate for women over 35 in mass cervical cancer screening using liquid based cytology.In the experimental arm of a randomised trial, women were tested both for liquid-based cytology and human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA and referred for colposcopy if cytology was ASCUS (atypical cells of undetermined significance) or more severe. We considered those with ASCUS (757) or LSIL (low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions) (485) and a valid HPV test who received colposcopy. We computed sensitivity, specificity and ROC curves with different values of relative light units (RLU, that are related to viral load) as cut off, using cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 2 or more severe (CIN2+) at blind histology review as the endpoint. The area under the receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve was significantly less among women aged 25-34 years than in those older, both considering ASCUS/AGUS (atypical glandular cells of undetermined significance) (p=0.0355) and LSIL (p=0.0009). At age 35-60 the curves for ASCUS and LSIL were similar, while at age 25-34 the area under the curve for LSIL was significantly less than for ASCUS (p=0.0084). With LSIL cytology, specificity of Hybrid Capture 2 with 2 RLU cut-off was 35.0% (95%CI 28.4-42.1) at age 25-34 and 64.5% (95%CI 58.3-70.3) at age 35-60. In conclusion, triaging by HPV testing performed better in women aged over 35 years than those younger. For older women, HPV triaging should also be considered for managing those with LSIL cytology.Prospective evaluation of the Hybrid Capture 2 and AMPLICOR human papillomavirus (HPV) tests for detection of 13 high-risk HPV genotypes in atypical squamous cells of uncertain significance.The use of high-risk human papillomavirus (hrHPV) testing as an adjunct to cervical cytology in population-based screening programs is currently based on DNA hybridization and PCR assays. The aim of this study was to prospectively assess the diagnostic performance of the Hybrid Capture 2 test (HC2; Digene Corporation) in comparison with that of the recently developed PCR-based AMPLICOR HPV test (Roche Molecular Systems) for the detection of 13 hrHPV types. A reverse line blot hybridization assay (Innogenetics) was used as an internal reference standard in discordant cases. Two hundred seventy-one patients with atypical squamous cells of uncertain significance (ASCUS) in cervical samples underwent hrHPV testing. The chi-square test was performed to compare respective proportions. Totals of 160/271 (59%) and 156/271 (58%) were found to be positive for hrHPV with HC2 and AMPLICOR, respectively. Concordant results were obtained for 235 (86.7%) of the 271 samples (kappa statistic, 0.73 +/- 0.04). Considering types 26, 53, and 66 as oncogenic types, negative predictive values (NPVs) of HC2 and AMPLICOR were 92.8% and 87.8%, respectively (difference was not significant), and their respective accuracies were 94.8% and 91.9% (difference was not significant). Considering types 26, 53, and 66 as not oncogenic, the respective HC2 and AMPLICOR NPVs were 92.8% and 97.4% (difference was not significant), and accuracy was significantly higher for the AMPLICOR assay (95.9% versus 90.8% for HC2) (P<0.05). For ASCUS samples, the NPV was 92.8% for HC2 testing and might be compromised if the copy number of HPV DNA was low. The NPV was 97.4% for the AMPLICOR assay and might be compromised if HPV types 26, 53, and 66 were considered oncogenic. The accuracy of these two assays is good and is compatible with routine clinical use in the triage of ASCUS cases.A comparison of the clinical utility of p16(INK4a) immunolocalization with the presence of human papillomavirus by hybrid capture 2 for the detection of cervical dysplasia/neoplasia.Evidence suggests that overexpression of p16(INK4a) protein indicates infection and genomic integration of high-risk human papillomavirus (HR HPV) and predicts progression to cervical high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (HSILs) and carcinoma. The authors compared the ability of p16(INK4a) and HR HPV detection by Hybrid Capture 2 (HC2) to detect the presence of significant cervical disease. METHODS.: Four hundred ThinPrep specimens (100 each in 4 categories: 100 specimens that were negative for intraepithelial lesions, 100 specimens of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance [ASC-US], 100 specimens of low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions [LSILs], and 100 specimens of HSILs) were analyzed. p16(INK4a) protein was immunolocalized using a specific monoclonal antibody, and the detection of HR HPV in all 400 specimens was determined using HC2.p16(INK4a) was found to be positive in 78% of HSIL specimens, 42% of LSIL specimens, and 36% of ASC-US specimens; whereas HC2 was positive in 92% of HSIL specimens, 81% of LSIL specimens, and 45% of ASC-US specimens. In the HSIL category, the sensitivity, which was calculated using Grade 2 or greater cervical intraepithelial neoplasia as the endpoint, was 78% (50 of 66 specimens) for p16(INK4a) and 91% (60 of 66 specimens) for HC2. For LSIL, the sensitivity was 75% (3 of 4 specimens) for p16(INK4a) and 100% (4 of 4 specimens) for HC2. In the ASC-US category, the sensitivity was 89% (8 of 9 specimens) for p16(INK4a) and 100% (9 of 9 specimens) for HC2. Overall, the sensitivity for HSIL was 92% for HC2 and 78% for p16(INK4a). The specificity for HC2 was 8.3% for HSIL, 16.9% for LSIL, and 48.7% for ASC-US; whereas the specificity for p16(INK4a) was 25% in HSIL, 59.1% in LSIL, and 68.4% in ASC-US. The overall specificity was 25% for HC2 and 56% for p16(INK4a).Although both p16(INK4a) and HC2 may aid in the clinical management of patients with clinically significant lesions, HC2 was found to have greater sensitivity, and p16(INK4a) greater specificity. The labeling of normal cells and bacteria may preclude the use of p16(INK4a) in automated screening or nonmorphologic assays.Clinical utility of atypical glandular cells (AGC) classification: cytohistologic comparison and relationship to HPV results.To determine the utility of the category of atypical glandular cells (AGC) in the management of patients with putative cervical neoplasia and to correlate HPV-DNA test results when available.The Johns Hopkins Hospital cytopathology records of 50,668 women patients were searched for all liquid-based gynecologic cytology (LBP) results of Atypical Glandular cells of Undetermined Significance (AGUS) and AGC from January 1, 2001 through December 31, 2003, yielding 98 patients (0.19%). Oncogenic HPV-DNA tests were performed on the residual fluids of 43 of these patients, 37 of whom had follow-up biopsy. During the period of January 1, 2000 and December 31, 2002, we identified 237 patients (0.58%) with conventional Pap smears in the AGUS or AGC category, among 41,024 conventional smears collected contemporaneously. To avoid confusion in this paper, AGC will be used to replace those results that originally were AGUS.Following the 98 LBP AGC interpretations, 24 lesions (33.8%) were discovered out of 71 biopsies. HPV-DNA tests were performed on the residual of 43 LBPs, 18 (41.9%) were positive for oncogenic HPV. Only 37 patients had follow-up biopsy and 15 (40.5%) were positive for oncogenic HPV, of which 40% (6/15) had a significant lesion. Of the 237 conventional AGC Paps, 18 lesions (15.3%) were discovered out of 118 biopsies.Comparison of liquid-based and conventional Pap tests revealed a significant difference (33.8% vs. 15.3% respectively) (OR: 2.84, 95% CI: 1.4-5.73, p=0.004) in the detection of glandular and squamous lesions. HPV testing may prove beneficial to triage AGC patients with negative colposcopic findings and positive HPV results.Human papillomavirus genotypes and the cumulative 2-year risk of cervical precancer.Prospective data on the risks of cervical precancer associated with specific human papillomavirus (HPV) genotypes are limited.In 5060 women participating in the Atypical Squamous Cells of Undetermined Significance/Low-Grade Squamous Intraepithelial Lesions Triage Study (ALTS), we determined the cumulative 2-year risks of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) grade 2 or more severe (> or =CIN2) and of grade 3 or more severe (> or =CIN3) for 38 individual HPV genotypes, as detected by polymerase chain reaction.The most common HPV genotypes detected at baseline, in descending order of prevalence, were 16, 52, 51, 31, 18, 53, 39, 56, 62, 59, and 58. When detected as a single-type HPV infection, HPV-16 had a 2-year cumulative risk of 50.6% (95% confidence interval [CI], 44.1%-57.2%) for > or =CIN2 and 39.1% (95% CI, 32.9%-45.7%) for > or =CIN3. For other singly detected carcinogenic HPV types, the risk of > or =CIN2 ranged from 4.7% (for HPV-59) to 29.5% (for HPV-31), and the risk of > or =CIN3 ranged from 0.0% (for HPV-59) to 14.8% (for HPV-31). Multiple infections with HPV genotypes of different risk classes resulted in a risk that was similar to, and not significantly different from, the risk observed for the HPV genotype of the highest risk class.Genotype-specific HPV testing may be useful for identifying women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance and low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions who are at higher and lower risk of prevalent and incipient cervical precancer.Introducing HPV triage into the English cervical cancer screening program: consequences for participation.To predict the likely impact of adding human papillomavirus (HPV) triage for minor abnormalities on participation in the English cervical cancer screening program.Contingent valuations of the existing Pap program and a possible HPV-augmented screening program, obtained from questionnaires completed by 1141 women in east-central England.The value of participating in Pap screening was negatively associated with age, positively associated with educational level, and positively associated with the level of household income. Higher levels of worry about cervical cancer were associated with higher valuations of screening. Adding HPV-based triage to the Pap program lowered the value of screening participation for only two women, whereas for the sample as a whole, it increased the average valuation by about 47 percent. Supposedly-negative characteristics of HPV testing, when described, were expected to trigger psychosocial concerns in respondents and thereby give rise to significant decreases in valuations of participating in a Pap-plus-HPV program. For most women, however, such information changed their valuations of participation in screening little, if at all.Accepting the proposition that higher contingent valuations indicate stronger behavioural preferences, our results offer insubstantial grounds for believing that the inclusion of HPV triage would detrimentally affect participation in Pap screening for cervical cancer.Clinical implications of the diagnosis "atypical squamous cells, cannot exclude high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion" in pregnant women.Atypical squamous cells, cannot exclude high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (ASC-H) has a high predictive value for high-grade intraepithelial lesion (HSIL) in the general population. However, the significance of ASC-H in pregnant women remains to be elucidated. The objective of this study was to investigate the clinical implications and pathologic significance of ASC-H in pregnant women, so that these patients will be managed appropriately.All Papanicolaou tests that were diagnosed as ASC-H in pregnant women over 1.5 years (total, 60 women) were reviewed and correlated with histologic and/or cytologic follow-up. High-risk type of human papillomavirus (HPV) status was also correlated with follow-up findings. The following cytomorphologic parameters were evaluated for each woman and were compared between the squamous intraepithelial lesion (SIL) follow-up group and the benign follow-up group: inflammatory background, the number of atypical cells, cell arrangement pattern, nuclear irregularity/grooves, hyperchromasia, and cell shape.Among 30 women who had histologic follow-up, 3 women (10%) had HSIL, and 13 women (43%) had low-grade intraepithelial lesion (LSIL). Among 32 women who had cytologic follow-up, 2 women (6%) had HSIL, 3 women (9%) had LSIL, 1 woman (3%) had ASC-H, and 3 women (9%) had atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS). HPV was detected in 24 of 43 women (56%). The cytomorphologic features were similar in the SIL follow-up group and the benign follow-up group. No specific cytomorphologic features that predicted underlying SIL were identified.ASC-H in pregnant women had a lower predictive value for an underlying HSIL compared with the general population. A positive HPV test result was not a good indicator for an underlying SIL, but a negative result appeared to be useful for ruling out an underlying HSIL. Because of low positive predictive value for HSIL and the difficult colposcopic examination, a more conservative follow-up may be reasonable for pregnant women who have a diagnosis of ASC-H. HPV testing may be used as an adjunctive test.Reflex high-risk human papilloma virus DNA test is useful in the triage of women with atypical squamous cells cannot exclude high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion.This study is aimed to investigate the role of reflex high-risk human papilloma virus (HPV) DNA testing as an alternative triage method to colposcopy for women with atypical squamous cells cannot exclude high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (ASC-H) on Papanicolaou (Pap) tests. Reflex HPV DNA testing using Hybrid Capture II method was carried out on 88 women with ASC-H diagnosed by Thin Prep Pap test. Correlation with follow-up biopsies was available on 42 of these patients. The reflex HPV DNA test showed an overall positive rate of 67% and negative rate of 33% in 88 patients with ASC-H. Using age 30 as the cut off point, the positive rate had increased to 83.3% (35/42) in patients 30 yr or younger, while the positive rate for patients older than 30 yr had decreased to 52.2% (24/46). Follow-up colposcopic biopsy results were available in 35 of 59 HPV-positive women, which revealed 15 (43%) high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (HSIL), 12 low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (LSIL), and 8 negative for dysplasia. In 7 HPV-negative patients, the follow-up biopsies showed no evidence of HSIL or LSIL. Correlation between clinical risk factors and the HPV results demonstrated no significant differences in HPV positivity between the high-risk and low-risk patients. The high sensitivity (100%) and negative predictive rate (100%) in detecting HSIL in our study provide strong evidence that, instead of automatic referral to colposcopy, reflex HPV DNA testing may be used as an alternative triage method for women diagnosed with ASC-H on Thin Prep Pap test, especially for women older than 30 yr of age.Predicting absolute risk of CIN3 during post-colposcopic follow-up: results from the ASCUS-LSIL Triage Study (ALTS).At present, clinical management of women referred to colposcopy but found to have <CIN2 remains unclear. Using data from the ASCUS-LSIL Triage Study (ALTS) to inform clinical management, we calculated the absolute risk for developing CIN3 within 2 years of referral to an enrollment colposcopy.Women included in the analyses: (1) were initially referred to ALTS with a community cytologic interpretation of atypical squamous cell of undetermined significance (ASCUS) or low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (LSIL); (2) had a colposcopic evaluation and biopsy, if indicated, resulting in a diagnosis <CIN2; and, therefore (3) were followed without treatment. Results from subsequent human papillomavirus (HPV) testing, liquid-based cytology interpretations, and a second colposcopic evaluation at least 6 months after and within 2 years of the first colposcopic evaluation were used to calculate absolute risks for CIN3.Women with HPV-negative test results were at low risk for CIN3 regardless of other test results. Among HPV-positive women, increasing absolute risks of CIN3 were observed with increasing cytology severity: 7% (normal), 11% (ASCUS and LSIL), and 45% (HSIL). The highest absolute risk for CIN3 (67%) was observed for HPV-positive women with HSIL and a colposcopic impression of high-grade/cancer on the second colposcopy.In the ALTS population, after the first colposcopic diagnosis of <CIN2, clear risk stratification for CIN3 outcomes was obtained among women with a subsequent HPV-positive test. Because absolute risk for histologic CIN3 outcomes was high for women with HPV positive tests, HSIL cytology, and a high-grade impression at second colposcopy, it is worth considering whether this combination of findings might warrant immediate excisional therapy in some circumstances.Clinical significance of cytologic diagnosis of atypical squamous cells, cannot exclude high grade, in perimenopausal and postmenopausal women.We used cytohistologic correlation to determine the clinical significance of atypical squamous cells, cannot exclude high grade (ASC-H) in perimenopausal and postmenopausal women. A computer search identified 250 Papanicolaou smears from women older than 45 years with a diagnosis of ASC- H. Cases were considered perimenopausal (45 to < 55 years; 150 cases) and postmenopausal ((3)55 years; 100 cases). No follow-up data were available for 33 cases, which were excluded. The remaining 217 cases (perimenopausal, 127; postmenopausal, 90) had surgical or cytologic follow-up. Results of follow-up colposcopic biopsy were available for 176 (81.1%) and cytology for 41 (18.9%) women. Follow-up results were as follows: perimenopausal women, negative, 50 (39.4%); mild dysplasia (low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion [LSIL]), 46 (36.2%); high-grade dysplasia (high-grade SIL [HSIL]); 28 (22.0%); and ASC of undetermined significance (ASC-US), 3 (2.4%); postmenopausal women, negative, 52 (58%); LSIL, 31 (34%); HSIL, 5 (6%); and ASC-US, 2 (2%). The diagnosis of ASC-H in postmenopausal women usually is associated with LSIL or a negative diagnosis on follow-up, suggesting a less aggressive surveillance and treatment regimen is needed for postmenopausal women with ASC-H.Impact of reflex HPV testing on interpretation and management of ThinPrep Pap tests.HPV testing for high-risk types is the preferred method to triage women with atypical squamous cells (ASC) on ThinPrep Pap tests for management. The impact of this practice on the cytopathologists' interpretation is unknown. A significant percentage of providers at the Beth Israel Deaconess Medical Center (BIDMC) are not requesting reflex HPV testing. This offers a unique opportunity to examine its impact. Consecutive ThinPreps submitted to the cytology laboratory at the BIDMC for a 3-mo period were identified retrospectively. The ThinPreps were divided into those with a request for reflex HPV testing (reflex testing request group), those without such a request, and those with a request for HPV testing regardless of the diagnosis. Cytologic diagnoses, results of HPV testing and subsequent cervical biopsies within 6 mo after the ThinPrep were recorded and correlated in these cases. A total of 4,590 ThinPreps were processed during this period. 2,659 had a request for reflex HPV testing, 1,849 did not have such a request, and 82 had a request for HPV testing regardless of diagnosis. The numbers (%) of abnormal results in these three groups were 155 (5.8%), 141 (7.6%), and 22 (27%), respectively. The ASC:SIL ratios for these three groups were 1.2, 0.86, and 0.62, respectively. 38/71 (54%) women with ASC in the reflex testing request group were positive for high-risk HPV types. Of those with ASC in the reflex testing request and no request groups, 15/73 (21%) and 12/56 (21%) underwent biopsies with 2 (of 15) and 2 (of 12) showing HSIL on histology, respectively. Our study demonstrates that at our institution a request for reflex HPV testing did not significantly affect cytopathologists' interpretation of ThinPreps. Furthermore, HPV testing did not seem to have influenced the subsequent management of women with ASC diagnosis.Human papillomavirus type-specific 18-month risk of high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia in women with a normal or borderline/mildly dyskaryotic smear.High-risk human papillomavirus (hrHPV) DNA testing is an increasingly used instrument in cervical cancer prevention along cervical cytology. The inclusion of hrHPV testing in cervical screening requires efficient management as many hrHPV infections are transient. We investigated the potential value of hrHPV genotyping in normal and borderline/mildly dyskaryotic (BMD) smears.From a screening population of 44,102 women in the Netherlands, we included hrHPV-positive women with a normal or BMD smear. We assessed the type-specific 18-month risk of high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN).In hrHPV-positive women, 18-month risk of CIN grade 3 or invasive cancer (> or =CIN3) was 6% [95% confidence interval (95% CI), 4-9] after normal cytology and 20% (95% CI, 16-25) after BMD. If positive for HPV16, > or =CIN3 risks were 14% (95% CI, 9-21) and 37% (95% CI, 28-48), respectively. In the subset of hrHPV-positive women without HPV16, HPV18 was associated with an increased risk of high-grade CIN after normal cytology and HPV31 and HPV33 were associated with an increased risk, particularly after BMD. HPV16 and HPV18 were also associated with an increased risk of high-grade CIN in women with an hrHPV-positive normal baseline smear and a repeat normal smear at 6 months.HrHPV-positive women without type 16, 18, 31, or 33 had a relatively low risk of high-grade CIN. Among women with baseline normal cytology and among women with a baseline and repeat normal smear, HPV16/18-positive women showed an increased risk of high-grade CIN. This warrants more aggressive management of HPV16/18-positive women compared with other hrHPV-positive women.Atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance, human papillomavirus, and cervical intraepithelial neoplasia 2 or 3 in adolescents: ASC-US, age, and high-grade cervical neoplasia.To determine rates of and factors associated with cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) 2 or 3 among women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US) and oncogenic human papillomavirus (HPV) infection.This is a retrospective review of 357 women with ASC-US and known high-risk HPV infection. To be eligible for inclusion, patients had to have subsequently undergone colposcopic-directed cervical biopsy and/or endocervical sampling. Univariate and multivariable regression analyses were used to estimate crude and adjusted odds ratios of CIN 2 or 3 by risk factors associated with HPV and CIN.Thirty-three of 215 (15%) women with ASC-US and oncogenic HPV who underwent histological sampling demonstrated CIN 2 or 3. In the adjusted model, only nulliparity (adjusted odds ratio = 2.2, 95% CI = 1.0-4.8) retained a marginal association with the outcome. No significant age-related differences in the prevalence of high-grade disease emerged. The high-grade lesions seen in adolescents consisted of single, small lesions.In the light of these findings, and in conjunction with the high rate of oncogenic HPV infection among adolescents with ASC-US, both reflex HPV testing and immediate colposcopy do not appear to be of benefit in the initial management of teenagers with this cytological diagnosis.Trial of management of borderline and other low-grade abnormal smears (TOMBOLA): Trial design.Cervical screening reduces the risk of cervical cancer by detecting and treating cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN). The management of women with low-grade cervical abnormalities is controversial. Two management policies exist: repeat smears in primary care and colposcopy examination. It is not clear which of these is the more effective and efficient. There is also uncertainty as to the most effective and efficient management of women at colposcopy when an area of abnormality is seen on the cervix - immediate treatment or biopsy and selective recall for treatment if the biopsy result suggests this is necessary. The result of a human papillomavirus (HPV) test might assist in deciding the appropriate management of women with low-grade abnormalities. TOMBOLA, a pragmatic randomised-controlled trial set within the cervical screening programmes in Scotland and England, addresses these three areas of uncertainty. Almost four and a half thousand women aged 20-59 with a low-grade cervical abnormality have been recruited and randomised to either repeat smears or colposcopy examination. Women in the colposcopy arm of the trial are further randomised to a policy of either immediate treatment or biopsy and selective recall for treatment if they have an abnormal transformation zone. Women are followed up to an exit examination at 3 years. HPV testing is undertaken at recruitment and at the exit examination. The primary endpoint is cumulative incidence of CIN2/3. A range of other clinical, psychosocial and economic outcomes is being considered. This paper describes the design of the trial, and discusses the rationale underlying aspects of the design and the challenges faced in designing and implementing the trial.Analyses of atypical squamous cells refined by the 2001 Bethesda System: the distribution and clinical significance of follow-up management.This study was conducted to analyze the clinical significance of follow-up diagnostic methods of atypical squamous cells (ASC) (the 2001 Bethesda System) cases according to age. A computerized search of the cytology database was performed to retrieve all cases diagnosed as ASC from 2001 to 2003. The pathologic reports for all follow-up diagnoses were reviewed. We divided the patients into two groups according to their age, younger than 50 years of age and 50 years and older, and follow-up diagnoses were compared between the two groups. ASC was identified in 1035 (2.0%) of 49,882 women screened, and a total of 914 patients were eligible. In atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US) cases, colposcopically directed biopsy showed CIN I (CIN is cervical intraepithelial neoplasia) or higher grade lesions in 34.9% of cases younger than 50 years of age and in 17.4% of cases 50 years and older (P= 0.000). However, repeat Pap smears and human papillomavirus DNA testing showed no differences between the two groups. In contrast, the three methods did not exhibit significant difference between the two groups in patients with atypical squamous cells, cannot exclude high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (ASC-H) (P= 0.743). Colposcopically directed biopsy for the ASC-US was more useful in patients younger than 50 years of age than in those who were 50 years and older. It is suggested that age should be considered in deciding follow-up diagnostic methods in patients with ASC-US.Performance of Pap smear and human papilloma virus testing in the follow-up of women with cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 1 managed conservatively.Conservative management (follow-up) of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 1 (CIN1) is acceptable, but evidence on performance of follow-up tools, such as Pap smear and human papilloma virus (HPV) test, is still needed.A cohort of 78 women with histologically confirmed CIN1, referred because of atypical squamous cell or low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion in their Pap smear, was enrolled between August 2000 and September 2002 and was prospectively followed-up at 6 and 12 months, until September 2003. Follow-up examinations included Pap test and Hybrid Capture II (HCII) with high-risk HPV, colposcopy, and cervical biopsies in patients with persistent abnormalities. Odds ratios and performance indicators (with 95% confidence interval) were calculated for HPV and Pap test results in detecting biopsy-confirmed CIN during the follow-up.Thirty-seven (47%) of the women were HPV-positive at baseline. At first follow-up visit, 30 women had persistent CIN1 and one woman progressed to CIN2; 15 patients had CIN1 and one patient CIN2 at the second follow-up visit. Women with persistent CIN1 (or progression) during follow-up had a significantly higher HPV detection rate and abnormal Pap tests, compared to women with regressive disease. Cytology had a far better sensitivity in detecting CIN than HCII at the first follow-up visit (81 versus 52%, respectively), whereas both examinations had equivalent sensitivities at the second follow-up visit (69 and 56%, respectively). Cytology had a superior negative predictive value at the first follow-up visit and better positive predictive value, in addition, at the second visit.Because cytological abnormalities correlated generally better with the persistence of biopsy-confirmed CIN1 in this follow-up protocol, HCII test is the second-hand option to Pap test, but the use of both Pap and HCII together seems an unnecessary waste of resources.Human papillomavirus triage for young women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance.Human papillomavirus testing is a cost-effective strategy for the management of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance. Young women have a high prevalence of transient human papillomavirus infections and low incidence high-grade cervical lesions, which may limit the usefulness of human papillomavirus testing in this cohort. We sought to estimate the usefulness of human papillomavirus testing for young women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance.A retrospective study of women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance was undertaken. Reflex human papillomavirus results and pathologic follow-up were evaluated. Age-stratified rates of human papillomavirus positivity, rates of high-grade dysplasia, and sensitivity and specificity were estimated.A total of 1,290 women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance cytology were identified. The rate of human papillomavirus positivity decreased with age from 55% for those aged 25 years or younger to 12% for women aged older than 50 years (P < .001). The cumulative rate of high-grade lesions increased with age; 12% for patients aged 25 years or younger compared with 24% for women aged older than 50 years (P = .05). A negative human papillomavirus test more effectively excluded high-grade disease in the young women. No high-grade lesions were detected in the human papillomavirus negative women aged 25 years or younger compared with 3.8% of those aged older than 50 years (P = .04). The sensitivity for detection of high-grade disease was higher in women aged younger than 25 years compared with those aged older than 50 years (100% compared with 50%), whereas specificity was lower (14% compared with 44%).Given the high prevalence of human papillomavirus and low occurrence of high-grade lesions in young women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance, a human papillomavirus-based triage strategy will result in the referral of a large number of women for colposcopy and may limit its cost-effectiveness.III.[Assessment of human papillomavirus testing on liquid-based Cyto-screen system for women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance. Effect of age].Analyse the performance of human papillomavirus testing with hybrid capture II on liquid-based CYTO-screen system for women diagnosed with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance according to the age.Were included all women diagnosed with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance for whom human papillomavirus testing was performed and cytological and histological procedures were available over a follow-up period of 6 to 18 months.Human papillomavirus testing was performed in 3,047 patients, and results were compared to cytological and histological follow-up diagnosis in 1,880 cases (61.7%). The sensitivity for diagnosing cervical intraepithelial neoplasia was 93.3% in women less than 30 of age and 89.7% in women more than 30 of age. Specificity was 44.9% in women less than 30 of age and 64.4% in women more than 30 of age. Likelihood ratios confirmed these results as they show a low discriminatory power in case of positive result specifically in women less than 30 of age but an excellent performance in case of negative result.The use of human papillomavirus testing after a diagnosis of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance with the residual material of Cyto-screen system is a possible triage procedure to identify patients needing a colposcopy. Its specificity is better for women over 30.Usefulness of combining testing for p16 protein and human papillomavirus (HPV) in cervical carcinoma screening.To evaluate the value of the combination of p16 and HPV detection in the screening for cervical cancer.186 patients with previous abnormal cervical lesion were studied. After colposcopic examination, two conventional Pap slides were prepared: the first was Papanicolaou-stained and examined by cytologist; the second was immunocytochemically stained for p16. Cervical cells were collected by brush using for HPV detection by Hybrid Capture II. Biopsy of any colposcopically abnormal lesions was performed.The 186 cervical samples were classified cytologically as normal (148), ASCUS (13), low-grade (11), high-grade (12) dysplasia and squamous cell carcinoma (2). P16 and HPV were found in all high-grade dysplasia and SCC, and in 64% and 27% of low-grade dysplasia, 62% and 0% of ASCUS and 7.4% and 3.4% of normal, respectively. 18 of p16-positive cases (11%) were HPV-negative, 14 of them in the ASCUS and normal group. Compared to histological results, all of the p16-positive cases of squamous metaplasia, CIN II/III and SCC were HR-HPV-positive. Therefore, the cases that were positive for both with normal cytology (5 cases) or low-grade dysplasia (3 cases) may comprise a high-risk group for neoplastic change.The combination of p16 and HPV detection may be useful in cervical cancer screening to identify high-risk patients requiring early and proper management.Effect of HIV infection on atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance.Detection of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) is a cervical cytologic finding that is suggestive but not definitive of squamous intraepithelial lesions (SILs).We examined the risk, characteristics, and progression of ASCUS in women with and without human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) infection. Cervical Papanicolou (Pap) test and colposcopy data were obtained at the first 10 semiannual visits for the HIV Epidemiology Research study of 774 HIV-infected and 480 demographically similar, HIV-uninfected women in the United States. Multiple logistic regression models and Cox proportional hazards models were utilized.ASCUS was more common among HIV-infected women (odds ratio [OR], 1.6 [95% confidence interval {CI}, 1.3-2.0] to 2.6 [95% CI, 1.9-3.6]) after adjustment for human papillomavirus (HPV) infection and other risk factors (e.g., race, condyloma, and prior Pap test result). Among women with normal Pap test results at enrollment, the cumulative incidence of ASCUS was 78% among HIV-infected women and 38% among HIV-uninfected women. HIV-infected and HIV-uninfected women with ASCUS did not differ by prevalence of indices of inflammation (inflammation on Pap test and leukocytes on cervical gram stain). HPV infection, including high risk types, was more common among HIV-infected women with ASCUS. Among women with ASCUS, 60% of HIV-infected and 25% of HIV-uninfected women developed SILs (P < .01). Compared with HIV-infected women with higher CD4+ lymphocyte counts, HIV-infected women with CD4+ lymphocyte counts < 200 cells/microL were more likely to present subsequently with a SIL detected by Pap test (OR, 1.7; 95% CI, 0.8-3.6).Higher risk of SIL following the appearance of ASCUS among HIV-infected women, especially women with low CD4+ lymphocyte counts, supports the need for follow up with colposcopy and histologic examination, as indicated, to allow early detection and treatment of SIL.High-risk human papillomavirus DNA testing: a marker for atypical glandular cells.Cervical/endocervical cytology screening has decreased morbidity and mortality, and implementing adjunctive human papilloma virus (HPV) DNA testing for atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance has improved the specificity for detecting premalignant squamous lesions. Currently, there are no guidelines to perform HPV DNA testing on cervical/endocervical ThinPreps with atypical glandular cells (AGC). To assess the potential role of HPV DNA testing on AGC cases, Hybrid Capture 2 (Digene Corp.) testing was performed on 144 cervical/endocervical AGC specimens. One hundred three of 144 cases had follow-up; 60/103 (58.3%) were high-risk HPV negative and 43/103 (42.3%) were high-risk HPV positive. Of 43 HPV-positive patients, 37 had adenocarcinoma in situ (AIS), atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS), or cervical squamous intraepithelial neoplasia, while only one patient without high-risk HPV had a squamous intraepithelial neoplasia. Furthermore, most high-risk HPV positive AGC cases harbored high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HSIL) rather than AIS. Our data support HPV DNA testing of all AGC specimens to detect cervical, especially squamous, neoplasia.Role of human papillomavirus DNA testing in management of women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance.To find the sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of the high-risk group human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA testing as a triage tool to detect high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (HSILs, ie, cervical intraepithelial neoplasia [CIN] 2 or worse) in women with a cytologic smear showing atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US). All new cases with cytologic smears showing ASC-US that presented in King Chulalongkorn Memorial Hospital from January 2003 to November 2003, excluding known cases of HSILs and pregnancies, were enrolled. Cervical cell samplings were done by cervical cytobrush technique and tested for high-risk group HPV with the Hybrid Capture 2 (HC2) test. All participants were examined under a colposcope. Then cervicographs were taken before colposcopic-directed cervical biopsies were done. Of the 90 ASC-US cases enrolled, the pathologic results were normal in 30.0%, squamous metaplasia in 16.7%, CIN 1 in 37.8%, CIN 2 in 1.1%, CIN 3 in 11.1%, and microinvasive cervical carcinoma in 3.3%. The prevalence of HSILs and the prevalence of high-risk HPV detection were 15.6% and 38.9%, respectively. Using pathologic results from cervical biopsy as the gold standard, the HC2 has the sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of 85.7%, 69.7%, 34.3%, and 96.4%, respectively, to detect HSILs. High-risk group HPV detection can be used as an additional triage test to detect HSILs in women having ASC-US with high sensitivity and negative predictive value.Distribution of human papillomavirus types in ThinPrep Papanicolaou tests classified according to the Bethesda 2001 terminology and correlations with patient age and biopsy outcomes.A survey of the distribution of human papillomavirus (HPV) types across the spectrum of cervical cytologic categories defined by the Bethesda 2001 guidelines was conducted with the objective of examining how HPV detection by polymerase chain reaction (PCR) analysis may benefit the management of patients who have abnormal Papanicolaou (Pap) test results.DNA samples from women with no intraepithelial lesion or malignancy (NLM) (n = 300 samples); atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US) (n = 200 samples); low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL) (n = 200 samples); atypical squamous cells, cannot rule out high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (ASC-H) (n = 200 samples); and high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HSIL) (n = 200 samples) were tested for HPV using a modified general primer (GP)5+/GP6+ PCR assay and dot-blot hybridization with type-specific oligonucleotide probes (PCR assay analytical sensitivity: 1-100 copies of HPV, depending on the HPV type, in a background of 100 ng human DNA).HPV was detected in 27% of NLM samples, in 89.5% of ASC-US samples, in 97.5% of LSIL samples, in 93% of ASC-H samples, and in 96.5% of HSIL samples. Thirty-seven different HPV types were identified in total. One or more of 13 high-risk (HR) HPV types (16, 18, 31, 33, 35, 39, 45, 51, 52, 56, 58, 59, and 68) were detected in 53% of samples that were diagnosed as ASC-US (59.0% of patients younger than age 30 yrs; 45.5% of patients age 30 yrs and older), in 55.5% of samples that were diagnosed as LSIL (60.0% of patients younger than age 30 yrs; 44.0% of patients age 30 yrs and older), in 80% of samples that were diagnosed as ASC-H, and in 87.5% of samples that were diagnosed as HSIL (P < 0.001). HPV-16 was detected in 17.5% of ASC-US samples, in 15.5% of LSIL samples, in 48.5% of ASC-H samples, and in 49.0% of HSIL samples (P < 0.001). Among abnormal smears, HR HPV was significantly more common in women younger than age 30 years compared with women age 30 years and older (P < 0.002). Follow-up biopsy data were obtained for 359 patients. A "benign" biopsy result was recorded for 47 of 64 women (73.5%) with ASC-US, 30 of 66 women (45.5%) with LSIL, 39 of 87 women (45.0%) with ASC-H, and 26 of 142 women (18.0%) with HSIL and was most common in women age 30 years and older (P < 0.0001). Cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) Grade I (CIN-I) was found in 14.0% of women with ASC-US, in 39.5% of women with LSIL, in 8.0% of women with ASC-H, and in 7.0% of women with HSIL. CIN-II was diagnosed in 9.5% of women with ASC-US, in 13.5% of women with LSIL, in 19.5% of women with ASC-H, and in 24.0% of women with HSIL. CIN-III was identified in 2 women (3.0%) with ASC-US, in 1 woman (1.5%) with LSIL, in 24 women (27.5%) with ASC-H, and in 71 women (50.0%) with HSIL.HR HPV testing by PCR of samples diagnosed according to the Bethesda 2001 guidelines may benefit the management of patients with ASC-US or patients with LSIL, especially among women age 30 years and older, by allowing exclusion from referral for biopsy of women who are negative for HR HPV types. However, the small numbers of women who had CIN-III detected after a diagnosis of ASC-US or LSIL limited the assessment of test sensitivity.Cost-effectiveness analysis based on the atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance/low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion Triage Study (ALTS).The ALTS (atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance [ASCUS] and low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion [LSIL] Triage Study) suggests that, for women diagnosed with ASCUS, human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA testing followed by referral to colposcopy of only those women with oncogenic HPV (i.e., HPV DNA testing) is as effective at detecting cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) 3 or cancer (CIN3+) as referring all women with ASCUS for immediate colposcopy. We conducted a cost-effectiveness analysis of the ALTS trial to determine whether HPV DNA testing is a cost-effective alternative to immediate colposcopy or conservative management with up to three cytology examinations.Data from the ALTS trial were used in conjunction with medical care costs in a short-term decision model. The model compared the incremental costs per case of CIN3+ detected as measured by the incremental cost-effectiveness ratio (ICER) for the following management strategies for women with ASCUS: immediate colposcopy, HPV DNA testing, and conservative management with up to three cytology examinations.The least costly and least sensitive strategy was conservative management with one repeat cytology examination using a threshold of high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HSIL) for referral to colposcopy. Compared with this strategy, triage to colposcopy based on a positive HPV DNA test result had an ICER of 3517 dollars per case of CIN3+ detected. Immediate colposcopy and conservative management with up to three repeat cytology visits detected fewer cases of CIN3+ and were more costly than HPV DNA testing. Immediate colposcopy became cost-effective at 20,370 dollars compared with HPV DNA testing only if colposcopy and biopsy were assumed to be 100% sensitive.HPV DNA testing is an economically viable strategy for triage of ASCUS cytology. The less than perfect sensitivity of colposcopy and biopsy needs to be accounted for in future clinical guidelines and policy analyses.Human papillomavirus triage of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance: cost-effective, but at what cost?Role of P16(INK4a) expression in identifying CIN2 or more severe lesions among HPV-positive patients referred for colposcopy after abnormal cytology.p16 is strongly overexpressed in dysplastic cervical cells because of the transforming activity of the E7 oncogene of all high-risk human papillomavirus (HR-HPV) types and may be easily revealed by immunochemistry: p16 may, therefore, be considered a surrogate marker for the activated oncogene expression of HR-HPV in dysplastic cervical cells.HPV and p16(INK4a) testing were performed in a consecutive series of 283 patients with abnormal cytology referred to colposcopy assessment or follow-up. Triage of patients to colposcopy by HPV or HPV and p16 testing was simulated, and the relative sensitivity, specificity, and positive predictive value (PPV) of HPV and p16 testing for > CIN2 lesions was determined as well as the cost balance of the two triage types.Compared to current protocol, triage by HPV testing reduced the number of colposcopies by 44.2%, but also reduced the > CIN2 detection rate by 10.7%, and was associated with a cost of euro 54.16 per assessed woman and of euro 613.20 per > CIN2 detected. Compared with current protocol, triage by HPV and p16 testing combined reduced the number of colposcopies by 73.1%, but reduced > CIN2 detection rate by 21.5%, and was associated with a cost of euro 54.73 per woman assessed and of euro 704.09 per > CIN2 detected.Triage by HPV and p16 improves considerably the PPV of diagnostic assessment, but decreases > CIN2 detection rate, and is associated with substantially higher costs. Further decrease of molecular immunochemistry testing due to technological progress may allow HPV and p16 testing to become a cost effective procedure in the future.When to test women for human papillomavirus.Lifetime effects, costs, and cost effectiveness of testing for human papillomavirus to manage low grade cytological abnormalities: results of the NHS pilot studies.To predict the incremental lifetime effects, costs, and cost effectiveness of using human papillomavirus testing to triage women with borderline or mildly dyskaryotic cervical smear results for immediate colposcopy.Modelling study.Three centres participating in NHS pilot studies, United Kingdom. Population Women aged 25-64 with borderline or mildly dyskaryotic cervical smear results.Screening using conventional cytology, liquid based cytology, and four strategies with different age cut-off points and follow up times that used combined liquid based cytology and human papillomavirus testing (adjunctive human papillomavirus testing).The model predicts that compared with using conventional cytology without testing for human papillomavirus, testing for the virus in conjunction with liquid based cytology for women with borderline or mildly dyskaryotic cervical smear results (aged 35 or more) would cost 3735 pounds sterling (5528 euros; 6474 dollars) per life year saved. Extending adjunctive human papillomavirus testing in combination with liquid based cytology to include women aged between 25 and 34 costs an additional 4233 pounds sterling per life year saved. Human papillomavirus testing is likely to reduce lifetime repeat smears by 52%-86% but increase lifetime colposcopies by 64%-138%.Testing for human papillomavirus to manage all women with borderline or mildly dyskaryotic cervical smear results is likely to be cost effective. The predicted increase in lifetime colposcopies, however, deserves careful consideration.Refining the management of low-grade cervical abnormalities in the UK National Health Service and defining the potential for human papillomavirus testing: a commentary on emerging evidence.Evaluation of cervical screening strategies with adjunct high-risk human papillomavirus testing for women with borderline or mild dyskaryosis.The management of women with a smear read as borderline/mild dyskaryosis (BMD) found by cervical cancer screening is still under discussion as only few of these cases are associated with high-grade lesions. To determine the optimal screening strategy for these women, a simulation model of cervical cancer development was used that is based on high-risk human papillomavirus (hrHPV) infection. The current strategy of repeat cytological testing at 6 and 18 months after BMD was compared to strategies with adjunct hrHPV testing. Calculations were done for both conventional and liquid-based cytology as the primary screening tool. In comparison to current screening, adjunct hrHPV testing was more effective in preventing cancer and more woman-friendly (reduction in colposcopy referrals with outcome < cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN2) of up to 56% and in repeat smears of 30-100%). In combination with conventional cytology, cost-effective strategies were the ones in which a sample for high-risk human papillomavirus (hrHPV) testing is collected at a return visit within 1 month or in which hrHPV testing is restricted to repeat smears taken at 6 and 18 months. For these strategies, co-collection of samples for hrHPV testing at baseline is not necessary which has organizational and cost advantages. In combination with liquid-based cytology, it was cost-effective to perform a reflex hrHPV test at baseline from the liquid-based specimen. Liquid-based screening was more effective than conventional screening, but annual diagnosis costs were euro5 million higher (population size 16 million). In conclusion, our calculations indicate that implementation of hrHPV testing for the management of women with borderline or mild dyskaryosis (BMD) is feasible both in settings where conventional and liquid-based cytology is current practice.A comparison of the human papillomavirus test and Papanicolaou smear as a second screening method for women with minor cytological abnormalities.Of the estimated one million Papanicolaou (pap) smears performed annually in Sweden, about 4% show any degree of abnormality. Approximately, 1% of these cases contain moderate or severe atypia (high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions) and the rest contain low-grade atypia. Recommendations for the management of minor abnormalities vary in various parts of Sweden. Generally, a second Pap smear is obtained 4-6 months after the first one showing low-grade atypia. The aim of this study is to compare the sensitivity of human papilloma virus (HPV)-DNA testing for the detection of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) 2-3 with that of a second Pap smear in women, who had low-grade atypia in their first Pap smear.Women with low-grade atypia in the Stockholm area, detected at a population-based cytology screening, were enrolled. A repeat Pap smear, HPV test, and colposcopically directed biopsies were obtained. For the detection of HPV, Hybrid Capture II (HC II) was used.The HPV-DNA test was positive in 66% of the 177 participating women. The sensitivity of the second Pap smear and HPV-DNA test to detect CIN 2-3 was 61 (95% CI = 45-74) and 82% (95% CI = 67-91), respectively. The positive and negative predictive values of HPV testing were 27 (95% CI = 18-35) and 89% (95% CI = 80-97), respectively.In Sweden, a second Pap smear is often obtained for the follow-up of women with low-grade atypia. The results of our study show that compared to the second Pap smear, HPV testing with HC II is a more sensitive method for detecting high-grade lesions.Which test is a better strategy to determine the outcome of atypical glandular cell-categorized Pap smears? Immunocytochemical p16INK4A expression or human papillomavirus test--a retrospective cohort study.This study was to correlate high-risk human papillomavirus (HR-HPV) viral load to p16(INK4A) (p16) expression in atypical glandular cell (AGC)-categorized Pap smears with follow-up biopsies for elucidating their relationships.We enrolled 36 AGC-categorized Pap smears with subsequent follow-up biopsies. HR-HPV viral load was determined by Hybrid Capture II assay in each AGC-diagnosed Pap smear. Both smears and biopsies were immunostained with a primary anti-p16 antibody, clone E6H4. Correlations between HR-HPV viral load in each AGC-diagnosed Pap smear and p16 expression of smears with follow-up biopsies were performed.Comparative analysis of two tests disclosed both consistencies and discrepancies. There were significant differences (P=0.02) between negative or weak p16 expression of Pap smears with the presence of reactive lesion or LSILs/CIN1s in follow-up biopsies and negative HR-HPV viral load. However, no significant difference (P=0.317) was found between p16 expression of Pap smears with the presence of HSIL/CIN2, 3 and AIS or adenocarcinoma in follow-up biopsies and high HR-HPV viral load. In addition, there were significant differences (P=0.012) in specificity, but no significant differences were found in sensitivity (P=0.604), positive and negative predictive value (P=0.066 and 0.264) between p16 immunoexpression and HR-HPV viral load.Pathogenic activity of HR-HPV was indicated by p16 expression on smears and tissue sections, which appears to be a better strategy than HR-HPV viral load test for the detection of clinically insignificant lesions from AGC-categorized Pap smears.Should women with atypical squamous cells, cannot exclude high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion, receive reflex human papillomavirus-DNA testing?The 2001 American Society for Colposcopy and Cervical Pathology Consensus Guidelines recommend that women who have Papanicolaou (Pap) smears diagnosed as atypical squamous cells (ASC), cannot exclude high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HSIL) (ASC-H) should be referred for immediate colposcopic examination. The objective of this pilot study was to evaluate whether reflex human papillomavirus (HPV)-DNA testing performed on smears diagnosed as ASC-H may obviate the need for immediate colposcopic examination.All ThinPrep Pap smears that were diagnosed as ASC-H or atypical squamous metaplastic cells (ASMT) between 2001-2003 and that had HPV-DNA testing and subsequent histologic and/or cytologic follow-up were evaluated. Those smears that were diagnosed as ASMT were reviewed and reclassified under the 2001 Bethesda System as either ASC of undetermined significance (ASCUS) or ASC-H. Smears that were diagnosed as ASCUS were excluded from the study.The study included of 48 smears that were diagnosed as ASC-H. All patients with biopsy-proven HSIL had positive high-risk (HR)-HPV results (100% negative predictive value). Approximately 80% of patients with ASC-H who had biopsy-proven, low-grade intraepithelial lesion on follow-up had positive HR-HPV results. Among the patients who had ASC-H with negative follow-up, 50% had positive HR-HPV results, and 50% had negative HR-HPV results.Among patients with ASC-H, a negative HR-HPV result was found to be an excellent predictor of the absence of HSIL. The results of this pilot study suggested that HPV-DNA testing may serve as a means to better select which patients with ASC-H on Pap smear should undergo colposcopic examination. This approach potentially may reduce medical costs and eliminate the need for routine colposcopic examination among patients with ASC-H Pap smears.The utility of HPV DNA triage in the management of cytological AGC.Given the demonstrated utility of human papilloma virus DNA triage in the management of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance, this study sought to evaluate the potential role of human papilloma virus DNA testing in the evaluation and management of cytological atypical glandular cells.Following institutional review board approval, 28 women presenting with cytological atypical glandular cells underwent repeat thin-prep cytology, Hybrid Capture 2 human papilloma virus DNA testing, colposcopic evaluation, Fisher electrosurgical conization, and endometrial sampling. Human papilloma virus test results in each patient were then correlated with histologic lesions, if present.Sixteen of the 28 study patients had pathologic lesions (11/28 high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion, 3/28 low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion, 1/28 adenocarcinoma in situ, 1/28 simple endometrial hyperplasia). Human papilloma virus DNA testing was available in 24 of 28 subjects (86%). The sensitivity of human papilloma virus positivity to predict the presence of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia was 100% (confidence interval 77% to 100%), specificity 64% (confidence interval 35% to 85%), positive predictive value 76%, and negative predictive value 100%. Women who tested human papilloma virus positive were 12 times more likely to have cervical intraepithelial neoplasia than women who were human papilloma virus negative (Fisher P<.001). Human papilloma virus positivity was not predictive of endometrial pathology; women who were human papilloma virus positive were less likely to have endometrial pathology than were women who were human papilloma virus negative (risk ratio 1.6, 95% confidence interval 0.01-1.7).Atypical glandular cells can represent a variety of lesions. The majority of the lesions will be squamous intraepithelial lesions of the cervix (50%), with high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion present in 40% of subjects. Human papilloma virus DNA testing is a sensitive test for the presence of squamous intraepithelial lesion, with excellent negative predictive value for the absence of squamous intraepithelial lesion. The results of this study suggest human papilloma virus DNA testing might be an effective screening test in the initial evaluation and management of cytological atypical glandular cells.Atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance-favour reactive compared to atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance-favour dysplasia: association with cervical intraepithelial lesions and human papillomavirus infection.The current study compared the cervical cytological sub-category "atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance-favour reactive (AFR)", recently recommended to be eliminated by the Bethesda system, to the sub-category "atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance-favour dysplasia (ASC-US)", in terms of prevalence of coexistent squamous intraepithelial lesions of either low-grade (LSIL) or high-grade (HSIL) and rate of human papillomavirus (HPV) infection.One hundred women with AFR and 100 with ASC-US were consecutively included in the study. All patients underwent colposcopy, followed by biopsy when necessary, and were screened for HPV infection by the combined use of Hybrid Capture II (DIGENE) and PCR with MY09/11 primers, the latter followed by direct sequencing of the amplifications products for HPV genotyping.LSIL were detected in 5.6% of AFR and 18.5% of ASC-US (p=0.00812), HSIL only in 4.3% of ASC-US. HPV infection was diagnosed in 11.2% of AFR and 38.0% of ASC-US (p=0.00003); high-risk HPV types (namely, HPV-16, -18, -31, -66, -67 and -70) were found in 6.7% of AFR and 22.8% of ASC-US (p=0.00239). Evidence of HPV infection in absence of SIL was proven in 7.1% of AFR and in 22.5% of ASC-US (p=0.00622).The association of AFR with SIL and high-risk HPV infection is low but not inexistent. Thus, to avoid the risk of leaving some high-risk AFR patients untreated or without follow-up, it could be proposed to keep AFR as a cytological category and to triage it by HPV testing, similarly to what has been already recommended for ASC-US.Performance of the Roche AMPLICOR human papillomavirus (HPV) test in prediction of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) in women with abnormal PAP smear.To assess the performance of a novel PCR-based assay (Roche AMPLICOR HPV test) in detection of cervical pathology as a part of management for abnormal PAP smear (MAPS) and in women participating in cervical cancer screening.Altogether, 504 women comprising 270 patients referred for colposcopy due to an abnormal Pap smear and another 234 women participating in cervical cancer screening (tested for comparison) were analyzed for oncogenic (HR) Human papillomavirus (HPV) types 16, 18, 31, 33, 35, 39, 45, 51, 52, 56, 58, 59, and 68 using the Roche AMPLICOR HPV test in cervical samples collected in PreservCyt liquid media. Colposcopic biopsy and/or LEEP cone biopsy was used as the gold standard in the triage group, while liquid-based cytology (LBC) was the reference test in the screening group.The prevalence of HPV was significantly higher in the MAPS group (65.9%) than in the screening group (31.2%) (P = 0.0001). There was a poor concordance between the referral PAP and the current LBC, being only moderate in the screening series, ICC (weighted kappa) = 0.291 (95%CI 0.070-0.459) (P = 0.007), and almost poor in the MAPS Series, with ICC = 0.217 (95%CI 0.04-0.384) (P = 0.023). AMPLICOR HPV positivity increased linearly with the increasing grade of cervical lesions. In detecting high-grade (CIN2-3), colposcopy was the most sensitive test (96.5%), very similar to AMPLICOR (95.2%) (P = 0.731), while LBC with HSIL cutoff was by far the most specific test (99.5%) and showed the highest PPV (96.1%). NPV of colposcopy (97.2%) and AMPLICOR (96.7%) were similar (P = 0.839). Together with abnormal colposcopy and HSIL cytology, the AMPLICOR HPV test is a powerful independent predictor of high-grade CIN2-3, and as such suitable to replace cervical cytology in management of women with abnormal PAP test (MAPS).The Roche AMPLICOR HPV test is comparable to other HPV tests (HCII, PCR) in detecting CIN in MAPS. However, more data are clearly needed on the performance of AMPLICOR test in management of abnormal PAP and particularly as a screening tool.HPV DNA testing in the triage of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS): cost comparison of two methods.Human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA testing for triage of cervical cytologies showing atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) has become the standard of practice. Currently, Hybrid Capture II (HCII) is the preferred method for ASCUS triage. In situ hybridization for HPV represents an alternative to HCII and appears to have a superior specificity but is more expensive. We compare the reimbursement rates of ASCUS triage (HPV high risk) using the methods of HCII and INFORM (in situ hybridization for HPV) in a series of 431 ASCUS patients. The patients were followed for 1 yr, during which each patient had either colposcopic biopsy or follow-up cervical cytology after ASCUS HPV DNA triage. Eighty-nine patients were excluded from the analysis because of incomplete follow-up. The HPV triage percentages, colposcopic biopsy positivity rates and cervical cytology positivity percentages were calculated for each method. The reimbursement rates of the tests/procedures used in the analysis were those in effect at the University of Utah in 2003. The total triage and follow-up reimbursement costs were calculated for HCII and INFORM and compared.HCII referred 19.9% of patients to colposcopy, with a biopsy positivity rate of 25.6% for dysplasia. INFORM referred 11.8% of patients to colposcopy, of whom 34% had a biopsy diagnosis of dysplasia. HCII negative cases revealed 19% to have ASCUS or higher on the follow-up cervical cytology, while 19.9% of INFORM negative cases had a reading of ASCUS or higher at follow-up cytologic examination. The 1-yr HPV DNA triage and follow-up reimbursements for HCII were 316,942.00 US dollars per 1,000 women, and for the INFORM methodology, the reimbursements were 369,484.00 US dollars per 1,000 women. The INFORM method was associated with higher specificity and sent fewer (41%) patients to colposcopy than did HCII. Although this smaller referral rate reduced reimbursement costs associated with colposcopy, the increased reimbursement paid for follow-up cytologies and office visits of HPV DNA negative patient and the greater cost of the INFORM test results in higher overall reimbursement for INFORM. Based on these costs and diagnostic accuracies, it appears that the INFORM HPV technology represents a viable option to HCII ASCUS triage. INFORM HPV appears to be 16% more expensive than HCII but has the advantage of sending 41% fewer women to colposcopy.Reflex human papilloma virus infection testing detects the same proportion of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 2-3 in young versus elderly women.The American Society for Colposcopy and Cervical Pathology recently recommended triage of women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) through reflex human papilloma virus (HPV) infection testing. Because age is an important determinant of the incidence of both ASCUS and HPV infection, the current study was conducted to determine the impact of age on reflex HPV infection test performance.The authors reviewed all liquid-based Papanicolaou tests submitted for reflex HPV infection testing to the University of Alabama Medical Center during the period from January 2002 to January 2004. To assess the impact of age on reflex HPV infection testing, women were divided into 6 age groups (<25, 25-34, 35-44, 45-54, 55-64, >64 years). Trend of different diagnostic categories with age was assessed using the chi-square test for linear trend. As a measure of test performance, the proportions of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) lesions confirmed by biopsy through reflex testing (of the total CIN lesions detected in the study population) were then compared among different age groups.During the study period, 25,164 ThinPrep tests were performed during the study period, with 2672 (11%) cases of ASCUS and 1371 (5%) cases of squamous intraepithelial lesions (SILs). A total of 2309 (86%) ASCUS cases were tested for HPV infection, of which 789 (34%) were positive. Biopsy specimens were obtained from 831 patients with SILs and from 316 patients with HPV+ASCUS. Of 246 patients with CIN Grade 2-3 (CIN2-3) detected on biopsy, 36 (15%) were triaged through reflex HPV infection testing and the rest were triaged through cytologic diagnosis of SILs. Despite the trend in the prevalence of HPV+ASCUS and SILs with increasing age (P < 0.05), there was no significant difference in the proportion (range, 9-23%) of CIN2-3 detected through reflex HPV infection testing in different age groups.Reflex HPV infection testing performed similarly for women in different age groups, including perimenopausal and postmenopausal women.HPV triage of women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance: a 3-year experience in an Italian organized programme.The purpose of our study was to determine if Hybrid Capture II assay (HCII) on Liquid Based Cytology (LCB) improves the accuracy (higher sensitivity, similar specificity) than the repeat conventional Pap smear in smears with Atypical Squamous Cell (ASC) of Undetermined Significance diagnosis.HPV testing was used to manage women, especially the older ones, with cervical abnormalities detected through our triennial organized screening in order to avoid unnecessary colposcopy and excessive follow-up if the woman is HPV negative. The HPV DNA Triage was offered without any charge to 909 women with ASC. The Bethesda System was used for the classification of these equivocal cytological findings and more precisely the 1991 version (ASCUS) until the summer 2001 (315 cases) and the new one 2001 classification (ASC-US and ASC-H) after this date (594 cases). The presence or absence of a cervical intraepithelial neoplasia of grade I or worse [CIN1+], and of grade II or worse [CIN2+], was confirmed by biopsy.The HPV DNA Triage showed a good accuracy (specificity over 94%, sensitivity of 37% and PPV for CIN2+ lesions around 30%). The higher values of ASC-H lesions (.462) for the sensitivity for CIN 2+ probably signify that this lesion is already a SIL.Our data were comparable with those recently published on the meta-analysis by Arbyn et al., confirming the promising approach of our guidelines for the treatment of these patients even in terms of Health Technology Assessment (HTA).Genital human papillomavirus testing by in situ hybridization in liquid atypical cytologic materials and follow-up biopsies.To describe cases of HPV testing by DNA in situ hybridization performed on atypical cervicovaginal samples collected by a liquidsed method that were negative for HPV DNA on cytology but revealed cervical intraepithelial neoplasia on follow-up biopsies.Three hundred ninety-five consecutive SurePath atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US) cytologic samples from asymptomatic, reproductive-age women were tested for human papillomaviruses (HPVs) by the in situ hybridization (ISH) method (Ventana Inform HPV Test, Tucson, Arizona, U.S.A). One hundred (25%) cases underwent follow-up colposcopic biopsy within 3 months of cytology. All the tests (cytology, ISH, histology) were independently evaluated without knowledge of the other tests.One hundred twenty-two (33%) cytologic samples were positive for HPVs. Of a total of 100 (HPV positive and negative) follow-up biopsies, 55 were positive for cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN). Fourteen cases of biopsy-proven CIN tested negative for all HPV types in the prior cytologic samples. Retesting of the 14 CIN tissues by ISH was negative in 10, positive for HPV in 2 and inconclusive in 2.There is a small but significant (14%) false negative rate with HPV testing by the Ventana ISH method. Clinically suspicious cases should be followed even if an HPV test is negative.Is p16(INK4A) expression more useful than human papillomavirus test to determine the outcome of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance-categorized Pap smear? A comparative analysis using abnormal cervical smears with follow-up biopsies.To correlate high-risk human papillomavirus (HR-HPV) viral load to p16(INK4A) expression in atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS)-categorized Pap smears with follow-up biopsies in order to elucidate their relationships in gynecological pathology.We studied 66 ASCUS-categorized Pap smears with subsequent follow-up biopsies. HR-HPV viral load was determined by Hybrid Capture II assay from the cervical swab in each ASCUS-diagnosed Pap smear. Both smears and biopsies were immunostained with a primary anti-p16 antibody, clone E6H4, and we analyzed the correlations between HR-HPV viral load in each ASCUS-diagnosed Pap smear and p16 expression of smears with follow-up biopsies.Correlation analyses of the corresponding histological diagnoses from 66 ASCUS-diagnosed Pap smears revealed that 21 (32%) cases had only reactive changes and 45 cases showed cervical intraepithelial neoplasia including LSIL (24 cases, 36%) and HSIL or higher (21 cases, 32%). Tests for HR-HPV viral load revealed 17 (26%) negative cases and 49 (74%) positive cases. Immunostaining showed that 26 cases (39%) were negative and 40 (61%) were positive for p16 expression. Comparative analysis of these two tests indicated consistencies as well as discrepancies. They showed significant differences (P < 0.001) between negative p16 expressions of Pap smears with the presence of reactive lesions in follow-up biopsies and HR-HPV viral load. However, no significant difference (P = 0.739 and 0.606) between p16 expression of Pap smears with the presence of LSIL, HSIL or higher in follow-up biopsies and high HR-HPV viral load was found. In addition, there were significant differences (P < 0.001) in specificity and positive predictive value, but no significant differences were found in sensitivity (P = 0.606) and negative predictive value (P = 0.062) between p16 immunostaining and HR-HPV viral load.The results indicate that there is a close association between weak or strong p16 expressions in ASCUS-categorized smears with the presence of SILs in follow-up biopsies and positive HR-HPV viral loads. Conversely, there is also a clear association between the lack of p16 expression and the absence of significant lesions in follow-up biopsies, but this is not consistent with a negative HR-HPV viral load. It is concluded that p16 expression is an indicator of pathogenic activity of HR-HPV, which is an objective biomarker for clarification of ASCUS-categorized Pap smears in gynecological cytopathology. Furthermore, through comparative analysis, directly visualized p16 immunostaining on smears appears to be a more effective method than HR-HPV viral load for the detection of reactive changes and LSILs from ASCUS-categorized Pap smears.Immunocytochemical expression of p16INK4A and Ki-67 in cytologically negative and equivocal pap smears positive for oncogenic human papillomavirus.This study was designed to analyze the cross-sectional comparison of the p16 and Ki-67 immunocytochemical expression in negative and equivocal (atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US)) liquid-based cytology (LBC) samples testing positive for high-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) types with HC2 assay or polymerase-chain reaction (PCR). A series of 199 consecutive LBC specimens derived from the same number of women participating in the ongoing Latin American Screening Study at Leonor Mendes de Barros Hospital, Sao Paulo, were analyzed using immunocytochemistry for expression of p16 and Ki-67 in negative and equivocal LBC samples testing positive for high-risk HPV types with hybrid capture II test (HC2) or PCR. All patients with at least one test positive (cytology, PCR, and/or HC2) were followed each 6 months for 3 years. The follow-up procedure consisted of visual examination, colposcopic inspection, cytology, and HC2 assay. Among the negative cytologic samples, 101 were HPV-positive and 55 HPV-negative. Of the HPV-positive group, 59 of 101 cases (58.4%) were positive for both p16 and Ki67 immunostaining, and 17 of 101 (16.8%) were negative for both. The proportion of Ki-67-positivity increased almost in parallel with the increasing grade of p16-positivity (p = 0.0001 for linear trend). In the HPV-negative group, both markers were negative in 41 of 55 cases (74.5%), and no statistical relationship was observed between the two markers (Pearson, p = 0.595). HPV-positive ASC-US samples demonstrated a simultaneous positive immunoreaction for p16 and Ki67 in 11 of 16 cases (68.7%), whereas 3 (18.7%) were concurrently negative. The relationship between the two markers was of borderline significance (Pearson, p = 0.053), but no linear relationship was found between the graded p16 and Ki-67 expression (p = 0.065 for linear trend). In the HPV-negative ASC-US group, there was no statistical association between the graded p16 and Ki-67 positivity (Pearson, p = 0.281). After 36 months of follow-up of the ASC-US patients, 6 women still displayed ASC-US smear, of which 4 of 6 were HPV-positive and expressed both p16 and Ki-67 markers. Two of 43 ASC-US smears had high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions diagnosed (4.6%), and 1 had low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (2.3%). All of those were positive for HPV, p16 and Ki-67. Patients with ASC-US diagnosis and positive high-risk HPV status and positive for p16 Ki67 should be carefully observed to exclude occurrence of a squamous intraepithelial lesion. The combination of these two markers can be a useful implement for management of women with equivocal cytology.Triage using HPV-testing in persistent borderline and mildly dyskaryotic smears: proposal for new guidelines.In the Netherlands 2% of cervical smears in the cervical cancer screening program are read as borderline or mildly dyskaryotic cytology (BMD smear). Only in about 10% of these women a high-grade CIN lesion (CIN II-III) is present; therefore referral is for the majority unnecessary. In our study triage with high-risk HPV (hrHPV) testing was used to identify women at risk for development of high-grade CIN lesions after a repeat BMD smear. A "wait-and-see" period was incorporated allowing clearance of HPV and regression of the lesion. Women with a low-grade lesion, irrespective of their HPV status, were monitored at 12 months; women with a high-grade lesion were monitored at 6 and 12 months. Fifty-one of the 105 women (49%) were hrHPV negative at baseline; none of them showed progression of the lesion within the first year of follow-up (NPV 100%). High-grade CIN was present in 1 patient who was HPV negative at baseline (2%); she demonstrated regression after 12 months. Nineteen of the hrHPV positive women (35%) demonstrated a high-grade CIN lesion at baseline and 3 cleared hrHPV after 6 months, with a subsequent regression of CIN. Ten women remained hrHPV positive with persistence of high-grade CIN and were eventually treated. At baseline, 35 hrHPV positive women demonstrated a low-grade lesion, 19 remained hrHPV positive after 12 months and 5 developed high-grade CIN. Sixteen out of the 35 cleared the hrHPV infection without progression of the lesion. In conclusion, triage, using hrHPV testing for women with persistent BMD cytology, can select women who are not at risk for development of high-grade CIN. We recommend return to the screening program without referral for colposcopic examination if hrHPV is absent. For hrHPV positive women, a repeat hrHPV test after another 6 months is suggested. Referral is only required if persistence of hrHPV is established.Reflex high-risk human papillomavirus testing for women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance in cytologic smears: effects since implementation in a large clinical practice.Reflex high-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) testing often is used in the management of women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance identified in cervicovaginal screening. Following implementation of reflex testing, our laboratory processed 8,022 specimens during a 20-month period; sufficient material was available for testing in 7,334 specimens. High-risk HPV was detected in 34.10% of these specimens. Detection rates varied with age, with positive rates as high as 58.46% in women 20 years old or younger, decreasing to 14.58% in women older than 35 years. The detection rate, categorized in 5-year age increments, showed a significant decrease until after 35 years, when the rate remained fairly constant (P < .0001). The detection rate decreased over the time of the study. These results demonstrate that high-risk HPV detection might vary according to the age mix of the population tested and the interval after implementation of testing.Predicting CIN2+ when detecting HPV mRNA and DNA by PreTect HPV-proofer and consensus PCR: A 2-year follow-up of women with ASCUS or LSIL Pap smear.It has been suggested that human papillomavirus (HPV) testing improves follow-up of atypical cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) and low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL) in cervical cancer screening programs. To evaluate the prognostic value of including HPV testing as an adjunct to cytology, we carried out a 2-year follow-up study of 77 women with ASCUS or LSIL Papanicolaou (Pap) smear in the Norwegian Cervical Cancer Screening Program (NCCSP) for detection of histological cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) 2+. The study includes a comparison between viral mRNA and DNA detection. PreTect HPV-Proofer was used for HPV E6/E7 mRNA detection from the 5 high-risk types 16, 18, 31, 33 and 45, and Gp5+/6+ consensus PCR was used for HPV DNA detection. Twice as many women were positive for HPV DNA (54.6%) than for HPV mRNA (23.4%). PreTect HPV-Proofer and consensus PCR had a sensitivity of 85.7% (95% confidence interval [CI] = 42.1-99.6) for detecting CIN2+ during follow-up. The specificity was significantly higher for PreTect HPV-Proofer, 84.9% (95% CI = 73.9-92.5), than for consensus PCR, 50.0% (95% CI = 37.4-62.6). PreTect HPV-Proofer positive women were 69.8 times (95% CI = 4.3-1137.3) more likely to be diagnosed with CIN2+ within 2 years than PreTect HPV-Proofer negative women. Consensus PCR-positive women were 5.7 times (95% CI = 0.6-52.0) more likely to be diagnosed with CIN2+ within 2 years than PCR-negative women. With equal sensitivity and higher specificity than consensus PCR, the PreTect HPV-Proofer might offer an improvement for the triage of women with ASCUS or LSIL Pap smear.Triage with human papillomavirus testing of women with cytologic abnormalities prompting referral for colposcopy assessment.The current study was conducted to evaluate the cost-effectiveness of triaging for colposcopy using human papillomavirus (HPV) testing.HPV tests were performed in a consecutive series of women who were referred for colposcopy for persistent atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS)-favor reactive (n = 35 women), ASCUS-favor squamous epithelial lesion (n = 164 women), atypical glandular cells of undetermined significance (n = 74 women), low-grade squamous epithelial lesion (n = 161 women), or high-grade squamous epithelial lesion (n = 78 women). The cost effectiveness of triaging women with ASCUS results using HPV testing was determined compared with the current protocol.The sensitivity of HPV testing for cervical intraepithelial neoplasia > Grade 2 was very high. Cost analysis showed a moderate increase in cost with the addition of HPV triage.Because HPV testing is highly sensitive, it may be useful as an alternative to the current policy of 6-month repeat cytology for women with ASCUS.Human papillomavirus DNA detection and histological findings in women referred for atypical glandular cells or adenocarcinoma in situ in their Pap smears.To evaluate the association between high-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA detection and histological diagnosis in women referred for atypical glandular cells (AGC) or adenocarcinoma in situ (AIS) at Pap smear.In this cross-sectional study, 146 women referred for AGC (124), AGC with high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HSIL) (15), or AIS (7) were tested for HPV DNA using Hybrid Capture II (HC II). All women underwent colposcopic examination, and cervical biopsy was performed for 95 patients. Fifty-one women referred due to AGC with normal colposcopy and normal second Pap smear were scheduled for control visits every 4 months.The overall prevalence of HPV DNA was 38%. HPV DNA was detected in 93% of the women with HSIL associated with AGC and in 71% of women with AIS Pap smear, being significantly higher when compared with the prevalence (29%) in women with AGC alone. Forty-five women (30.8%) had clinically significant histological lesions (CIN 2 or worse). High-risk HPV DNA was detected in only 16% of the women without significant abnormalities in biopsy, in contrast to 96% of those who had CIN 2 or CIN 3 and 75% of women with AIS. Eighty-five percent of women with invasive cervical carcinoma (squamous or adenocarcinoma) tested positive for HPV DNA. HPV DNA detection was significantly associated with histological diagnosis of CIN 2 or worse, with an odds ratio (OR) = 51.8 (95% CI 14.3-199.9).HPV DNA detection was strongly associated with the severity of cervical lesion (CIN 2 or worse) in women referred for AGC or AIS in their Pap smear. These data implicate the use of HPV testing in triage of women with AGC Pap smears.The predictive value of p16(INK4a) and hybrid capture 2 human papillomavirus testing for high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia.We performed p16(INK4a) immunocytochemical analysis and Hybrid Capture 2 (HC2; Digene, Gaithersburg, MD) high-risk HPV testing on 210 abnormal SurePath (TriPath Imaging, Burlington, NC) Papanicolaou specimens diagnosed as low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL) or high grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HSIL). The results were compared with 121 follow-up biopsy specimens. p16(INK4a) was positive in 57.9% of women with LSIL compared with 97.1% of women with HSIL. In contrast, HC2 testing was positive in 85.0% of women with LSIL and 86.4% of women with HSIL. The differences in the positive rates for16(INK4a) between LSIL and HSIL was significant (P < .001), whereas, for HC2, it was not (P = .264). In patients who had cervical biopsies following a cytologic diagnosis of LSIL, the positive predictive value (PPV) of p16(INK4a) for a biopsy of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 2 or 3 (CIN2/3; 33.3%) was significantly higher than the PPV of HC2 results (21.2%) (P < .001). Using liquid-based cytology specimens, p16(INK4a) immunocytochemical analysis has a higher PPV than reflex HC2 HPV testing for identifying CIN2/3 among patients with LSIL and might be useful for selecting patients with LSIL for colposcopy.ASC-US and HPV testing in women aged 40 years and over.High-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA triage is commonly performed for cervical cytology specimens interpreted as atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US), but little is known about testing results in women > or =40 yr of age. The extent to which clinical follow-up after HPV testing reflects the most recent management guidelines is unknown also. Data from 108 patients > or =40 yr of age with concurrent (93 patients) or recent (15 patients) ASC-US interpretations and HPV testing were reviewed. Twenty-five (23.1%) of these patients were positive for high-risk HPV. The HPV(+) rate was higher in women with a current interpretation of ASC-US (26.9%) compared with those with a previous ASC-US result (0%). Many patients were not managed exactly according to the "2001 Consensus Guidelines for the Management of Women with Cervical Cytologic Abnormalities." The majority (52.6%) of women with HPV(+) ASC-US did not receive colposcopy in our institution, and 41.3% of women with HPV(-) ASC-US received follow-up testing within 8 mo. These results show the potential for inadequate evaluation of women with HPV(+) ASC-US, as well as unnecessary early repeat cytology in HPV(-) ASC-US patients. Therefore, additional clinician education and reminders to correlate cytology and HPV test results may be warranted to optimize patient care.Detection of high-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA by Hybrid Capture II in women referred due to atypical glandular cells in the primary screening.We assessed the detection of high-risk human papillomavirus DNA (HPV-DNA) in women examined by a second Pap smear due to atypical glandular cells (AGC) detected in their screening Pap smear. In 91 women included in the study, a second Pap smear was taken and HPV-DNA test was performed using Hybrid Capture II (HC II). The second Pap smear showed no abnormalities in 28 (31%) cases, ACG in 17 (19%) cases, and high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (HSIL) or worse in 24 (26%). HC II test was positive in 36% of the cases. Considering the second Pap smear diagnosis, HPV-DNA was detected in 87% of the women with HSIL, 100% of women with in situ adenocarcinoma, and only in 11% of the women with no abnormalities. The use of the second Pap smear combined with HPV-DNA may improve the management of women with AGC in the primary screening.Prevalence and typing of HPV DNA by hybrid capture II in women with ASCUS, ASC-H, LSIL, and AGC on ThinPrep Pap tests.Testing for human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA is now a viable option for the management of women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS). The utility of reflexive HPV DNA testing for women with a cytologic diagnosis of atypical glandular cells-not otherwise specified (AGC-NOS), ASCUS subtypes, and low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL) has not been well established. In the present investigation, reflex Hybrid Capture II HPV DNA testing results were evaluated for HPV prevalence and type in 371 women with abnormal cytologic diagnoses of ASCUS-not otherwise specified (ASCUS-NOS), ASCUS-suspicious for low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (ASCUS-L), atypical squamous cells-cannot exclude high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (ASC-H), AGC-NOS, and LSIL on ThinPrep Pap tests. Positive high-risk HPV DNA was identified in 53.6% of the study samples, including ASCUS-NOS 40.2% ASCUS-L 71.4%, ASC-H 37.5%, LSIL 88.6%, and AGC-NOS 0%. We conclude that reflex HPV DNA testing appears to not be useful for colposcopy triage for cytologic diagnoses of LSIL or AGC-NOS.HPV testing for triage of HIV-infected women with papanicolaou smears read as atypical squamous cells of uncertain significance.To assess the utility of testing for high-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA as a triage strategy for detecting cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) grade 2/3 in women with human immunodeficiency virus-1 (HIV-1) infection and cytology read as atypical cells of uncertain significance (ASCUS).Conventional cervical cytology and cervicovaginal lavage were obtained at 6-month intervals between October 1, 1994, and September 30, 2002, from women enrolled in the Women's Interagency HIV Study, a multicenter cohort studying the natural history of HIV in women. HPV typing was performed by PCR. HPV types 16, 18, 31, 33, 35, 39, 45, 51, 52, 56, 58, 59, and 68 were classified as carrying high oncogenic risk. Women with ASCUS smears were referred for colposcopy. Analyses of the sensitivity of HPV testing were cross-sectional, using colposcopy results within 90 days of first ASCUS result.Of the 270 women evaluated, 7 (3%) had CIN 2, and 3 (1%) had CIN3 or adenocarcinoma in situ. High-risk HPV DNA was found in 81 (30%) of the 270 participants. The sensitivity of high-risk HPV DNA detection for CIN 2/3 was 50% (95% CI 0.19, 0.81), the specificity was 71% (95% CI 0.65, 0.76), the positive predictive value was 6% (95% CI 0.01, 0.11), and the negative predictive value was 97% (95% CI 0.95, 1.00). HPV of any risk type was found in 176 (65%) of the 270 women, including 9 of 10 women with CIN 2/3, for a sensitivity of 90% (95% CI 0.56, 1.00), a specificity of 36% (95% CI 0.30, 0.42), a positive predictive value of 5% (95% CI 0.02, 0.08), and a negative predictive value of 99% (95% CI 0.94, 1.00).For women with HIV and Papanicolaou smears read as ASCUS, DNA testing for high risk HPV may not be sensitive enough for clinical use.Atypical glandular cells of undetermined significance. Outcome predictions based on human papillomavirus testing.Cases of atypical glandular cells (AGC) diagnosed on liquid-based preparations were culled from a 3-year period. When available, residual cellular material was analyzed for human papillomavirus (HPV) by polymerase chain reaction and correlated with cytologic and histologic (biopsy) outcome. Of 178,994 cytologic cases, 187 (0.1045%) contained AGC compared with 8,740 (4.8828%) atypical squamous cells (ASC) for an AGC/ASC ratio of 0.021. HPV results and follow-up were available for 108 specimens from 106 patients. Depending on the end-point (histologic/cyto-logic), the sensitivity range of HPV testing for significant cervical disease (high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion [SIL], adenocarcinoma in situ [ACIS], invasive carcinoma) was 83% with a specificity range of 78% to 82%, a positive predictive value of 57% to 61%, and a negative predictive value of 91% to 95%. Fifteen false-positive results included concurrent ASC or low-grade SIL, ASC on follow-up cytology, and previous ACIS with a negative follow-up cone biopsy result. Noncervical glandular neoplasia (including atypical endometrial hyperplasia) was confirmed in 13 cases (1 recurrent), only 2 of which scored positive for HPV. HPV-positive AGC has a substantially higher positive predictive value for significant disease than ASC (61% vs historic 20%) and merits consideration in the triage of patients with atypical endocervical cells not otherwise specified. However, noncervical or other HPV-negative glandular neoplasia must be considered in all patients with AGC, particularly older patients.Management of women who test positive for high-risk types of human papillomavirus: the HART study.Certain types of human papillomavirus (HPV) are the primary cause of almost all cervical cancers. HPV testing of cervical smears is more sensitive but less specific than cytology for detecting high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN2+). HPV testing as a primary screening approach requires efficient management of HPV-positive women with negative or borderline cytology. We aimed to compare the detection rate and positive predictive values of HPV assay with cytology and to determine the best management strategy for HPV-positive women.We did a multicentre screening study of 11085 women aged 30-60 years. Women with borderline cytology and women positive for high-risk HPV with negative cytology were randomised to immediate colposcopy or to surveillance by repeat HPV testing, cytology, and colposcopy at 12 months.HPV testing was more sensitive than borderline or worse cytology (97.1% vs 76.6%, p=0.002) but less specific (93.3% vs 95.8%, p<0.0001) for detecting CIN2+. Of 825 randomised women, surveillance at 12 months was as effective as immediate colposcopy. In women positive for HPV at baseline, who had surveillance, 73 (45%) of 164 women with negative cytology and eight (35%) of 23 women with borderline cytology were HPV negative at 6-12 months. No CIN2+ was found in these women, nor in women with an initial negative HPV test with borderline (n=211) or mild (32) cytology.HPV testing could be used for primary screening in women older than 30 years, with cytology used to triage HPV-positive women. HPV-positive women with normal or borderline cytology (about 6% of screened women) could be managed by repeat testing after 12 months. This approach could potentially improve detection rates of CIN2+ without increasing the colposcopy referral rate.The triage of squamous cell abnormalities of cervical cytology by human papilloma virus screening.The aim of the study was to determine the presence of human papilloma virus (HPV) infection in cervical swabs by the use of the Digene Hybrid Capture assay in a cohort of patients with squamous cell abnormalities found in cervical cytologic screening.Thirty-four (0.3%) of 1,100 patients who came for their routine cervical cytologic screening and diagnosed as having squamous cell abnormalities were enrolled in the study. Colposcopy-directed biopsy was obtained from all study patients. HPV DNA was sought in cervical swab specimens placed in Digene transport medium by the use of the Digene Hybrid Capture assay. The findings of cervical cytology, colposcopy-directed biopsy and HPV screening were compared.In a total of 34 women who were diagnosed as having squamous cell abnormalities in their routine cervical cytologic screening, 15 women had atypical squamous cell lesions of undetermined significancy (ASCUS), 16 women had low-grade cervical intraepithelial lesions (LGSIL), and three women had high-grade cervical intraepithelial lesions (HGSIL). Five (15%) of these women tested positive for HPV screening in cervical swabs where four women had infection with high-risk and one woman had infection with low-risk subtypes. None of the patients with koilocytotic changes of the squamous cells in the class of LGSIL histopathologically tested positive for HPV screening. In addition, one patient diagnosed as having invasive cervical carcinoma histopathologically tested negative for HPV screening. Atypical vascularization was seen colposcopically in this 37-year-old woman who had ASCUS cytologically.HPV screening seems to have value in the triage of patients with ASCUS with no clear advantage to colposcopy-directed biopsy. The routine performance of HPV screening for the triage of patients with squamous cell abnormalities has no advantage over colposcopy-directed biopsy.[Contribution of high risk human papillomavirus testing to the management of premalignant and malignant lesions of the uterine cervix].High risk human papillomaviruses (HR-HPV) are consistently associated with premalignant and malignant lesions of the uterine cervix. Thus, the use of molecular techniques to detect HPV has been proposed to improve the results of conventional diagnostic strategies. In the present study, we evaluated the usefulness of the detection of HR-HPV in a cervical pathology unit.1005 women (mean age [SD], 38.4 [12.3]; range, 16-83) were referred for a cytology of atypical cells of unknown origin (ASCUS), squamous intraepithelial lesion (SIL) or carcinoma in the six months previous to the admission. All patients underwent a colposcopy, Pap test and/or histological study as well as HR-HPV detection using the Hybrid Capture II test.HR-HPV was detected in 96% high grade-SIL, 86% carcinomas of the uterine cervix and 86% low grade-SIL, but only in 25% women with no cervical lesions and 0% women with metastatic carcinomas to the cervix (p<0.001). The sensitivity of this test for high grade-SIL or higher was 90.2% and the negative predictive value was 96.5% (odds ratio=18.9; 95% confidence interval, 10.9-33.1). In patients with ASCUS, a negative result for HR-HPV nearly excluded the presence of a cervical lesion (negative predictive value, 98.52%).HR-HPV detection using Hybrid Capture II is useful in the study of lesions of the uterine cervix. It displays a high sensitivity for the diagnosis of squamous intraepithelial lesions and invasive carcinomas and a high usefulness in the management of ASCUS cases.Role of HPV DNA testing in predicting cervical intraepithelial lesions: comparison of HC HPV and ISH HPV.Human papillomavirus (HPV) is widely accepted as the primary agent involved in the development of squamous intraepithelial neoplasia and cervical carcinoma. Several commercial tests are available for detecting HPV DNA. This study compares the efficacy of INFORM HPV (in situ hybridization [ISH] HPV) and HCII (HC HPV) in predicting cervical lesions. A total of 762 sequential Papanicolaou (Pap) smears determined by cytologic examination to be either atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASC-US) or low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (LSIL) were tested by both Hybrid Capture (HC) HPV and ISH HPV; 250 follow-up biopsies were reviewed as the reference standard for presence or absence of a lesion. ISH HPV and HC HPV differed significantly in accurately predicting biopsy findings from ASC-US and LSIL cases. The overall sensitivity and specificity of ISH HPV were 97% (28/29) and 86% (191/221); and HC HPV was 79% (23/29) and 56% (123/221). The positive predictive value (PPV) of ISH HPV was 48% (28/58) vs HC HPV value of 19% (23/121). Negative predictive value (NPV) was also better with ISH HPV at 99% (191/192) and HC HPV at 95% (123/129). Of equal importance, ISH HPV demonstrated a lower false-positive rate compared to HC HPV, 12% (30/250) vs 39% (98/250), as well as having a slightly lower false-negative rate 0.4% (1/250) vs 2.4% (6/250). ISH HPV is more predictive of biopsy histopathology in patients with detectable cervical lesions than is HC HPV. Effective triage of patients by HPV analysis using ISH HPV as compared to HC HPV has the potential of significant public health impact by reducing unnecessary colposcopies, as well as adverse medical, social, and psychological patient consequences.Triage by HPV-DNA testing: is it useful in women with persistent minor smear abnormalities?This study was carried out to evaluate the efficacy of HPV-DNA (Human Papilloma Virus) testing as a triage strategy for persistent borderline and mild cytological abnormalities.A prospective cross-sectional study involving 321 women registered between January and December 2001 with two smears showing borderline or mild dyskaryosis, taken 6 months apart. This study was undertaken in a colposcopy unit in a large district general hospital in central London.Three hundred and twenty-one women referred with persistent borderline and mild dyskaryosis were recruited in this study. HPV-DNA testing was positive in 194 women (60.4%). Histology of colposcopically directed biopsy showed CIN2/3 in 57 women (18%). Fifty-one of these 57 women were detected by HPV-DNA testing (sensitivity for high-grade disease 89.5%). Specificity for high-grade disease was 45.8%. Negative predictive value was 95.3%. Women with a positive HPV-DNA result had a 7.2 times higher risk of having a high-grade cervical cancer precursor lesion.Negative predictive value of HPV-DNA testing for high-grade cervical lesion is very high. Hence, it can be used as a triage strategy for persistent borderline changes and mild dyskaryosis.Triage of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance with hybrid capture II: colposcopy and histologic human papillomavirus correlation.To estimate the effectiveness of Hybrid Capture II to predict high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) from a cytological cervical sample. Evidence of high-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) was also determined from biopsy samples using the polymerase chain reaction (PCR) for women referred with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) Papanicolaou smears.We screened 8170 women with Papanicolaou smears, of whom 278 (3.4%) returned ASCUS. All ASCUS cases underwent colposcopy and Hybrid Capture II testing. High-grade CIN biopsy specimens were tested for high-risk HPV by PCR.Nearly 30% of ASCUS cases had CIN biopsy results (11.9% showing CIN II or CIN III and 17.6% showing CIN I). Hybrid Capture II positive rates were 93.3% for cases with CIN III, 72.2% for CIN II, and 51.0% for CIN I (P <.001). ASCUS-Premalignant Process Favored cases showed a 28.1% high-grade biopsy rate and a 100% Hybrid Capture II positive rate. For ASCUS-Undefined and ASCUS-Reactive Process Favored cases, Hybrid Capture II returned positive in 90.9% of CIN III and 61.5% of CIN II cases (P <.001). Sixty-nine of 178 (38.8%) patients with no evidence of CIN tested positive for Hybrid Capture II. Human papillomavirus deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) high-risk subtypes were detected by PCR in the tissue of all high-grade CIN cases with negative Hybrid Capture II results.Hybrid Capture II returned negative in 25% of cases with biopsy-proven high-grade CIN with associated high-risk HPV DNA by PCR (non-Premalignant ASCUS subset), and positive in 39.3% of cases with normal results; this limits its clinical utility.Detection of telomerase, its components, and human papillomavirus in cervical scrapings as a tool for triage in women with cervical dysplasia.To examine whether the detection of either telomerase and its components or high risk human papillomavirus (HPV) are of value in predicting the presence of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) grade II/III in women referred because of cervical cytology reports showing at most moderate dyskaryosis.Cervical scrapings of 50 women referred with cytological borderline, mild, or moderate dyskaryosis were analysed. Telomerase activity was assessed by a commercially available telomere repeat amplification protocol assay and its components human telomerase RNA (hTR) and human telomerase reverse transcriptase (hTERT) were assessed by reverse transcriptase polymerase chain reaction (PCR). HPV was detected by GP5+/6+ PCR enzyme immunosassay. Histological findings on colposcopy guided biopsies or excised cervical tissue were regarded as the final pathological diagnosis. The sensitivity and specificity for detecting CIN II/III were calculated.Twenty eight women were diagnosed with CIN II/III. Telomerase activity was detected in none, hTR in 88%, hTERT in 23%, and high risk HPV was detected in 79% of these women. As a diagnostic test none of the described analyses combined a sensitivity of at least 90% with a specificity >or= 90%. Despite the small numbers, calculation of the 95% confidence intervals excluded a combined sensitivity and specificity of at least 90% for all of the evaluated parameters.Neither detection of telomerase or its components, nor detection of high risk HPV seem suitable for the triage of women with borderline, mild, and moderate cytological dyskaryosis.Role for HPV testing in ASCUS: a cytologic-histologic correlation.Human papilloma virus (HPV) Hybrid Capture II testing was introduced at our institution in mid-April, 2001. Relatively little data exists on the histologic follow-up of "high-risk HPV-positive ASCUS" patients without a previous abnormal Pap result. The results of the cytologic-histologic correlation of 50 patients over an 11-mo period are presented. Our results indicate that significant lesions may be discovered in patients of the "high-risk HPV-positive ASCUS" category who have no previous abnormal Pap history. Of the 50 patients presented in this study, histologic follow-up demonstrated evidence of squamous carcinoma in one patient (2%), high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HSIL) in eight patients (16%), and low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL) in 19 patients (38%). The other 22 (44%) showed chronic cervicitis, reactive changes, or no pathologic changes. These findings suggest a more aggressive clinical approach may be warranted in the management of new onset ASCUS positive for high risk HPV.Human papillomavirus DNA detection in the management of women with twice mildly abnormal cytological smears.This study was undertaken to investigate the value of HPV testing in women referred with two abnormal smears that were graded as mild dyskaryosis or less who attended for at least three follow-up visits. One hundred forty-nine women were included in the study and a total of 39 high-grade lesions including one cancer were detected. All of these were found to be associated with the persistent presence of one or more of 13 high-risk human papillomavirus types (HPV) as detected by a multiplex type specific PCR technique. Two high-grade lesions were initially missed by cytology. In contrast, no cytological or histological evidence of high-grade lesions was found during a follow-up period of up to 8 years in 62 women with no high-risk HPV infection or in 38 women with only transient high-risk HPV infection. The utility of high-risk HPV detection in the management of women presenting with mild cytological abnormalities is discussed.Evaluation of human papillomavirus testing in primary screening for cervical abnormalities: comparison of sensitivity, specificity, and frequency of referral.Human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA testing of women having Papanicolaou (Pap) smears showing atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) has clinical usefulness. Whether HPV DNA testing alone is useful in primary screening remains to be determined.To determine the accuracy of HPV DNA testing for detecting cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) grade 3 or cancer (the criterion standard).Between December 1997 and October 2000, 4075 women who attended Planned Parenthood clinics in Washington State were screened simultaneously using thin-layer Pap and HPV DNA testing by a polymerase chain reaction (PCR)-based method and by a liquid-based RNA-DNA hybridization capture with signal amplification assay (signal amplification). Women who were positive for high-risk HPV types, or had Pap results of ASCUS or higher, were considered to have positive screening test results and were referred for colposcopy and biopsy. Additionally, a random sample of women with negative screening test results was referred for colposcopy. Based on individual and combined thin-layer Pap, HPV PCR, and HPV signal amplification test results from the screening and the colposcopy visits, 7 colposcopy triage strategies were defined and evaluated.Sensitivity and specificity for detecting cervical lesions graded CIN 3 or higher for each of the 7 triage strategies.The estimated prevalence of CIN 3 or higher was 3.2%. The sensitivity (95% confidence interval) of thin-layer Pap (with a result of > or = ASCUS) for identifying women with CIN 3 or higher was only 61.3% (48.5%-70.9%) compared with 88.2% (78.9%-93.8%) for HPV testing by PCR and 90.8% (83.1%-95.8%) by signal amplification. Differences in specificities were also observed: 82.4% (81.8%-83.1%) for thin-layer Pap (with a result of > or = ASCUS), 78.8% (77.9%-79.7%) for PCR, and 72.6% (69.4%-75.0%) for signal amplification. Compared with referral for colposcopy of all women with ASCUS or higher, signal amplification testing of women with ASCUS and referral of those with a positive result was about as sensitive (61.3% vs 60.3%, respectively) and significantly more specific (82.4% vs 88.9%, respectively). The strategy requiring repeat positive PCR tests on 2 visits had a sensitivity of 84.2% (75.3%-91.0%) and a specificity of 86.2% (85.1%-87.3%). All tests were more specific and less sensitive in older (> or = 30 years) vs younger women.Testing for HPV has higher sensitivity but lower specificity than thin-layer Pap screening. In some settings, particularly where screening intervals are long or haphazard, screening for HPV DNA may be a reasonable alternative to cytology-based screening of reproductive-age women.Utility of HPV DNA detection in thin-layer, liquid-based tests with atypical squamous metaplasia.To determine if testing for HPV is useful in the management of patients with atypical squamous metaplasia (ASM) and to evaluate a small group of patients with atypical squamous cells in the setting of an atrophic cellular profile (estrogen test [ESTT]).Presence of HPV DNA was determined on 104 ASM and ESTT cases on residual ThinPrep specimens using Hybrid Capture II. Results of the HPV DNA test were correlated with subsequent biopsy or repeat Pap test results.Of 63 patients with ASM on ThinPrep Pap tests, 52% were associated with histologically proven SIL when HPV DNA was detected by Hybrid Capture II. None of the 17 patients who were negative for HPV DNA had subsequent evidence of HPV infection by biopsy or repeat Pap test. Among 14 patients with ESTT, none of the 12 who were negative for HPV DNA had subsequent evidence of HPV infection.ASM and ESTT with a negative HPV DNA test can be followed routinely, and a colposcopic examination is not warranted.Comparison of two signal-amplification DNA tests for high-risk HPV as an aid to colposcopy.To compare Hybrid Capture Tube (HCT) and the second-generation Hybrid Capture II (HC II) test for detection of high-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA at the time of colposcopy.Colposcopy and HPV testing were performed by HCT and HC II on 1,309 women for evaluation of abnormal Pap smears. Differences in the proportions were tested with chi 2 and 95% CI calculations.When compared to HCT, HC II was more often positive in women with any abnormal Pap smear (44% [95% CI 41-46%] vs. 34% [31-37%], P < .005) and in the subset of women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance Pap smears (32% [29-35%] vs. 24% [22-27%], P < .005). HC II was more sensitive in detecting cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) 2 or worse (93% [88-97%] vs. 78% [70-84%], P < .005) and had a lower rate of undetected > or = CIN 2 in HPV test-negative subjects (1.5% [0.7-2.7%]) vs. 4.3% [3.0-5.9%], P < .005). HC II was also more often positive in women with negative colposcopic evaluations (29% [25.7-32.4%] vs. 20% [17.6-23.5%], P < .005). The specificity of HC II in detection of > or = CIN 2 was lower than that for HCT (63% [60.5-66.2%] vs. 73% [69.5-74.8%], P < .005).Effects of age and human papilloma viral load on colposcopy triage: data from the randomized Atypical Squamous Cells of Undetermined Significance/Low-Grade Squamous Intraepithelial Lesion Triage Study (ALTS).Testing for oncogenic human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA at a 1.0-pg/mL threshold represents a promising approach for colposcopy triage of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS), but not for low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (LSIL). Considering age or viral load could improve colposcopy triage.We determined the sensitivity for detecting Cervical Intraepithelial Neoplasia 3 (CIN3) and cancer and the percentage of referrals for colposcopy using HPV testing and repeat thin-layer cytopathology in 2198 women with ASCUS and in 848 women with LSIL enrolled in ALTS from November 1996 through December 1998. We analyzed results by age and at two thresholds for HPV load and repeat cytopathology.For ASCUS, the overall sensitivity of HPV testing at 1.0 pg/mL was 96.1% (95% confidence interval [CI] = 92.8 to 99.5%) and varied minimally with age (range, 93.9% to 97.8%). HPV testing at this threshold would refer 31.2% (95% CI = 28.0% to 34.3%) of women aged 29 years or older as compared with more than 65% of younger women. Among women aged 29 years or older with ASCUS, referral for repeat cytopathology of ASCUS had a sensitivity of 90.9% (95% CI = 81.1% to 100.0%) and would refer 50.1% (95% CI = 46.7 to 53.5%). Among all ASCUS, HPV testing using a 10.0-pg/mL threshold decreased sensitivity to 91.5% and referrals to 41.7%. More than 63% of LSIL would have been referred using any strategy achieving 90% sensitivity.For women with ASCUS, HPV testing was highly sensitive for detecting CIN3 and cancer with dramatically fewer referrals of older women. Neither a single HPV test nor repeat cytopathology provides useful triage for women with LSIL.Is the human papillomavirus test in combination with the Papanicolaou test useful for management of patients with diagnoses of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance/low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions?To determine whether human papillomavirus (HPV) testing is useful in the evaluation of patients diagnosed with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS)/low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL) and whether the HPV test is appropriate as an alternative screening method.The results of Papanicolaou (Pap) tests and subsequent hybrid capture tube (HCT) II tests for high-risk-type HPV were analyzed for 457 patients. Among these tests, 208 histologic diagnoses were made and correlated with the results of Pap and HPV tests. The sensitivity and specificity of the Pap test, HPV test, and the combined method of Pap and HPV tests to detect cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) 2/3 and all CIN were also measured.Sixty (63.8%) of 94 women with LSIL and 31 (26.3%) of 118 women with ASCUS tested positive for high-risk HPV. The sensitivity values for Pap tests in detecting all cases of CIN and CIN 2/3 were 91.4% and 92.9%, respectively. The sensitivity values of HCT II tests using the high-risk probe for detecting all cases of CIN and CIN 2/3 were 62.6% and 88.1%, respectively. Biopsies confirmed that 10 (22.7%) of 44 LSIL patients with high-risk HPV had CIN 2/3, but only 1 (4.5%) of 22 LSIL patients without high-risk HPV had CIN 2/3.Testing for high-risk HPV with the HCT II test is useful in the detection of CIN 2/3 in LSIL groups and in the selection of patients for colposcopy in ASCUS groups, but it is not suitable for cervical cancer screening tests.High-risk HPV testing in women with borderline and mild dyskaryosis: long-term follow-up data and clinical relevance.In The Netherlands and most other European countries, women with two serial cervical smears with borderline or mild dyskaryosis (BMD) within 6 months are referred for colposcopy-directed biopsies. Only about 10% of these women have high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN). This study therefore investigated whether human papillomavirus (HPV) testing could identify which women with smears read as BMD are most likely to have high-grade CIN, either at referral or during follow-up and the relationship was determined between clearance of high-risk HPV and regression of abnormal cytology. Women with smears read as BMD (n=278) were referred to the gynaecologist for colposcopy. They were subdivided into two groups; group A comprised women with a single smear (n=172) and group B women with two sequential smears (n=106) read as BMD before referral. High-risk HPV detection with Hybrid Capture II (HC II) was performed on a cervical scrape taken at the first visit before colposcopy (i.e. baseline smear) and during follow-up. Biopsies were taken when lesions suspected for CIN were seen at colposcopy. High-risk HPV DNA was present in the baseline smears of 126 (45.0%) women; 26 (20.6%) of them had histologically confirmed CIN 2/3 at the first visit and another 14 (11.1%) during follow-up. Only one of the 152 women (0.7%) with a negative high-risk HPV test had a CIN 2 lesion at the first visit and no CIN lesions were detected during follow-up of these women. After exclusion of women who were treated for prevalent high-grade CIN, the median follow-up times were 1.3 years (range 0.0-4.3 years) and 1.6 years (range 0.0-4.5 years) for women with HPV-negative and HPV-positive baseline smears, respectively. The sensitivity of a positive high-risk HPV test for CIN 2/3 at the first visit was 96.3%, the specificity 60.2%, the positive predictive value 20.6%, and the negative predictive value 99.3%. These values did not change markedly when stratified for group A or group B. Thus, a high-risk HPV positive test was strongly associated with the presence at the first visit and the development of CIN 2/3 lesions during follow-up. Moreover, regression of abnormal cytology in women with a positive high-risk HPV test at baseline was strongly associated with viral clearance and occurred 0.3 years (range -1.2 to 1.7 years) later than HPV clearance. This study establishes the value of a high-risk HPV positive test for women at risk of high-grade CIN, with virtually no risk for missing CIN 2/3. Addition of a test on high-risk HPV in women with BMD could prevent 55% of the referrals and/or repeat smears.Comparison of three management strategies for patients with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance: baseline results from a randomized trial.More than 2 million U.S. women receive an equivocal cervical cytologic diagnosis (atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance [ASCUS]) each year. Effective colposcopy triage strategies are needed to identify the minority of women who have clinically significant disease while avoiding excessive follow-up evaluation for others.The ASCUS/LSIL (i.e., low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion) Triage Study (ALTS) is a multicenter, randomized trial comparing the sensitivity and specificity of the following three management strategies to detect cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 3 (CIN3): 1) immediate colposcopy (considered to be the reference standard), 2) triage to colposcopy based on human papillomavirus (HPV) results from Hybrid Capture 2(TM) (HC 2) and thin-layer cytology results, or 3) triage based on cytology results alone. This article summarizes the cross-sectional enrollment results for 3488 women with a referral diagnosis of ASCUS. All statistical tests are two-sided.Among participants with ASCUS, the underlying prevalence of histologically confirmed CIN3 was 5.1%. Sensitivity to detect CIN3 or above by testing for cancer-associated HPV DNA was 96.3% (95% confidence interval [CI] = 91.6% to 98.8%), with 56.1% of women referred to colposcopy. Sensitivity of a single repeat cytology specimen with a triage threshold of HSIL or above was 44.1% (95% CI = 35.6% to 52.9%), with 6.9% referred. Sensitivity of a lower cytology triage threshold of ASCUS or above was 85.3% (95% CI = 78.2% to 90.8%), with 58.6% referred.HC 2 testing for cancer-associated HPV DNA is a viable option in the management of women with ASCUS. It has greater sensitivity to detect CIN3 or above and specificity comparable to a single additional cytologic test indicating ASCUS or above.Contribution of human papillomavirus testing by hybrid capture in the triage of women with repeated abnormal pap smears before colposcopy referral.The purpose of this work was to evaluate the ability of testing for high-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) types using the hybrid capture technique to predict the presence of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) II,III in patients with repeated atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) and low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LGSIL) on Pap smears.Hybrid capture testing and tissue biopsy were performed on 503 consecutive women with ASCUS or LGSIL on repeated Pap smears who were referred for colposcopy.A highly significant association (P < 0.0001) was found between a positive test for high-risk HPV types and CIN II,III, with an 87.0% positive predictive value and a 95.7% negative predictive value. In 226 women with ASCUS on repeated Pap smears, a positive test for high-risk HPV types had a 85.7% sensitivity and a 97% specificity for CIN II,III. In 277 patients with LGSIL on repeated Pap smears, a positive test for high-risk HPV types had an 88.2% sensitivity and a 94.7% specificity for CIN I,II. Reserving colposcopy examination for women who were positive for high-risk HPV types would have reduced the number of referrals for colposcopy to 24.6% and maintained a sensitivity of 87.0% for CIN II,III.A positive hybrid capture test for high-risk HPV types was highly sensitive and specific for the presence of CIN II,III in patients with ASCUS and LGSIL on repeated Pap smears. We believe that improved methodology will eventually enable more selective colposcopy referrals without affecting patient safety among these women.Comparison of human papillomavirus DNA testing and repeat Papanicolaou test in women with low-grade cervical cytologic abnormalities: a randomized trial. HPV Effectiveness in Lowgrade Paps (HELP) Study No. 1 Group.Results of cervical cytology screening showing atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) or low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (LSIL) indicate risk for high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN 2 or 3). In a community-based randomized trial we compared the test performance of human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA testing with that of 6-month repeat Papanicolaou (Pap) test in detecting histologically confirmed CIN 2 or 3.We randomly assigned 212 women aged 16-50 years with ASCUS or LSIL on cervical cytology screening to undergo either immediate HPV DNA testing or a repeat Pap test in 6 months. Cervical swabs for the HPV DNA testing and the Pap smears were obtained by their family physicians. We tested the swabs for oncogenic HPV using the Hybrid Capture II assay (Digene Corp., Beltsville, Md.). Community-based pathologists examined the Pap smears. All women were referred for colposcopy by their family physicians. Two gynecological pathologists assessed the histology findings. We calculated test performance in women who completed the trial using CIN 2 or 3 as the reference standard.A total of 159 women completed the study. Compared with HPV DNA testing, which detected 87.5% (7/8) of the cases of CIN 2 or 3, repeat Pap smear showing high-grade intraepithelial neoplasia (HSIL) detected 11.1% (1/9) of cases (p = 0.004), and repeat Pap smear showing ASCUS, LSIL or HSIL detected 55.6% (5/9) (p = 0.16). Corresponding specificities were 50.6%, 95.2% (p = 0.002) and 55.6% (p = 0.61). Loss to follow-up was 17.1% in the HPV test group and 32.7% in the repeat Pap group (p = 0.009). Given the 7 cases of CIN 2 or 3 detected by HPV testing and the 5 cases detected by the repeat Pap smear, the incremental cost of HPV testing was calculated to be $3003 per additional case of CIN identified.HPV DNA testing was more costly but was associated with significantly less loss to follow-up. It may detect more cases of CIN 2 or 3 in women with low-grade cytologic abnormalities.Prediction of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 2-3 using risk assessment and human papillomavirus testing in women with atypia on papanicolaou smears.To determine whether human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA testing and risk assessment can predict cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) 2-3 on biopsies in women with atypia on Papanicolaou smears.One hundred ninety-five consenting women were referred for colposcopy because of atypia on Papanicolaou smears between September 1997 and April 1999. Before colposcopy, women completed risk assessments and had cervical swabs collected for HPV testing using the Hybrid Capture-II assay (Digene Corporation, Silver Spring, MD). Associations of demographic and clinical variables were assessed by chi(2) analysis, and logistic regression was used to assess factors associated with CIN 2-3. The cost-effectiveness of routine colposcopy versus reflex HPV testing by either conventional or liquid-based Papanicolaou smear media was compared.Cervical intraepithelial neoplasia was diagnosed in 70 of 195 women (35.9%), 55 (28.2%) with CIN 1 and 15 (7.7%) with CIN 2-3. High-risk HPV types were detected in 31.3% of all subjects, 36.4% of those with CIN 1, and 93.3% of those with CIN 2-3. By logistic regression, CIN 2-3 was associated only with detection of high-risk HPV (odds ratio 110.08, 95% confidence interval 8.35, 999. 00). The sensitivity of high-risk HPV for detecting CIN 2-3 was 93. 3%, specificity 73.9%, positive predictive value 23.0%, and negative predictive value 99.3%. The cost of reflex HPV testing using conventional smear or liquid-based media was less than routine colposcopy ($4809 and $4308, respectively, versus $4875 per case detected).Triage based on HPV testing would result in referral of approximately 31% of patients to colposcopy and appears to be a sensitive and cost-effective alternative to colposcopy.Quantitative detection of oncogenic HPV DNA using hybrid capture to triage borderline and mildly dyskaryotic Papanicolaou smears.To investigate the use of hybrid capture to triage borderline and mildly abnormal PAP smears to either colposcopy or continued cytological surveillance.A prospective cross-sectional study of 207 women with either mild or borderline dyskaryosis referred to the colposcopy clinic at the Whittington Hospital, London was done. Quantitative detection of oncogenic human papillomavirus deoxyribose nucleic acid was performed using the solution hybridization technique Hybrid Capture I (Digene Diagnostics). Positive or negative hybrid capture results were compared to colposcopically directed punch biopsy or loop excision of the transformation zone.Hybrid capture correctly predicted 1/1 micro-invasive cancers, 23/24 CIN 3 and 20/24 CIN 2, giving a sensitivity to detect significant disease of CIN 2 or above of 90%. For CIN 1, 37/66 were HPV positive making the sensitivity to detect all grades of CIN 70%. Of women with a normal cervix, 39/92 were HPV positive and in total 58% of the women were HPV positive and would have been referred to colposcopy.Hybrid capture was a simple solution hybridization method which provided a sensitive method of detecting CIN 2 and above lesions in women with minor PAP smear abnormalities. However, the sensitivity for CIN 1 and the specificity were low, meaning that further improvements in the technique are needed before it can be used as a triage strategy.Human papillomavirus testing in women with mild cytologic atypia.To evaluate the efficiency of human papillomavirus (HPV) testing by Hybrid Capture II (Digene Diagnostics Inc., Silver Spring, MD) with regard to detecting biopsy-confirmed cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) or high-grade CIN in women with mild atypia, compared with the efficiencies of polymerase chain reaction (PCR), Southern blot hybridization, and cytology.We prospectively studied 378 women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) (n = 111) or low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (SILs) (n = 267) demonstrated by referral cytology. We did repeat cytology, sampling for detection of HPV DNA by Hybrid Capture II, PCR, and Southern blot hybridization, and colposcopic evaluation with cervical biopsies.All participants underwent the Hybrid Capture II test and 320 underwent the three HPV tests. Sensitivities of Hybrid Capture II for detecting CIN and high-grade CIN (0.81 and 0.86, respectively) were similar to those of cytology (0.83 and 0.82, respectively) and PCR (0.77 and 0.95, respectively), and higher than those of Southern blot hybridization (0.48 and 0.45, respectively). Compared with cytology, combined triage with Hybrid Capture II improved sensitivities for detecting CIN (0.94 versus 0.83, P <.001) and high-grade CIN (0.96 versus 0.85), though the latter difference was not significant (P =.17). In women with ASCUS, sensitivities of combined triage and cytology for detecting CIN were 0.94 and 0.71, respectively (P =.01), and sensitivities of the two methods for detecting high-grade CIN were 0.92 and 0.66, respectively (P =.13). The increase in sensitivity was lower among women with low-grade SILs; for these women, cytology had high sensitivity (0.86 for CIN and 1.00 for high-grade CIN). The specificity of combined triage was significantly lower than that of cytology in both groups.Compared with repeat cytology, combined triage with HPV testing markedly improves sensitivity for detecting CIN in women with ASCUS, but at the expense of specificity.Atypical glandular cells of undetermined significance (AGUS): cytopathologic features, histopathologic results, and human papillomavirus DNA detection.We intensively reviewed 137 smears initially classified as atypical glandular cells of undetermined significance (AGUS) to refine cytological criteria for evaluating these cases, evaluate histological outcomes, and assess the value of human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA testing in management. Consenting, nonpregnant study participants were identified from a cohort of 46,009 women receiving routine Pap smear screening in a managed care setting. Colposcopy was performed on all women, and at least one histological sample was obtained from each. Review diagnoses were assigned to smears and biopsy specimens by two separate panels of pathologists. DNA testing for cancer-associated HPV types was performed on rinses of cytological samplers after a smear and thin-layer slide had been made. On review, 47 (34%) smears were reclassified as negative, 44 (32%) as AGUS, 30 (22%) as atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS), and 16 (12%) as squamous intraepithelial lesions (SIL). The 19 smears interpreted as high-grade intraepithelial lesions on review included 13 high-grade SIL (HSIL), two HSIL with AGUS, favor neoplastic (endocervical adenocarcinoma in situ [AIS]), and four AGUS, favor neoplastic (AIS). Review histological diagnoses were negative in 105 (77%), squamous or glandular atypia in four (3%), low-grade SIL (LSIL) in nine (7%), HSIL in 12 (9%), AIS in five (4%, including two with concurrent HSIL), and endometrial carcinoma in one (1%). HPV testing identified 11 (92%) of 12 women with histologically confirmed HSIL and all five with AIS (100%). A high-grade intraepithelial lesion or carcinoma is detected in approximately 14% of women with community-based diagnoses of AGUS who are referred for immediate evaluation. Use of refined cytological criteria and HPV DNA testing may permit improved management of women with AGUS.Identifying women with cervical neoplasia: using human papillomavirus DNA testing for equivocal Papanicolaou results.A Papanicolaou (Pap) test result of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) presents a clinical challenge. Only 5% to 10% of women with ASCUS harbor serious cervical disease, but more than one third of the high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (HSILs) in screening populations are identified from ASCUS Pap test results.To determine whether human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA testing of residual material from liquid-based Pap tests and referral of cases found to be HPV-positive directly to colposcopy could provide sensitive detection of underlying HSILs in women with ASCUS Pap results, compared with repeat Pap testing.Natural history of women with ASCUS Pap smear results, all of whom had liquid-based cytology, HPV testing, and subsequent repeat Pap tests and colposcopy with histologic evaluation, conducted at 12 gynecology clinics in a large managed care organization between October 1995 and June 1996.From a cohort of 46009 women who had routine cervical examinations, 995 women with Pap test results of ASCUS who consented to participate were identified.Cervical histology, HPV test results, and repeat Pap smear results, and sensitivity of HPV testing to identify patients found to have HSIL+ histology.Of 995 participants with ASCUS Pap test results, 973 had both a definitive histologic diagnosis and HPV result. Sixty-five (6.7%) had histologic HSIL or cancer. For women with histologic HSIL+, the HPV test was positive in 89.2% (95% confidence interval [CI], 78.4%-95.2%), and the specificity was 64.1 % (95% CI, 60.9%-67.2%). The repeat Pap smear result was abnormal in 76.2% (95% CI, 63.5%-85.7%). Triage based on HPV testing only or on repeat Pap testing only would refer similar proportions (approximately 39%) to colposcopy. The sensitivity of HPV DNA testing for HSIL was equivalent to, if not greater than, that of the repeat Pap test. We further estimated that an HPV-based algorithm including the immediate colposcopy of HPV-positive women, and then repeat Pap testing of all others, would provide an overall sensitivity of 96.9% (95% CI, 88.3%-99.5%).For women with ASCUS Pap tests, HPV DNA testing of residual specimens collected for routine cervical cytology can help identify those who have underlying HSIL. By testing the specimen collected at initial screening, the majority of high-risk cases can be identified and referred for colposcopy based on a single screening.Does typing of human papillomavirus assist in the triage of women with repeated low-grade, cervical cytologic abnormalities?To evaluate the ability of testing for high-risk human papillomavirus (HPV) using the hybrid capture technique to detect cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) in patients with repeated low-grade cervical cytologic abnormalities and an adequate and normal colposcopy.Hybrid capture testing and LEETZ were performed on 166 women with repeated low-grade cervical cytologic abnormalities who were referred for colposcopy which was to be adequate and normal.A highly significant correlation (P < 0.0001) was found between a positive test for high-risk HPV types and the finding of CIN II,III. In 67 women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance on repeated cytologic studies, a positive test for high-risk HPV types had a sensitivity and specificity of 90 and 96.5%, respectively, for detecting CIN II,III. In 99 patients with low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions found on repeated cytologic study, a positive test for high-risk HPV types identified all patients as having CIN II,III on cone biopsy (sensitivity, 100%), with a specificity of 86.4%. Restriction of tissue sampling to women who were positive for high-risk HPV types would have reduced the number of tissue samplings performed to 20.4%, while identifying 20 of 21 patients with biopsy-confirmed CIN II, III.A positive hybrid capture test for high-risk HPV types is highly sensitive and specific for detecting CIN II,III in patients with repeated low-grade cervical cytologic abnormalities and an adequate and normal colposcopy and may be used in the triage of these women before performing tissue sampling.Evaluation of atypical and low-grade cervical cytology in private practice.To evaluate the adequacy of cytology alone for diagnosis of grade of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) and to study performance of cytology, human papillomavirus (HPV) testing, and colposcopy in the evaluation of cytologic findings suggesting low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions (SIL), or atypical squamous (ASCUS) or atypical glandular (AGCUS) cells of undetermined significance.Standard gynecologic and cytologic evaluation and colposcopic inspection as an additional screening approach were performed on women with no prior hysterectomies screened in a private practice between January 1, 1993, and August 1, 1995. Among these 7651 women, 367 had ASCUS, AGCUS, or SIL cytology or clinically or colposcopically visible cervical lesions. Sensitivity, specificity, and relative risk of CIN in the 367 women were compared by colposcopic, cytologic, histologic and virologic diagnoses.The sensitivity of all non-negative Papanicolaou smears for CIN 2-3 and cancer was 92%, combined cytologic categories of high- and low-grade SIL were 59%, and high-grade SIL alone was 22%. Colposcopy was performed in all 367 patients, and positive findings led to biopsies in 48%. Colposcopy of patients with ASCUS increased detection of CIN 2-3 by 32% and CIN 1 by 48%. Cervical cytology was false negative in 8% of patients with CIN 2-3 and in 14% of those with CIN 1. These cases of CIN were detected by screening colposcopic inspection. High-risk HPV DNA was positive in 41% of women with CIN 2-3, and in 25% of those with CIN 1. The positive predictive value of ASCUS cytology increased from 5% to 42% for CIN 2-3 and from 30% to 85% for all grades of CIN in patients carrying high-risk HPV DNA. Virologic studies did not add to an increase in the sensitivity for CIN 2-3 among women in the low- and high-grade SIL cytology groups.Because of the limited sensitivity of the high-grade SIL cytologic category for CIN 2-3, we recommend that all women with ASCUS, AGCUS, low- or high-grade SIL cytology be recalled for colposcopy, with biopsy only when indicated by colposcopic findings.The clinical value of digene hybrid capture HPV DNA testing in a referral-based population with abnormal pap smears.The hybrid capture human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA assay is offered by the manufacturer to assist clinicians with patients with ASCUS pap smear results to assess the risk factor and to potentially direct follow-up of these patients. In our practice, a gynecologic oncology practice that has a referral based population with abnormal pap smears, our purpose was to evaluate the patients referred with all grades of abnormal cervical cytology.One hundred consecutive patients who were referred for evaluation of abnormal cervical cytology: atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS); low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LGSIL); high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HGSIL); or squamous cell carcinoma (SCC) were evaluated by repeat pap smear, hybrid capture HPV DNA analysis and colposcopy. Colposcopic findings were recorded, and if appropriate, cervical biopsies were performed. Hybrid capture results were correlated with histologic and cytologic findings. Using histopathologic diagnosis as the reference standard, the sensitivity and positive predictive value of pap smear and high risk HPV were calculated. The Kappa test was used to correlate colposcopic and histopathologic findings.Repeat pap smears at the time of initial consultation demonstrated 25 patients with normal results, 39 with LGSIL, 30 with HGSIL, 1 SCC and 5 ASCUS. Seventy-eight patients underwent cervical biopsy. Colposcopic findings correlated significantly with histopathologic findings (p<0.0001). Forty-four percent of patients tested positive for HPV DNA: 40 patients with high risk HPV, three patients with low risk HPV, and one patient with both high risk and low risk HPV. Sixteen of 39 patients (41%) with LGSIL on pap smear tested positive for high risk HPV; 37% of patients in this group required cervical conization because cervical biopsies demonstrated moderate/severe dysplasia. The diagnosis of moderate/severe dysplasia significantly correlated with the presence of high risk HPV [OR 78.9 (8.31-389.30)]. There was no significant correlation between the HPV DNA signal strengths and the histologic grade of dysplasia. The sensitivity and the positive predictive value of pap smear alone in identifying moderate/severe dysplasia was 62% and 96%, respectively. The combination of HGSIL pap smears and high risk HPV increased the sensitivity but not the positive predictive value for the detection of moderate/severe dysplasia to 77.7% and 95%, respectively (P=NS).Although in this setting, the use of hybrid capture DNA testing did not significantly improve the sensitivity or positive predictive value of the diagnosis of HGSIL cytology when compared to cytologically indicated plus colposcopically directed cervical biopsies in this population of women at high risk for the presence of disease, the combination of HGSIL pap smears and high-risk HPV did result in a clinically important increase in the diagnosis of moderate/severe dysplasia.Risk factors for high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia in patients with mild cytological dyskaryosis: human papillomavirus testing versus multivariate tree analysis of demographic data.The objective of this study was to compare the use of molecular hybridization by hybrid capture methodology for human papillomavirus (HPV) with the use of demographic and lifestyle variables as intermediate triage in patients with cytological mild dyskaryosis. The study was designed as a prospective study using regression tree analysis of demographic data in consecutive patients who were subjected to colposcopic evaluation at the colposcopy clinic at the First Department of Obstetrics and Gynaecology, University of Milan (Milan, Italy). A total of 177 women were subjected to colposcopy because of a single routine Pap smear showing mild dyskaryosis. A structured interview, sampling for HPV testing for the detection of viral DNA by hybrid capture methodology, and colposcopic evaluation with cervical biopsies were performed for each subject. The accuracies of molecular hybridization for HPV and of the classification model based on the demographic and lifestyle variables in predicting patients with histologically high-grade cervical intraepithelial lesions were measured. The classification model based on the demographic and lifestyle variables showed comparable results with molecular hybridization for HPV (specificity, 0.75 versus 0.73; sensitivity, 0.61 versus 0.67, respectively). The use of demographic and lifestyle variables appears to be a simple and economic possibility for triaging patients with mild dyskaryotic smears in a screening program.Comparison of two tests for detecting carcinogenic HPV in women with Papanicolaou smear reports of ASCUS and LSIL.The detection of cancer-associated types of human papillomavirus (HPV) in cervical specimens predicts the presence and future development of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN). The purposes of this study were (1) to determine the efficacy of a second-generation assay by hybrid capture (HC II) to detect carcinogenic HPV from residual cervical cells of a liquid-based cervical cytologic specimen, and (2) to compare the performance of this second-generation test with the first-generation hybrid capture (HCT) HPV test of material from direct cervical sampling to detect CIN in women with atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) and low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL) Papanicolaou (Pap) smear reports.Women with a recent Pap smear report of ASCUS or LSIL had a sampling of the cervix using either an Ayre's spatula and cytobrush or an Accellon device sampling for liquid-based cytologic system HC II HPV testing, followed by a Dacron swab sampling of the cervix for standard HCT HPV testing of the paired specimens. All women received colposcopy examinations including cervical biopsy and endocervical curettage, when indicated, to determine criterion standards for comparison.Paired swabs and liquid-based cervical specimens from 242 women were available for testing by standard HCT and the newer HC II HPV DNA assays. The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values for detecting CIN grade 2 or 3 (CIN 2/3) were 61.9%, 57.0%, 12.0%, and 94.0%, respectively, for the HCT test, and 90.5%, 29.4%, 10.9%, and 97.0%, respectively, for the liquid-based cytology HC II assay. When only women with an initial ASCUS Pap smear report were considered, the HC II test results were 88.9%, 40.3%, 9.1%, and 98.2%, respectively.Testing for lower genital tract carcinogenic HPV DNA using a cervical cytology liquid transport media residual sample is clinically feasible. The new HC II microplate HPV test achieved a greater test sensitivity for detecting carcinogenic HPV and correspondingly of CIN 2/3 compared with the currently available first-generation HC HPV test. Use of a liquid-based cervical cytology system combined with intermediate triage by HC II testing of residual cells for carcinogenic HPV alone may help to efficiently identify CIN 2/3 in women who have a prior screening Pap smear report of ASCUS.Triage of women with ASCUS and LSIL on Pap smear reports: management by repeat Pap smear, HPV DNA testing, or colposcopy?The purpose of this study was to determine the efficacy of a repeat Papanicolaou (Pap) smear and the Hybrid Capture tube-based (HCT) HPV DNA test for detecting cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) grade 2 or 3 in women with recent atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) or low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (LSIL) Pap smear reports.Women with a recent Pap smear report of ASCUS (n = 169) or LSIL (n = 110) had a repeat Pap smear, sampling of the cervix for HCT HPV DNA assay and a colposcopy examination. Data were evaluated using three different triage thresholds for colposcopy examination: a repeat Pap smear of persistent ASCUS or more severe dysplasia, a finding of persistent LSIL or more severe dysplasia, and a carcinogenic HPV test result.The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values for detecting CIN 2/3 were 70%, 45%, 7%, and 96% for a repeat Pap smear using an ASCUS-positive threshold and 20%, 86%, 8%, and 94% for a repeat Pap smear using an LSIL-positive threshold, respectively, when women with an initial ASCUS Pap smear were considered. HPV testing for carcinogenic viruses alone or in combination with a repeat Pap smear (using ASCUS as a positive threshold) yielded results of 50%, 67%, 9%, and 96%, respectively, and 70%, 37%, 7%, and 95%, respectively, for detecting CIN 2/3. In women with an initial LSIL Pap smear, respective values for detecting CIN 2/3 by a repeat Pap smear with an ASCUS threshold were 92%, 26%, 14%, and 96%, and for an LSIL threshold 23%, 64%, 8%, and 86%, respectively. Hybrid Capture HPV testing alone or in combination with a repeat Pap smear yielded 69%, 43%, 14%, and 91%, respectively, and 100%, 21%, 14%, and 100%, respectively.A Pap smear triage threshold restricted to LSIL or more severe dysplasia for women with prior ASCUS or LSIL Pap smear results was clearly ineffective for detecting high-grade cervical precancerous lesions. In contrast, when the repeat Pap smear triage threshold was expanded to include persistent ASCUS as abnormal, 83% of the women with CIN 2/3 were detected. Detection of carcinogenic HPV DNA using the HCT test was almost as sensitive for detecting CIN 2/3 as a solitary repeat Pap smear using an ASCUS or more severe positive threshold. Combining the HPV test with a repeat Pap smear did not significantly improve the sensitivity of cytology for detecting high-grade CIN. This study suggests that women with ASCUS and particularly LSIL Pap smears should be referred for a colposcopy examination until better triage methods become available.Human papillomavirus testing as triage for atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance and low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions: sensitivity, specificity, and cost-effectiveness.Our purpose was to evaluate the cost-effectiveness of the use of a Food and Drug Administration-approved human papillomavirus test in triaging patients with Papanicolaou smears showing atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance or a low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion for colposcopy compared with an algorithm that used cytologic follow-up.Four hundred sixty-two women referred to our Colposcopy Clinic with a Papanicolaou smear report of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance or a low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion underwent repeat Papanicolaou smear, cervical colposcopy, directed cervical biopsy, and endocervical curettage. In addition, human papillomavirus testing by the Food and Drug Administration-approved HPV Profile (Digene Diagnostics, Silver Spring, Md.) test was done. A comparison of sensitivity, specificity, and cost-effectiveness of an algorithm determining the need for colposcopy on the basis of repeat cytologic testing versus an algorithm that incorporated repeat cytologic testing and human papillomavirus screening was done. The cost-effectiveness of both of these triage algorithms was also compared.As expected, high-risk human papillomavirus deoxyribonucleic acid was detected with greater frequency in relation to increasing severity of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia. In 268 women, the follow-up smear obtained in our clinic was reported as negative. High-risk human papillomavirus types were found in 23.5% of these women. In the human papillomavirus-negative women, 5.9% had grade 2 or 3 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia confirmed on cervical biopsy. In comparison, 20.6% of those with a positive result of the human papillomavirus test had grade 2 or 3 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia on biopsy (p < 0.001). Despite this difference, the sensitivity of a positive result of a high-risk human papillomavirus test in predicting the presence of grade 2 or 3 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia was only 52%. Among the women for whom a follow-up clinic Papanicolaou smear was reported as showing atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance or a low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion, there was no difference in the frequency of biopsy-proved grade 2 or 3 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia between those women with a positive human papillomavirus test result and those with a negative test result. Colposcopy would have been recommended for 194 women because of a repeat clinic smear revealing atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance, a low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion, or a high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion, and in 21.6% of these grade 2 or 3 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia was shown on biopsy (sensitivity 63%, specificity 62%). Colposcopy would have been recommended for 180 women because high-risk human papillomavirus or a high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion was detected at the clinic visit, and in 25% of this group grade 2 or 3 cervical intraepithelial neoplasia was shown on biopsy (sensitivity 67%, specificity 66%). Sensitivity and specificity were virtually identical for the two algorithms, but the cost of human papillomavirus testing was nearly double that of triage based on repeat cytologic testing alone ($692 vs $1246 per case).The Food and Drug Administration-approved HPV Profile test is not a cost-effective triage for patients referred with Papanicolaou smears reported as showing atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance or low-grade squamous lesions.Human papillomavirus deoxyribonucleic acid detection in mildly or moderately dysplastic smears: a possible method for selecting patients for colposcopy.Current screening protocols for cervical cancer dictate that patients with smears read as mild or moderate dysplasia of the uterine cervix undergo colposcopy, although approximately half these women do not prove to have high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions. The aim of this study was to determine whether human papillomavirus testing is capable of discriminating between high- and low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions so as to be useful in reducing the number of colposcopic examinations.We tested 190 consecutive patients with smears read as mild or moderate dysplasia for the presence of human papillomavirus deoxyribonucleic acid by use of two different polymerase chain reactions with the consensus primer pairs CPI/IIG and MY09/11. Typing was carried out by direct sequence analysis of the CPI/IIG amplimers. The MY09/11 amplimers were detected in enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay format with the SHARP (Solution Hybridization Assay for PCR Products) Signal System with two probe mixtures (A and B) to detect nononcogenic and oncogenic human papillomavirus types. The human papillomavirus test results were compared with the histologic diagnosis, which was regarded as the reference standard.Fifty-six of the 190 patients had high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions. The sensitivity was 96% for the CPI/IIG test and 95% for the MY09/11 polymerase chain reaction plus SHARP Signal System when probe B only was used. The specificity was 33% for the CPI/IIG test and 40% for the MY09/11 polymerase chain reaction plus SHARP Signal System when probe B was used.A negative CPI/IIG or SHARP Signal System probe B test can select, respectively, 44 or 54 of the 134 patients without high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions. The use of these human papillomavirus tests as a secondary triage in patients with smears that were read as mild or moderate dysplasia could prevent those patients from undergoing unnecessary colposcopy. However, respectively, 2 or 3 of the 56 patients who have high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions would be missed by human papillomavirus testing.Human papillomavirus testing by hybrid capture appears to be useful in triaging women with a cytologic diagnosis of atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance.Our purpose was to determine the clinical value of human papillomavirus deoxyribonucleic acid testing with the hybrid capture test, specifically to examine whether human papillomavirus testing could identify which women with Papanicolaou smears read as atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance were most likely to have histologically confirmed cervical intraepithelial neoplasia.Hybrid capture testing for 14 human papillomavirus types, repeat Papanicolaou smears, and colposcopically directed biopsies were performed concurrently on 217 women referred to a student health colposcopy clinic with a previous Papanicolaou smear read as atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance.Human papillomavirus deoxyribonucleic acid positivity was associated with an eightfold increased likelihood of histologic confirmation of cervical intraepithelial neoplasia. The sensitivity of hybrid capture for any cervical intraepithelial neoplasia was 86% (43/50) and for grade 2 or 3 was 93% (14/15), whereas the corresponding values for the repeat Papanicolaou smear were 60% (30/50) and 73% (11/15), respectively. Moreover, high viral levels of human papillomavirus types known to be associated with cervical cancer were strongly predictive of high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia.Testing for human papillomavirus deoxyribonucleic acid with hybrid capture appears to offer an effective means by which patients whose cervical Papanicolaou smears have been read as atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance could be triaged for colposcopy. In particular, sensitivity for high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia could be maintained and specificity markedly improved by referring only those patients who had elevated levels of human papillomavirus deoxyribonucleic acid of cancer-associated viral types.Comparison of management algorithms for the evaluation of women with low-grade cytologic abnormalities.To present our clinical experience using a repeat Papanicolaou smear and human papillomavirus (HPV) DNA testing to evaluate patients with low-grade cytologic abnormalities.We performed a retrospective chart review of women who were referred for the evaluation of a Papanicolaou smear and were diagnosed as having either atypical cells of undetermined clinical significance or a low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (SIL). All women included in this review had a repeat Papanicolaou smear, HPV DNA testing with the Hybrid Capture method, and a colposcopic examination.The sensitivity and specificity of the repeat Papanicolaou smear for detecting biopsy-confirmed cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) were 0.74 and 0.67, respectively, in the 398 women referred for a previous low-grade SIL or atypical Papanicolaou smear. The sensitivity and specificity of a HPV DNA test positive for "high oncogenic risk" HPV types were 0.73 and 0.66, respectively. Triage using a repeat Papanicolaou smear and an HPV DNA test in combination correctly identified 92% of the women with biopsy-proven CIN, but 71% of the women would have been referred for colposcopy with this form of triage.A repeat Papanicolaou smear combined with a HPV DNA test is a sensitive alternative to colposcopic evaluation for the detection of CIN in women referred for a previous low-grade abnormal Papanicolaou smear. However, because of the low specificity of this approach, it results in only modest cost reductions compared to the more standard triage of performing colposcopy at the first visit.Human papillomavirus status in the prediction of high-grade cervical intraepithelial neoplasia in patients with persistent low-grade cervical cytological abnormalities.The role of human papillomavirus (HPV) detection in the management of patients with persistent low-grade (mild dyskaryosis or less) cervical cytological abnormalities is unclear. We have analysed cytological material from 167 such patients both cytologically and by non-isotopic in situ hybridisation (NISH) for HPV 16, 18, 31 and 33 and consensus primer polymerase chain reaction (PCR) amplification followed by both generic and specific typing for these HPV types. Cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN) 2 or 3 was present in 40 of 167 patients (23.9%), and the positive predictive values (PPVs) for the presence of CIN 2 or 3, of moderate or severe dyskaryosis at repeat cytology and an HPV-positive NISH and generic PCR signal were 100%, 66% and 42% respectively. The corresponding sensitivities were 48%, 68% and 87%. Addition of cytology to molecular analysis improved both PPV and sensitivity, the best combination being NISH and cytopathology (PPV 71%, sensitivity 87%). These data demonstrate that the presence of CIN 2 or 3 in patients with mild cytological abnormalities can be predicted by molecular detection of HPV in some cases, particularly when combined with cytological analysis. However, the magnitude of this prediction is dependent on the population of patients studied, and the clinical role of this approach therefore remains to be defined.Should all women with cervical atypia be referred for colposcopy: a HARNET study. Harrisburgh Area Research Network.Clinicians who manage women with Papanicolaou (Pap) smears showing atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance (ASCUS) may miss clinically significant cervical disease by repeating the cytology alone. We evaluated the ability of the human papillomavirus (HPV) screen and the naked-eye examination after a cervical acetic acid wash to enhance the follow-up Pap smear in predicting an abnormal colposcopic biopsy.Pap smears were performed on all women (N = 7458) attending six family practice offices for a health maintenance examination from August 1989 through February 1991. Consenting subjects with ASCUS underwent repeat cytological testing, an HPV screen, and a cervical acetic acid wash examination immediately before colposcopy after a 4- to 6-month waiting period.Of the 122 consenting women identified with ASCUS, 67 (55%) demonstrated abnormalities on biopsy, including 26 with condyloma, 26 with cervical intraepithelial neoplasia I (CIN I), and 15 with CIN II to III. The false-negative rate, 58%, of the follow-up Pap smear alone for detecting these cases of condyloma and CIN was significantly decreased (false-negative rate, 27%) with the use of the cervical acetic acid wash as an adjunctive test. There was no additional reduction in the false-negative rate with the use of the HPV screen. Of the 15 subjects with high-grade cervical lesions (CIN II to III), 14 had either an abnormal follow-up Pap smear or an abnormal cervical acetic acid wash examination.Among women with cervical atypia, a single follow-up Pap smear alone failed to detect one third of the cases of high-grade disease. Ninety-three percent of these cases were detected, however, with a follow-up Pap smear and an acetic acid wash. Our one subject with a high-grade lesion missed with this combination of tests had an unsatisfactory Pap smear. Use of both tests together may reliably guide clinical decisions regarding the management of cervical atypia.An evaluation of human papillomavirus testing as part of referral to colposcopy clinics.To determine the usefulness of human papillomavirus (HPV) testing as a triage method for predicting which women referred to a colposcopy clinic were most likely to have histologically confirmed cervical intraepithelial neoplasia (CIN).Papanicolaou tests, ViraPap tests for HPV infection, and colposcopically directed biopsies were performed concurrently on 482 women referred to a student health colposcopy clinic.The results demonstrated that HPV positivity was associated with a greatly increased likelihood of histologic confirmation of CIN, especially among women with concurrent cytologic findings that were negative or showed only atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance.Testing for HPV appears to have a role in the triage of students now being referred to our colposcopy clinic. A combination of HPV testing and repeated cytologic screening would provide reasonably sensitive screening for cervical neoplasia while limiting the use of colposcopic services, which are currently overburdened. The eventual usefulness of HPV testing will depend on the cost and availability of colposcopy services, the cost of Papanicolaou tests, the cost and accuracy of HPV tests, and the predictive value of HPV detection in the population being screened.